Massachusetts, session 194th, H5501.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. To provide for the operations of the several departments, boards,
commissions and institutions of the commonwealth and other services of the commonwealth and
for certain permanent improvements and to meet certain requirements of law, the sums set forth
in this act, for the several purposes and subject to the conditions specified, are hereby
appropriated from the General Fund unless specifically designated otherwise, subject to the
provisions of law regulating the disbursement of public funds and the approval thereof for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. All sums appropriated under this act, including supplemental
and deficiency budgets, shall be expended in a manner reflecting and encouraging a policy of
nondiscrimination and equal opportunity for members of minority groups, women and persons
with a disability. All officials and employees of an agency, board, department, commission or
division receiving funds under this act shall take affirmative steps to ensure equality of
opportunity in the internal affairs of state government and in their relations with the public,
including those persons and organizations doing business with the commonwealth. Each agency,
board, department, commission and division of the commonwealth, in spending appropriated
sums and discharging its statutory responsibilities, shall adopt measures to ensure equal
opportunity in the areas of hiring, promotion, demotion or transfer, recruitment, layoff or
termination, rates of compensation, in-service or apprenticeship training programs and all other
terms and conditions of employment.
1

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
SECTION 1A. In accordance with Articles LXIII and CVII of the Articles of Amendment to the
Constitution of the Commonwealth and section 6D of chapter 29 of the General Laws, it is hereby declared
that the amounts of revenue set forth in this section by source for the respective funds of the commonwealth
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027 are necessary and sufficient to provide the means to defray the
appropriations and expenditures from such funds for said fiscal year as set forth and authorized in this act.
The comptroller shall keep a distinct account of actual receipts from each such source by each such fund
to furnish the executive office for administration and finance and the house and senate committees on ways
and means with quarterly statements comparing such receipts with the projected receipts set forth in this
section, and include a full statement comparing such actual and projected receipts in the annual report for
said fiscal year pursuant to section 12 of chapter 7A of the General Laws. The quarterly and annual reports
shall also include detailed statements of any other sources of revenue for the budgeted funds in addition to
those specified in this section.
Fiscal Year 2027 Revenue by Source and Budgeted Fund (in Millions)
Commonweal
All th Other
Budgete General Transportatio Major Other
Revenue Source d Funds Fund n Fund Funds Funds
Alcoholic Beverages 96.5 96.5
Banks 19.0 19.0
Cigarettes 225.2 225.2
Corporations 3,383.1 3,383.1
Deeds 411.6 411.6
Fair Share 2,700.0 1,725.0 975.0
Income 25,621.0 25,621.0
Inheritance and Estate 718.9 718.9
Insurance 783.9 756.9 27.0
Marijuana Excise 193.9 193.9
Motor Fuel 697.8 696.9 0.9
Public Utilities
Room Occupancy 259.3 259.3
Sales - Regular 6,827.9 4,506.9 2,321.0
Sales - Meals 1,750.9 1,750.9
Sales - Motor Vehicles 1,198.7 791.2 407.5
Miscellaneous 12.9 12.9
Fiscal Year 2027 Base Tax Revenue Estimate 44,900.5 39,487.1 2,463.2 193.9 2,756.4
Statutory Tax Transfers
Annual Contribution to the State Pension System (5,130.5) (5,130.5)
Sales Tax Transfer to the MBTA (1,444.3) (1,444.3)
Sales Tax Transfer to the MSBA (1,284.3) (1,284.3)
UI Surcharge to the Workforce Training Trust Fund (27.0) (27.0)
Fair Share Transfer to Education and Transportation Fund (1,725.0) (1,725.0)
Excess Capital Gains to the Stabilization Fund (128.0) (128.0)
Excess Capital Gains to the State Retiree Benefits Trust Fund (128.0) (128.0)
Excess Capital Gains to the Pension Liability Fund (230.4) (230.4)
Total Statutory Tax Transfers (10,097.4 (7,341.9) (2,755.5)
)
Total Fiscal Year 2027 Consensus Tax Revenue Available 34,803.1 32,145.1 2,463.2 193.9 0.9
for Budget
Tax Initiatives and Other Tax Revenue
Tax-Related Settlements & Judgments 50.0 50.0
Federal Conformity Phase In 108.0 108.0
Pass-through Entity Excise Tax Expansion 296.0 296.0
Food Donation Tax Credit (5.5) (5.5)
Total Tax Initiatives and Other Tax Revenue 448.5 448.5
Total Taxes for Budget 35,251.6 32,593.6 2,463.2 193.9 0.9
Non-Tax Revenue
Federal Reimbursements 15,854.0 15,845.5 8.4
Departmental Revenues 6,554.3 5,795.3 692.9 12.3 53.9
2

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
Consolidated Transfers 5,152.4 5,152.4
Total Non-Tax Revenue 27,560.6 26,793.2 692.9 12.3 62.3
Fiscal Year 2027 Grand Total 62,812.2 59,386.8 3,156.0 206.1 63.2
SECTION 1B. The comptroller shall keep a distinct account of actual receipts of non-tax revenues by
each department, board, commission or institution to furnish the executive office for administration and
finance and the house and senate committees on ways and means with quarterly statements comparing
such receipts with projected receipts set forth in this section and to include a full statement comparing such
receipts with projected receipts in the annual report for such fiscal year pursuant to section 12 of chapter
7A of the General Laws. The quarterly and annual reports shall also include detailed statements of any
other sources of revenue for the budgeted funds in addition to those specified in this section.
Non-Tax Revenue: Department Summary
Federal Departmental Budgeted Total Total
Revenue Source Revenues Revenues Transfers Unrestricted Restricted
Judiciary
Supreme Judicial Court $0 $2,237,901 $0 $2,237,901 $0
Committee for Public Counsel $0 $3,038,139 $0 $3,038,139 $0
Appeals Court $0 $284,765 $0 $284,765 $0
Trial Court $0 $65,745,420 $0 $65,745,420 $0
TOTAL: $0 $71,306,225 $0 $71,306,225 $0
District Attorneys
Plymouth District Attorney $0 $100,000 $0 $100,000 $0
Suffolk District Attorney $0 $450,000 $0 $450,000 $0
Worcester District Attorney $0 $5,000 $0 $5,000 $0
TOTAL: $0 $555,000 $0 $555,000 $0
Secretary of the Commonwealth
Secretary of the Commonwealth $0 $311,026,204 $0 $310,511,204 $531,000
TOTAL: $0 $311,026,204 $0 $310,511,204 $531,000
Treasurer and Receiver General
Office of the Treasurer $0 $620,415,808 $573,116,352 $1,143,182,160 $83,203,995
Massachusetts Cultural Council $0 $21,597 $0 $21,597 $0
Massachusetts Teachers' Retirement Board $0 $45,105,410 $0 $45,105,410 $0
State Lottery Commission $0 $30,887 $1,321,596,996 $1,321,627,883 $0
TOTAL: $0 $665,573,702 $1,894,713,348 $2,509,937,050 $83,203,995
Attorney General
Office of the Attorney General $5,979,752 $59,857,050 $0 $58,347,250 $7,489,552
TOTAL: $5,979,752 $59,857,050 $0 $58,347,250 $7,489,552
State Ethics Commission
State Ethics Commission $0 $150,000 $0 $150,000 $0
TOTAL: $0 $150,000 $0 $150,000 $0
Inspector General
Office of the Inspector General $0 $1,680,000 $0 $0 $1,680,000
TOTAL: $0 $1,680,000 $0 $0 $1,680,000
3

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
Non-Tax Revenue: Department Summary
Federal Departmental Budgeted Total Total
Revenue Source Revenues Revenues Transfers Unrestricted Restricted
Office of Campaign and Political Finance
Office of Campaign and Political Finance $0 $79,500 $0 $79,500 $0
TOTAL: $0 $79,500 $0 $79,500 $0
Massachusetts Commission Against
Discrimination
Massachusetts Commission Against
Discrimination $0 $360,326 $0 $35,007 $325,319
TOTAL: $0 $360,326 $0 $35,007 $325,319
Office of the State Comptroller
Office of the State Comptroller $0 $98,592,914 $2,343,795,802 $2,442,388,716 $153,206,551
TOTAL: $0 $98,592,914 $2,343,795,802 $2,442,388,716 $153,206,551
Massachusetts Gaming Commission
Massachusetts Gaming Commission $0 $0 $368,345,895 $368,345,895 $0
TOTAL: $0 $0 $368,345,895 $368,345,895 $0
Cannabis Control Commission
Cannabis Control Commission $0 $23,569,523 $0 $23,569,523 $0
TOTAL: $0 $23,569,523 $0 $23,569,523 $0
Executive Office for Administration and
Finance
Secretary of Administration and Finance $0 $1,108,130 $0 $1,108,130 $34,584,188
Division of Capital Asset Management &
Maintenance $0 $4,644,339 $9,701,826 $4,638,339 $35,336,798
Civil Service Commission $0 $12,500 $0 $12,500 $0
Group Insurance Commission $0 $1,328,690,159 $409,862,157 $1,736,205,695 $2,346,621
Division of Administrative Law Appeals $0 $70,000 $0 $0 $70,000
Department of Revenue $56,017,558 $217,431,963 $0 $266,682,270 $34,706,204
Appellate Tax Board $0 $2,985,306 $0 $2,585,306 $400,000
Human Resources Division $0 $1,235,830 $0 $1,235,830 $71,047,846
Operational Services Division $0 $30,161,252 $0 $12,599,064 $37,044,621
TOTAL: $56,017,558 $1,586,339,479 $419,563,983 $2,025,067,134 $215,536,278
Executive Office of Technology Services
and Security
Executive Office of Technology Services
and Security $0 $2,733,931 $0 $0 $253,358,378
TOTAL: $0 $2,733,931 $0 $0 $253,358,378
Executive Office of Veterans' Services
Department of Veterans' Services $0 $765,484 $0 $5,484 $5,760,000
Chelsea Soldiers' Home $16,480,848 $2,654,195 $0 $18,635,043 $500,000
Holyoke Soldiers' Home $8,687,722 $2,321,163 $0 $8,008,885 $3,000,000
TOTAL: $25,168,570 $5,740,842 $0 $26,649,412 $9,260,000
4

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
Non-Tax Revenue: Department Summary
Federal Departmental Budgeted Total Total
Revenue Source Revenues Revenues Transfers Unrestricted Restricted
Executive Office of Energy and
Environmental Affairs
Executive Office of Energy & Environmental
Affairs $25,000 $5,051,342 $0 $4,386,342 $7,310,837
Department of Public Utilities $0 $51,567,000 $0 $51,567,000 $0
Department of Environmental Protection $0 $36,332,145 $0 $30,440,593 $5,891,552
Department of Fish and Game $8,420,000 $14,033,313 $1,945,000 $23,930,324 $467,989
Department of Agricultural Resources $0 $6,828,571 $0 $6,828,571 $0
Department of Conservation and
Recreation $0 $32,099,974 $0 $32,099,974 $0
Department of Energy Resources $0 $10,083,672 $0 $10,083,672 $0
TOTAL: $8,445,000 $155,996,017 $1,945,000 $159,336,476 $13,670,378
Executive Office of Health and Human
Services
Secretary of Health and Human Services $12,654,847,415 $2,099,364,010 $16,000,000 $14,455,211,425 $458,700,034
Mass Commission for the Blind $5,289,456 $191,736 $0 $5,481,192 $0
Massachusetts Rehabilitation Commission $8,289,128 $77,310 $0 $8,366,438 $0
Mass Commission for the Deaf $261,584 $3,500 $0 $265,084 $6,450,000
Department of Youth Services $4,301,146 $288,293 $0 $4,589,439 $0
Department of Transitional Assistance $471,136,421 $1,121,427 $19,075,578 $491,333,426 $0
Department of Public Health $234,852,252 $121,103,855 $1,000,000 $150,622,109 $285,633,705
Department of Children and Families $382,826,989 $3,143,392 $700,000 $379,527,850 $7,142,531
Department of Mental Health $169,871,904 $22,522,218 $0 $192,269,122 $125,000
Department of Developmental Services $1,246,279,965 $4,394,397 $0 $1,250,674,362 $0
TOTAL: $15,177,956,260 $2,252,210,138 $36,775,578 $16,938,340,447 $758,051,270
Health Policy Commission
Health Policy Commission $0 $11,148,300 $0 $11,148,300 $0
TOTAL: $0 $11,148,300 $0 $11,148,300 $0
Center for Health Information and
Analysis
Center for Health Information and Analysis $0 $37,277,886 $0 $37,277,886 $0
TOTAL: $0 $37,277,886 $0 $37,277,886 $0
Board of Library Commissioners
Board of Library Commissioners $0 $15,039 $0 $15,039 $0
TOTAL: $0 $15,039 $0 $15,039 $0
Executive Office of Housing and Livable
Communities
Department of Housing & Livable
Communities $0 $7,063,538 $0 $3,412,477 $3,651,061
TOTAL: $0 $7,063,538 $0 $3,412,477 $3,651,061
Executive Office of Economic
Development
5

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
Non-Tax Revenue: Department Summary
Federal Departmental Budgeted Total Total
Revenue Source Revenues Revenues Transfers Unrestricted Restricted
Executive Office of Housing and Economic
Development $0 $0 $0 $0 $3,091,734
Office of Consumer Affairs and Business
Regulation $0 $1,957,300 $0 $859,553 $1,097,747
Division of Banks $0 $52,644,595 $0 $49,644,595 $3,000,000
Division of Insurance $0 $160,773,862 $0 $160,773,862 $0
Division of Professional Licensure $0 $38,798,307 $0 $18,237,551 $20,560,756
Division of Standards $0 $5,622,090 $0 $4,718,528 $903,562
Massachusetts Marketing Partnership $0 $0 $5,343,355 $5,343,355 $0
Massachusetts Office of Business
Development $0 $1,194,528 $0 $1,194,528 $0
Department of Telecommunications and
Cable $0 $5,389,647 $0 $5,389,647 $0
TOTAL: $0 $266,380,329 $5,343,355 $246,161,619 $28,653,799
Executive Office of Labor and Workforce
Development
Labor and Workforce Development $0 $3,083,693 $23,786,462 $26,415,727 $454,428
TOTAL: $0 $3,083,693 $23,786,462 $26,415,727 $454,428
Executive Office of Education
Department of Early Education and Care $301,527,830 $4,517,760 $0 $305,525,590 $520,000
Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education $0 $7,508,998 $0 $4,888,116 $2,620,882
Department of Higher Education $0 $10,500,000 $0 $10,500,000 $0
Executive Office of Education $0 $0 $0 $0 $3,000,000
University of Massachusetts $0 $110,000,000 $0 $110,000,000 $0
Bridgewater State College $0 $250,000 $0 $250,000 $0
Fitchburg State College $0 $425,000 $0 $425,000 $0
Framingham State College $0 $115,000 $0 $115,000 $0
Massachusetts College of Liberal Arts $0 $150,000 $0 $150,000 $0
Salem State College $0 $803,000 $0 $803,000 $0
Westfield State College $0 $625,000 $0 $625,000 $0
Worcester State College $0 $425,000 $0 $425,000 $0
Berkshire Community College $0 $291,150 $0 $291,150 $0
Bristol Community College $0 $298,275 $0 $298,275 $0
Cape Cod Community College $0 $288,750 $0 $288,750 $0
Greenfield Community College $0 $118,750 $0 $118,750 $0
Holyoke Community College $0 $451,608 $0 $451,608 $0
Mass Bay Community College $0 $520,000 $0 $520,000 $0
Massasoit Community College $0 $393,165 $0 $393,165 $0
Mount Wachusett Community College $0 $259,320 $0 $259,320 $0
Northern Essex Community College $0 $379,648 $0 $379,648 $0
Quinsigamond Community College $0 $101,423 $0 $101,423 $0
Springfield Technical Community College $0 $780,000 $0 $780,000 $0
Roxbury Community College $0 $2,500,000 $0 $0 $2,500,000
Bunker Hill Community College $0 $0 $0 $0 $0
TOTAL: $301,527,830 $141,701,847 $0 $437,588,795 $8,640,882
6

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
Non-Tax Revenue: Department Summary
Federal Departmental Budgeted Total Total
Revenue Source Revenues Revenues Transfers Unrestricted Restricted
Executive Office of Public Safety and
Security
Executive Office of Public Safety and
Security $0 $2,100,000 $0 $2,100,000 $6,661,730
Office of the Chief Medical Examiner $0 $10,148,999 $0 $1,297,881 $8,851,118
Criminal History Systems Board $0 $30,746,070 $0 $24,929,150 $5,816,920
Department of State Police $1,935,922 $111,533,000 $0 $2,763,000 $155,862,297
Municipal Police Training Council $0 $2,800,000 $0 $0 $2,800,000
Department of Fire Services $0 $60,129,486 $0 $57,710,617 $2,418,869
Military Division $0 $1,900,000 $0 $0 $2,000,000
Emergency Management Agency $2,000,000 $0 $0 $2,000,000 $0
Department of Corrections $3,500,000 $6,013,000 $4,687,000 $0 $28,850,000
TOTAL: $7,435,922 $225,370,555 $4,687,000 $90,800,648 $213,260,934
Sheriffs
Hampden Sheriff's Office $1,035,000 $3,713,856 $0 $1,117,604 $3,631,252
Worcester Sheriff's Office $34,000 $20,000 $0 $54,000 $0
Middlesex Sheriff's Office $14,600 $210,338 $0 $49,938 $175,000
Hampshire Sheriff's Office $7,600 $8,223 $0 $15,823 $0
Berkshire Sheriff's Office $8,500 $1,800,214 $0 $208,714 $1,600,000
Franklin Sheriff's Office $206,863 $7,152 $0 $214,015 $0
Essex Sheriff's Office $29,200 $1,858,697 $0 $37,897 $1,850,000
Barnstable Sheriff's Office $0 $1,506,036 $0 $6,036 $1,500,000
Bristol Sheriff's Office $148,764 $257,215 $0 $405,979 $0
Dukes Sheriff's Office $0 $448,764 $0 $148,764 $300,000
Norfolk Sheriff's Office $357,229 $215,430 $0 $357,229 $215,430
Plymouth Sheriff's Office $34,341,845 $300,000 $0 $34,341,845 $300,000
Suffolk Sheriff's Office $0 $2,000,000 $0 $200,000 $1,800,000
TOTAL: $36,183,601 $12,345,925 $0 $37,157,844 $11,371,682
Executive Office of Aging and
Independence
Department of Elder Affairs $235,246,726 $1,434,850 $0 $236,681,576 $0
TOTAL: $235,246,726 $1,434,850 $0 $236,681,576 $0
Massachusetts Department of
Transportation
Massachusetts Department of
Transportation $0 $638,502,672 $53,433,545 $691,936,217 $0
TOTAL: $0 $638,502,672 $53,433,545 $691,936,217 $0
Total Non-Tax Revenue $15,853,961,219 $6,580,095,485 $5,152,389,968 $26,753,214,967 $1,762,345,507
SECTION 2.
7

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
JUDICIARY.
Supreme Judicial Court.
0320-0003 For the operation of the supreme judicial court, including the salaries of the
chief justice and the 6 associate justices ..............................................................$12,684,431
0320-0010 For the operation of the clerk’s office of the supreme judicial court for Suffolk
county ......................................................................................................................$2,500,938
0321-0001 For the operation of the commission on judicial conduct ........................................$1,223,014
0321-0100 For the services of the board of bar examiners ......................................................$2,711,846
Committee for Public Counsel Services.
0321-1500 For the operation of the committee for public counsel services under chapter
211D of the General Laws, including, but not limited to, payroll costs of the
committee’s public defenders, attorneys in charge and appeals attorneys,
including fringe benefit costs; provided, that the committee shall maintain a
system in which not less than 20 per cent of indigent clients shall be
represented by public defenders; provided further, that to the extent feasible,
the committee shall assign public defenders to district and superior courts;
provided further, that the committee shall approve by majority vote any
increase in the base salary or rate of compensation for employees holding
management positions, including, but not limited to, chiefs, deputy chiefs,
directors, assistant directors and managers; provided further, that not later
than December 2, 2026, the committee shall submit a report to the executive
office for administration and finance and the house and senate committees
on ways and means that shall include, but not be limited to, the expected
surplus or deficiency of items 0321-1500, 0321-1510 and 0321-1520 for
fiscal year 2027; provided further, that not later than March 3, 2027, the
committee shall submit an annual report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means in a cumulative manner and which shall be
compared with data from the current period to the previous 2 fiscal years;
and provided further, that the report shall include, but not be limited to: (i)
the caseload of attorneys in charge compared to the caseload of public
defenders; (ii) the number of cases handled by the committee in each
reporting period, delineated by public defender and private bar advocate;
(iii) the average number of hours spent per case by public defenders; (iv)
the number of public defenders currently employed by the committee and
the total number employed by the committee at the end of each fiscal year,
delineated by division; (v) the number of public defender vacancies to be
filled; (vi) the average cost for public defender services rendered per case
in the prior fiscal year; (vii) the number of cases assigned to private bar
advocates; (viii) the average number of hours billed by private bar
advocates; (ix) the average cost for private bar advocate services rendered
per case in the prior fiscal year; (x) the billable hours of private counsel,
delineated by travel time and time spent in court, including wait time and trial
preparation time, including interview time, investigating time and research
time; (xi) any changes to the private bar billing system and any billing
improvements that have been made; (xii) the total number of support staff,
investigators, attorneys in charge and management personnel currently
employed by the committee and the total number employed by the
8

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
committee at the end of each fiscal year for the previous 2 fiscal years; and
(xiii) a summary of all spending for psychologists, psychiatrists and
investigators, including the total number of hours billed, the number of
unique vendors and the average number of hours billed ...................................$109,000,001
0321-1510 For compensation paid to private counsel assigned to criminal and civil
cases under subsection (b) of section 6 of chapter 211D of the General Laws
and under section 11 of said chapter 211D; provided, that not more than
$3,000,000 from this item shall be expended for services rendered prior to
fiscal year 2027 ...................................................................................................$245,827,979
0321-1520 For fees and costs as defined in section 27A of chapter 261 of the General
Laws, as ordered by a justice of the appeals court or a justice of a
department of the trial court on behalf of persons who are indigent as
defined in said section 27A of said chapter 261; provided, that not more than
$2,000,000 from this item shall be expended for services rendered prior to
fiscal year 2027 .....................................................................................................$25,172,236
Massachusetts Legal Assistance Corporation.
0321-1600 For the Massachusetts Legal Assistance Corporation to provide legal
representation for indigent or otherwise disadvantaged residents of the
commonwealth; provided, that not later than February 3, 2027, the
corporation shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on
ways and means using the most recent United States Census Bureau
population data available that shall include, but not be limited to: (i) the
number of persons assisted by the programs funded by the corporation in
the prior fiscal year; (ii) any proposed expansion of legal services, delineated
by type of service, target population and cost; and (iii) the total number of
indigent or otherwise disadvantaged residents who received services from
the corporation, delineated by type of case and geographic location;
provided further, that the corporation may contract with any organization to
provide representation; provided further, that not less than $125,000 shall
be expended to the Massachusetts Association of Mental Health for an
awareness campaign focused on the screening, early diagnosis, and
evidence-based treatment and medication for sleep and wakefulness
disorders, and their behavioral health and medical comorbidities; provided
further, that not less than $75,000 shall be expended to the University of
Massachusetts School of Law for the South Coast Bridge Program for
Legal Professionals to provide mentorship and professional development;
and provided further, that notwithstanding the first paragraph of section 9 of
chapter 221A of the General Laws, funds shall be expended for the
Disability Benefits Project, the Medicare Advocacy Project and the Domestic
Violence Legal Assistance Project ........................................................................$52,200,000
0321-1800 For the access to counsel program; provided, that funds may be expended
for costs associated with implementing the program; and provided further,
that, subject to appropriation, funds shall be distributed by the
Massachusetts Legal Assistance Corporation to designated non-profit
organizations to increase access to legal representation for low-income
tenants and low-income owner occupants in eviction proceedings ........................$3,000,000
Mental Health Legal Advisors Committee.
9

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
0321-2000 For the operation of the mental health legal advisors committee and for
certain programs for the indigent mentally ill established in section 34E of
chapter 221 of the General Laws ............................................................................$3,415,073
Prisoners’ Legal Services.
0321-2100 For the expenses of Prisoners’ Legal Services .......................................................$3,370,268
Social Law Library.
0321-2205 For the expenses of the social law library located in Suffolk county ......................$3,049,096
Appeals Court.
0322-0100 For the appeals court, including the salaries, traveling allowances and
expenses of the chief justice, recall justices and associate justices .....................$16,268,212
Trial Court.
0330-0101 For the salaries of the justices of the 7 departments of the trial court ..................$90,824,360
0330-0300 For the central administration of the trial court, including costs associated
with trial court non-employee services, dental and vision health plan
agreements for employees who are subject to a collective bargaining
agreement, jury expenses, law libraries, statewide telecommunications,
private and municipal court rentals and leases, operation of courthouse
facilities, rental of county court facilities, witness fees, printing expenses,
equipment maintenance and repairs, the court interpreter program,
insurance and chargeback costs, the Massachusetts sentencing
commission, court security and judicial training; provided, that 50 per cent
of all fees payable under rules 15(d) and 30(c)(8) of the Massachusetts
Rules of Criminal Procedure shall be paid from this item; provided further,
that funds may be expended for training on domestic violence issues, the
maintenance of a domestic violence registry, evaluations of batterers’
intervention programs and the risk assessment tool for domestic violence
offenders under chapter 260 of the acts of 2014; provided further, that not
less than $25,000 shall be expended for Cambridge Somerville Legal
Services within Greater Boston Legal Services, Inc.; provided further, that
not less than $378,000 shall be expended for the Race and Bias Initiative to
expand the trial court’s Office of Diversity, Equity, Inclusion & Experience
and to provide additional diversity training for all court employees; provided
further, that in planning and implementing the policies of the Race and Bias
Initiative, the trial court’s Office of Diversity, Equity, Inclusion & Experience
shall solicit feedback from community stakeholders in order to identify any
structural, organizational or cultural barriers to ensure equity in the justice
system for people of racial, linguistic, cultural or sexual minorities and shall
recommend methods to remove such barriers to guarantee the provision of
competent representation and inclusive practices in every courtroom in the
commonwealth; provided further, that funds shall be expended for juvenile
court investigators rates at an amount that at least maintains the rates from
fiscal year 2026; provided further, that funds may be expended to provide
information and assistance to self-represented litigants; provided further,
that the trial court shall submit quarterly reports to the house and senate
committees on ways and means on revenues collected in the trial court;
provided further, that each report shall provide for the previous quarter for
10

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
each court division and courthouse: (i) the total amount ordered in fees and
fines; (ii) the total amount dismissed in fees and fines; (iii) the total amount
paid in fees and fines; and (iv) the total amount outstanding in fees and fines;
provided further, that not later than February 3, 2027, the court administrator
shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways and
means detailing the number of court officers, per diem court officers and
security personnel located in each trial court of the commonwealth; provided
further, that notwithstanding section 9A of chapter 30 of the General Laws
or any other general or special law to the contrary, the rights afforded to a
veteran under said section 9A of said chapter 30, shall also be afforded to
any such veteran who holds a trial court office or position in the service of
the commonwealth not classified under chapter 31 of the General Laws,
other than an elective office, an appointive office for a fixed term or an office
or position under section 7 of said chapter 30 and who has: (a) held the
office or position for not less than 1 year; and (b) completed 30 years of total
creditable service to the commonwealth, as defined in section 1 of chapter
32 of the General Laws; provided further, that the trial court shall submit a
report to the victim and witness assistance board, established in section 4
of chapter 258B of the General Laws, detailing the amount of assessments
imposed within each court by a justice or clerk-magistrate during the
previous calendar year under section 8 of said chapter 258B; provided
further, that the report shall include, but not be limited to, the number of
cases in which the assessment was reduced or waived by a judge or clerk-
magistrate within the courts; provided further, that not later than January 6,
2027, the report shall be submitted to the victim and witness assistance
board; and provided further, that not less than 15 days before the transfer
of funds between items within the trial court, the court administrator shall
submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways and means
that shall include, but not be limited to: (1) the amount of funds transferred
from any item of appropriation; (2) the item number of the appropriation
making the transfer; (3) the item number of the appropriation receiving the
transfer; and (4) the reason for the transfer ........................................................$387,124,302
0330-0344 For the administration and transportation costs associated with a veterans
court program .............................................................................................................$274,746
0330-0410 For the implementation of alternative dispute resolution programming;
provided, that not less than $250,000 shall be expended for online dispute
resolution .................................................................................................................$1,372,241
0330-0441 For permanency mediation services in the probate and juvenile courts ...................$515,000
0330-0500 For the use of video teleconferencing for court appearances by persons in
the custody of the houses of correction .....................................................................$254,925
0330-0599 For a probation program that administers high-intensity supervision to
promote successful probation outcomes and reduce recidivism; provided,
that the office of the commissioner of probation may partner with the same
external research organization in fiscal year 2027 as selected in fiscal year
2026 to: (i) monitor program fidelity and design; (ii) implement the model;
and (iii) collect and analyze the outcome evaluation; provided further, that
said program shall be conducted at both a district and a superior court;
provided further, that the trial court shall maintain this probation program in
at least the 10 court locations currently in operation; and provided further,
that not later than March 15, 2027, the office of the commissioner of
probation shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways
11

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
and means that shall include, but not be limited to, any relevant data on
participants and outcomes ......................................................................................$1,383,811
0330-0601 For the operation of the specialty courts; provided, that no funds shall be
transferred from this item to any other item in the trial court; and provided
further, that not later than April 1, 2027, the trial court shall, in coordination
with partner departments and agencies, submit reports on interdepartmental
service agreements made with the partner departments and agencies to the
court administrator and the house and senate committees on ways and
means that shall include, but not be limited to: (i) the amount of funds
transferred to each specific agency or department for use in the specialty
courts; (ii) the specific intent of the transfer in relation to specialty court
operations; (iii) any additional services implemented by way of the transfer;
and (iv) the amount of unspent funds from the transfer at the time of
reporting ...................................................................................................................$8,947,480
0330-0612 For the administration of the Massachusetts Community Justice Project to
serve individuals with mental health and substance use disorders who are
involved in the criminal justice system; provided, that the trial court shall
continue to fund a project coordinator to oversee coordination and
administration and to provide financial oversight of the sequential intercept
model; and provided further, that not later than March 3, 2027, the project
coordinator shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on
ways and means that shall include, but not be limited to, the: (i) design of
the sequential intercept model mappings; (ii) locations of workshops held to
advocate for the model; (iii) number of cases in which the model has been
utilized; (iv) impact of the model on rehabilitation and recidivism; and (v) cost
savings associated with the model .............................................................................$283,606
0330-0613 For the implementation of the recommendations set forth by the Council of
State Governments Justice Center - Massachusetts Criminal Justice
Review including, but not limited to, the establishment of new programs and
expansion of existing programs targeted at recidivism reduction; provided,
that the trial court shall transfer funds to other commonwealth agencies and
departments as outlined in this item; provided further, that not less than 15
days before any such transfer, the trial court administrator shall notify the
house and senate committees on ways and means; provided further, that if
no state agency or department is specifically designated to receive funds
from this item, the trial court administrator shall distribute funding based on
the recommendations of the Council of State Governments Justice Center -
Massachusetts Criminal Justice Review; provided further, that not later than
March 3, 2027, each state agency or department receiving funds from this
item shall submit a report to the executive office for administration and
finance and the house and senate committees on ways and means
detailing, as applicable, participation, completion and recidivism rates,
delineated by gender; provided further, that the department of correction
shall expend not less than $637,500 to expand recidivism reduction
programming; provided further, that not later than March 3, 2027, the
department of correction shall submit a report to the executive office of
public safety and security, the executive office for administration and
finance, the house and senate committees on ways and means and the joint
committee on the judiciary on the types of recidivism reduction programs
provided, participation, completion and recidivism rates for said recidivism
reduction programming; provided further, that the report shall be delineated
by gender and include descriptions of new programs offered to women as a
result of these funds; provided further, that not less than $345,000 shall be
12

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
expended on grants administered by the executive office of public safety
and security to support the expansion of evidence-based cognitive
behavioral programs in county houses of correction and jails; provided
further, that the secretary of public safety and security shall award grants on
a competitive basis and applicants shall provide a plan for ensuring that
proposed programs shall be implemented with fidelity to a research-based,
evidence-based or evidence-informed program design; provided further,
that if there is no existing research or evidence supporting the proposed
program, applicants shall describe in detail how the program will be
evaluated with sufficient rigor to add to existing research; provided further,
that not less than $130,000 shall be expended for: (a) evaluating the
caseload of parole and probation officers; (b) hiring new officers accordingly;
and (c) expanding programs and services at community corrections centers;
provided further, that not less than $2,300,000 shall be expended for a
transitional youth early intervention probation pilot program to be
administered by the office of the commissioner of probation; provided
further, that not less than $45,000 shall be expended for the improvement
of case management and data-tracking capacity in the office of the
commissioner of probation; and provided further, that not less than
$5,075,000 shall be expended in conjunction with the executive office of
health and human services for the development and implementation of a
behavioral health strategy, including statewide capacity to track the
utilization of behavioral health care services and behavioral health
outcomes for persons in the criminal justice system within the Medicaid
management information system ............................................................................$8,662,500
Superior Court Department.
0331-0100 For the operation of the superior court department; provided, that funds shall
be expended for medical malpractice tribunals under section 60B of chapter
231 of the General Laws; and provided further, that the clerk of the court
shall be responsible for the internal administration of the clerk’s office,
including personnel, staff services and record keeping ........................................$39,925,794
District Court Department.
0332-0100 For the operation of the district court department, including a civil conciliation
program; provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, the district court of Chelsea shall be the permanent location for the
northern trial session to handle 6-person jury cases; and provided further,
that all personnel within said district court whose duties related to said
northern trial session shall report to the clerk-magistrate of said district court
...............................................................................................................................$92,986,131
Probate and Family Court Department.
0333-0002 For the operation of the probate and family court department; provided, that
not less than $848,014 shall be expended for the continuation of the case
management triage plan ........................................................................................$48,720,381
Land Court Department.
0334-0001 For the operation of the land court department .......................................................$6,534,669
Boston Municipal Court Department.
13

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
0335-0001 For the operation of the Boston municipal court department ................................$16,814,450
Housing Court Department.
0336-0002 For the operation of the housing court department; provided, that funds shall
be expended on court interpreter services ............................................................$15,780,738
Juvenile Court Department.
0337-0002 For the operation of the juvenile court department; provided, that not less
than $407,602 shall be expended to CASA Project Worcester county for
its court appointed special advocate program in Worcester county;
provided further, that not less than $137,877 shall be expended to Friends
of Children, Inc. for its court appointed special advocate program in
Franklin and Hampshire counties; provided further, that not less than
$178,244 shall be expended to Center for Human Development,
Incorporated for its court appointed special advocate program in Hampden
county; provided further, that not less than $166,317 shall be expended to
Family Services of Merrimack Valley for its court appointed special
advocate program in Essex county; provided further, that not less than
$277,326 shall be expended to Boston CASA for its court appointed
special advocate program in Suffolk and Middlesex counties; provided
further, that not less than $104,849 shall be expended to 18 Degrees, Inc.
for its court appointed special advocate program in Berkshire county;
provided further, that not less than $127,785 shall be expended to The
Advocacy Bridge, Inc for its CARE advocate program in Bristol county;
provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to One Can
Help, Inc. for the purpose of providing assistance and resources for
families in juvenile courts statewide ....................................................................$25,569,194
Office of the Commissioner of Probation.
0339-1001 For the office of the commissioner of probation; provided, that the office shall
enter into an interagency service agreement with the department of revenue
to verify income data and to use the department’s wage reporting and bank
match system for weekly tape-matching to determine an individual’s
eligibility for appointment of indigent counsel under chapter 211D of the
General Laws; provided further, that not less than $479,167 shall be
expended for DNA testing; provided further, that not less than $450,000
shall be expended for expanded drug testing capacity; provided further, that
not less than $222,000 shall be expended for increased sealing and
expungement capacity; provided further, that not less than $250,000 shall
be expended for a caseload management software system for the juvenile
and probate and family courts; provided further, that not less than $641,000
shall be expended for a pre-trial services unit; provided further, that not less
than $350,000 shall be expended for increased electronic monitoring
capacity; provided further, that not less than $374,667 shall be expended
for a probate and family court workload reduction project; provided further,
that not less than $160,000 shall be expended for the purchase of
bulletproof vests for probation officers; provided further, that funds may be
expended for increased lab-based testing, oral toxicology tests and new
urine tests to detect additional substances; provided further, that funds shall
be used for the ongoing development and implementation of the validated
risk assessment tool to inform pre-adjudication decision making with regard
14

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
to detention, release on personal recognizance or release under conditions
of criminal defendants before the adult trial court; provided further, that not
later than November 3, 2026, the office shall submit a report to the house
and senate committees on ways and means that shall include, but not be
limited to: (i) the status of the validated risk assessment tool; (ii) efforts to
implement the risk assessment tool; (iii) further goals to expand the use of
the risk assessment tool; and (iv) the outcomes associated with utilization
of the risk assessment tool; and provided further, that funds from this item
shall be expended for costs associated with the full implementation of
chapter 303 of the acts of 2006 and chapter 418 of the acts of 2006 to
ensure effective supervision of probationers who are monitored through
global positioning system bracelets ....................................................................$206,356,677
0339-1003 For the office of community corrections and performance-based contracts
for the operation of community corrections centers; provided, that not later
than March 3, 2027, the office shall submit a report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means that shall include, but not be limited to: (i)
the performance standards used to evaluate community corrections
centers; (ii) a description of how each community corrections center
compares based on performance and utilization data; (iii) the amount of
each contract awarded to community corrections centers on a per-client-day
basis; (iv) the standards for terminating contracts with underperforming
community corrections centers; and (v) plans for increasing the use of
community corrections centers by the courts, the department of correction
and the county sheriffs’ offices; provided further, that the executive director
of the office of community corrections may make funds available from this
item for rehabilitative pilot programs that incorporate evidence-based
corrections practices; provided further, that the office may provide re-entry
services programs, which shall not operate as intermediate sanctions
programs as defined in section 1 of chapter 211F of the General Laws, to
any person released from incarceration including, but not limited to, any
probationer or parolee; and provided further, that not less than $2,000,000
shall be expended for the Ralph Gants Reentry Services Program for the
purpose of supporting reentry, including providing reentry services
programs ................................................................................................................$33,678,828
0339-1005 For a competitive grant program to be administered by the office of the
commissioner of probation for cities and towns, acting either individually or
in concert, to pilot or expand multidisciplinary approaches to divert juveniles
and young adults from the juvenile and criminal justice systems prior to
arrest or arraignment through coordinated programs for prevention and
intervention that serve youths and their families including, but not limited to:
(i) connecting youths to mental health services; (ii) providing youth
development activities and mentoring; (iii) promoting school safety, family
home visits, juvenile diversion programs and restorative justice and
mediation programs; and (iv) providing assistance for families and schools
to navigate the legal system; provided, that eligible applicants may partner
with nonprofit organizations to provide programs and services; provided
further, that the office shall give preference to applications that: (a) clearly
outline a comprehensive plan for municipalities to collaborate with law
enforcement agencies, schools, community-based organizations and
government agencies to address juvenile delinquency and young adult
crime; (b) include written commitments of municipalities, law enforcement
agencies, schools, community-based organizations and government
agencies to collaborate; (c) make a written commitment to match grant
funds with not less than a 25 per cent matching grant provided by either
15

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
municipal or private contributions; and (d) identify a local governmental unit
to serve as the fiscal agent for the proposed programs and services;
provided further, that administrative costs for approved grant applications
shall not exceed 5 per cent of the value of the grant; and provided further,
that not later than March 15, 2027, the office shall submit a report to the
house and senate committees on ways and means that shall include, but
not be limited to: (1) the number of grant applications received; (2) the
number of grants approved; (3) the amount of funds issued to each grantee;
and (4) details regarding each grantee, including geographic location,
services offered, organizations with which the grantee collaborated,
matching funds provided and the number of juveniles and young adults
served .........................................................................................................................$515,000
0339-1011 For a grant program to be administered by the office of the commissioner of
probation for community-based residential re-entry programs to reduce
recidivism by providing transitional housing, workforce development and
case management to individuals returning to the community from county
correctional facilities and state prisons, including incarcerated persons
under the supervision of state prisons and county correctional facilities
approved under sections 49 and 86F of chapter 127 of the General Laws
and individuals on parole or on probation; provided, that no funds shall be
transferred from this item to any other item in the trial court; provided further,
that said programs shall provide supervision and accountability as needed;
provided further, that the funds shall be awarded through a competitive
process to qualified nonprofit organizations with a documented history of
providing comprehensive, evidence-based or evidence-informed
community residential re-entry services; provided further, that applicants
shall provide a plan for ensuring that proposed programs shall be
implemented with fidelity to a research-based, evidence-based or evidence-
informed program design; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall
be expended to PAACA, Inc. in the city of New Bedford for costs related
to their PAACA housing support fund; provided further, that not less than
$1,000,000 shall be spent on women and elderly persons returning from
incarceration; and provided further, that not later than March 3, 2027, the
office shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways
and means on the outcomes and recidivism rates of the participants .................$16,135,703
Office of Jury Commissioner.
0339-2100 For the office of jury commissioner under chapter 234A of the General Laws
.................................................................................................................................$3,886,393
DISTRICT ATTORNEYS.
Suffolk District Attorney.
0340-0100 For the Suffolk district attorney’s office, including the victim and witness
assistance program, the child abuse and sexual assault prosecution
program, the domestic violence unit and the children’s advocacy center;
provided, that 50 per cent of fees payable under rules 15(d) and 30(c)(8) of
the Massachusetts Rules of Criminal Procedure for appeals taken by the
office shall be paid from this item; provided further, that not less than
$500,000 shall be expended for the design and operation of a pre-
arraignment diversion program and a diversion session; and provided
16

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
further, that no assistant district attorney shall be paid an annual salary of
less than $76,000 ..................................................................................................$30,451,325
0340-0198 For the overtime costs of state police officers assigned to the Suffolk district
attorney’s office ...........................................................................................................$532,839
Middlesex District Attorney.
0340-0200 For the Middlesex district attorney’s office, including the victim and witness
assistance program, the child abuse and sexual assault prosecution
program and the domestic violence unit; provided, that 50 per cent of fees
payable under rules 15(d) and 30(c)(8) of the Massachusetts Rules of
Criminal Procedure for appeals taken by the office shall be paid from this
item; and provided further, that no assistant district attorney shall be paid an
annual salary of less than $76,000 .......................................................................$25,490,650
0340-0298 For the overtime costs of state police officers assigned to the Middlesex
district attorney’s office ...............................................................................................$789,542
Eastern District Attorney.
0340-0300 For the Eastern district attorney’s office, including the victim and witness
assistance program, the child abuse and sexual assault prosecution
program and the domestic violence unit; provided, that 50 per cent of fees
payable under rules 15(d) and 30(c)(8) of the Massachusetts Rules of
Criminal Procedure for appeals taken by the office shall be paid from this
item; and provided further, that no assistant district attorney shall be paid an
annual salary of less than $76,000 .......................................................................$15,452,606
0340-0398 For the overtime costs of state police officers assigned to the Eastern district
attorney’s office ...........................................................................................................$758,496
Worcester District Attorney.
0340-0400 For the Worcester district attorney’s office, including the victim and witness
assistance program, the child abuse and sexual assault prosecution
program and the domestic violence unit; provided, that 50 per cent of fees
payable under rules 15(d) and 30(c)(8) of the Massachusetts Rules of
Criminal Procedure for appeals taken by the office shall be paid from this
item; and provided further, that no assistant district attorney shall be paid an
annual salary of less than $76,000 .......................................................................$16,733,669
0340-0498 For the overtime costs of state police officers assigned to the Worcester
district attorney’s office ...............................................................................................$641,139
Hampden District Attorney.
0340-0500 For the Hampden district attorney’s office, including the victim and witness
assistance program, the child abuse and sexual assault prosecution
program and the domestic violence unit; provided, that 50 per cent of fees
payable under rules 15(d) and 30(c)(8) of the Massachusetts Rules of
Criminal Procedure for appeals taken by the office shall be paid from this
item; and provided further, that no assistant district attorney shall be paid an
annual salary of less than $76,000 .......................................................................$17,398,941
17

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
0340-0598 For the overtime costs of state police officers assigned to the Hampden
district attorney’s office ...............................................................................................$649,406
Northwestern District Attorney.
0340-0600 For the Northwestern district attorney’s office, including the victim and
witness assistance program, the child abuse and sexual assault prosecution
program, the domestic violence unit and the anti-crime task force; provided,
that 50 per cent of fees payable under rules 15(d) and 30(c)(8) of the
Massachusetts Rules of Criminal Procedure for appeals taken by the office
shall be paid from this item; and provided further, that no assistant district
attorney shall be paid an annual salary of less than $76,000 ...............................$10,465,496
0340-0698 For the overtime costs of state police officers assigned to the Northwestern
district attorney’s office ...............................................................................................$456,230
Norfolk District Attorney.
0340-0700 For the Norfolk district attorney’s office, including the victim and witness
assistance program, the child abuse and sexual assault prosecution
program and the domestic violence unit; provided, that 50 per cent of fees
payable under rules 15(d) and 30(c)(8) of the Massachusetts Rules of
Criminal Procedure for appeals taken by the office shall be paid from this
item; and provided further, that no assistant district attorney shall be paid an
annual salary of less than $76,000 .......................................................................$15,083,161
0340-0798 For the overtime costs of state police officers assigned to the Norfolk district
attorney’s office ...........................................................................................................$628,869
Plymouth District Attorney.
0340-0800 For the Plymouth district attorney’s office, including the victim and witness
assistance program, the child abuse and sexual assault prosecution
program and the domestic violence unit; provided, that 50 per cent of fees
payable under rules 15(d) and 30(c)(8) of the Massachusetts Rules of
Criminal Procedure for appeals taken by the office shall be paid from this
item; and provided further, that no assistant district attorney shall be paid an
annual salary of less than $76,000 .......................................................................$13,322,877
0340-0898 For the overtime costs of state police officers assigned to the Plymouth
district attorney’s office ...............................................................................................$656,788
Bristol District Attorney.
0340-0900 For the Bristol district attorney’s office, including the victim and witness
assistance program, the child abuse and sexual assault prosecution
program and the domestic violence unit; provided, that 50 per cent of fees
payable under rules 15(d) and 30(c)(8) of the Massachusetts Rules of
Criminal Procedure for appeals taken by the office shall be paid from this
item; and provided further, that no assistant district attorney shall be paid an
annual salary of less than $76,000 .......................................................................$15,309,162
0340-0998 For the overtime costs of state police officers assigned to the Bristol district
attorney’s office ...........................................................................................................$785,005
18

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
Cape and Islands District Attorney.
0340-1000 For the Cape and Islands district attorney’s office, including the victim and
witness assistance program, the child abuse and sexual assault prosecution
program and the domestic violence unit; provided, that 50 per cent of fees
payable under rules 15(d) and 30(c)(8) of the Massachusetts Rules of
Criminal Procedure for appeals taken by the office shall be paid from this
item; and provided further, that no assistant district attorney shall be paid an
annual salary of less than $76,000 .........................................................................$6,850,372
0340-1098 For the overtime costs of state police officers assigned to the Cape and
Islands district attorney’s office ...................................................................................$434,368
Berkshire District Attorney.
0340-1100 For the Berkshire district attorney’s office, including the victim and witness
assistance program, the child abuse and sexual assault prosecution
program, the drug task force, the domestic violence unit and the Berkshire
county law enforcement task force; provided, that 50 per cent of fees
payable under rules 15(d) and 30(c)(8) of the Massachusetts Rules of
Criminal Procedure for appeals taken by the office shall be paid from this
item; and provided further, that no assistant district attorney shall be paid an
annual salary of less than $76,000 .........................................................................$6,321,513
0340-1198 For the overtime costs of state police officers assigned to the Berkshire
district attorney’s office ...............................................................................................$354,094
MASSACHUSETTS DISTRICT ATTORNEYS ASSOCIATION.
0340-0203 For the implementation and administration of drug diversion programs for
nonviolent young adult drug offenders; provided, that individuals using
heroin or other opiate derivatives who are arrested for nonviolent crimes
shall be eligible for such programs; provided further, that individuals charged
with violent crimes shall not be eligible for participation in a drug diversion
program; provided further, that a district attorney’s office may contract with
any organization to administer a drug diversion program or an education
program; provided further, that such programs shall be designed in
consultation with the department of public health; provided further, that
eligible drug diversion programs shall offer pre-arraignment or post-
arraignment programs for non-violent drug offenders to provide candidates
the opportunity to receive comprehensive substance use treatment services
in lieu of prosecution through the traditional court process; provided further,
that treatment plans may include, but shall not be limited to, inpatient,
outpatient and step-down recovery services; provided further, that diversion
program candidates without insurance coverage for such services shall not
be denied access to the program based on the inability to pay; provided
further, that not less than 60 days before the distribution of funds, the
Massachusetts District Attorneys Association shall submit a report to the
house and senate committees on ways and means detailing: (i) the amount
to be given to each district attorney’s office; (ii) the methodology for the
distribution; and (iii) the administration and cost of the program; and
provided further, that no funds from this item shall be expended on the
administrative costs of the Massachusetts District Attorneys Association ................$514,949
19

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
0340-2100 For the operation of the Massachusetts District Attorneys Association,
including the implementation and related expenses of the district attorneys’
offices automation, case management and tracking system; provided, that
expenses associated with the system may be charged directly to this item;
provided further, that the association shall work in conjunction with the
disabled persons protection commission and the 11 district attorneys' offices
to prepare a report that shall include, but not be limited to: (i) the number of
abuse cases that are referred to each district attorney’s office for further
investigation; (ii) the number of said referrals resulting in the filing of criminal
charges, delineated by type of charge; (iii) the number of cases referred to
each district attorney's office that remain open as of the date for submission
of the report; and (iv) the number of cases that resulted in a criminal
prosecution and the disposition of each such prosecution; provided further,
that not later than March 15, 2027, said report shall be submitted to the
house and senate committees on ways and means and the clerks of the
house of representatives and senate; provided further, that not later than
January 15, 2027, the association shall work in conjunction with the 11
district attorneys’ offices to prepare and submit a report to the house and
senate committees on ways and means and the clerks of the house of
representatives and senate; provided further, that the association shall
provide said offices with an agreed-upon template for the report to be filled
out; provided further, that said offices shall submit said report in a standard
electronic format; provided further, that said template shall include,
delineated by charge type: (a) the number of criminal cases initiated by
arraignment in each department of the trial court; (b) the number of criminal
cases disposed of in each department of the trial court; (c) the number of
cases appealed to the appeals courts, or of the supreme judicial court, a
single justice of the appeals court or of the supreme judicial court or any
other appeals; (d) the number of cases reviewed but not charged; and (e)
the number of cases under active management where the case includes
charges for drug offenses under chapter 94C of the General Laws, motor
vehicle offenses under chapter 90 of the General Laws or firearm offenses
under chapter 140 of the General Laws; provided further, that not less than
$330,000 shall be expended for a one-year PILOT program for an
automated crime victim and witness notification and survey platform for
each of the 11 district attorneys, including assistant district attorneys and
crime advocates; and provided further, that each district attorney shall notify
the house and senate committees on ways and means at least 30 days
before transferring any funds from the AA object class of each district
attorney’s administrative line item and means of its intention to make that
transfer ....................................................................................................................$3,202,595
0340-2117 For the retention of assistant district attorneys and non-attorney staff with
not less than 3 years of experience; provided, that the Massachusetts
District Attorneys Association shall transfer funds to the AA object class in
each of the 11 district attorneys’ offices; provided further, that the
association shall develop a formula for the distribution of said funds;
provided further, that funds distributed from this item to the district attorneys’
offices shall be used for retention purposes and shall not be transferred out
of the AA object class; provided further, that not more than $125,000 shall
be distributed to any 1 district attorney’s office for such purpose; provided
further, that not less than 60 days prior to the distribution of funds, the
Massachusetts District Attorneys Association shall submit a report to the
house and senate committees on ways and means detailing: (i) the
methodology used to determine the amount to be disbursed; (ii) the amount
to be given to each district attorney’s office; (iii) the methodology for the
20

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
distribution; and (iv) the number of assistant district attorneys and non-
attorney staff from each office who would receive funds from this item; and
provided further, that no funds from this item shall be expended for the
administrative costs of the Massachusetts District Attorneys Association .............$1,030,000
0340-8908 For the costs associated with maintaining the Massachusetts District
Attorneys Association’s wide area network .............................................................$3,465,645
EXECUTIVE.
0411-1000 For the offices of the governor, the lieutenant governor and the governor’s
council; provided, that the amount appropriated in this item may be used at
the discretion of the governor for the payment of extraordinary expenses not
otherwise provided for and for transfers to appropriation items where the
amounts otherwise available may be insufficient; provided further, that funds
may be expended for the governor’s commission on intellectual disability;
provided further, that funds may be expended for the governor’s
development coordinating council; and provided further, that the advisory
council on Alzheimer’s disease and related disorders, established in section
379 of chapter 194 of the acts of 1998, shall continue during fiscal year 2027
.................................................................................................................................$6,482,282
0411-1020 For the operation of the office of climate innovation and resilience ...........................$500,000
SECRETARY OF THE COMMONWEALTH.
0511-0000 For the operation of the office of the secretary of the commonwealth;
provided, that the secretary may transfer funds between items 0540-0900,
0540-1000, 0540-1100, 0540-1200, 0540-1300, 0540-1400, 0540-1500,
0540-1600, 0540-1700, 0540-1800, 0540-1900, 0540-2000 and 0540-2100
under an allocation schedule which shall be filed with the house and senate
committees on ways and means not less than 30 days before the transfer;
and provided further, that each register of deeds using electronic record
books shall ensure that all methods of electronically recording instruments
conform to the regulations or standards established by the secretary of the
commonwealth and the records conservation board ..............................................$8,945,369
0511-0001 For the secretary of the commonwealth, who may expend not more than
$15,000 in revenues collected from the sale of merchandise at the state
house gift shop to restock gift shop inventory ..............................................................$15,000
0511-0002 For the operation of the corporations division; provided, that the division
shall implement a corporate dissolution program; and provided further, that
not later than April 1, 2027, the secretary of the commonwealth shall submit
a report to the house and senate committees on ways and means detailing
the total number of reports filed as a result of this program and the amount
of revenue generated for the commonwealth ............................................................$606,206
0511-0200 For the operation of the archives division; provided, that the secretary of the
commonwealth shall expend not less than $200,000 for preservation
matching grants for municipalities and nonprofit organizations to preserve
veterans’ monuments, memorials and other significant sites and historic
documents; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended
to capital improvements to Camp DiCarlo, home of the National Lancers,
21

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
to bring the facility up to code; provided further, that not less than $50,000
shall be expended to the city of Gardner for the purpose of the city archives
buildout; and provided further, that the program shall be administered by the
state historic records advisory board .........................................................................$989,130
0511-0230 For the operation of the records center ........................................................................$36,259
0511-0250 For the operation of the archives facility ....................................................................$847,715
0511-0260 For the operation of the commonwealth museum .....................................................$368,538
0511-0270 For the secretary of the commonwealth, who shall contract with the
University of Massachusetts Donahue Institute to provide the
commonwealth with technical assistance on United States census data and
to prepare annual population estimates, prior appropriation continued .................$1,280,663
0511-0280 For the secretary of the commonwealth, who may expend not more than
$500,000 in revenues collected from fees assessed upon communication
technology service providers for administration and monitoring of the remote
online notarization program under subsection (i) of section 28 of chapter 222
of the General Laws; provided, that notwithstanding any general or special
law to the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies
between the receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures, the
secretary of the commonwealth may incur expenses and the comptroller
may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this
authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state
accounting system ......................................................................................................$500,000
0511-0420 For the operation of the address confidentiality program ..........................................$349,337
0517-0000 For the printing of public documents ..........................................................................$577,146
0521-0000 For the operation of the elections division, including preparation, printing and
distribution of ballots and for other miscellaneous expenses for primary and
other elections; provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to
the contrary, the secretary of the commonwealth may incur costs and make
expenditures in excess of funds available by up to $15,000,000 to provide
for necessary election costs related to items 0521-0000, 0521-0001, 0521-
0002 and 0524-0000; and provided further, that the secretary of the
commonwealth may award grants for voter registration and education; and
provided further, that the registration and education activities may be
conducted by community-based voter registration and education
organizations .........................................................................................................$30,595,926
0521-0001 For the operation of the central voter registration computer system;
provided, that not later than January 29, 2027, the secretary of the
commonwealth shall submit a report to the house and senate committees
on ways and means detailing voter registration activity .......................................$11,448,118
0521-0002 For implementing early voting in the commonwealth as determined through
the collection and certification of accurate accounting by the office of the
state auditor and division of local mandates for distribution by the secretary
of the commonwealth, prior appropriation continued ..............................................$6,884,180
0524-0000 For providing information to voters ..........................................................................$2,155,894
22

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
0526-0100 For the operation of the Massachusetts historical commission .............................$1,228,624
0527-0100 For the operation of the ballot law commission ............................................................$10,384
0528-0100 For the operation of the records conservation board ...................................................$36,396
0540-0900 For the registry of deeds located in the city of Lawrence .......................................$1,474,004
0540-1000 For the registry of deeds located in the city of Salem .............................................$3,343,591
0540-1100 For the registry of deeds located in the county of Franklin ........................................$732,774
0540-1200 For the registry of deeds located in the county of Hampden ..................................$2,297,688
0540-1300 For the registry of deeds located in the county of Hampshire ...................................$917,227
0540-1400 For the registry of deeds located in the city of Lowell .............................................$1,398,798
0540-1500 For the registry of deeds located in the city of Cambridge .....................................$4,724,746
0540-1600 For the registry of deeds located in the town of Adams .............................................$489,356
0540-1700 For the registry of deeds located in the city of Pittsfield .............................................$661,809
0540-1800 For the registry of deeds located in the town of Great Barrington .............................$392,706
0540-1900 For the registry of deeds located in the county of Suffolk .......................................$2,766,382
0540-2000 For the registry of deeds located in the city of Fitchburg ...........................................$851,435
0540-2100 For the registry of deeds located in the city of Worcester .......................................$2,738,149
TREASURER AND RECEIVER GENERAL.
Office of the Treasurer and Receiver General.
0610-0000 For the office of the treasurer and receiver general; provided, that the
treasurer shall provide computer services required by the teachers’
retirement board; provided further, that funds may be expended for the
payment of bank fees; and provided further, that financial assistance shall be
made available to injured firefighters .....................................................................$13,707,567
0610-0010 For programs to promote and improve financial literacy for Massachusetts
residents ..................................................................................................................$1,476,700
0610-0050 For the administration of the alcoholic beverages control commission in its
efforts to regulate and control the conduct and condition of trafficking in
alcoholic beverages; provided, that the commission shall maintain at least 1
chief investigator and other investigators as may be necessary for the
regulation and control of trafficking of alcoholic beverages; provided further,
that the commission shall work and cooperate with the Bureau of Alcohol,
Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives in the United States Department of
Justice and other relevant federal agencies to assist in its efforts to regulate
and control trafficking of alcoholic beverages; and provided further, that the
commission shall seek out matching federal funds and apply for federal
23

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
grants that may be available to assist in the enforcement of laws pertaining
to the trafficking of alcoholic beverages ...................................................................$6,255,309
0610-0051 For the operation of the alcoholic beverages control commission relative to
the prevention of underage drinking and related programs including, but not
limited to, applying for and obtaining Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms
and Explosives in the United States Department of Justice funds, grants and
other federal appropriations; provided, that the commission may expend not
more than $350,000 in revenues collected from fees generated by the
commission; and provided further, that notwithstanding any general or
special law to the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing
discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
expenditures, the commission may incur expenses and the comptroller may
certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or
the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting system
....................................................................................................................................$350,000
0610-0060 For the costs associated with the investigation and enforcement division of
the alcoholic beverages control commission’s implementation of the
enhanced liquor enforcement programs known as the safe campus, safe
holidays, safe prom and safe summer programs; provided, that funds from
this item shall not support other operating costs of item 0610-0050 .........................$348,780
0610-2000 For payments made to veterans under section 1 of chapter 646 of the acts of
1968, section 16 of chapter 130 of the acts of 2005 and section 11 of chapter
132 of the acts of 2009; provided, that the office of the state treasurer may
expend not more than $500,000 for costs incurred in the administration of
these payments; and provided further, that not later than September 25,
2026 the state treasurer shall submit a report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means detailing: (i) the number of veterans
applying for the payments, delineated by in-person and online applications;
and (ii) how many payments were approved in the prior fiscal year .........................$2,203,626
0611-1000 For bonus payments to war veterans ...........................................................................$44,500
0612-0105 For payment of the public safety employee killed in the line of duty benefit
established in section 100A of chapter 32 of the General Laws; provided,
that the office of the state treasurer shall provide immediate written
notification to the secretary of administration and finance and the house and
senate committees on ways and means upon the expenditure of the funds
appropriated in this item; and provided further, that at the written request of
the office of the state treasurer, the comptroller shall transfer uncommitted
and unobligated funds from item 1599-3384 to this item .........................................$1,200,000
Lottery Commission.
0640-0000 For the operation of the state lottery commission and arts lottery; provided,
that no funds shall be expended from this item for costs associated with the
promotion or advertising of lottery games; provided further, that positions
funded from this item shall not be subject to chapters 30 and 31 of the
General Laws; provided further, that 25 per cent of the amount appropriated
in this item shall be transferred quarterly from the State Lottery and Gaming
Fund, established in section 35 of chapter 10 of the General Laws, to the
General Fund; and provided further, that notwithstanding any general or
special law to the contrary, funds may be expended for the establishment
24

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
and operation of the online lottery established in section 24 of chapter 10 of
the General Laws ................................................................................................$122,614,695
0640-0005 For the costs associated with monitor games; provided, that 25 per cent of
the amount appropriated in this item shall be transferred quarterly from the
State Lottery and Gaming Fund, established in section 35 of chapter 10 of
the General Laws, to the General Fund ..................................................................$4,321,359
0640-0010 For the promotional activities associated with the state lottery program;
provided, that not later than June 30, 2027, the state lottery commission
shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways and
means detailing additional revenues generated as a result of promotional
activities funded from this item; and provided further, that 25 per cent of the
amount appropriated in this item shall be transferred quarterly from the State
Lottery and Gaming Fund, established in section 35 of chapter 10 of the
General Laws, to the General Fund ........................................................................$8,000,000
0640-0096 For the commonwealth’s fiscal year 2027 contributions to the health and
welfare fund established under the collective bargaining agreement
between the state lottery commission and the Service Employees
International Union, Local 888, AFL-CIO; provided, that the contributions
shall be paid to the fund on such basis as the collective bargaining
agreement provides; and provided further, that 25 per cent of the amount
appropriated in this item shall be transferred quarterly from the State Lottery
and Gaming Fund, established in section 35 of chapter 10 of the General
Laws, to the General Fund .........................................................................................$618,509
Massachusetts Cultural Council.
0640-0300 For the services and operations of the Massachusetts cultural council,
including grants to or contracts with public and nonpublic entities; provided,
that the council may expend the amounts appropriated in this item for the
council as provided in sections 52 to 58A, inclusive, of chapter 10 of the
General Laws; provided further, that 25 per cent of the amount appropriated
in this item shall be transferred quarterly from the State Lottery and Gaming
Fund, established in section 35 of said chapter 10, to the General Fund;
provided further, that a person employed under this item shall be considered
an employee within the meaning of section 1 of chapter 150E of the General
Laws and shall be placed in the appropriate bargaining unit; provided
further, that the council shall expend from any source an amount not less
than 75 per cent of this item on grants and subsidies to further the
achievement of the goals of the council’s 3-year strategic plan, including: (i)
stewarding programmatic practices that advance equity, diversity and
inclusion; (ii) advancing the creative and cultural sector through building
partnerships, identifying recommendations, and storytelling; and (iii)
ensuring internal systems, structures and ways of working reflect the
council’s values of creativity, public service and inclusion and advance the
sector’s needs; provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall be
expended to Acton Community Access Television, Inc. for equipment
upgrades; provided further, that not less than $10,000 shall be expended
to the Attleboro Art Museum for damages to a flooded basement; provided
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to Allston Village
Main Streets, Inc. for artists community assistance; provided further, that
not less than $20,000 shall be expended to Fitchburg Public Market to
sustain customer-facing commercial retail operations on Main street in
Fitchburg through fiscal year 2028; provided further, that not less than
25

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
$25,000 shall be expended to Longmeadow Pride Alliance, Inc. to
continue the Longmeadow Pride Festival to support community services
and promote Italian heritage; provided further, that not less than $100,000
shall be expended to Boston Ballet, Incorporated; provided further, that
not less than $100,000 shall be expended to Franklin Performing Arts
Company, Inc.; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be
expended to the Children’s Museum of Franklin, Inc; provided further, that
not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the Franklin Creative Center
for the Arts Inc.; and provided further, that not later than November 3, 2026,
the council shall submit its board-approved fiscal year 2027 spending plan
to the office of the state treasurer, the executive office for administration and
finance, the house and senate committees on ways and means and the joint
committee on tourism, arts and cultural development including, but not
limited to, the amounts to be expended on: (a) grants and subsidies; (b)
personnel; (c) leases and utilities; and (d) travel, delineated by in-state and
board-approved out-of-state travel .......................................................................$27,723,072
Debt Service.
0699-0005 For the state treasurer, who may retain and expend not more than
$50,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 from premiums paid on the sales of
revenue anticipation notes and expend those premium payments to pay
the principal and interest on account of the revenue anticipation notes ................$50,000,000
0699-0014 For the payment of interest, discount and principal on certain indebtedness
incurred under chapter 233 of the acts of 2008 for financing the
accelerated bridge program .................................................................................$289,765,086
Commonwealth Transportation Fund ........................100%
0699-0015 For the payment of interest, discount and principal on certain bonded debt
and the sale of bonds of the commonwealth; provided, that notwithstanding
any general or special law to the contrary, the state treasurer may make
payments under section 38C of chapter 29 of the General Laws from this
item and items 0699-9100, 0699-2005 and 0699-0014; provided further, that
the payments shall pertain to the bonds, notes or other obligations authorized
to be paid from each item; provided further, that notwithstanding any general
or special law to the contrary, the comptroller may transfer the amounts that
would otherwise be unexpended on June 30, 2027 from this item to items
0699-9100, 0699-2005 and 0699-0014 or from said items 0699-9100, 0699-
2005 and 0699-0014 to this item that would otherwise have insufficient
amounts to meet debt service obligations for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2027; provided further, that each amount transferred shall be charged to the
funds as specified in the item to which the amount is transferred; provided
further, that payments on bonds issued under section 2O of said chapter 29
shall be paid from this item and shall be charged to the infrastructure
subfund of the Commonwealth Transportation Fund; and provided further,
that notwithstanding any provision of this item or of any other general or
special law to the contrary, the comptroller may charge the payments
authorized in the item to the appropriate budgetary or other fund subject to
a plan that the comptroller shall file 10 days in advance with the house and
senate committees on ways and means ..........................................................$2,240,456,319
General Fund .........................................................45.06%
Commonwealth Transportation Fund .....................54.94%
26

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
0699-2005 For the payment of interest, discount and principal on certain indebtedness
that may be incurred for financing the central artery/third harbor tunnel
funding shortfall .....................................................................................................$81,421,109
Commonwealth Transportation Fund .......................100%
0699-9100 For the payment of costs associated with any bonds, notes or other
obligations of the commonwealth, including issuance costs, interest on
bonds, bond and revenue anticipation notes, commercial paper and other
notes under sections 47 and 49B of chapter 29 of the General Laws and for
the payment to the United States under Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C.
148, of any rebate amount or yield reduction payment owed with respect to
any bonds or notes or other obligations of the commonwealth; provided, that
the state treasurer shall certify to the comptroller a schedule of the distribution
of costs among the various funds of the commonwealth; provided further,
that not more than $400,000 shall be expended from this item for the costs
of personnel at the debt management department of the office of the state
treasurer; provided further, that the comptroller shall charge costs to the
funds in accordance with the schedule; and provided further, that any deficit
in this item at the close of the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027 shall be
charged to the various funds or to the General Fund or the
Commonwealth Transportation Fund debt service reserves .................................$28,881,484
OFFICE OF THE STATE AUDITOR.
0710-0000 For the office of the state auditor, including the review and monitoring of
privatization contracts under sections 52 to 55, inclusive, of chapter 7 of the
General Laws ........................................................................................................$20,724,096
0710-0100 For the operation of the division of local mandates ...................................................$515,371
0710-0200 For the operation of the bureau of special investigations; provided, that the
office of the state auditor shall submit quarterly reports to the house and
senate committees on ways and means detailing the total amount of
fraudulently obtained benefits identified by the bureau, the total value of
settlement restitution payments, actual monthly collections and any
circumstances that produce shortfalls in collections ...............................................$2,657,193
0710-0225 For the operation of the Medicaid audit unit within the division of audit
operations to prevent and identify fraud and abuse in the MassHealth
system; provided, that the federal reimbursement for any expenditure from
this item shall not be less than 50 per cent; provided further, that not later
than February 26, 2027, the division shall submit a report to the house and
senate committees on ways and means detailing all findings on activities
and payments made through the MassHealth system; provided further, that
the report shall include, to the extent available, a review of all post-audit
efforts undertaken by MassHealth to recoup payments owed to the
commonwealth due to identified fraud and abuse; provided further, that the
report shall include the responses of MassHealth to the most recent post-
audit review survey, including the status of recoupment efforts; and provided
further, that the report shall include the unit’s recommendations to enhance
recoupment efforts ...................................................................................................$1,525,387
0710-0300 For costs related to the use of data analytic techniques to identify fraud by
the bureau of special investigations ...........................................................................$569,735
27

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
0710-0400 For the operation of an information technology audit unit within the office of
the state auditor in order to conduct audits of high risk information
technology related activities including, cybersecurity, data access, systems
operations, data integrity and regulatory compliance ................................................$905,621
Police Reform Commissions.
0800-0000 For the operation of the Massachusetts Peace Officer Standards and
Training Commission; provided, that not later than March 16, 2027, the
commission shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on
ways and means that shall include, but not be limited to: (i) the commission’s
current caseload for fiscal year 2027; (ii) the number of complaints
concerning police officer conduct received by the commission; (iii) patterns
of unprofessional police conduct identified by the commission; and (iv) the
number of police officers suspended by the commission and the reason for
said suspension .......................................................................................................$8,829,669
0800-0001 For the operation of the commission on the status of African Americans ..................$150,000
0800-0002 For the operation of the commission on the status of Latinos and Latinas ................$150,000
0800-0003 For the operation of the commission on the status of persons
with disabilities ...........................................................................................................$150,000
0800-0004 For the operation of the commission on the social status of Black
men and boys ..........................................................................................................$150,000
OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.
0810-0000 For the office of the attorney general, including the administration of the local
consumer aid fund, established in section 11G of chapter 12 of the General
Laws, the operation of the anti-trust division, all regional offices, a high-tech
crime unit and the victim and witness assistance program ..................................$51,088,563
0810-0013 For the office of the attorney general, which may expend for a false claims
program not more than $4,578,648 in revenues collected from enforcement
of sections 5A to 5O, inclusive, of chapter 12 of the General Laws; provided,
that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the
purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of
retained revenues and related expenditures, the office may incur expenses
and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the
lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported
in the state accounting system ................................................................................$4,578,648
0810-0014 For the operation of the office of ratepayer advocacy within the office of the
attorney general under section 11E of chapter 12 of the General Laws;
provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the
amount assessed under said section 11E of said chapter 12 shall equal the
amount expended from this item and the associated fringe benefit costs for
personnel paid from this item; and provided further, that funds shall be
expended for the expenses of legal and technical personnel and associated
administrative and travel expenses relative to participation in regulatory
proceedings at the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission on behalf of
ratepayers in the commonwealth ............................................................................$3,330,207
28

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
0810-0016 For the office of the attorney general, which may expend not more than
$618,200 from revenues collected from costs of litigation, including
reasonable attorney and expert witness fees as awarded to the attorney
general by the court or as agreed upon by the parties in settlement of any
claims brought pursuant to the acts enforced in this item, for the
development and prosecution of claims for enforcement by the
commonwealth of the Clean Water Act, 33 U.S.C. 1251 et seq., the Clean
Air Act, 42 U.S.C. 7401 et seq., the Safe Drinking Water Act, 42 U.S.C. 300f
et seq., the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and
Liability Act, 42 U.S.C. 9601 et seq., the Emergency Planning and
Community Right-to-Know Act, 42 U.S.C 11001 et seq., the Resource
Conservation and Recovery Act, 42 U.S.C. 6901 et seq. and the
Endangered Species Act, 16 U.S.C. 1531 et seq. including, but not limited
to, the investigation of such claims, personnel and litigation costs, the
engagement of experts, the administration of studies or related activities and
the enforcement of settlements; provided, that penalties payable to the
commonwealth under the General Laws that are recovered by the
commonwealth in the course of prosecuting claims for enforcement of
federal law shall be deposited into the General Fund; and provided further,
that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the
purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of
retained revenues and related expenditures, the office may incur expenses
and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the
lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported
in the state accounting system ...................................................................................$618,200
0810-0021 For the operation of the Medicaid fraud control unit; provided, that the
federal reimbursement for any expenditure from this item shall not be less
than 75 per cent of the expenditure; provided further, that funds shall
continue to be used specifically for the investigation and prosecution of
abuse, neglect, mistreatment and misappropriation based on referrals from
the department of public health under section 72H of chapter 111 of the
General Laws; provided further, that the unit shall provide training for all
investigators of the department of public health’s division of health care
quality responsible for the investigations on a periodic basis pursuant to a
comprehensive training program to be developed by the division and the
unit; and provided further, that training shall include instruction on
techniques for improving the efficiency and quality of investigations of
abuse, neglect, mistreatment and misappropriation referred under said
section 72H of said chapter 111 ..............................................................................$5,897,957
0810-0045 For the wage enforcement program; provided, that notwithstanding any
general or special law to the contrary, a nonmanagement position funded
by this item shall be considered a job title in a collective bargaining unit as
prescribed by the labor relations commission and shall be subject to chapter
150E of the General Laws; provided further, that not less than $500,000
shall be expended for the operation and administration of a specialized
prevailing wage and construction investigatory and enforcement unit within
the wage enforcement program; provided further, that the unit shall consist
of not less than 2 investigators assigned to eastern Massachusetts, 2
investigators assigned to central Massachusetts and 2 investigators
assigned to western Massachusetts; provided further, that the specialized
unit shall be supervised by at least 1 supervising investigator and 1 assistant
attorney general in the wage enforcement program’s Boston office with
significant experience investigating violations of the commonwealth’s
29

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
prevailing wage and construction laws; and provided further, that not later
than February 26, 2027, the specialized unit shall submit a report on its
annual enforcement actions and violation trends within the construction
industry to the clerks of the senate and the house of representatives ...................$7,514,554
0810-0061 For the funding of existing and future litigation committed to obtaining
significant recoveries for the commonwealth ..........................................................$3,995,599
0810-0098 For the overtime costs of state police officers assigned to the office of the
attorney general; provided, that other costs associated with said officers
shall not be funded from this item; and provided further, that no expenditures
shall be made on or after the effective date of this item that would cause the
commonwealth’s obligation under this item to exceed the amount
appropriated in this item .............................................................................................$867,874
0810-0201 For the costs incurred in administrative or judicial proceedings on insurance
under section 11F of chapter 12 of the General Laws; provided, that funds
made available in this item may be used to supplement the automobile
insurance fraud unit and the workers’ compensation fraud unit in the office
of the attorney general; and provided further, that notwithstanding any
general or special law to the contrary, the amount assessed for these costs
shall be equal to the amount expended from this item and the associated
fringe benefit costs for personnel paid from this item .............................................$2,093,995
0810-0338 For the investigation and prosecution of automobile insurance fraud;
provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the
amount assessed for these costs shall be equal to the amount appropriated
in this item and the associated fringe benefit costs for personnel paid from
this item .......................................................................................................................$598,970
0810-0399 For the investigation and prosecution of workers’ compensation fraud;
provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the
amount assessed for these costs shall be equal to the amount appropriated
in this item and the associated fringe benefit costs for personnel paid from
this item; provided further, that the office of the attorney general shall
investigate and prosecute, when appropriate, employers who fail to provide
workers’ compensation insurance as required by law and those employers
or employees who may seek to defraud the system; and provided further,
that the unit shall investigate and report on all companies not in compliance
with chapter 152 of the General Laws ........................................................................$420,582
0810-1204 For the costs of the division of gaming enforcement under section 11M of
chapter 12 of the General Laws; provided, that the gaming commission shall
reimburse the General Fund for the total amount of this appropriation and
associated fringe benefit costs under said section 11M of said chapter 12 ..............$596,773
0810-1205 For programs devoted to combatting opioid addiction including, but not
limited to, the investigation and enforcement of opioid dispensing practices
and fraudulent prescribing practices; provided, that not later than January
29, 2027, the office of the attorney general shall submit a report to the house
and senate committees on ways and means on the results of said programs
including, but not limited to, the effectiveness of investigations, opioid and
trafficking settlements pursued and long-term plans for the program; and
provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to SAFE
Coalition Incorporated for those affected by substance use disorder in the
city known as the town of Franklin .........................................................................$2,961,598
30

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
0810-1206 For the office of the attorney general, which may expend for a civil penalties
revolving fund an amount not to exceed $2,292,704 from revenues collected
from enforcement of civil laws; provided, that notwithstanding any general
or special law to the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing
discrepancies between the receipt of revenues and related expenditures,
the office may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment
amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent
revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting system ...............................$2,292,704
1599-0213 For a reserve for the office of the attorney general to support costs and other
obligations associated with federal litigation ...........................................................$1,000,000
Victim and Witness Assistance Board.
0840-0004 For compensation to victims of violent crimes; provided, that
notwithstanding chapter 258C of the General Laws, if a claimant is 60 years
of age or older at the time of the crime and is not employed or receiving
unemployment compensation, such claimant shall be eligible for
compensation under said chapter 258C even if the claimant has suffered no
out-of-pocket loss; provided further, that compensation to such claimant
shall be limited to a maximum of $50; and provided further, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, victims of the
crime of rape shall be notified of all available services designed to assist
rape victims including, but not limited to, the services provided under section
5 of chapter 258B of the General Laws ...................................................................$3,426,323
0840-0100 For the operation of the victim and witness assistance board; provided, that
not less than $100,000 shall be expended for the operation and
administration of trainings and educational programming that advances the
goals of the Massachusetts office for victim assistance; provided further, that
the victim and witness assistance board shall submit to the general court
and the secretary of administration and finance a report detailing the claims
submitted to the state treasurer for payment under item 0840-0004,
indicating both the number and costs for each category of claim; and
provided further, that the report shall be submitted not later than January 12,
2027 .........................................................................................................................$2,875,578
0840-0101 For the salaries and administration of the SAFEPLAN advocacy program to
be administered by the Massachusetts office for victim assistance; provided,
that not later than January 29 2027, the office shall submit a report to the
house and senate committees on ways and means detailing the
effectiveness of contracting for the program including, but not limited to, the:
(i) expansion of the program’s services to new courthouses throughout the
commonwealth; (ii) number and types of incidents to which the advocates
responded; (iii) types of services and service referrals provided by the
domestic violence advocates; (iv) cost of providing such services; and (v)
extent of coordination with other service providers and state agencies; and
provided further, that SAFEPLAN services shall be maintained at not less
than the levels provided in fiscal year 2026 ............................................................$2,453,510
STATE ETHICS COMMISSION.
0900-0100 For the operation of the state ethics commission ...................................................$4,007,431
31

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
OFFICE OF THE INSPECTOR GENERAL.
0910-0200 For the operation of the office of the inspector general ..........................................$6,373,641
0910-0210 For the office of the inspector general, which may expend revenues
collected not more than $1,680,000 from the fees charged to participants in
the OIG Academy, including the Massachusetts public purchasing official
certification program for the operation of OIG Academy programs; provided,
that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the
purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of
retained revenues and related expenditures, the office may incur expenses
and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the
lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported
in the state accounting system; provided further, that notwithstanding any
general or special law to the contrary, funds may be collected in the prior
fiscal year for service programs or activities delivered during the next fiscal
year; and provided further, that any unspent balance at the close of the
current fiscal year up to the ceiling shall remain in the account and may be
expended for this item in the following fiscal year ...................................................$1,680,000
0910-0220 For the operation of the bureau of program integrity established in section
16V of chapter 6A of the General Laws .....................................................................$844,780
0910-0230 For the operation of the data analytics unit within the office of the inspector
general ........................................................................................................................$649,094
0910-0300 For the operation of the internal special audit unit established in section 9 of
chapter 6C of the General Laws .............................................................................$1,312,345
0910-0330 For the operation of the division of state police oversight established in
section 72 of chapter 22C of the General Laws .........................................................$486,890
OFFICE OF CAMPAIGN AND POLITICAL FINANCE.
0920-0300 For the operation of the office of campaign and political finance ............................$2,177,077
OFFICE OF THE CHILD ADVOCATE.
0930-0100 For the operation of the office of the child advocate; provided, that not less
than $100,000 shall be used to ensure effective cross-agency coordination
of early childhood and school-aged student wellness efforts to address
barriers to student academic success, including, but not limited to, access
to social services, mental health and behavioral health resources; provided
further, that not less than $300,000 shall be expended on efforts to ensure
that transition-age youth who are aging out of the care or custody of the
department of children and families or the department of youth services are
well-prepared for and supported in their transition into adulthood; provided
further that not less than $250,000 shall be expended for a hospital-based,
comprehensive child protection program at UMass Memorial Medical
Center; and provided further, that such services shall include, but not be
limited to, staff support through case management and the provision of
direct housing services ............................................................................................$4,438,835
32

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
0930-0101 For the operation of the state center on child wellbeing and trauma ......................$3,750,000
MASSACHUSETTS COMMISSION AGAINST DISCRIMINATION.
0940-0100 For the Massachusetts commission against discrimination; provided, that
the commission shall pursue the highest allowable rate of federal
reimbursement; provided further, that not later than March 5, 2027, the
commission shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on
ways and means on the: (i) number of currently pending cases and the
number of cases under investigation and in post-probable cause, with the
number of post-probable cause cases delineated by the number of cases in
the conciliation, pre-public hearing and post-public hearing stages; (ii)
number of cases pending before the commission in which a state agency or
state authority is named as a respondent, delineating those cases by
agency or authority; (iii) number of new cases filed in fiscal year 2026; (iv)
number of cases closed by the commission in fiscal year 2026; and (v)
average duration of cases closed by the commission in fiscal year 2026,
delineated by cases that reached the conciliation, pre-public hearing and
post-public hearing stages; provided further, that funds made available in
this item shall be in addition to funds available in items 0940-0101 and 0940-
0103; and provided further, that all non-clerical positions shall be exempt
from chapter 31 of the General Laws ....................................................................$10,422,737
0940-0102 For the Massachusetts commission against discrimination, which may
expend not more than $325,319 in revenues collected from fees charged
for training and monitoring programs; provided, that the commission shall
work with the office of access and opportunity and the office of diversity and
equal opportunity to design and deliver training to executive branch staff;
provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, the commission may also expend revenues generated through the
collection of fees and costs so authorized; and provided further, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose
of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the commission may incur expenses
and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower
of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the
state accounting system .............................................................................................$325,319
COMMISSION ON THE STATUS OF WOMEN.
0950-0000 For the commission on the status of women established in section 66 of
chapter 3 of the General Laws ....................................................................................$991,743
COMMISSION ON THE STATUS OF GRANDPARENTS RAISING GRANDCHILDREN.
0950-0030 For the commission on the status of grandparents raising grandchildren
established in section 69 of chapter 3 of the General Laws ......................................$284,675
MASSACHUSETTS COMMISSION ON LESBIAN, GAY, BISEXUAL,
TRANSGENDER, QUEER AND QUESTIONING YOUTH.
33

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
0950-0050 For the commission on lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, queer and
questioning youth established in section 67 of chapter 3 of the General
Laws; provided, that funds shall be used to address issues related to the
implementation of the commonwealth’s anti-bullying law under section 37O
of chapter 71 of the General Laws ..........................................................................$1,600,000
COMMISSION ON THE STATUS OF ASIAN AMERICANS AND PACIFIC
ISLANDERS.
0950-0080 For the commission on the status of Asian and Pacific Islanders
established in section 68 of chapter 3 of the General Laws .......................................$586,188
OFFICE OF THE VETERAN ADVOCATE.
0960-1000 For the operation of the office of the veteran advocate ..........................................$2,040,000
OFFICE OF THE COMPTROLLER.
1000-0001 For the office of the comptroller for the management of the accounting,
payroll, related financial systems and annual financial reports, including
prescribing the books and manner of accounting and internal control
guidance for all agencies of the commonwealth to promote accountability,
integrity and clarity in the commonwealth’s business, fiscal and
administrative enterprises and to mitigate the risk of fraud, waste and abuse
of the commonwealth’s resources; provided, that the comptroller shall
submit quarterly reports to the executive office for administration and finance
and the house and senate committees on ways and means which shall
include, for each state agency for which the commonwealth is billing, the
eligible state services and the full-year estimate of revenues and collected
revenues; provided further, that the comptroller shall make expenditures for
an enhanced intercept collections of delinquent debt program; and provided
further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the
comptroller may take any necessary actions to secure financial and payroll
data including, but not limited to, restricting certain data released under
section 20 of chapter 66 of the General Laws ......................................................$11,632,765
CANNABIS CONTROL COMMISSION.
1070-0840 For the operation of the cannabis control commission ..........................................$16,253,623
Marijuana Regulation Fund ......................................100%
1070-0842 For the cannabis control commission’s oversight of the medical marijuana
industry ....................................................................................................................$3,526,466
Marijuana Regulation Fund ......................................100%
EXECUTIVE OFFICE FOR ADMINISTRATION AND FINANCE.
Office of the Secretary.
34

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
1100-1100 For the office of the secretary of administration and finance; provided, that
the secretary shall provide biannual reports, the first of which shall be
submitted not later than January 29, 2027 and the second of which shall be
submitted not later than May 27, 2027, to the house and senate committees
on ways and means; provided further, that the reports shall summarize
existing and proposed collective bargaining agreements in an electronic
format, which shall include for each agreement, but not be limited to: (i) the
session law for the previously agreed upon collective bargaining agreement;
(ii) the current agreement status; (iii) the collective bargaining unit and unit
number; (iv) the number of full-time equivalent employees subject to the
agreement, by item; (v) a description of the membership of the unit; (vi) the
total salary base of the most recent previous agreement; (vii) the start date
and expiration date of the most recent agreement; (viii) the estimated total
fiscal impact of the agreement compared to the previous agreement; (ix) the
base salary increases required by the agreement, by effective time; and (x)
the funding status of the agreement; provided further, that the reports shall
detail, by bargaining unit, the costs to the commonwealth resulting from the
collective bargaining agreements with various public employees’ unions,
delineated by item; provided further, that the reports shall include, but not
be limited to, the: (a) effective date of any new negotiations or
renegotiations; (b) end date of the contract; (c) number of employees in the
bargaining unit, by department; and (d) costs associated with any new
negotiations or renegotiations, including salary adjustments, step increases,
statutory benefits and other non-salary costs for the current and subsequent
fiscal years for the life of the contract; provided further, that the executive
office for administration and finance shall submit quarterly reports to the
house and senate committees on ways and means detailing federal grant
applications submitted and federal grants received by executive branch
agencies during the applicable reporting period; and provided further, that
not later than December 2, 2026, the executive office for administration and
finance shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways
and means evaluating the stress impacts of varying economic scenarios for
the next 2 fiscal years including, but not limited to, the: (1) potential effects
of economic changes on tax revenue collections; and (2) sufficiency of the
Commonwealth Stabilization Fund established in section 2H of chapter 29
of the General Laws and other reserve balances in offsetting potential
revenue declines .....................................................................................................$4,837,840
1100-1201 For supporting activities relating to accountability and transparency
including, but not limited to, economic forecasting, adoption of uniform
procedures across state agencies and departments and maximizing federal
revenue opportunities .................................................................................................$582,639
1100-1700 For the provision of information technology services within the executive
office for administration and finance .....................................................................$39,262,566
1106-0064 For the caseload and economic forecasting office; provided, that the office
shall forecast: (i) MassHealth enrollment by group and coverage type; (ii)
participation in state-subsidized child care provided through items 3000-
3060 and 3000-4060; (iii) participation in emergency assistance and
housing programs provided through items 7004-0101, 7004-0102, 7004-
0108 and 7004-9316; (iv) enrollment of active members and dependents in
the group insurance commission; (v) recipients of direct benefits provided
by the department of transitional assistance through items 4400-1004,
4403-2000, 4405-2000 and 4408-1000; (vi) participation in programs
provided by the department of children and families through items 4800-
35

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
0038 and 4800-0041; and (vii) other related economic forecasts; provided
further, that not later than October 30, 2026, the office shall report its fiscal
year 2026 actuals, fiscal year 2027 year-to-date actuals and forecasts and
fiscal year 2028 forecasts to the executive office for administration and
finance and the house and senate committees on ways and means; and
provided further, that not later than March 16, 2027, the office shall submit
updated forecasts to the executive office for administration and finance and
to the house and senate committees on ways and means ........................................$245,616
Division of Capital Asset Management and Maintenance.
1102-3199 For the operation of the office of facilities management and maintenance,
including the cost of utilities and associated contracts for properties
managed by the division of capital asset management and maintenance ...........$31,606,483
1102-3205 For the division of capital asset management and maintenance, which may
expend for the maintenance and operation of the Massachusetts
information technology center and other state buildings not more than
$9,701,826 in revenues collected from rentals, commissions, fees and any
other sources pertaining to the operations of said facilities; provided, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose
of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the division may incur expenses and
the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of
this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the
state accounting system ..........................................................................................$9,701,826
1102-3233 For the division of capital asset management and maintenance for the
certification of contractors and subcontractors ...........................................................$986,564
Bureau of the State House.
1102-1128 For state house accessibility coordination, including communications
access to public hearings and meetings; provided, that access shall include
interpreter services for the deaf and hard of hearing .................................................$177,257
1102-3331 For the operation of the bureau of the state house; provided, that the
superintendent, director of operations and other employees of the bureau
shall work in conjunction with the business manager of the house of
representatives and the chief financial officer of the senate on the
maintenance, repair, purchases and payments for materials and services;
provided further, that funds shall be expended for full-time maintenance
coverage of elevators at the state house; and provided further, that funds
shall be expended for personnel necessary to provide management of
physical security technology at the state house ......................................................$4,575,172
1102-3400 For security operations at the bureau of the state house, including security
personnel necessary to adequately staff the security operations center and
manage communications for the bureau of the state house security and
emergency preparedness team with public safety agencies .....................................$242,500
Office on Disability.
1107-2400 For the Massachusetts office on disability ...............................................................$1,465,805
36

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
DISABLED PERSONS PROTECTION COMMISSION.
1107-2501 For the operation of the disabled persons protection commission including,
but not limited to, the costs of maintaining a computerized registry system
of persons who have been substantiated for registrable abuse of a person
with an intellectual or developmental disability; provided, that the
commission shall facilitate compliance by the department of mental health
and the department of developmental services with uniform investigative
standards; provided further, that the commission shall submit quarterly
reports to the house and senate committees on ways and means on the
number of claims of abuse by caretakers made by employees or contracted
service employees of the department of developmental services, the
department of mental health and MassAbility; provided further, that the
report shall include the number of: (i) substantiated claims; (ii)
unsubstantiated claims; and (iii) false claims reported as a result of
intentional and malicious action; and provided further, that all persons who
call the commission’s 24-hour hotline shall be provided with the opportunity
to elect that the call not be recorded .....................................................................$12,611,693
Civil Service Commission.
1108-1011 For the civil service commission; provided, that the General Fund shall be
reimbursed for the appropriation in this item through a fee charged on a per-
claim basis; provided further, that the commission shall develop and
implement regulations to provide for reimbursement to the General Fund;
and provided further, that the commission may assess a fee upon the
appointing authority when inappropriate action has occurred ................................$1,305,302
Group Insurance Commission.
1108-5100 For the operation of the group insurance commission; provided, that on a
monthly basis, the commission shall provide the caseload forecasting office
with enrollment data and any other information pertinent to caseload
forecasting; provided further, that the information shall be provided in a
manner that meets all applicable federal and state privacy requirements;
provided further, that the commission shall submit quarterly reports to the
house and senate committees on ways and means that shall include, but
not be limited to: (i) any proposed plan changes accompanied by a detailed
rationale for such changes; (ii) a detailed delineation of any estimated
deficiencies or reversions in the current fiscal year, detailed by item; and (iii)
a projection of any funding changes for the following fiscal year, detailed by
item; provided further, that not later than September 25, 2026 the first such
report shall be submitted; and provided further, that the commission shall
provide all materials presented at any public meetings hosted by the
commission to the house and senate committees on ways and means not
later than 15 days after the public meeting ..............................................................$5,609,591
1108-5200 For the commonwealth’s share of the group insurance premium and plan
costs incurred in fiscal year 2027; provided, that funds may be expended
from this item for the commonwealth’s share of group insurance premium
and plan costs provided to employees and retirees in prior fiscal years;
provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, funds in this item shall not be available during the accounts
payable period of fiscal year 2027 and any unexpended balance in this item
shall revert to the General Fund on June 30, 2027; provided further, that
37

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
funds may be expended from this item for elderly retired governmental
employees and retired municipal teachers; provided further, that the
commission may pay premium and plan costs for municipal employees and
retirees who are enrolled in the commission’s health plans under the
commission’s regulations; provided further, that the rules for determining the
commonwealth’s share of the group insurance premiums for active and
retired state employees shall be the same as the standards in effect on July
1, 2012; provided further, that notwithstanding section 26 of chapter 29 of
the General Laws, the commission may negotiate, purchase and execute
contracts before July 1 of each year for policies of group insurance under
chapter 32A of the General Laws; provided further, that the group insurance
commission shall obtain reimbursement for premium and administrative
expenses from other agencies and authorities not funded by state
appropriations; provided further, that the secretary of administration and
finance shall charge the department of unemployment assistance and other
departments, authorities, agencies and divisions that have federal or other
funds allocated to them for this purpose for that portion of insurance
premium and plan costs as the secretary determines shall be borne by such
funds and shall notify the comptroller of the amounts to be transferred, after
similar determination, from the several state or other funds and amounts
received in payment of all such charges or transfers shall be credited to the
General Fund; provided further, that the secretary of administration and
finance may charge all agencies for the commonwealth’s share of the health
insurance costs incurred on behalf of any employees of those agencies who
are on leave of absence for a period of more than 1 year; provided further,
that the amounts received in payment for the charges shall be credited to
the General Fund; provided further, that not less than 90 days before any
changes in coverage, benefits or the schedule of copayments and
deductibles for plans offered by the group insurance commission, the
commission shall notify the house and senate committees on ways and
means; and provided further, that not later than March 3, 2027, the
commission shall report to the house and senate committees on ways and
means on: (i) the average full cost premium equivalent per enrollee; (ii) the
average actual cost per enrollee for enrollees from participating
municipalities; (iii) the contribution ratios for each participating municipality
for fiscal year 2027; (iv) the number of members in high deductible health
plans; (v) the premium reimbursement paid by each municipality per active
enrollee by plan; (vi) the average employee premium contribution by plan
for each municipality; (vii) estimates for the total premium per active enrollee
by plan for each municipality; (viii) the average employee out-of-pocket
expenditure and premium contribution by salary level of employees; (ix) a
comparison of the total premium estimate with the sum total of municipality
reimbursement and average employee premium contribution; (x) the total
amount spent on pharmaceutical drugs; and (xi) the cost of the
commonwealth’s projected share of premiums for the next fiscal year ...........$2,765,209,719
1108-5201 For the costs incurred by the group insurance commission associated with
providing municipal health insurance coverage under section 19 of chapter
32B of the General Laws; provided, that the commission may expend not
more than $2,346,621 from revenue received from administrative fees
associated with providing municipal health insurance coverage under said
section 19 of said chapter 32B; and provided further, that notwithstanding
any general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating
timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
expenditures, the commission may incur expenses and the comptroller may
certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or
38

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting
system .....................................................................................................................$2,346,621
1108-5500 For the costs, notwithstanding chapter 32A of the General Laws, of dental
and vision benefits for active state employees, not including employees of
authorities or any other political subdivision, who are not otherwise provided
those benefits under a separate item or by the terms of a contract or
collective bargaining agreement; provided, that such employees shall pay
15 per cent of the monthly premiums established by the group insurance
commission for the benefits ...................................................................................$12,634,259
Division of Administrative Law Appeals.
1110-1000 For the operation of the division of administrative law appeals; provided, that
the division shall maintain, to the fullest extent practicable, a complete
physical and technological separation from any agency, department, board,
commission or program the decisions, determinations or actions of which
may be appealed to it; and provided further, that a decision issued by a
commissioner or other head of an agency or by such person’s designee
following the issuance of a recommended decision by an administrative law
judge shall be an agency decision subject to judicial review under chapter
30A of the General Laws .........................................................................................$2,201,006
1110-1002 For the division of administrative law appeals, which may expend not more
than $70,000 in revenues from fees charged to appellants upon the filing of
claims, for the operation of such services provided .....................................................$70,000
George Fingold Library.
1120-4005 For the administration of the George Fingold Library .............................................$1,663,212
Department of Revenue.
1201-0100 For the operation of the department of revenue, including tax collection
administration, audits of certain foreign corporations and the division of local
services; provided, that the department may allocate funds to the office of
the attorney general for the tax prosecution unit; provided further, that the
department may charge the expenses for computer services, including the
costs of personnel and other support costs provided to the child support
services unit, from this item to item 1201-0160 consistent with the costs
attributable to that unit; provided further, that the department shall provide the
general court with access to the municipal data bank; provided further, that
notwithstanding section 1 of chapter 31 of the General Laws, seasonal
positions funded by this item shall be positions requiring the services of an
incumbent, beginning not earlier than December 1 and ending not later than
November 30; provided further, that seasonal positions funded by this item
shall not be filled by an incumbent for more than 10 months within a 12-
month period; and provided further, that not less than $1,500,000 shall be
expended to organizations providing tax assistance services to individuals
and families qualifying for the volunteer income tax assistance program, in
partnership with the Internal Revenue Service, for the provision of such
services ................................................................................................................$106,366,605
1201-0122 For grants to qualified low-income taxpayer clinics established in section 13
of chapter 14 of the General Laws; provided, that not later than March 2,
39

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
2027, the department of revenue shall report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means on the: (i) number of grant applications; (ii)
number of rejected applications; (iii) reasons for those rejections; (iv)
estimated number of taxpayers served by each approved grant; (v)
geographic location of the approved grant recipient clinic; and (vi) average
size of approved grants ..............................................................................................$500,000
1201-0130 For the department of revenue, which may expend for the operation of the
department not more than $27,938,953 from revenues collected by the
additional auditors for an enhanced audit program; provided, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose
of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the department may incur expenses
and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the
lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported
in the state accounting system ..............................................................................$27,938,953
1201-0160 For the child support services division; provided, that the department of
revenue may allocate funds appropriated in this item to other state agencies
for the performance of certain child support services activities and those
agencies may expend funds for the purposes of this item; provided further,
that not later than March 3, 2027, all such allocations shall be reported to the
house and senate committees on ways and means upon the allocation of
the funds; provided further, that federal receipts associated with the child
support computer network shall be drawn down at the highest possible rate
of reimbursement and deposited into a revolving account to be expended
for the network; provided further, that federal receipts associated with child
support services grants shall be deposited into a revolving account to be
drawn down at the highest possible rate of reimbursement and shall be
expended for the grant authority; provided further, that not later than March
3, 2027, the department shall submit a report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means detailing the balance, year-to-date and
projected receipts and year-to-date and projected expenditures, by
subsidiary, of the child support trust fund established under section 9 of
chapter 119A of the General Laws; and provided further, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose
of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the department may incur expenses
and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the
lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported
in the state accounting system for federal incentives and the network in
items 1201-0165, 1201-0410 and 1201-0412 .......................................................$47,063,828
1201-0164 For the child support services division; provided, that the division may
expend not more than $6,767,251 from the federal reimbursements
awarded for personnel and lower subsidiary related expenditures; and
provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between
the receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures, the division may
incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to
exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate
as reported in the state accounting system .............................................................$6,767,251
1201-0400 For the operation of the multi-agency illegal tobacco task force established
in section 40 of chapter 64C of the General Laws ...................................................$1,072,879
40

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
1201-0911 For the costs associated with expert witnesses retained by the department of
revenue to resolve tax disputes; provided, that expenditures from this item
shall be the lesser of $173,250 or the amount certified by the secretary of
administration and finance under section 156 of chapter 139 of the acts of
2012 ............................................................................................................................$173,250
1231-1000 For the Commonwealth Sewer Rate Relief Fund established in section
2Z of chapter 29 of the General Laws .....................................................................$1,500,000
1232-0100 For underground storage tank reimbursements to parties that have
remediated spills of petroleum products under chapter 21J of the General
Laws ........................................................................................................................$5,842,714
Underground Storage Tank Petroleum
Product Cleanup Fund .............................................100%
1232-0200 For the Underground Storage Tank Petroleum Cleanup Fund
Administrative Review Board established in section 8 of chapter 21J of the
General Laws and for the administration of the underground storage tank
program associated with the implementation of said chapter 21J; provided,
that notwithstanding section 4 of said chapter 21J or any other general or
special law to the contrary, appropriations made from this item shall be
sufficient to cover the administrative expenses of the underground storage
tank program; and provided further, that not later than February 26, 2027,
the board shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways
and means on the status of the underground storage tank program including,
but not limited to, the: (i) number of municipal grants made for the removal
and replacement of underground storage tanks; (ii) reimbursements for
remediated petroleum spills; (iii) number of backlog claims; (iv) average
waiting period for claims granted in the past year; and (v) number of tanks
not in compliance with said chapter 21J .................................................................$1,892,435
Underground Storage Tank Petroleum
Product Cleanup Fund .............................................100%
1233-2000 For the tax abatement program for certain veterans, widows, blind persons
and the elderly; provided, that cities and towns shall be reimbursed for the
abatements granted under clauses Seventeenth, Twenty-second, Twenty-
second A, Twenty-second B, Twenty-second C, Twenty-second D, Twenty-
second E, Twenty-second F, Thirty-seventh, Thirty-seventh A, Forty-first,
Forty-first B, Forty-first C, Forty-first C 1/2 and Fifty-second of section 5 of
chapter 59 of the General Laws; provided further, that the commonwealth
shall reimburse each city or town that accepts said clause Forty-first B or
said clause Forty-first C of said section 5 of said chapter 59 for additional
costs incurred in determining eligibility of applicants under said clause Forty-
first B or said clause Forty-first C of said section 5 of said chapter 59 not more
than $2 per exemption granted; and provided further, that funds in this item
shall be available for reimbursements to cities and towns for additional
exemptions granted from the motor vehicle excise under the seventh
paragraph of section 1 of chapter 60A of the General Laws ...............................$43,119,996
1233-2350 For the distribution to cities and towns of the balance of the State Lottery
and Gaming Fund under clause (c) of the second paragraph of section 35 of
chapter 10 of the General Laws and additional aid to municipalities as
provided for in section 3 ....................................................................................$1,333,109,519
41

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
General Fund ........................................................84.98%
Gaming Local Aid Fund ........................................15.02%
1233-2400 For reimbursements to cities and towns in lieu of taxes on state-owned land
under sections 13 to 17, inclusive, of chapter 58 of the General Laws;
provided, that not less than $1,520,000 shall be expended for one-time,
additional reimbursements to cities and towns so that no city or town shall
receive an amount from this line item in fiscal year 2027 that is less than the
amount said city or town received in fiscal year 2026 ..........................................$55,371,000
1233-2401 For reimbursements to qualifying cities and towns for additional
educational costs under chapter 40S of the General Laws .....................................$1,200,000
Appellate Tax Board.
1310-1000 For the operation of the appellate tax board; provided, that the board shall
schedule hearings in each county; and provided further, that not later than
January 8, 2027, the board shall report to the house and senate committees
on ways and means on the number of hearings held at each location ..................$2,671,770
1310-1001 For the appellate tax board, which may expend not more than $400,000 in
revenues from fees collected; provided, that notwithstanding any general or
special law to the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing
discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
expenditures, the board may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify
for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the
most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting system ..............$400,000
Health Policy Commission.
1450-1200 For the operation of the health policy commission; provided, that the
commission shall provide all materials presented at any public meetings
hosted by the commission to the house and senate committees on ways
and means not later than 15 days after the public meeting ..................................$13,935,376
Reserves.
1599-0026 For a reserve to support municipal improvements; provided, that not less
than $3,000,000 shall be expended for the District Local Technical
Assistance Fund established under section 2XXX of chapter 29 of the
General Laws, for initiatives, including projects that encourage
regionalization, to be administered by the division of local services and
distributed through the District Local Technical Assistance Fund; provided
further, that not less than $15,000 shall be expended to the town of Sutton
for the maintenance, improvements, or removal of the Clark Reservoir
Dam; provided further, that not less than $30,000 shall be expended to the
town of Shrewsbury to upgrade athletic lights at Dean Park and Coolidge
Pickleball Court; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be
expended to the Longmeadow police department, to repurpose an existing
first floor room as an interview room to meet ADA requirements; provided
further, that not less than $40,000 shall be expended to the town of Paxton
for disaster relief, recovery costs and reimbursements for damage as a
result of the September 2025 tornado that touched down in said town;
provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the town
of Holden for essential renovations and the relocation of municipal
42

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
buildings; provided further, that not less than $8,000 shall be expended to
the town of Abington for maintenance and infrastructure improvements to
town hall facilities; provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall be
expended to Abington public schools for maintenance and infrastructure
improvements; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to the town of Whitman for animal control facility maintenance
and infrastructure improvements; provided further, that not less than
$100,000 shall be expended to Old Sturbridge Village Living History
Museum for capital improvements; provided further, that not less than
$25,000 shall be expended to the town of Chicopee to create an
emergency access and recreational ramp for the Chicopee River; provided
further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to the town of
Norwood for the repair and construction of infrastructure at the historic
Shattuck Memorial Park; provided further, that not less than $150,000
shall be expended to the town of Marlborough for GIS Flyover data capture
drone and analysis; provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be
expended to the town of Marlborough for continued upgrades for the
Marlborough downtown veterans park containing the Women’s Veterans,
MIA/POW, Spanish American and Civil War monuments; provided further,
that not less than $40,000 shall be expended to the city of Framingham
for the design, fabrication, engraving, installation and public dedication of
a Middle East Conflicts Veterans Memorial in Framingham; provided
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the city of Chelsea
to support a new fire station; provided further, that not less than $100,000
shall be expended to the town of Wakefield for restroom construction at
Veterans field in Wakefield; provided further, that not less than $100,000
shall be expended for Brighton Main Streets, Inc.; provided further, that
not less than $100,000 shall be expended to the city of Melrose for stage
lights replacements and other capital improvements at Memorial Hall;
provided further, that not less than $35,000 shall be expended to the town
of Swampscott for maintenance and repairs of deteriorating structures at
the Swampscott cemetery; provided further, that not less than $20,000
shall be expended to the town of Somerset for essential repairs to the
eroding Waterfront park seawall and damaged municipal parking lot in
Somerset; provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall be expended
to the town of Dalton for the purchase and installation of an emergency
generator at the Dalton senior center; provided further, that not less than
$25,000 shall be expended to the town of Essex for a study of Chebacco
lake and its watershed; provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall
be expended to the city of Gloucester for the planning and design of the
courtyard at O’Maley Innovation middle school; provided further, that not
less than $25,000 shall be expended to the town of Rowley for a PFAS
remediation system to bring Town Well #2 online; provided further, that
not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the town of Ipswich for water
treatment plant updates and wastewater treatment to alleviate issues that
have contributed to the closure of local clam flats; provided further, that
not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the town of Georgetown for
critical water treatment infrastructure; provided further, that not less than
$25,000 shelled be expended to the town of Newbury to address
watershed supply and drought management; provided further, that not less
than $50,000 shall be expended to the city of Malden for upgrades and
capital improvements to the city’s streetscape; provided further, that not
less than $100,000 shall be expended to the city of Malden for flood
mitigation and stormwater infrastructure improvements including, but not
limited to, the cleaning and maintenance of the Town Line brook and
Linden brook culverts; provided further, that not less than $75,000 shall be
43

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
expended town of North Reading for roof maintenance at the historic
Putnam House; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be
expended to Wayland public schools for wellness and recreational
enhancements at Wayland high school and Happy Hollow elementary
school; provided further, that not less than $250,000 shall be expended to
support Volunteer Medical Group of Eastern Massachusetts to cover start-
up costs and to provide primary care services to uninsured patients in the
Allston, Brighton, Watertown and Waltham communities; provided further,
that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the Wrentham department
of public works for the procurement of a vacuum excavation trailer;
provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall be expended to the city
known as the town of North Attleborough for a feasibility study regarding
the World War II Memorial Pool; provided further, that not less than
$25,000 shall be expended to the town of Petersham to replace its current
ADA-compliant ramp for the Town Office building; provided further, that
not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the town of Petersham for
unanticipated costs associated with continuing ambulance services;
provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the town
of Scituate for the renovation and conversion of the WPA building into a
veterans’ space, in coordination with the executive office of veterans’
services; provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall be expended
to the town of Medfield for technological and facility upgrades to its town
hall; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the
city of Westfield for capital improvements to Bullens field in Westfield; and
provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to the town
of Wellesley for digital content updates and modifications ...................................$9,638,000
1599-0093 For contract assistance to the Massachusetts Clean Water Trust including,
but not limited to, the debt service obligations of the trust, principal
forgiveness, interest rate reduction and other subsidies or financial
assistance under sections 6 and 18 of chapter 29C of the General Laws ...........$63,383,680
1599-0105 For a reserve for costs associated with the delivery of medication-assisted
treatment for substance use disorder at county correctional facilities under
section 98 of chapter 208 of the acts of 2018; provided, that the secretary of
administration and finance, in consultation with the commissioner of public
health, may transfer funds from this item to commonwealth agencies as
defined under section 1 of chapter 29 of the General Laws; and provided
further, that not less than 30 days before any such transfer, the secretary
shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways and
means detailing the amount to be given to each state agency, delineated
by item ....................................................................................................................$18,500,000
1599-0340 For a reserve for costs associated with increasing starting salaries for
assistant district attorneys .......................................................................................$6,000,000
1599-1970 For a reserve for the Massachusetts Department of Transportation to defray
the costs of the Massachusetts Turnpike Authority, or its successor, incurred
in fiscal year 2026 under section 138 of chapter 27 of the acts of 2009 .............$125,000,000
Commonwealth Transportation Fund .......................100%
1599-1977 For contract assistance and other payments to the Massachusetts
Development Finance Agency for payment of debt service and related
obligations in connection with bonds issued by the agency under chapter
293 of the acts of 2006, as amended by chapter 129 of the acts of 2008,
44

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
chapter 238 of the acts of 2012, chapter 287 of the acts of 2014 and chapter
219 of the acts of 2016; provided, that not later than January 29, 2027, the
secretary of administration and finance shall submit a report to the house
and senate committees on ways and means on the estimated contract
assistance and other payments to be required under said chapter 293 of the
acts of 2006, said chapter 219 of the acts of 2016, said chapter 238 of the
acts of 2012 and said chapter 287 of the acts of 2014 for obligations existing
not later than July 1, 2026, in fiscal years 2028 and 2029 and an estimate
of anticipated contract assistance and other payments arising out of
potential agreements reasonably expected to be entered into after July 1,
2026, in fiscal years 2028 and 2029 .....................................................................$13,000,000
1599-2003 For the Uniform Law Commission; provided, that prior fiscal year
payments may be payable from this item .....................................................................$75,000
1599-3234 For the South Essex sewerage district debt service assessment ................................$33,914
1599-3384 For a reserve for the payment on behalf of a state agency as defined in
section 1 of chapter 29 of the General Laws under regulations promulgated
by the comptroller, of certain court judgments, settlements and legal fees
that were ordered to be paid in the current fiscal year or a prior fiscal year;
provided, that the office of the comptroller shall not pay attorneys’ fees to
outside counsel representing a state agency, including a state official or
employee who is sued for actions undertaken within that individual’s scope
of employment for the commonwealth, in litigation before a court until the
office of the attorney general has reviewed and provided written approval
for the outside counsel's bills, which may be reviewed in redacted form if
warranted because of a conflict of interest; provided further, that the office
of the comptroller shall not pay attorneys’ fees for outside counsel
representing a state agency in such litigation that exceeds a cumulative
amount of $250,000 until the secretary of administration and finance or a
designee has reviewed and provided written approval for such attorneys’
fees for outside counsel; provided further, that before a state official or
employee who is sued for actions undertaken within that individual’s scope
of employment for the commonwealth may seek reimbursement from this
item, that individual shall obtain written approval from the office of the
attorney general in a form to be approved by the office of the comptroller;
provided further, that the office of the comptroller shall not pay a settlement
of litigation before a court on behalf of a state agency that is not within an
executive office identified in section 2 of chapter 6A of the General Laws,
including any state official or employee who is sued for actions undertaken
within that individual’s scope of employment for the commonwealth, until the
office of the attorney general has reviewed and provided written approval for
such a settlement; provided further, that the office of the comptroller shall
not pay a settlement of litigation before a court that exceeds $250,000 on
behalf of a state agency that is not within an executive office identified under
said section 2 of said chapter 6A, including a state official or employee who
is sued for actions undertaken within that individual’s scope of employment
for the commonwealth, until the secretary of administration and finance or a
designee has reviewed and provided written approval for such a settlement;
provided further, that the office of the comptroller may certify for payment
amounts not to exceed the 5-year historical expenditure average as certified
by the secretary of administration and finance or the current appropriation,
whichever is greater; provided further, that the comptroller shall submit
quarterly reports to the house and senate committees on ways and means
on the amounts expended from this item, delineated by item; and provided
45

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
further, that upon written notification to the executive office for administration
and finance and the house and senate committees on ways and means,
uncommitted and unobligated funds from this item may be transferred to
item 0612-0105 upon the request of the state treasurer .......................................$1,000,000
1599-4417 For the Edward J. Collins Jr. Center for Public Management in the John W.
McCormack Graduate School of Policy and Global Studies at the
University of Massachusetts at Boston .......................................................................$275,000
1599-6903 For the fiscal year 2027 costs of rate implementations under chapter 257 of
the acts of 2008; provided, that rate implementations under said chapter 257
may include, but shall not be limited to, costs associated with any court order
or settlement between providers of services and the commonwealth related
to the rate implementation process; provided further, that preference in
distributing funds from this item shall be given to personnel earning wages
less than $20 per hour; provided further, that home care workers shall be
eligible for funding from this item; provided further, that workers from
shelters and programs that serve homeless individuals and families that
were previously contracted through the department of transitional
assistance and the department of public health who are currently contracted
with the executive office of housing and livable communities and direct care
workers that serve homeless veterans through the executive office of
veterans' services shall be eligible for funding from this item; provided
further, that no funds from this item shall be allocated to special education
programs under chapter 71B of the General Laws, contracts for early
education and care services or programs for which payment rates are
negotiated and paid as class rates as established by the executive office of
health and human services; provided further, that no funds shall be allocated
from this item to contracts funded exclusively by federal grants as delineated
in section 2D of this act; provided further, that the secretary of
administration and finance may transfer from the sum appropriated in this
item to other items of appropriation and allocations thereof for fiscal year
2027, amounts that are necessary to meet these costs where the amounts
otherwise available are insufficient for the purpose of rate implementations;
provided further, that the executive office for administration and finance shall
submit quarterly reports to the house and senate committees on ways and
means on transfers made from this item; provided further, that the report
shall identify, by line item and service class, all transfers made from this item
as of the date of the report and all transfers expected to be made before the
end of the fiscal year; provided further, that not later than February 3, 2027,
the executive office of health and human services shall submit a report to
the executive office for administration and finance and the house and senate
committees on ways and means on the implementation of rates under
chapter 257 of the acts of 2008, including, the: (i) state costs for rates
promulgated as of July 1, 2026 by regulation, department and program; (ii)
state costs for rates promulgated as of January 1, 2027 delineated by
regulation, department and program; (iii) per cent of increase in state
funding for rates to be reviewed between July 1, 2026 and June 30, 2027
delineated by regulation, department and program; and (iv) fiscal impact for
increases in state funding versus prior fiscal year actual costs for rates to be
reviewed between July 1, 2026 and June 30, 2027 by regulation,
department and program; provided further, that contracts between providers
and the departments within the executive office of health and human
services and the executive office of aging and independence shall require
providers to report on the impact of the rate implementations on employee
salaries, employee-related costs and operations; provided further, that not
46

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
later than April 1, 2027 the executive office of health and human services
shall submit a report to the executive office for administration and finance
and the house and senate committees on ways and means on the
implementation of ongoing and proposed initiatives that increase the hourly
wages and compensation of the direct care human service workforce;
provided further, that this report shall include: (a) the average uniform
financial report provider data on employee tax and fringe benefit information
of the preceding 2 state fiscal years, as validated with information from the
uniform financial report or a method determined by the executive office; (b)
the median salary and compensation information of the preceding 2 state
fiscal years classified by direct care and frontline staff, medical and clinical
staff and management staff, as validated with information from the uniform
financial report or a method determined by the executive office; (c) a
comparison of the median salary for each classification of staff position with
the fiftieth percentile wage estimate for that position as determined by the
United States Bureau of Labor Statistics for the commonwealth using the
available data for that rate review; and (d) the average employee vacancy
rates of direct care and frontline staff for the preceding 2 state fiscal years
and the current fiscal year from the date of new rate implementations;
provided further, that not later than March 4, 2027 the executive office health
and human services shall report to the house and senate committees on
ways and means a comparison of the median salary for each classification
of staff position with the seventy-fifth percentile wage estimate for that
position as determined by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics for
Massachusetts in the most recent available data; provided further, that not
later than December 30, 2026 the executive office of health and human
services shall report to the house and senate committees on ways
and means the methodology used to develop service rates for home health
aides, personal care aides and homemakers; and provided further, that any
human service provider receiving revenue under said chapter 257 shall use
not less than 75 per cent of received funds for compensation for their direct
care, frontline and medical and clinical staff, which may include, but shall not
be limited to, hourly rate increases, wraparound benefits, shift differentials,
overtime, hiring and retention bonuses or recruitment, as defined by the
executive office ....................................................................................................$175,000,000
Human Resources Division.
1750-0100 For the operation of the human resources division and the costs of
administration, training and customer support related to the
commonwealth’s human resources and compensation management
system and the human resource modernization initiative; provided, that any
employee of the commonwealth who chooses to participate in a bone
marrow donor program shall be granted a leave of absence without loss or
reduction in pay to undergo the medical procedure and for associated
physical recovery time, but such leave shall not exceed 5 days; provided
further, that notwithstanding clause (n) of section 5 of chapter 31 of the
General Laws or any other general or special law to the contrary, the
secretary of administration and finance shall charge a fee of not less than
$50 to be collected from each applicant for a civil service examination;
provided further, that the division shall administer a program of state
employee unemployment management including, but not limited to, agency
training and assistance; provided further, that funds may be expended to
revalidate civil service exams, including police and fire medical standards;
provided further, that the division shall be responsible for the administration
of examinations for state and municipal civil service titles, establishment of
47

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
eligible lists, certification of eligible candidates to state and municipal
appointing authorities and technical assistance in selection and appointment
to state and municipal appointing authorities; and provided further, that the
division shall administer the statewide classification system including, but
not limited to, maintaining a classification pay plan for civil service titles in
accordance with generally accepted compensation standards and
reviewing appeals for reclassification ..................................................................$17,546,607
1750-0103 For the operation of the training and career ladder program .....................................$829,164
1750-0104 For the human resources division, which may expend for the administration
of the civil service examination program, examinations for non-civil service
positions and implementation of the medical and physical fitness standards
programs ..................................................................................................................$5,846,319
1750-0119 For payment of workers’ compensation benefits to certain former employees
of Middlesex and Worcester counties and the Hampshire council of
government; provided, that the human resources division shall routinely
recertify the former employees under current workers’ compensation
procedures ....................................................................................................................$53,548
1750-0300 For the commonwealth’s contributions in fiscal year 2027 to health and
welfare funds established under certain collective bargaining agreements;
provided, that the contributions shall be calculated as provided under the
applicable collective bargaining agreements and shall be paid to the health
and welfare trust funds on a monthly basis or on such other basis as the
applicable collective bargaining agreement shall provide .....................................$37,979,800
1750-0928 For the cost to lease or rent space to administer the civil service physical
abilities tests and to revalidate civil service exams, including police and fire
medical standards ......................................................................................................$752,345
Operational Services Division.
1775-0115 For the operational services division, which may expend not more than
$16,011,867 from revenues collected from the statewide contract
administrative fee to procure, manage and administer statewide contracts;
provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for
the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of
retained revenues and related expenditures, the division may incur
expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to
exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate
as reported in the state accounting system ..........................................................$16,011,867
1775-0124 For the operational services division, which may expend not more than
$131,101 from revenues collected in the recovery of cost reimbursement
and non-reimbursable overbilling and recoupment for health and human
service agencies and as a result of administrative reviews as determined
during the division’s audits and reviews of providers under section 22N of
chapter 7 of the General Laws; provided, that the division may only retain
revenues collected in excess of $100,000; and provided further, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose
of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the division may incur expenses and
the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of
48

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the
state accounting system .............................................................................................$131,101
1775-0600 For the operational services division, which may expend not more than
$397,220 from revenues collected from the sale of state surplus personal
property and the disposal of surplus motor vehicles including, but not limited
to, state police vehicles from vehicle accident and damage claims and from
manufacturer warranties, rebates and settlements for the payment,
expenses and liabilities for the acquisition, warehousing, allocation and
distribution of surplus property and the purchase of motor vehicles;
provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for
the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of
retained revenues and related expenditures, the division may incur
expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to
exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate
as reported in the state accounting system, including the costs of personnel
....................................................................................................................................$397,220
1775-0700 For the operational services division, which may expend not more than
$1,000,000 from revenues collected in addition to the amount authorized in
item 1775-1000 of section 2B for printing, photocopying, mailing, related
graphic art or design work and other reprographic goods and services
provided to the general public, including all necessary or incidental
expenses; provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between
the receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures, the division may
incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to
exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate
as reported in the state accounting system ............................................................$1,000,000
1775-0900 For the operational services division, which may expend not more than
$22,000 from revenues collected under chapter 449 of the acts of 1984 and
section 4L of chapter 7 of the General Laws, including the costs of
personnel, from the sale of federal surplus property, including the payment,
expenses and liabilities for the acquisition, warehousing, allocation and
distribution of federal surplus property; provided, that notwithstanding any
general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating
timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
expenditures, the division may incur expenses and the comptroller may
certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or
the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting
system ...........................................................................................................................$22,000
Supplier Diversity Office.
1780-0100 For the operation and administration of the supplier diversity office;
provided, that the office shall provide training and other services to diverse
businesses, as defined in section 58 of chapter 7 of the General Laws,
certified by the office that allow those businesses to better compete for state
contracts and ensure that equitable practices and policies in the public
marketplace are maintained; provided further, that the office shall administer
an electronic business certification application which shall be accessible to
business applicants through the internet; provided further, that the office
shall ensure the integrity and security of personal and financial information
transmitted by electronic application; and provided further, that the office
shall, using all existing available resources, provide certification services to
49

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
all supplier diversity office qualified applicants within or outside of the
commonwealth, as applicable .................................................................................$4,744,508
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF VETERANS’ SERVICES.
Office of the Secretary.
1410-0010 For the operation of the executive office of veterans’ services; provided, that
the secretary of veterans' services may transfer funds between 1410-0010,
1410-0012, 1410-0015, 1410-0018, 1410-0024, 1410-0075, 1410-0251,
1410-0400, 1410-0630, 1410-1616 and 1410-1700; provided further, that
funds may be transferred from said items to items 4180-0100 and 4190-
0100; and provided further, that the secretary shall notify the house and
senate committees on ways and means not less than 30 days in advance
of any such transfer ...............................................................................................$12,724,233
1410-0012 For services to veterans, including the maintenance and operation of
outreach centers; provided, that said outreach centers shall provide
counseling to incarcerated veterans and to Vietnam war era veterans who
may have been exposed to agent orange and the families of such veterans;
provided further, that said outreach centers shall provide services to
veterans who were discharged after September 11, 2001 and the families
of those veterans; provided further, that $2,000,000 shall be expended for
clinical care, education and training in veterans' mental and behavioral
health issues, including post-traumatic stress, traumatic brain injury,
substance use disorder and suicide prevention administered by the
Massachusetts General Hospital Home Base Program; provided further,
that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to Veterans Inc. to expand
its behavioral health programming and create low-barrier access to
treatment for persons at the Worcester housing programs, and that these
funds shall be in addition to funds available for its outreach center;
provided further, that not less than $10,000 shall be expended to The
Veteran's Kitchen of Fall River, Inc.; provided further, that not less than
$10,000 shall be expended to the South Attleboro Lions Club, Inc. for costs
associated with their wheelchair ramp project; provided further, that not
less than $25,000 shall be expended to The Cape and Islands Veterans
Outreach Center, Inc. for the purpose of communications and systems
upgrades; provided further, that not less than $350,000 shall be expended
to the New England Brain Sciences Institute, Inc. to deliver cutting-edge
brain treatment to veterans and first responders; provided further, that not
less than $30,000 shall be expended to the Veterans Oral History Project
in the town of Natick; provided further, that not less than $10,000 shall be
expended to VFW Post 1645 and American Legion Post 89 combined in
the town of Stoughton; provided further, that not less than $10,000 shall
be expended to VFW Post 8892 in the town of Avon for building
improvements; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to Springfield Veterans First (NABVET) Outreach Center;
provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended for Project
New Hope Incorporated for initiatives related to veteran outreach,
community engagement in the town of Leicester, and wellness programs;
provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the
Bilingual Veterans Outreach Centers of Massachusetts, Inc. in the city of
Springfield for a city of Pittsfield caseworker; provided further, that not less
than $125,000 shall be expended to the Montachusett Veterans Outreach
Center, Inc. for supportive housing programs and operational functions;
50

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the
Abraham Lincoln Post 11 in the Charlestown section of the city of Boston
for facility upgrades and maintenance; provided further, that not less than
$200,000 shall be expended to Brave for Veterans, Inc. to support
research programs benefiting veterans in the commonwealth; provided
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to New England
Wounded Veterans, Inc. for the development of the East Boston Veterans
Museum; provided further, that the executive office of veterans’ services
shall make a payment of not less than the amount appropriated for each
outreach center funded by this item in fiscal year 2026; and provided further,
that not later than March 26, 2027, the executive office shall submit a report
to the house and senate committees on ways and means detailing for each
outreach center receiving funds under this item: (i) the number of veterans
served annually; (ii) the cost and types of programs, including evidence-
based or evidence-informed programs, offered to veterans; and (iii) a 5-year
spending plan or outline that shall include a summary of the implementation
or further development of evidence-based programs and program
evaluation ..............................................................................................................$10,627,339
1410-0013 For veterans' education, employment and training services and programs to
expand employment, education and training support for veterans returning
to the commonwealth including, but not limited to, the Veterans Coordinated
Approach to Recovery and Employment program that supports unemployed
or underemployed veterans with post-traumatic stress disorder to attain
competitive employment ..........................................................................................$1,650,000
1410-0015 For the women veterans’ outreach program ..............................................................$721,444
1410-0018 For the executive office of veterans’ services, which may expend not more
than $760,000 for the maintenance and operation of veterans’ cemeteries in
the city known as the town of Agawam and the town of Winchendon from
revenue collected from fees, grants, gifts and other contributions to the
cemeteries; provided, that the funds appropriated in this item shall not revert
to the General Fund but shall be made available for these purposes through
June 30, 2028 .............................................................................................................$760,000
1410-0024 For the training and certification of veterans' benefits and services officers;
provided, that the secretary of veterans' services shall continue a training
program for veterans' agents and directors of veterans' services in cities and
towns; provided further, that the executive office of veterans' services shall
provide such training in several locations across the commonwealth; and
provided further, that training shall be provided annually and on an as
needed basis to veterans' service organizations recognized by the executive
office of veterans affairs to provide information and education regarding the
benefits available under chapter 115 of the General Laws and all other
benefits to which a veteran or a veteran's dependents may be entitled ....................$385,068
1410-0075 For the train vets to treat vets program; provided, that the executive office of
veterans’ services shall work in conjunction with the William James College,
Inc. to administer a behavioral health career development program for
veterans ......................................................................................................................$275,000
1410-0250 For veterans’ homelessness services; provided, that the executive office of
veterans’ services shall expend not less than the amount appropriated for
each veterans’ homelessness service funded by this item in fiscal year 2026;
and provided further, that not less than $175,000 shall be expended to
51

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
Volunteers of America Massachusetts, Inc. for the development of an
innovative transitional employment program for individuals in recovery
from mental health and substance use disorder ...................................................$4,117,952
1410-0251 For the maintenance and operation of homeless shelters and transitional
housing for veterans at the New England Center and Home for Veterans
located in the city of Boston .....................................................................................$4,043,750
1410-0400 For reimbursements to cities and towns for money expended for veterans’
benefits and for payments to certain veterans under section 6 of chapter 115
of the General Laws and for the payment of annuities to certain disabled
veterans; provided, that annuity payments made under this item shall be
made under sections 6A, 6B and 6C of said chapter 115; provided further,
that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, 100 per cent
of the amounts of veterans’ benefits paid by cities and towns to residents of
a state-operated veterans’ home, homeless shelter or transitional housing
facility shall be paid by the commonwealth to said cities and towns; provided
further, that under section 9 of said chapter 115, the executive office of
veterans’ services shall reimburse cities and towns for the cost of United
States flags placed on the graves of veterans on Memorial Day; provided
further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the
executive office shall continue a training program for veterans’ agents and
directors of veterans’ services in cities and towns; provided further, that the
executive office shall provide such training in several locations across the
commonwealth; provided further, that such training shall be provided
annually and on an as-needed basis to veterans’ service organizations to
provide information and education regarding the benefits available under
said chapter 115 and all other benefits to which a veteran or a veteran’s
dependents may be entitled; provided further, that any person applying for
veterans’ benefits to pay for services available under chapter 118E of the
General Laws shall also apply for medical assistance under said chapter
118E to minimize costs to the commonwealth and its municipalities;
provided further, that veterans’ agents shall complete applications
authorized by the executive office for the spouse or dependent applying for
medical assistance under said chapter 115; provided further, that the
veterans’ agent shall file the application for the veteran, surviving spouse or
dependent for assistance under said chapter 118E; provided further, that
the executive office of health and human services shall act on all chapter
118E applications and advise the applicant and the veterans’ agent of the
applicant’s eligibility for said chapter 118E healthcare; provided further, that
the veterans’ agent shall advise the applicant of the right to assistance for
medical benefits under said chapter 115 pending approval of the application
for assistance under said chapter 118E by the executive office of health and
human services; provided further, that the secretary of veterans’ services
may supplement health care under said chapter 118E with health care
coverage under said chapter 115 if the secretary determines that
supplemental coverage is necessary to provide the veteran, surviving
spouse or dependent with sufficient relief and support; provided further, that
payments to, or on behalf of, a veteran, surviving spouse or dependent
under said chapter 115 shall not be considered income for determining
eligibility under said chapter 118E; and provided further, that benefits
awarded under said section 6B of said chapter 115 shall be considered
countable income ..................................................................................................$85,049,082
1410-0630 For the administration of the veterans’ cemeteries in the town of
Winchendon and in the city known as the town of Agawam ...................................$1,567,538
52

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
1410-1616 For war memorials; provided, that not less than $100,000 shall be
expended to the city of Worcester for the maintenance and care of the
Vietnam Veterans Memorial in the city of Worcester; and provided further,
that not less than $10,000 shall be expended for the North Adams
Veterans Memorial Wall ............................................................................................$110,000
1410-1700 For the provision of information technology services within the
executive office of veterans' services ......................................................................$4,749,739
State-operated Veterans’ Home in the City of Chelsea.
4180-0100 For the maintenance and operation of the state-operated veterans’ home in
the city of Chelsea, including a specialized unit for the treatment of
Alzheimer’s disease patients; provided, that no fee, assessment or other
charge shall be imposed upon or required of any person for any admission
or hospitalization which exceeds the amount of fees charged in fiscal year
2026 .......................................................................................................................$45,464,230
4180-1100 For the maintenance and operation of the state-operated veterans’ home in
the city of Chelsea in an amount not to exceed $500,000; provided, that 50
per cent of all revenues generated under section 2 of chapter 90 of the
General Laws through the purchase of license plates with the designation
VETERAN by eligible veterans of the commonwealth, after compensating
the registry of motor vehicles for the costs associated with the license plates,
shall be deposited into and for the purposes of this account; and provided
further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for
the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of
retained revenues and related expenditures, the department may incur
expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to
exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate,
as reported in the state accounting system, prior appropriation continued ...............$500,000
State-operated Veterans’ Home in the City of Holyoke.
4190-0100 For the maintenance and operation of the state-operated veterans’ home in
the city of Holyoke; provided, that no fee, assessment or other charge shall
be imposed upon or required of any person for any outpatient treatment,
admission or hospitalization that exceeds the amount of fees charge in fiscal
year 2026; and provided further, that funds shall be expended for the
operation of an ombudsman’s office at the Soldiers’ Home in Holyoke to act
as an independent, impartial and confidential resource for the community .........$36,885,297
4190-0103 For the state-operated veterans’ home in the city of Holyoke, which may
expend not more than $50,000 for its operation from the sale of goods to
residents and visitors of the home ................................................................................$50,000
4190-0300 For the state-operated veterans’ home in the city of Holyoke, which may
expend not more than $2,400,000 for the operation of 12 long-term care
beds from revenue generated through the occupancy of those beds;
provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for
the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of
retained revenues and related expenditures, the home may incur expenses
and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the
lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported
in the state accounting system, prior appropriation continued ...............................$2,400,000
53

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
4190-1100 For the maintenance and operation of the state-operated veterans’ home in
the city of Holyoke in an amount not to exceed $500,000; provided, that 50
per cent of all revenues generated under section 2 of chapter 90 of the
General Laws through the purchase of license plates with the designation
VETERAN by eligible veterans of the commonwealth, after compensating
the registry of motor vehicles for the costs associated with the license plates,
shall be deposited into and for the purposes of this account; and provided
further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for
the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of
retained revenues and related expenditures, the department may incur
expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to
exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate,
as reported in the state accounting system, prior appropriation continued ...............$500,000
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF TECHNOLOGY SERVICES AND SECURITY.
1790-0100 For the operation of the executive office of technology services and security;
provided, that the executive office shall continue a chargeback system for
its information technology services; provided further, that the state
comptroller shall establish accounts and procedures as the comptroller
deems appropriate and necessary to assist in accomplishing the purposes
of this item; provided further, that the executive office may establish rules
and procedures necessary to implement this item; provided further, that the
chief information officer shall review and approve any planned information
technology development project or purchase by any agency under the
authority of the governor for which the total projected cost exceeds
$200,000, including the cost of any related hardware, software or consulting
fees and regardless of fiscal year or source of funds, before the agency may
obligate funds for the project or purchase; provided further, that not later
than June 30, 2027, the secretary of technology services and security shall
submit to the office of the state auditor, the house and senate committees
on ways and means and the joint committee on state administration and
regulatory oversight a complete accounting of and justification for all project-
related expenditures totaling $250,000 or more over the previous 12-month
period regardless of source of funds or authorization for such expenditure;
provided further, that not less than $250,000 shall be expended to expand
the AI For Impact program to design, test and deploy artificial intelligence
solutions that improve delivery of state services and build an AI-ready
state workforce; and provided further, that not later than February 17, 2027,
the executive office shall submit a report to the executive office for
administration and finance, the office of the state auditor and the house and
senate committees on ways and means that shall include, but not be limited
to: (i) financial statements detailing savings and, where applicable,
additional expenses realized from the consolidation of information
technology services within each executive office and other initiatives; (ii)
efforts being taken to ensure the compatibility and interoperability of agency
systems and to consolidate relevant data between agencies; (iii) the number
of personnel assigned to information technology services within each
executive office; (iv) efficiencies that have been achieved from the sharing
of resources; (v) the status of the centralization of the commonwealth's
information technology staffing, infrastructure and network and cloud
hosting; (vi) the status of the commonwealth's cybersecurity; and (vii)
strategies and initiatives to further improve the: (a) efficiency and security of
the commonwealth's information technology; and (b) transparency of the
54

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
executive office of technology services and security with the general court,
other executive branch agencies and the general public .....................................$$3,897,090
1790-0300 For the executive office of technology services and security, which may
expend not more than $2,733,931 in revenues collected from the provision
of computer resources and services to the general public for the costs of the
bureau of computer services, including the purchase, lease or rental of
telecommunications lines, services and equipment; provided, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose
of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the executive office may incur expenses
and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the
lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported
in the state accounting system ................................................................................$2,733,931
1790-1700 For core technology services and security, including those previously
funded through item 1790-0200 in prior fiscal years .............................................$53,892,963
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF ENERGY AND ENVIRONMENTAL AFFAIRS.
Office of the Secretary.
2000-0100 For the operation of the office of the secretary of energy and environmental
affairs, including the water resources commission, the hazardous waste
facility site safety council, the coastal zone management program and
environmental impact reviews conducted under chapter 30 of the General
Laws; provided, that efforts shall be made to prioritize environmental justice
across all departments; provided further, that not less than $500,000 shall
be expended to the Cape Cod Commercial Fishermen’s Alliance, Inc. for
the modernization and maintenance of sustainable fishing; and provided
further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to Quiet
Communities, Inc. in Concord ..............................................................................$20,722,773
2000-0101 For the executive office of energy and environmental affairs to coordinate
and implement strategies for climate change adaptation and preparedness
including, but not limited to: (i) the resiliency of the commonwealth's
transportation, energy and public health infrastructures; (ii) built
environments; (iii) municipal assistance; (iv) improved data collection and
analysis; (v) enhanced planning; and (vi) improved resiliency through the
strengthening and revitalization of natural resources, including marshes and
other wetlands; provided, that the executive office may enter into
interagency service agreements to facilitate and accomplish these efforts;
provided further, that not later than February 5, 2027 the executive office of
energy and environmental affairs shall submit a report to the house and
senate committees on ways and means that shall include, but not be limited
to: (a) the commonwealth’s multi-year plan for developing a climate change
resiliency plan and response strategy; (b) plans to support local partners in
climate change adaptation and resiliency; (c) an analysis of the differing
effects of climate change in different geographic, ecological, and coastal
regions of the state, including urban, suburban and rural homes; (d) a review
of the environmental justice impacts of climate change on communities of
color; and (e) a detailed breakdown of all expenditures made under this item;
provided further, that not less than $200,000 shall be expended to Boston
Harbor Now, Inc. for planning, programming and activation and for climate
resiliency and community science education; provided further, that not less
55

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
than $300,000 shall be expended to the University of Massachusetts
Boston to compile and use new technologies to conduct a climate
resiliency report and study on preparing for low probability high impact
event; and provided further, that not later than December 30, 2026 the
executive office shall submit a report to the house and senate committees
on ways and means, the house committee on climate action and
sustainability, the senate committee on climate change and global warming,
the joint committee on transportation and the joint committee on
telecommunications, utilities and energy that shall include the status of its
efforts to enhance port infrastructure for the development of offshore wind ..........$4,779,957
2000-0102 For the executive office of energy and environmental affairs to implement
an environmental justice strategy and promote and secure environmental
justice; provided, that funds shall be expended on language translation
services to ensure adequate access during public comment periods; and
provided further, that not later than March 3, 2027, the executive office shall
submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways and means
that shall include, but not be limited to: (i) the number of full-time equivalent
positions assigned to the executive office’s environmental justice staff; (ii)
the responsibilities held by the executive office’s environmental justice staff;
(iii) the status of environmental justice policies, strategies and initiatives
being pursued for both the current and coming fiscal years; (iv) the efforts
to expand language access through verbal and written materials, including
the languages in which policy and materials have been translated; and (v)
the impact of language access initiatives on participation in public hearings
and public comment periods ...................................................................................$4,591,056
2000-0120 For obligations of the commonwealth to neighboring states incurred
pursuant to interstate compacts for flood control .......................................................$506,140
2000-0125 For the purposes of a dam safety technical assistance program for public
and private dam owners; provided, that the program will support compliance
with existing dam safety requirements; and provided further, that not less
than $25,000 shall be expended to the town of Foxborough for necessary
repairs and improvements to aging dam structures .............................................$1,015,000
2000-1011 For the office of environmental law enforcement, which may expend not
more than $40,000 from the administrative handling charge revenues
received from electronic transactions processed through its online licensing
and registration systems; provided, that notwithstanding any general or
special law to the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing
discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
expenditures, the office may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify
for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the
most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting system ................$40,000
2000-1700 For the operation of information technology services within the executive
office of energy and environmental affairs ............................................................$22,301,293
2030-1000 For the operation of the office of environmental law enforcement; provided,
that environmental police officers shall provide monitoring under the
National Shellfish Sanitation Program ...................................................................$17,097,428
2030-1004 For environmental police private details; provided, that the office of
environmental law enforcement may expend not more than $650,000 from
revenues collected from the fees charged for private details; and provided
56

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for
the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of
retained revenues and related expenditures, the office may incur expenses
and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the
lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported
in the state accounting system ...................................................................................$650,000
Department of Public Utilities.
2100-0012 For the operation of the department of public utilities; provided, that
notwithstanding the second sentence of the first paragraph of section 18 of
chapter 25 of the General Laws, the assessments levied for fiscal year 2027
under said first paragraph of said section 18 of said chapter 25 shall be
made at a rate sufficient to produce the amount expended from this item
and the associated fringe benefit costs for personnel paid from this item ............$18,973,830
2100-0013 For the operation of the transportation oversight division ..........................................$970,861
2100-0016 For the department of public utilities to regulate steam distribution
companies; provided, that notwithstanding section 18A of chapter 25 of the
General Laws, the assessments levied for fiscal year 2027 shall be made at
a rate sufficient to produce the amount expended from this item and the
associated fringe benefit costs for personnel paid from this item ..............................$462,420
2100-0017 For the operation of the division of transportation network services
established in section 23 of chapter 25 of the General Laws; provided, that
the amount assessed under said section 23 of said chapter 25 shall be
made at a rate sufficient to produce the amount expended from this item
and the associated fringe benefit costs for personnel paid from this item ..............$4,343,775
2100-5694 For the operation of the energy facilities siting division; provided, that funds
shall be expended for the implementation of section 12N of chapter 25 of
the General Laws, including the maintenance of a real-time, online, clean
energy infrastructure dashboard, and the creation thereof .....................................$3,604,000
Department of Environmental Protection.
2200-0100 For the operation of the department of environmental protection, including
the environmental strike force, the bureau of planning and evaluation, the
bureau of resource protection, the bureau of waste prevention, the Senator
William X. Wall Experiment Station and a contract with the University of
Massachusetts for environmental research; provided, that section 3B of
chapter 7 of the General Laws shall not apply to fees established in section
18 of chapter 21A of the General Laws; and provided further, that not later
than February 5, 2027 the department shall submit a report to the house
and senate committees on ways and means detailing: (i) the status of hiring
of additional staff; (ii) the staffing levels of the department for the last 10
fiscal years; (iii) the number of enforcement actions for serious violations
and fine collections compared to the previous 10 fiscal years; and (iv)
recommendations for the additional resources needed to fulfill the
department’s enforcement responsibilities ............................................................$51,108,149
2200-0102 For the department of environmental protection, which may expend not
more than $650,148 in revenues collected from fees for wetland permits;
provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for
the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of
57

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
retained revenues and related expenditures, the department may incur
expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to
exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate
as reported in the state accounting system ................................................................$650,148
2200-0107 For technical assistance, grants and support of efforts consistent with the
Massachusetts Recycling and Solid Waste Master Plan and the
Massachusetts Climate Protection Plan; provided, that funds may be
expended for a recycling industries reimbursement grant program, under
subsection (b) of section 241A of chapter 43 of the acts of 1997, inserted by
section 85 of chapter 88 of the acts of 1997 ..............................................................$488,748
2200-0109 For the department of environmental protection to ensure sufficient staff for
timely permit decisions and compliance assurance ................................................$2,471,257
2200-0112 For the department of environmental protection, which may expend not
more than $2,500,000 in revenues collected from permit and compliance
fees to ensure sufficient staff for timely permit decisions and compliance
assurance; provided, that if this item is eliminated or reduced in fiscal year
2027 or operational funding for the department falls below the level
authorized in the general appropriations act for fiscal year 2015, excluding
appropriations for earmarks and nonrecurring operating costs, the fee
increase supporting this item shall terminate; and provided further, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose
of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the department may incur expenses
and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the
lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported
in the state accounting system ................................................................................$2,500,000
2210-0106 For the department of environmental protection, which may expend for the
administration and implementation of chapter 21I of the General Laws, not
more than $2,741,404 in revenues collected from fees, penalties, grants and
tuition under said chapter 21I; provided, that not less than $1,629,860 from
this item shall be made available for the operation of the Toxics Use
Reduction Institute program at the University of Massachusetts at Lowell;
provided further, that the department shall enter into an interagency service
agreement with the University of Massachusetts to make such funding
available for this purpose; provided further, that not less than $644,096 from
this item shall be made available for toxics use reduction technical
assistance and technology under said chapter 21I; provided further, that the
department shall enter into an interagency service agreement with the
executive office of energy and environmental affairs to make such funding
available for this purpose; and provided further, that notwithstanding any
general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating
timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
expenditures, the department may incur expenses and the comptroller may
certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or
the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting
system .....................................................................................................................$2,741,404
2220-2220 For the administration and implementation of the Clean Air Act under 42
U.S.C. section 7401 et seq., including the operating permit program, the
emissions banking program, the auto-related state implementation program,
the low emission vehicle program, the non-auto-related state
implementation program and the commonwealth’s commitments under the
58

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
New England Governors and Eastern Canadian Premiers Regional Climate
Change Action Plan for reducing acid rain deposition and mercury
emissions ....................................................................................................................$766,721
2220-2221 For the administration and implementation of the operating permit and
compliance program required under the Clean Air Act under 42 U.S.C.
section 7401 et seq. ................................................................................................$1,384,924
2250-2000 For the administration and implementation of the Safe Drinking Water Act of
1974 under section 18A of chapter 21A of the General Laws; provided, that
the department of environmental protection may expend funds for the study
and remediation of lead in public school drinking water; provided further,
that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the Silent Spring Institute,
Inc. for continued study of the long term effects of PFAS on residents in
Ayer, including supporting epidemiological analyses, reconstructing past
exposures to PFAS drinking water and disseminating study findings to
community members and presenting health-related resources to
clinicians; and provided further, that not less than $200,000 shall be
expended to the town of Maynard for the mitigation of drinking water
quality issues ..........................................................................................................$2,716,225
2260-8870 For the expenses of the hazardous waste cleanup and underground storage
tank programs including, but not limited to, monitoring unlined landfills,
notwithstanding section 4 of chapter 21J of the General Laws; provided, that
the department of environmental protection shall provide the department of
revenue with information necessary for the completion of the report required
in item 1232-0200 including, but not limited to, the number of tanks out of
compliance with said chapter 21J .........................................................................$15,081,628
2260-8872 For the brownfields site audit program ....................................................................$1,022,328
2260-8881 For the operation of the board of registration of hazardous waste site
cleanup professionals, notwithstanding section 19A of chapter 21A of the
General Laws ..............................................................................................................$386,896
Department of Fish and Game.
2300-0100 For the office of the commissioner of fish and game; provided, that the
commissioner’s office shall assess and receive payments from the division
of marine fisheries, the division of fisheries and wildlife, the office of fishing
and boating access, the division of ecological restoration, the riverways
program and all other programs under the control of the department of fish
and game; provided further, that those assessments shall be used to cover
appropriate administrative costs of the department including, but not limited
to, payroll, personnel, legal and budgetary costs; provided further, that not
less than $30,000 shall be expended to the town of Chelmsford for an
aquatic management study at Heart Pond, including water quality analysis
and invasive species mitigation; provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended to the North Walpole Fish and Game Club, Inc.
in the town of Walpole to support the continuation of programs for combat
veterans and students with special needs; provided further, that not less
than $100,000 shall be expended to the New England Wildlife Center, Inc.
in Weymouth for costs associated with the care, treatment and
maintenance of wildlife; and provided further, that the amount and
contribution from each division or program shall be determined by the
commissioner ..........................................................................................................$2,356,087
59

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
2300-0101 For the division of ecological restoration and the riverways program and for
the promotion of public access to rivers and wetland restoration, including
grants to public and nonpublic entities ....................................................................$4,826,042
2300-0102 For a culverts and small bridges technical assistance program; provided,
that the program will support improvements to culverts and small bridges for
the purpose of public safety, climate change resilience, and ecosystem
restoration ................................................................................................................$1,889,361
2310-0200 For the administration of the division of fisheries and wildlife, including
expenses of the fisheries and wildlife board, the administration of game
farms and wildlife restoration projects, wildlife research and management,
the administration of fish hatcheries, the improvement and management of
lakes, ponds and rivers, fish and wildlife restoration projects, the
commonwealth’s share of certain cooperative fisheries and wildlife
programs and for certain programs reimbursable under the federal Aid to
Fish and Wildlife Restoration Act; provided, that the division may expend the
amount necessary to restore anadromous fish in the Connecticut and
Merrimack river systems; and provided further, that no funds shall be spent
on the restoration of catadromous fish in the Connecticut and Merrimack
river systems unless considered necessary by the division .................................$18,490,988
George L. Darey Inland Fisheries and Game Fund .100%
2310-0300 For the operation of the natural heritage and endangered species program;
provided, that not less than $10,000 shall be expended to the Fishing
Academy of Boston for programming ....................................................................$1,231,735
2310-0306 For the hunter safety training program .......................................................................$581,485
George L. Darey Inland Fisheries and Game Fund .100%
2310-0316 For the purchase of land containing wildlife habitats and for the costs of the
division of fisheries and wildlife directly related to the administration of the
wildlands stamp program under sections 2A and 2C of chapter 131 of the
General Laws ..........................................................................................................$1,500,000
George L. Darey Inland Fisheries and Game Fund .100%
2310-0317 For the waterfowl management program established in section 11 of chapter
131 of the General Laws ..............................................................................................$65,000
George L. Darey Inland Fisheries and Game Fund .100%
2320-0100 For the administration of the office of fishing and boating access, including
the maintenance, operation and improvement of public access land and
water areas; provided, that positions funded by this item shall not be subject
to chapter 31 of the General Laws ..........................................................................$1,004,529
2330-0100 For the operation of the division of marine fisheries; provided, that the
division may expend funds for the Annisquam river marine research
laboratory, marine research programs, a commercial fisheries program, a
shellfish management program, including coastal area classification,
mapping and technical assistance, and a shellfish classification program;
provided further, that funds shall be expended on a recreational fisheries
60

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
program to be reimbursed by federal funds; provided further, that the
division shall continue to develop strategies to improve federal regulations
governing the commercial fishing industry and to promote sustainable
fisheries; provided further, that not less than $150,000 shall be expended
for shellfish propagation in Barnstable, Dukes and Nantucket counties to
be administered jointly by the director of Marine Fisheries and the
aforementioned counties; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall
be expended for a green crab trapping program in the towns of
Provincetown, Truro, Wellfleet, Eastham, Orleans, Chatham and Harwich
to be distributed by the department of marine fisheries; and provided
further, that not less than $575,000 shall be expended for a program of
collaborative research by the division of marine fisheries through the Marine
Fisheries Institute, in collaboration with the School for Marine Science and
Technology at the University of Massachusetts at Dartmouth, that applies
innovative technology to assess the biomass of fish in the region managed
by the New England Fishery Management Council and hydrodynamic
modeling of coastal waters to accurately assess delineation of shellfish
growing area classifications and other applications to improve
management of marine fisheries resources, and whelk fishery research to
evaluate alternative management strategies ........................................................$9,523,957
2330-0120 For the division of marine fisheries for a program to enhance and develop
marine recreational fishing and related programs and activities, including the
cost of equipment, maintenance and staff and the maintenance and
updating of data ..........................................................................................................$987,684
2330-0121 For the division of marine fisheries to utilize reimbursable federal sportfish
restoration funds to further develop marine recreational fishing and related
programs, including the costs of activities that increase public access for
marine recreational fishing, support research on artificial reefs and
otherwise provide for the development of marine recreational fishing;
provided, that the division may expend not more than $217,989 in revenues
collected from the United States Fish and Wildlife Service’s Sport Fish
Restoration Program funds and from the sale of materials which promote
marine recreational fishing; and provided further, that notwithstanding any
general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating
timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
expenditures, the division may incur expenses and the comptroller may
certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or
the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting
system ........................................................................................................................$217,989
2330-0199 For conducting surveys to monitor and forecast the number of commercially-
important invertebrate species in commonwealth waters, including ventless
lobster traps employing the services of contracted commercial lobster
fishing vessels in the commonwealth; provided, that the division of marine
fisheries may expend not more than $250,000 in revenues collected from
fees generated by the sale of lobster permits; and provided further, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose
of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the division may incur expenses and
the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of
this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the
state accounting system .............................................................................................$250,000
61

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
2330-0300 For the administration and operation of the recreational saltwater fishing
permit program under section 17C of chapter 130 of the General Laws ................$2,306,416
Marine Recreational Fisheries Development Fund ..100%
Department of Agricultural Resources.
2511-0100 For the operation of the department of agricultural resources, including the
division of administration, the integrated pest management program, the
board of agriculture, the division of agricultural markets, the division of
animal health, the division of agricultural conservation and technical
assistance, the division of crop and pest services, including a program of
laboratory services at the University of Massachusetts at Amherst, the
expenses of the pesticide board and agency costs associated with the
administration of other boards, commissions and committees chaired by the
department; provided, that not less than $120,000 shall be expended for the
Massachusetts Farm to School Project, LLC; provided further, that not less
than $100,000 shall be expended for the Massachusetts Food Trust
Program established in section 65 of chapter 23A of the General Laws;
provided further, that not less than $500,000 shall be expended to enhance
the Buy Local effort in western, central, northeastern and southeastern
Massachusetts; and provided further, that any buy local effort included in
this item shall include locally harvested seafood including, but not limited to,
fish and shellfish ....................................................................................................$10,189,910
2511-0103 For the costs associated with agricultural oversight of hemp and cannabis ..........$1,007,138
Marijuana Regulation Fund ......................................100%
2511-0105 For the purchase of supplemental foods for the emergency food assistance
program within the Feeding America nationally certified food bank system;
provided, that funds appropriated in this item shall reflect the Feeding
America allocation formula in order to benefit the commonwealth’s 4
regional food banks; provided further, that the department of agricultural
resources may assess an administrative charge not to exceed 2 per cent of
the total appropriation in this item; provided further, that not less than
$1,250,000 shall be expended to the commonwealth’s 4 regional food banks
for operating funds to distribute food for the Massachusetts emergency food
assistance program; provided further, that not less than $500,000 shall be
expended to the Women's Lunch Place, Inc. to provide nutritious food and
individualized services for women who are experiencing homelessness or
poverty; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to
the Merrimack Valley Food Bank for the operation of the nourish children’s
feeding program; and provided further, that the department of agricultural
resources may assess an administrative charge not to exceed 2 per cent of
the total appropriation in this item .........................................................................$60,025,000
2511-0107 For the advancement of community food security and the protection of
public access to sufficient, safe and nutritious food; provided, that not less
than $25,000 shall be expended to People's Pantry in the town of North
Andover for a vehicle to transport food donations; provided further, that
not less than $50,000 shall be expended to Catholic Charities of Lynn for
the purposes of supporting their food pantry and additional community
services; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended
to the Regional Environmental Council, Inc. for programs and operations;
provided further, that not less than $90,000 shall be expended to Greater
62

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
Lynn Senior Services, Inc. for programming related to the Phoenix Food
Hub in the city of Lynn; provided further, that not less than $40,000 shall
be expended to Coastal Foodshed Incorporated to address food insecurity
through access to healthy food and to provide support to local farmers and
our agricultural economy in the greater New Bedford region; provided
further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to expanding the
Edward L. Cooper Community Gardening and Education Center, Inc.;
provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to
expanding the Hawthorne Youth and Community Center, Incorporated;
provided further, that not less than $75,000 shall be expended to Manna
Community Kitchen to combat food insecurity and expand their support
service for vulnerable populations; provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended to the Martha's Vineyard Fishermen's
Preservation Trust, Inc. for operating and expanding the Seafood Donation
Program, and for otherwise supporting the fishing industry on Martha’s
Vineyard; provided further, that not less than $40,000 shall be expended
to Farming Falmouth, Inc. for the purchase and installation of a year-round
greenhouse and for otherwise supporting agriculture in the town of
Falmouth; provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall be expended
to The People's Pantry in the town of Great Barrington for the purchase of
a new off-site food storage unit; provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended to the city of Somerville for the operation of
school-based food access programs; provided further, that not less than
$100,000 shall be expended to Fenway Civic Association, Inc. for the
purpose of funding the Fenway Cares Mutual Aid Initiative, including
administrative costs, to distribute fresh food and supplies to food-insecure
Fenway residents; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to the Marion Institute, Inc. for the 2026 Food System
Assessment for Southeastern Massachusetts; provided further, that not
less than $75,000 shall be expended to the Lexington Interfaith Outreach
Food Pantry, Inc. for operations, rent support, feasibility studies and
planning for potential new locations and efficiency improvements for the
Lexington food pantry; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall
be expended to Just Roots, Inc., Greenfield Community Farm; provided
further, that not less than $10,000 shall be expended to the city of
Somerville for its mobile market revolving fund to help maintain the low-
cost farmers market on wheels; provided further, that not less than
$30,000 shall be expended to Survival Centers,Inc. to support its food
pantry programs; provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall be
expended to Granby To-Go, Inc. to support the in-school food pantry and
clothing distribution program in the town of Granby; provided further, that
not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the food pantry at A Place to
Turn Inc. in the town of Natick; provided further, that not less than $25,000
shall be expended to the heart healthy food pantry at the Natick Service
Council,Inc.; provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall be
expended to Arlington EATS, Inc.; provided further, that not less than
$25,000 shall be expended to Neighbors Eating All Together (NEAT), Inc.
in the town of Arlington; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall
be expended to the Cambridge Economic Opportunity Committee, Inc. in
the city of Cambridge for the reopening of the North Cambridge food
pantry; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to
the Franklin Food Pantry, Incorporated for the prevention of food
insecurity; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended
to the Medway Community Farm, Inc. Agriculture Development Project;
provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the
Medway food pantry for local food security and anti-hunger initiatives;
63

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the
Walpole Community Food Pantry, Inc. for operations, rent support,
feasibility studies and planning for a potential new location; provided
further, that not less than $375,000 shall be expended to the Boston Public
Market Association, Inc. for the operation and programming at the Boston
Public Market; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to the Charity Guild Food Pantry for local food security and anti-
hunger initiatives in the city of Brockton; provided further, that not less than
$25,000 shall be expended to the Al Nelson Friendship Center Food
Pantry; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to
Rose's Bounty Food Pantry, Inc. to help fulfill food insecurity needs for
residents of the southwest neighborhood of the city of Boston; provided
further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to Land’s Sake,Inc.
in the town of Weston to support infrastructure and capital improvements
to support the sale and donation of fresh produce; provided further, that
not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the Newton Food Pantry, Inc.
to fund the purchasing of fresh and nutritious food; provided further, that
not less than $40,000 shall be expended to the East Boston Community
Soup Kitchen, Inc. to provide food aid and additional services; provided
further, that not less than $10,000 shall be expended to Meadowbrook
Farm LLC in Westford for regional food sustainability services; provided
further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to Codman Square
Health Center, Inc. for planning and operational costs related to the
expansion of food security services provided by the Dorchester Food
Court; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to
the West Bridgewater Food Pantry, Inc.; provided further, that not less
than $100,000 shall be expended to Food for Free Committee,
Incorporated to operate school programming; and provided further, that
not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the Belmont Food
Collaborative, Inc. in the town of Belmont .............................................................$2,120,000
2511-3002 For the integrated pest management program ............................................................$87,129
Department of Conservation and Recreation.
2800-0100 For the operation of the department of conservation and recreation;
provided, that notwithstanding section 3B of chapter 7 of the General Laws,
the department shall establish or renegotiate fees, licenses, permits, rents
and leases and adjust or develop other revenue sources to fund the
maintenance, operation and administration of the department ..............................$7,235,707
2800-0101 For the watershed management program to operate and maintain
reservoirs, watershed lands and related infrastructure of the department of
conservation and recreation and the office of water resources in the
department; provided, that the amount of the payment shall be charged to
the General Fund and shall not be included in the amount of the annual
determination of fiscal year charges to the Massachusetts Water Resources
Authority assessed to the authority under the General Laws; provided
further, that the department shall continue to make payments under chapter
616 of the acts of 1957, as amended by section 89 of chapter 801 of the
acts of 1963; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to the Blackstone Watershed Collaborative, Inc. for
programming and operations; and provided further, that the department
shall continue to make payments under chapter 307 of the acts of 1987 for
the use of certain land .............................................................................................$1,732,905
64

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
2800-0401 For a program to provide stormwater management for all properties and
roadways under the care, custody and control of the department of
conservation and recreation; provided, that the department shall implement
a stormwater management program in compliance with federal and state
stormwater management requirements; provided further, that the
department shall inventory all stormwater infrastructure, assess its
stormwater practices, analyze long-term capital and operational needs and
develop a stormwater management plan to comply with federal and state
regulatory requirements; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall
be expended to the town of Chelmsford for efforts to address PFAS
contamination through the installation of a granular activated carbon
filtration system; and provided further, that in order to protect public safety
and to protect water resources for water supply, recreational and ecosystem
uses, the department shall immediately implement interim stormwater
management practices including, but not limited to, street sweeping,
inspection and cleaning of catch basins and emergency repairs to roadway
drainage ..................................................................................................................$1,644,905
2800-0500 For the existing maintenance, operational and infrastructure needs of the
metropolitan beaches as determined by the commission established under
section 70 of chapter 3 of the General Laws; provided, that not less than
$900,000 shall be expended for the metropolitan beaches in the cities of
Lynn, Revere and Quincy, the towns of Nahant and Hull, the city known as
the town of Winthrop and the East Boston, South Boston and Dorchester
sections of the city of Boston to be fully maintained and seasonally staffed
as recommended by the metropolitan beaches commission in coordination
with the department of conservation and recreation; provided further, that
not less than $50,000 shall be expended for Save the Harbor, Save the Bay,
Inc.’s staff time, consultants and direct expenses to support the ongoing
work of the commission on the future of metropolitan beaches; and provided
further, that not less than $190,000 shall be expended for matching grants
to public and nonpublic entities to support free public events and programs
on the metropolitan beaches as part of Save the Harbor, Save the Bay, Inc.’s
Better Beaches Grants Program as recommended by the metropolitan
beaches commission ...............................................................................................$1,310,231
2800-0501 For the operation of the beaches, pools and spray pools under the control
of the department of conservation and recreation; provided, that the
seasonal hires of the department’s parks, beaches, pools and spray pools
shall be paid from this item; provided further, that said beaches, pools and
spray pools shall remain open and staffed from Memorial Day to Labor Day,
inclusive; provided further, that said beaches, pools and spray pools shall
be fully maintained; provided further, that seasonal employees who are
hired before the second Sunday preceding Memorial Day, whose
employment continues beyond the Saturday following Labor Day and who
received health insurance benefits in fiscal year 2026, shall continue to
receive such benefits in fiscal year 2027 during the period of said
employees’ seasonal employment; provided further, that notwithstanding
section 1 of chapter 31 of the General Laws, seasonal positions funded by
this item shall be positions requiring the services of an incumbent, on either
a full-time or less than full-time basis, beginning not earlier than April 1 and
ending not later than November 30 or beginning not earlier than September
1 and ending not later than April 30; and provided further, that
notwithstanding said section 1 of said chapter 31, seasonal positions funded
by this item shall not be filled by an incumbent for more than 8 months within
a 12-month period .................................................................................................$28,463,716
65

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
2800-0700 For the office of dam safety; provided, that the office shall, in collaboration
with the department of environmental protection and the department of fish
and game, establish and maintain a comprehensive inventory of all dams
and develop a coordinated permitting and regulatory approach to dam
removal for stream restoration and public safety; provided further, that not
less than $25,000 shall be expended to the town of Groveland for repairs
to the Salem Street dam; and provided further, that not less than $50,000
shall be expended to the city of Newburyport to advance the Lower
Artichoke dam project ................................................................................................$855,817
2810-0100 For the operation of the division of state parks and recreation; provided, that
funds appropriated in this item shall be used to: (i) operate all of the
division’s parks, parkways, boulevards, roadways, bridges and related
appurtenances under the care, custody and control of the division, flood
control activities of the division, reservations, campgrounds, beaches and
pools; (ii) oversee skating rinks; and (iii) protect and manage the division’s
lands and natural resources, including the forest and parks conservation
services and the bureau of forestry development; provided further, that all
properties that were open in fiscal year 2026 shall be open in fiscal year
2027; provided further, that the crossing guards located at department of
conservation and recreation intersections shall continue to perform the
duties where state police previously performed such duties; provided
further, that the division may issue grants to public and nonpublic entities
from this item; provided further, that up to $3,000,000 may be used to
support the costs of snow and ice removal; provided further, that the rinks
under the control of the department shall remain open and staffed for the full
rink season and that ice skating shall be available from September 1 through
April 15 of the following year; provided further, that local youth programs and
nonprofits get first preference in scheduling on all playfields and hockey
rinks operated by the department; provided further, that additional funds
shall be expended to address the needs of state parks in all regions of the
commonwealth; provided further, that not later than February 3, 2027 the
department shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on
ways and means on: (A) the status of hiring for additional staffing; (B) the
staffing levels for the previous 10 fiscal years; and (C) the average staffing
level at each park; provided further, that the department shall take steps to
address personnel needs in a manner that is geographically equitable; and
provided further, that not later than January 13, 2027, the department shall
submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways and means
detailing the hires made for division personnel in fiscal year 2027 ....................$104,380,958
2810-0122 For special projects relating to the commonwealth’s state parks and
recreational areas; provided, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended
to Fore River Trail in the city known as the town of Weymouth; and
provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to Friends
of Faxon Park in the city of Quincy; provided, that not less than $25,000
shall be expended to the city of Leominster for the purposes of upgrading
the Alzheimer’s Awareness park in the city of Leominster; provided further,
that not less than $40,000 shall be expended to the city of Lynn for the
treatment of invasive species in ponds; provided further, that not less than
$35,000 shall be expended to the Rutland and Washington Community
Garden in the city of Boston for improvements including wrought iron fence
restoration, replacing and adding aged beds and the stabilization of the
gazebo; provided further, that not less than $10,000 shall be expended to
the town of East Brookfield for beaver trapping; provided further, that not
66

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
less than $80,000 shall be expended to the city known as the town of
Barnstable for public beach and waterfront improvements supporting
accessibility and community use at Veterans beach; provided further, that
not less than $75,000 shall be expended to the town of Sudbury for the
acquisition of adaptive bicycles for persons with disabilities for use on the
Bruce Freeman and Mass Central rail trails and for the construction of a
storage shed for said adaptive bicycles; provided further, that not less than
$25,000 shall be expended to the city of Fitchburg for improvements to the
Gus Johnson and Herman Bourque Jr. baseball and softball fields;
provided further, that not less than $40,000 shall be expended to Finnish
Center at Saima Park, Inc. for replacement of the boiler; provided further,
that not less than $15,000 shall be expended to the town of Norfolk for a
storage container for the town of Norfolk parks and recreation; provided
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the North Shore
Maritime Center, Inc. for their youth rowing program; provided further, that
not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the town of Arlington for
improvements to Parallel park; provided further, that not less than
$100,000 shall be expended to the Blue Hill Observatory & Science
Center, Inc.; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to the town of Shirley for the operation, administration and
improvement of the Summer in Shirley camp program including, but not
limited to providing for low-income children’s camp attendance costs and
other related expenses; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall
be expended to the town of Acton for the design, construction and
installation of pedestrian and recreational infrastructure at the Acton
Community dog park including, but not limited to providing shade pavilion
to protect against heat and other related expenses; provided further, that
not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the town of Dedham for the
parks and recreation summer program; provided further, that not less than
$250,000 shall be expended to Boston 4 Celebrations Foundation, Inc. for
the Boston Pops Fireworks Spectacular for the fourth of July,
Independence Day celebrations on the Charles river; provided further, that
not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the Edward “Gus” Whelan
memorial at Thompson Square park in the Charlestown section of the city
of Boston for rehabilitation and maintenance; provided further, that not less
than $50,000 shall be expended to the city of Quincy for improvements,
preparedness and operations for ferry service at Squantum Point park;
provided further, that not less than $40,000 shall be expended to the town
of Sandwich for recreational improvements and maintenance of
recreational areas; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be
expended to the Pawtucket Farm Wildlife Sanctuary in the city of Lowell
for preservation, infrastructure improvements and community
programming in the Pawtucketville section of the city of Lowell; provided
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the Harry
McDonough Sailing Center, Inc. for programming; provided further, that
not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the city known as the town of
Randolph for the purposes of the construction of a new tri-town water
treatment plant in collaboration with the city known as the town of Braintree
and the town of Holbrook; provided further, that not less than $40,000 shall
be expended to Tree Eastie, Inc. for expanding the tree canopy in the East
Boston section of the city of Boston through the planting and maintenance
of trees; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to
the city of Brockton public schools for the renovation of dilapidated tennis
courts into basketball courts at the Davis elementary school park area;
provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the town
of Chelmsford for the maintenance of the Bruce Freeman rail trail;
67

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the city
of Brockton for baseball field improvements; provided further, that not less
than $75,000 shall be expended to the city of Brockton for landscaping
and hardscaping outside the new D.W. Field Park Welcoming Center;
provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to the city
of Worcester for improvements to Elm park; and provided further, that not
less than $75,000 shall be expended to the town of Belmont to maintain
the tree canopy .......................................................................................................$1,625,000
2820-0101 For the costs associated with the department of conservation and
recreation’s park rangers specific to the security of the state house;
provided, that funds appropriated in this item shall only be expended for the
costs of security and park rangers at the state house ............................................$3,132,611
2820-2000 For the operation of street lighting and the expenses of maintaining the
parkways of the department of conservation and recreation ..................................$4,578,423
Department of Energy Resources.
7006-1001 For the Massachusetts residential conservation service program under
chapter 465 of the acts of 1980 and the Massachusetts commercial and
apartment conservation service program under section 11A of chapter 25A
of the General Laws; provided, that the assessments levied for fiscal year
2027 under said chapter 465 shall be made at a rate sufficient to produce
the amount expended from this item and the associated fringe benefit costs
for personnel paid from this item ................................................................................$272,563
7006-1003 For the operation of the department of energy resources; provided, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the amount
assessed under section 11H of chapter 25A of the General Laws shall be
made at a rate sufficient to produce the amount expended from this item
and the associated fringe benefit costs for personnel paid from this item ..............$7,066,535
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF EDUCATION.
Department of Early Education and Care.
3000-1000 For the administration of the department of early education and care;
provided, that the department shall report on the first business day of each
month to the joint committee on education, the joint committee on children,
families and persons with disabilities, the house and senate committees on
ways and means and the executive office for administration and finance on
the unduplicated number of children on waiting lists for state-subsidized early
education and care programs and services, including supportive child care
services; provided further, that notwithstanding chapter 66A of the General
Laws, the department of early education and care, the child care resource
and referral agencies, the department of elementary and secondary
education, the department of transitional assistance, the department of
children and families, the executive office of housing and livable
communities, the Children’s Trust Fund established in section 50 of chapter
10 of the General Laws, the disabled persons protection commission, the
district attorneys’ offices and the early intervention program within the
department of public health may share with each other personal data
regarding the parents and children who receive services provided under
early education and care programs administered by the commonwealth for
68

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
investigations, waitlist management, program implementation and
evaluation, reporting and policy development purposes; provided further,
that not less than $7,500,000 shall be expended for an early education and
care educator scholarship program established in section 19F of chapter
15A of the General Laws; provided further, that the department shall issue
monthly reports detailing the number and average cost of voucher and
contracted slots funded by the department for items 3000-3060 and 3000-
4060 delineated by age category; provided further, that such reports shall
reflect current caseload and detailed assumptions on caseload cost in future
months; provided further, that the reports shall include the number of
recipients subject to subsection (f) of section 110 of chapter 5 of the acts of
1995; provided further, that the department of early education and care shall
provide the caseload forecasting office and the house and senate
committees on ways and means with enrollment data and any other
information pertinent to caseload forecasting that is requested by the office
on a monthly basis; provided further, that the information shall be provided
in a manner that meets all applicable federal and state privacy and security
requirements; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to the Old Colony YMCA-Taunton Branch for the replacement
of the basketball court; and provided further, that the commissioner of early
education and care may transfer funds between items 3000-3060 and 3000-
4060, as necessary, for this purpose, under an allocation plan that shall
detail, by object class, the distribution of the funds to be transferred and
which shall be submitted to the house and senate committees on ways and
means not less than 30 days before any such transfer ........................................$20,282,108
3000-1020 For early education and care quality supports to improve and sustain
educational quality among providers of early education and care and to
assist early educators and providers in attaining higher levels of proficiency,
skill and quality; provided, that funding may be used to incentivize public-
private partnerships to implement reforms that lead to student success;
provided further, that such partnerships’ funding shall be administered in
coordination with the department of elementary and secondary education,
and preference shall be given to partnerships serving high percentages of
high-needs students; provided further, that supports funded through this
item shall include, but not be limited to, program quality improvements
related to meeting the Massachusetts Quality Rating and Improvement
System standards; provided further, that costs related to department of early
education and care personnel who support quality improvement may be
funded from this item, including the department's licensing staff and other
personnel who ensure compliance with state and federal requirements for
inspections, monitoring and training; provided further, that funds from this
item may support the Massachusetts universal pre-kindergarten program,
inclusive learning environment grants and early childhood mental health
consultation services; provided further, that any payment made under any
such grant to a school district shall be deposited with the treasurer of the
city, town or regional school district and held as a separate account and,
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, shall be
expended by the school committee of such city, town or regional school
district without municipal appropriation; provided further that not less than
$10,000 shall be expended to the Nauset Youth Alliance in support of the
Alliance’s childcare programming; and provided further, that supports
funded through this item may include, but not be limited to, the development
and purchasing of curriculum, the development and implementation of early
childhood assessment systems, incentives for programs to recruit, develop
and retain highly qualified educators, payment of fees and direct assistance
69

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
to programs seeking accreditation by agencies approved by the board of
early education and care and professional development courses .......................$48,175,758
3000-1045 For operational grants to child care providers; provided, that for fiscal year
2027 funds shall be distributed in accordance with the formula established
in section 20 of chapter 15D of the General Laws; provided further, that
funds from this line item shall be expended in coordination with funds from
line item 1596-2410; provided further, that the department shall collect data
from participating programs, including, but not limited to: (i) the number of
enrolled children; (ii) the number of educators employed; (iii) efforts to recruit
and retain employees; (iv) any available demographic data of the families
served by participating providers; (v) to the extent feasible, the income level
of the families served by participating providers; (vi) the amount awarded to
each provider; and (vii) the amount of operational grants spent by provider,
delineated by category of spending including, but not limited to: (a) salaries;
(b) other compensation; (c) workforce training; and (d) facilities
improvements; provided further, that programs shall respond to all data
collection requests and surveys from the department to be eligible for said
grants; provided further, that funds may be expended for departmental
technical assistance related to the administration and distribution of the
grants; and provided further, that the department shall provide technical
assistance to providers to assist them in planning expenditures so as to
avoid any fiscal cliffs in future fiscal years, prior appropriation continued ..........$110,000,000
Early Education and Care Operational
Grant Fund ............................................................90.91%
General Fund ..........................................................9.09%
3000-2000 For the regional administration and coordination of services provided by
child care resource and referral agencies .............................................................$20,000,000
3000-2050 For the administration of the Children’s Trust Fund established in section 50
of chapter 10 of the General Laws; provided, that the department of early
education and care shall not exercise any supervision or control with respect
to the board of the trust fund; and provided further, that not later than
December 30, 2026, the Children’s Trust Fund shall submit a report to the
house and senate committees on ways and means and the joint committee
on children, families and persons with disabilities on the progress of the pilot
program and the mobilization of services at the family centers ..............................$1,993,205
3000-2060 For evidence-based, adult-focused child sexual abuse prevention
initiatives that provide technical assistance to communities, youth-serving
organizations and schools to: (i) organize local coalitions dedicated to
preventing child sexual abuse; (ii) recruit, train and certify local volunteers to
provide free prevention education for parents, students and professionals;
and (iii) strengthen the core standards around the screening of prospective
employees, the development of codes of conduct, the assessment and
modification of physical spaces to reduce opportunities for sexual abuse,
the responding to and reporting of boundary-violating behaviors and
suspected acts of sexual abuse and the training of staff and volunteers on
ways to prevent adult perpetration and child-on-child sexual abuse ......................$2,165,019
3000-3060 For early education and care services for children with active cases at the
department of children and families, for families currently involved with, or
transitioning from, transitional aid to families with dependent children and
for families participating in education and training services funded by the
70

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program; provided, that providers shall
be reimbursed for subsidized child care services funded under this item
based on enrollment; provided further, that the department of early
education and care, in collaboration with the department of children and
families, shall maintain a centralized list detailing the number of children
eligible for services under this item, the number of supportive slots filled and
the number of supportive slots available; provided further, that for children
with active cases at the department of children and families, funds may be
used to provide services during a transition period of not less than 12 months
upon the closure of the family’s case with the department of children and
families; provided further, that in the case of families involved with transitional
aid to families with dependent children, early education and care shall be
available to: (i) recipients of transitional aid to families with dependent
children benefits; (ii) former recipients who are working or are engaged in an
approved service need activity for up to 1 year after termination of their
benefits; (iii) participants who are working or are engaged in an approved
service need activity for up to 1 year after the transitional period; and (iv)
parents who are under 18 years of age who are currently enrolled in a job
training program and who would qualify for benefits under chapter 118 of
the General Laws but for the consideration of the grandparents’ income;
provided further, that all teens eligible for year-round, full-time early
education and care services shall be participating in school, education, work
and training-related activities or a combination thereof for at least the
minimum number of hours required by applicable regulations; provided
further, that recipients of transitional aid to families with dependent children
shall not be charged fees for care provided under this item; provided further,
that early education and care services for families involved with transitional
aid to families with dependent children funded from this item shall be
distributed geographically in a manner that provides fair and adequate
access to early education and care for all eligible individuals; provided
further, that informal early education and care benefits for families involved
with transitional aid to families with dependent children may be funded from
this item; provided further, that the commissioner of early education and
care may transfer funds to this item from items 3000-1000 and 3000-4060,
as necessary, under an allocation plan, which shall detail, by object class,
the distribution of the funds to be transferred; provided further, that the
commissioner shall submit to the house and senate committees on ways
and means not less than 30 days prior to the transfer; provided further, that
not later than April 16, 2027, the commissioner shall submit a preliminary
report to the house and senate committees on ways and means and the
executive office for administration and finance on the projected expenses
for the program that shall include, but not be limited to, the expected surplus
or deficiency for the program; provided further, that not later than June 30,
2027, if the department determines that the available appropriation for this
program will be insufficient to meet projected expenses, the commissioner
shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways and
means and the executive office for administration and finance detailing the
amount of appropriation needed to address the deficiency; provided further,
that reimbursements for services rendered in prior fiscal years may be
expended from this item; provided further, that the department of early
education and care shall recoup funds owed by providers related to
payments made by the department in prior fiscal years by reducing
payments to those providers for services related to this item rendered in
fiscal year 2027; and provided further, that all children eligible for services
under this item shall receive such services .........................................................$598,633,977
71

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
General Fund ........................................................64.70%
High-Quality Early Education & Care Trust Fund .15.34%
Education and Transportation Fund ......................19.95%
3000-4060 For income-eligible early education and care programs; provided, that
providers shall be reimbursed for subsidized child care services funded
under this item based on enrollment; provided further, that teen parents and
homeless families identified as likely to become eligible for transitional aid to
families with dependent children may be paid from this item; provided
further, that informal early education and care benefits for families meeting
income-eligibility criteria may be funded from this item; provided further, that
early education and care services funded under this item shall be distributed
geographically in a manner that provides fair and adequate access to early
education and care for all eligible individuals; provided further, that the
commissioner of early education and care may transfer funds to this item
from items 3000-1000 and 3000-3060, as necessary, pursuant to an
allocation plan, which shall detail, by object class, the distribution of the
funds to be transferred; provided further, the commissioner shall submit to
the house and senate committees on ways and means and the executive
office for administration and finance not less than 30 days prior to the
transfer; provided further, that not more than 3 per cent of the funds
appropriated in this item may be transferred in fiscal year 2027 as set forth
in a plan submitted by the department of early education and care; provided
further, that said plan shall be submitted to the joint committee on education,
the house and senate committees on ways and means and the executive
office for administration and finance; provided further, that not later than April
16, 2027, the commissioner shall submit a preliminary report to the house
and senate committees on ways and means and the executive office for
administration and finance on the projected expenses for the program that
shall include, but not be limited to, the expected surplus or deficiency for
the program; provided further, that not later than June 30, 2027, if the
department determines that the available appropriation for this program will
be insufficient to meet projected expenses, the commissioner shall submit
a report to the house and senate committees on ways and means and the
executive office for administration and finance detailing the amount of
appropriation needed to address such deficiency; provided further, that
reimbursements for services rendered in prior fiscal years may be expended
from this item; provided further, that the department shall recoup funds owed
related to payments made by the department in prior fiscal years by reducing
payments for services related to this item rendered in fiscal year 2027; and
provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, any payment made under any such grant with a school district shall
be deposited with the treasurer of the city, town or regional school district
and held as a separate account and shall be expended by the school
committee of such city, town or regional school district without municipal
appropriation ........................................................................................................$623,593,845
General Fund ........................................................66.87%
Education and Transportation Fund ......................19.95%
High-Quality Early Education & Care Trust Fund .14.73%
3000-5000 For grants to head start programs; provided, that funds from this item may be
expended on early head start programs ...............................................................$20,000,000
3000-6025 For grants in fiscal year 2027 to support planning and implementation
activities in cities, towns, regional school districts or educational
72

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
collaboratives to expand pre-kindergarten or preschool opportunities on a
voluntary basis to children who will be eligible for kindergarten by September
2028; provided, that planning and implementation grants may be awarded
through a competitive process established by the department of early
education and care utilizing the Massachusetts Preschool Expansion Grant
public-private partnership model; provided further, that preference in
awarding grants shall be given to districts serving high percentages of high-
needs students; provided further, that additional preference in awarding
planning grants may be given to districts to update strategic expansion plans
completed in prior fiscal years; provided further, that additional preference in
awarding implementation grants shall be given to districts that have
completed strategic planning efforts that support expanding access to high-
quality preschool through the Commonwealth Preschool Partnership
Initiative; provided further, that not later than March 16, 2027, the department
shall submit a report to the joint committee on education and the house and
senate committees on ways and means on the status of planning and
implementation activities, which shall include, but not be limited to, the: (i)
districts that submitted applications for grant funding; (ii) recipients of grant
funding; (iii) anticipated number of children served by recipients; (iv) size of
awarded grants by recipient; and (v) recipients’ workforce development
efforts; provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to
the contrary, funds distributed from this item shall be deposited with the
treasurer of the city, town, regional school district or educational
collaborative and held in a separate account and shall be expended by the
school committee of such city, town, regional school district or educational
collaborative without further appropriation; provided further, that funds may
be expended for programs or activities during the summer months; and
provided further, that funds from this item may be used to provide
administration support to grantees, including technical assistance and
program evaluation ..................................................................................................$5,000,000
3000-6075 For early childhood mental health consultation services in early education
and care programs in the commonwealth; provided, that preference shall be
given to those services designed to limit the number of expulsions and
suspensions from the programs and to early education and care programs
serving high percentages of high-needs students; provided further, that
eligible recipients for such grants shall include municipal school districts,
regional school districts, educational collaboratives, head start programs,
licensed child care providers, child care resource and referral centers and
other qualified entities; and provided further, that funds shall be spent on
trauma-informed professional development for early education providers .............$4,950,000
3000-7000 For statewide neonatal and postnatal home parenting education and home
visiting programs for at-risk newborns to be administered by the Children’s
Trust Fund, established in section 50 of chapter 10 of the General Laws;
provided, that such services shall be made available statewide to parents
under 24 years of age; provided further, that the department of early
education and care shall collaborate with the Children’s Trust Fund, when
appropriate, to coordinate services provided through this item with services
provided through item 3000-7050 to ensure that parents receiving services
through this item are aware of all opportunities available to them and their
children through the department; provided further, that the Children’s Trust
Fund shall oversee the maintenance of a participant data system; and
provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, priority for such services shall be given to low-income parents .............$18,116,604
73

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
3000-7040 For the department of early education and care, which may expend not more
than $520,000 for contingency contracts related to pursuing federal
reimbursement or avoiding costs in its capacity as the single state agency
under Title IV, Part E, of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. chapter 7,
subchapter IV, part E; provided, that notwithstanding any general or special
law or regulation to the contrary, these contingency contracts shall not
exceed 3 years except with prior review and approval by the executive office
for administration and finance; and provided further, that for the purpose of
accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the department may incur expenses
and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower
of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the
state accounting system .............................................................................................$520,000
3000-7050 For the coordinated family and community engagement grant program,
which shall establish a statewide network of supports for early education;
provided, that the department of early education and care shall distribute
grants not later than August 28, 2026 in order to allow a full year of service
for families involved in these programs; provided further, that the
department shall, to the maximum extent feasible, coordinate services
provided through this item with services provided through item 3000-7000 in
order to ensure that parents receiving services through this item are aware
of all opportunities available to them and their children through the
department; provided further, that eligible recipients for such grants shall
include, but not be limited to: (i) the Massachusetts Family Networks
program; (ii) municipal school districts; (iii) regional school districts; (iv)
educational collaboratives; (v) the parent-child plus program; (vi) head start
programs; (vii) other school readiness and family support programs; (viii)
licensed child care providers; and (ix) child care resource and referral
centers; provided further, that supports funded through this item shall be in
alignment with the quality requirements of the Massachusetts universal pre-
kindergarten program and the Massachusetts Quality Rating and
Improvement System; provided further, that the department shall take steps
to streamline activities and programs funded through this item; provided
further, that the department may expend funds from this item on grants for
supplemental services for children with individualized education plans;
provided further, that not more than $160,000 shall be expended for
technical assistance; and provided further, that funds may be expended for
programs or activities during the summer months ................................................$11,740,598
3000-7052 For the parent-child plus program, also known as the parent-child home
program ...................................................................................................................$4,250,000
3000-7055 For the Neighborhood Villages Inc. pilot program to provide high-quality,
economically-integrated infant and toddler classrooms that demonstrate
best practices for supporting children, families and the early childhood
workforce and establish infrastructure to facilitate wraparound health and
wellness programming for children and families; provided, that funds shall
be used to support high-quality early education and care classroom
instruction and workforce development training; provided further, that funds
shall be used to allow for the enhancement, coordination and alignment of
early learning programs with community-based health providers and those
resources that impact outcomes across health and early learning; and
provided further, that the pilot program shall serve to identify resources and
promising practices that inform efforts to support school-readiness and
ensure the healthy development and well-being of children and families ..............$1,000,000
74

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
3000-7066 For professional development and higher education opportunities and
supports for early educators to be coordinated by the department of early
education and care in conjunction with Massachusetts-based 2-year public
institutions of higher education; provided, that programming shall focus on
the statewide recruitment and training needs of the early education and care
workforce, encourage opportunities for career advancement and retention
and incorporate early education and care stakeholder, employer and
industry collaboration; and provided further, that professional development
opportunities shall be consistent with the core competencies and career
pathways established by the department and, to the greatest extent
possible, shall provide a standard number of college credits transferable to
all other public institutions of higher education in the commonwealth ....................$2,970,000
3000-7070 For Reach Out and Read, Inc.; provided, that the funds distributed through
Reach Out and Read, Inc. shall be contingent upon a match of not less than
$1 in private or corporate contributions for every $1 in state grant funding
.................................................................................................................................$1,750,000
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES.
Office of the Secretary.
4000-0000 For the cost of transportation services for health and human services clients;
provided, that the secretary of health and human services may transfer from
the sum appropriated in this item to departments under the purview of the
executive office for the sole purpose of providing transportation services to
clients ...................................................................................................................$449,596,838
General Fund ........................................................77.76%
Commonwealth Transportation Fund ....................22.24%
4000-0005 For youth violence prevention program grants administered by the executive
office of health and human services; provided, that the grants shall be
targeted at reducing youth violence among young persons at the highest
annual risk of being perpetrators or victims of gun and community violence;
provided further, that these funds shall be made available to those
municipalities with the highest number of annual youth homicides and
serious assaults as determined by the executive office; provided further, that
any new grants awarded from this item in fiscal year 2027 shall comply with
the grant application requirements set forth in item 4000-0005 of section 2 of
chapter 38 of the acts of 2013; provided further, that the executive office of
health and human services may select the same evaluator in fiscal year
2027 as selected in fiscal year 2026; provided further, that funds may be set
aside for the administration of these programs; provided further, that not
less than $50,000 shall be expended to the SISU Center in Lawrence to
provide programming for at-risk youth in the Merrimack Valley; provided
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to Friendship Home,
Inc. to provide programming for those with developmental disabilities and
their families; and provided further, that not later than February 5, 2027, the
secretary of health and human services shall submit a report to the house
and senate committees on ways and means detailing: (i) successful grant
applications; (ii) the criteria used in selecting grant recipients; (iii) a set of
clearly-defined goals and benchmarks on which grant recipients shall be
75

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
evaluated; and (iv) outcomes and findings that demonstrate program
success from the grant awards for fiscal year 2025 .............................................$12,549,000
4000-0007 For housing and supportive services for unaccompanied youth under
section 16X of chapter 6A of the General Laws; provided, that not later than
February 5, 2027, the executive office of health and human services shall
submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways and means
on: (i) the number of youths served through this item receiving either
prevention or rehousing services, including total statewide numbers and
numbers by region; (ii) the types of services received by participating youths;
(iii) the number of youths who transition into stabilized housing after
experiencing homelessness; (iv) the number of youths who do not enter
homelessness after receiving prevention support; (v) the number of youths
who do not return to homelessness after being housed; (vi) other
quantifiable data related to client outcomes as determined by the executive
office; and (vii) the amount of funding awarded to vendors for the delivery of
services and the names of each vendor; and provided further, that not less
than $100,000 shall be expended to BAY-CASH to provide direct cash
assistance to unaccompanied homeless youth ..................................................$10,539,590
4000-0009 For the office of health equity established in section 16AA of chapter 6A of
the General Laws; provided, that the office may enter into service
agreements with the department of public health to fulfill the obligations of
the office; provided further, that not less than $250,000 shall be expended
to the Massachusetts Sickle Cell Association, Inc for advocacy, family
support services, awareness campaigns and staff expansion; and provided
further, that not later than December 17, 2026, the office shall submit a
report to the house and senate committees on ways and means on the
development of the office of health equity within the executive office of
health and human services and the implementation of programming as set
forth in said section 16AA of said chapter 6A, including personnel costs and
an organizational structure plan .................................................................................$649,691
4000-0014 For the Edward M. Kennedy Community Health Center, Inc. to train
community health workers to serve as the patient link to medical and social
services for the disenfranchised population throughout the Worcester and
MetroWest regions………………………………………………..…$250,000
4000-0020 For the nursing and allied health workforce development initiative, to
develop and support strategies that increase the number of public higher
education faculty members and students who participate in programs that
support careers in fields related to the nursing and allied health workforce;
provided, that the amount appropriated in this item shall be transferred to
the Massachusetts Nursing and Allied Health Workforce Development Trust
Fund established in section 33 of chapter 305 of the acts of 2008; provided
further, that funds shall be transferred to the fund according to an allotment
schedule adopted by the executive office for administration and finance;
provided further, that not less than $200,000 shall be expended to
Northeastern University Bouve College of Health Sciences School of
Nursing for scholarships, simulation programs and clinical partnerships at
its city of Fall River campus; and provided further, that not later than March
3 2027, the executive office of health and human services shall submit a
report to the joint committee on public health, the joint committee on health
care financing, the joint committee on higher education and the house and
senate committees on ways and means detailing the expenditures from the
Massachusetts Nursing and Allied Health Workforce Development Trust
76

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
Fund and short-term and long-term strategies to increase the number of
public and private higher education faculty and students who participate in
programs that support careers in fields related to nursing and allied health .............$825,000
4000-0050 For the operation of the PCA quality home care workforce council
established in section 71 of chapter 118E of the General Laws .............................$3,875,767
4000-0250 For the executive office of health and human services, which may expend
not more than $15,000,000 from monies received from the commonwealth
health insurance connector authority for the costs of the operation and
maintenance of the health insurance exchange; provided, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose
of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenue and related expenditures, the executive office may incur expenses
and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the
lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported
in the state accounting system ..............................................................................$15,000,000
4000-0300 For the operation of the office of the executive office of health and human
services, including the operation of the managed care oversight board;
provided, that funds appropriated in this item shall be expended for
administrative and contracted services related to the implementation and
operation of programs under chapter 118E of the General Laws; provided
further, that no expenditures, whether made by the executive office or
another commonwealth entity, shall be made that are not federally
reimbursable, including those related to Titles XIX or XXI of the Social
Security Act, 42 U.S.C. chapter 7, subchapters XIX or XXI, the MassHealth
demonstration waiver approved under subsection (a) of section 1115 of Title
XI of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. 1315(a), or the community first
section 1115 demonstration waiver under said section 1115 of said Title XI
of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C 1315, except as required for: (i) the
administration of the executive office; (ii) the equivalent of MassHealth
Standard benefits for children under 21 years of age who are in the care or
custody of the department of youth services or the department of children
and families; (iii) the dental benefits provided to clients of the department of
developmental services who are 21 years of age or older; (iv) the payments
related to services delivered in institutions for mental disease for which
federal financial participation is not otherwise available; (v) cost-
containment efforts, the purposes and amounts of which shall be submitted
to the executive office for administration and finance and the house and
senate committees on ways and means not less than 30 days before making
these expenditures; or (vi) otherwise as explicitly authorized with the prior
written approval of the secretary of administration and finance; provided
further, that the executive office shall provide technical and administrative
assistance to agencies under the purview of the secretariat receiving federal
funds; provided further, that the executive office shall ensure that any
collaborative assessments for children receiving services from multiple
agencies within the secretariat shall be performed within existing resources;
provided further, that funds may be expended for the operation of the office
of health equity under the department of public health and the executive
office; provided further, that the office of Medicaid shall coordinate with the
health policy commission in the development of care delivery and payment
models in the MassHealth program, including patient-centered medical
homes and accountable care organizations, in order to ensure alignment of
such models with the commission’s certification programs under sections 14
and 15 of chapter 6D of the General Laws; provided further, that in
77

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
consultation with the center for health information and analysis, no rate
increase shall be provided to existing Medicaid provider rates without taking
all measures possible under Title XIX of the Social Security Act, codified at
42 U.S.C. chapter 7, subchapter XIX, to ensure that rates of payment to
providers shall not exceed the rates that are necessary to meet the cost of
efficiently and economically operated providers in order to provide services
of adequate quality; provided further, that notwithstanding any general or
special law to the contrary, the commissioner of mental health shall approve
any prior authorization or other restriction on medication used to treat mental
illness under written policies, procedures and regulations of the department
of mental health; provided further, that the executive office may continue to
recover provider overpayments made in the current and prior fiscal years
through the Medicaid Management Information System and any such
recoveries shall be considered current fiscal year expenditure refunds;
provided further, that the executive office may collect directly from a liable
third party any amounts paid to contracted providers under said chapter
118E for which the executive office later discovers another third party is
liable if no other course of recoupment is possible; provided further, that the
executive office and its agencies, when contracting for services on the
islands of Martha’s Vineyard and Nantucket and the town of Provincetown,
shall take into consideration the increased costs associated with the
provision of goods, services and housing in said jurisdictions; provided
further, that funds shall be expended for interpretive services directly or
indirectly related to a settlement or resolution agreement with the office of
civil rights or any other office, group or entity; provided further, that the
executive office of health and human services shall report to the house and
senate committees on ways and means not later than January 13, 2027 on
the: (a) number of members served in the dual eligible initiative; (b) average
expenditure per member; (c) average expenditure per member before the
demonstration project; and (d) number of clients that receive care at skilled
nursing facilities; provided further, that not later than December 17, 2026,
the executive office shall submit a report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means and the joint committee on health care
financing detailing utilization in fiscal year 2026 of the Health Safety Net
Trust Fund, established in section 66 of said chapter 118E, including the:
(1) number of persons whose medical expenses were billed to the Health
Safety Net Trust Fund; (2) total dollar amount billed to the Health Safety Net
Trust Fund; (3) age, income level and insurance status of recipients using
the Health Safety Net Trust Fund; (4) types of services paid for out of the
Health Safety Net Trust Fund; and (5) amount disbursed from the Health
Safety Net Trust Fund to each hospital and community health center;
provided further, that not later than March 5, 2027, the executive office shall
submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways and means
and the joint committee on health care financing on: (A) total spending
related to pharmaceutical utilization for fiscal year 2026; (B) estimated
spending related to pharmaceutical utilization for fiscal year 2027; (C) the
actual and estimated revenue amounts, both in the form of supplemental
rebates and federal financial participation, received in fiscal year 2026 and
in fiscal year 2027 as a result of total pharmaceutical spending; (D) total or
projected savings amounts delivered from supplemental rebate negotiations
in fiscal year 2027; and (E) the relative impact of price and utilization of
pharmaceutical drugs added to the MassHealth drug list within fiscal year
2026 and fiscal year 2027; provided further, that not later than March 5,
2027, the executive office, in consultation with office of Medicaid, shall
submit a report to the executive office for administration and finance, the
joint committee on health care financing and the house and senate
78

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
committees on ways and means on the review of wage payment rates for
the provision of continuous skilled nursing care, as established in 101 CMR
350.04, 101 CMR 361 and 101 CMR 453, including: (I) an aggregated
overview of the wage payment rates paid by home health agencies to staff
or contracted nurses providing continuous skilled nursing care, including
any increases in said wage rates resulting from increases in Medicaid rates
paid to home health agencies for continuous skilled nursing care; (II) an
aggregated overview of the proportion of the Medicaid reimbursement rate
paid directly as wages and benefits to nurses providing continuous skilled
nursing care through a home health agency that contracts with MassHealth;
(III) an aggregated breakdown of said wage rates as applied to the acuity
level of patients receiving continuous skilled nursing care; (IV) an
aggregated breakdown of said wage rates as applied to the licensure level
of the providers of continuous skilled nursing care; (V) state costs for wage
rates promulgated in state fiscal years 2022 to 2026, inclusive, by regulation,
department and program; (VI) the fiscal impact of increases in state funding
versus prior fiscal year actual costs for wage rates promulgated for state
fiscal years 2022 to 2026, inclusive, delineated by regulation, department
and program; and (VII) recommendations on information to be included in
any future reporting by home health agencies receiving an increase of
continuous skilled nursing care rates provided by the office of Medicaid;
provided further, that home health agencies providing continuous skilled
nursing care shall provide all information and documentation requested by
the executive office of health and human services to compile the required
report; provided further, that the executive office shall submit quarterly
reports to the house and senate committees on ways and means and the
joint committee on health care financing summarizing the projected total
costs for the next fiscal year of pharmaceutical pipeline drugs identified by
the executive office and expected to be made available for utilization within
a 12-month period from the submission date of the report; provided further,
that said report shall not identify the specific drugs, manufacturer identities
or wholesale acquisition costs of individual drugs identified by the
department; provided further, that the executive office shall submit monthly
MassHealth caseload reports in a searchable electronic format to the
executive office for administration and finance and the house and senate
committees on ways and means; provided further, that not later than
January 13, 2027, the executive office shall submit a report to the house
and senate committees on ways and means detailing the methodology used
to project caseload and utilization in fiscal year 2026 and fiscal year 2027;
provided further, that the executive office of health and human services shall
report to the house and senate committees on ways and means not later
August 3, 2026 and every 30 days thereafter on the status of the
implementation of the behavioral health roadmap; provided further, that the
executive office shall make a supplemental payment not less than
$3,000,000 to Franciscan Hospital for Children, Inc. above base rates, to
compensate for high-complexity pediatric care; provided further, that not
less than $500,000shall be expended for Health Care For All, Inc. for the
costs associated with operating its free statewide non-profit consumer
assistance helpline in order to provide health coverage eligibility, enrollment
and navigation assistance and to operate an online support platform for
enrollment assistance across the state; provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended to Emerson Hospital in the town of Concord to
expand its emergency behavioral health service capacity; provided further,
that not less than $75,000 shall be expended to the Watertown Community
Foundation, Inc. for support and stabilization services for vulnerable
populations in the city known as the town of Watertown; provided further,
79

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
that not less than $75,000 shall be expended to Transhealth Inc. for
infrastructure and programming; provided further, that not less than
$100,000 shall be expended to Sturdy Memorial Hospital, Inc. for services
and equipment related to maternal care; provided further, that not less
than $2,000,000 shall be expended to Planned Parenthood League of
Massachusetts, Inc. to support continued access to sexual and
reproductive health care and community needs; provided further, that not
less than $150,000 shall be expended to New England Life Flight, Inc.,
doing business as, Boston MedFlight; provided further, that not less than
$25,000 shall be expended to Heywood Hospital for facility upgrades and
the expansion of its bariatric program; provided further, that not less than
$75,000 shall be expended to the Brookline Community Mental Health
Center, Inc. to expand the healthy lives program; provided further, that not
less than $100,000 shall be expended to St. Anthony Shrine Order of
Friars Minor Province of the Most Holy Name to expand the Father Mychal
Judge Center for counseling and recovery; provided further, that not less
than $150,000 shall be expended to Harbor Health Services, Inc. for the
operation of its Program of All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly (PACE) day
centers; provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended
to The Joint Committee for Children’s Health Care in Everett, Inc. for
increased staffing needs; provided further, that a total of $40,000,000 may
be expended from items 4000-0700 and 4000-1426 during the fiscal year
2026 accounts payable period to pay for services delivered during fiscal
year 2026; provided further, that the secretary of health and human
services, with the written approval of the secretary of administration and
finance, may authorize transfers of surplus among items 4000-0320, 4000-
0430, 4000-0500, 4000-0601, 4000-0641, 4000-0700, 4000-0875, 4000-
0880, 4000-0885, 4000-0940, 4000-0950, 4000-0990, 4000-1400, 4000-
1420 and 4000-1426 for the purpose of reducing any deficiency in these
items; provided further, that any such transfer shall be made not later than
September 30, 2026; provided further, that any projected aggregate
deficiency among these items shall be reported to the house and senate
committees on ways and means not less than 90 days before the projected
exhaustion of funding; provided further, that any unexpended balance in
these accounts shall revert to the General Fund on June 30, 2027; and
provided further, that funds shall be expended to the Nantucket Cottage
Hospital and Martha’s Vineyard Hospital, Inc. for off-island medical
transportation, including the transportation of patients with behavioral health
conditions ............................................................................................................$157,592,413
4000-0320 For the executive office of health and human services, which may expend
not more than $225,000,000 for medical care and assistance rendered in
the current year from the monies received from recoveries and collections
of any current or prior year expenditures; provided, that notwithstanding any
general or special law to the contrary, the balance of any personal needs
accounts collected from nursing and other medical institutions upon the
death of a medical assistance recipient and held by the executive office for
more than 3 years may be credited to this item ..................................................$225,000,000
4000-0321 For the executive office of health and human services, which may expend
not more than $65,000,000 for contingency fee contracts related to pursuing
federal reimbursement or avoiding costs in its capacity as the single state
agency under Titles XIX and XXI of the Social Security Act and as the
principal agency for all of the agencies within the executive office and other
federally-assisted programs administered by the executive office; provided,
that such contingency contracts shall not exceed 3 years unless such
80

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
contracts received prior review and approval by the executive office for
administration and finance; provided further, that after providing payments
due under the terms of the contingency contracts, the executive office of
health and human services may use available funds to support special
MassHealth projects that will receive enhanced federal revenue
opportunities, including MassHealth eligibility operations and systems
enhancements that support reforms and improvements to MassHealth
programs; provided further, that any enhanced federal financial participation
received for said special projects, including the Implementation Advanced
Planning Documents or other eligibility operations and systems
enhancements that support reforms and improvements to MassHealth shall
be deposited into this item; provided further, that notwithstanding any
general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating
timing discrepancies between the receipt of revenues and payments
required under contingency contracts, the comptroller shall certify for
payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the most
recent revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting system;
provided further, that the executive office may negotiate contingency fees
for activities and services related to pursuing federal reimbursement or
avoiding costs, and the comptroller shall certify these fees and pay them
upon the receipt of said revenue, reimbursement or demonstration of costs
avoided; provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to
the contrary, the executive office may enter into interdepartmental service
agreements with the University of Massachusetts medical school to perform
activities that the executive office, in consultation with the comptroller,
determines to be within the scope of the proper administration of said Title
XIX of the Social Security Act and other federal funding provisions to support
the programs and activities of the executive office; provided further, that said
activities may include providing: (i) administrative services including, but not
limited to, utilization management activities and eligibility determinations
based on disability and supporting case management activities and similar
initiatives; (ii) consulting services related to quality assurance, program
evaluation and development, integrity and soundness and project
management; and (iii) activities and services to pursue federal
reimbursement, avoid costs or identify third-party liability and recoup
payments made to third parties; provided further, that federal
reimbursement for any expenditure made by the University of
Massachusetts medical school for federally-reimbursable services the
university provides under these interdepartmental service agreements or
other contracts with the executive office shall be distributed to the university
and recorded distinctly in the state accounting system; provided further, that
contingency fees paid to the University of Massachusetts medical school
shall not exceed $42,000,000 for state fiscal year 2027 except for
contingency fees paid under interdepartmental service agreements for
recoveries related to special disability workload projects; and provided
further, that not later than December 18, 2026, the executive office shall
submit a report to the executive office for administration and finance and the
house and senate committees on ways and means detailing: (a) the
amounts of the agreements; (b) a delineation of all ongoing and new
projects; and (c) the amount of federal reimbursement and cost avoidance
derived from the contracts for the previous fiscal year’s activities ........................$65,000,000
4000-0322 For the executive office of health and human services, which may expend
not more than $10,000,000 for contingency fee contracts related to revenue
maximization projects pursuing additional federal reimbursement or
avoiding state costs; provided, that such contingency contracts shall not
81

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
exceed 3 years except with prior review and approval by the executive office
for administration and finance; provided further, that notwithstanding any
general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating
timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
expenditures required under contingency contracts, the executive office of
health and human services shall incur expenses and the comptroller shall
certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or
the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting
system; and provided further, that the secretary of health and human
services may negotiate contingency fees for activities and services related
to pursuing federal reimbursement or avoiding costs, and the comptroller
shall certify these fees and pay them upon the receipt of this revenue,
reimbursement or demonstration of costs avoided ...............................................$10,000,000
4000-0430 For the CommonHealth program to provide primary and supplemental
medical care and assistance to disabled adults and children under sections
9A, 16 and 16A of chapter 118E of the General Laws; provided, that funds
may be expended from this item for health care services provided to the
recipients in prior fiscal years; provided further, that the executive office of
health and human services shall maximize federal reimbursement for state
expenditures made on behalf of those adults and children; provided further,
that children shall be determined eligible for medical care and assistance if
they meet the disability standards as defined by the executive office;
provided further, that such standards shall be no more restrictive than those
in effect on July 1, 1996; and provided further, that the executive office shall
process a CommonHealth application within 45 days of receipt of a
completed application or within 90 days if a determination of disability is
required ................................................................................................................$327,948,284
4000-0500 For health care services provided to medical assistance recipients through
the executive office of health and human services’ managed care delivery
systems, including a behavioral health contractor, the Primary Care
Clinician Plan, Primary Care Accountable Care Organizations, MassHealth
managed care organizations and Accountable Care Partnership Plans and
for MassHealth benefits provided to children, adolescents and adults under
section 9 of chapter 118E of the General Laws and clauses (a) to (d),
inclusive, and clause (h) of subsection (2) of section 9A of said chapter 118E
and section 16C of said chapter 118E; provided, that no funds shall be
expended from this item for children and adolescents under clause (c) of
said subsection (2) of said section 9A of said chapter 118E whose
household incomes, as determined by the executive office, exceed 150 per
cent of the federal poverty level; provided further, that funds may be
expended from this item for health care services provided to recipients in
prior fiscal years; provided further, that the executive office shall require that
any contract or other arrangement entered into by a managed care provider
under the managed care delivery system for the provision and
administration of pharmacy benefit management services on behalf of
individuals enrolled in programs of medical assistance under this item,
including a managed care provider participating in an accountable care
partnership plan, shall include, but not be limited to, the requirement that
pharmacy benefit managers: (i) identify all sources and amounts of income,
payments and financial benefits related to the provision and administration
of pharmacy benefit management services on behalf of the managed care
provider including, but not limited to, pricing discounts, rebates, inflationary
payments, credits, clawbacks, fees, grants, chargebacks, reimbursements
or other benefits; and (ii) disclose to MassHealth the sources and amounts
82

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
of all income, payments and financial benefits received by the pharmacy
benefit manager; provided further, that not later than February 5, 2027, the
executive office shall submit a report to the house and senate committees
on ways and means detailing: (a) the total number of members participating
in the Accountable Care Organization program; (b) disenrollment trends
from the Partnership Plan, Primary Care Accountable Care Organization
and Managed Care Organization-administered Accountable Care
Organizations within the designated plan selection; (c) the outcomes
achieved by accountable care organizations and community partners
including, but not limited to, financial performance, patient safety, patient
satisfaction, quality and aggregate and per-member reductions in spending
compared to prior cost trends; (d) the results of benchmarks on accountable
care organizations’ and community partners’ progress toward an integrated
care delivery system; and (e) a summary of spending and activities related
to traditionally non-reimbursed services to address health-related social
needs including, but not limited to, home and community-based services,
housing stabilization and support, utility assistance, non-medical
transportation, physical activity, nutrition, sexual assault and domestic
violence supports; provided further, that said summary shall include, to the
maximum extent practicable, aggregated data on the results of preventative
health care services, including health-related social needs screening, the
number of referrals to human service providers to address such screening,
the result of such referrals and changes in health status; provided further,
that such data shall be stratified by demographic factors to support an
analysis of the impact on health disparities; provided further, that where data
is not available, a report on progress toward establishing necessary data
systems shall be provided; provided further, that said summary shall include
outcome measures for at-risk populations with chronic health conditions;
and provided further, that not later than March 5, 2027, the executive office
shall conduct and submit a comparative analysis to the house and senate
committees on ways and means and the joint committee on mental health,
substance use and recovery of the rate differential for inpatient psychiatric
and substance use hospital per diem payments between MassHealth and
its contracted health insurers, health plans, health maintenance
organizations, behavioral health management firms and third-party
administrators under contract to a Medicaid managed care organization or
primary care clinician plan ................................................................................$6,051,261,716
4000-0601 For health care services provided to MassHealth members who are seniors,
including those provided through the Medicare Savings Program, and for
the operation of the MassHealth senior care options program under section
9D of chapter 118E of the General Laws; provided, that funds may be
expended from this item for health care services provided to recipients in
prior fiscal years; provided further, that notwithstanding any general or
special law to the contrary, for the purposes of determining an individual’s
eligibility for the senior care options program, an individual shall be deemed
to reach 65 years of age on the first day of the month in which their sixty-
fifth birthday occurs; provided further, that nursing facility rates effective
October 1, 2026 under section 13D of said chapter 118E shall be developed
using the costs of calendar year 2019; provided further, that funds shall be
expended from this item to maintain a personal needs allowance of $72.80
per month for individuals residing in nursing and rest homes who are eligible
for MassHealth, emergency aid to the elderly, the disabled and children
program or supplemental security income; provided further, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for any nursing
home facility or non-acute chronic disease hospital that provides kosher
83

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
food to its residents, the executive office of health and human services, in
consultation with the center for health information and analysis, and in
recognition of the special innovative program status granted by the
executive office, shall continue to make the standard payment rates
established in fiscal year 2006 to reflect the high dietary costs incurred in
providing kosher food; provided further, that MassHealth shall reimburse
nursing home facilities for up to 20 medical leave-of-absence days and shall
reimburse the facilities for up to 10 non-medical leave-of-absence days;
provided further, that medical leave-of-absence days shall include an
observation stay in a hospital in excess of 24 hours; provided further, that
no nursing home shall reassign a patient’s bed during a leave of absence
that is eligible for reimbursement under this item; provided further, that not
later than January 15, 2027, MassHealth shall submit a report to the house
and senate committees on ways and means detailing, for fiscal year 2026,
the: (i) number of nursing facility clients on a leave of absence, delineated
by the nursing facility, medical leave-of-absence days and medical leave-of-
absence days that exceeded 10 days per hospital stay, nonmedical leave-
of-absence days and the total number of days on leave of absence
unduplicated member count; (ii) monthly licensed bed capacity level per
nursing home and the monthly total number of empty beds per nursing
facility, total number of all nursing home residents and total MassHealth
nursing home residents; (iii) 6 separate MassHealth payment rates and the
average payment amount rate per nursing facility client resident; (iv) actual
number of nursing home residents for each of the 6 payment rates in clause
(iii); and (v) aggregate payment amount per nursing facility, by month;
provided further, that the information in the report shall be delineated by
nursing facility, including grand totals where appropriate; provided further,
that no payment for special provider costs shall be made from this item
without the prior written approval of the secretary of administration and
finance; provided further, that not later than February 3, 2027, the executive
office of health and human services shall submit a report to the house and
senate committees on ways and means on the implementation of the
Medicare Savings Program expanded program eligibility for seniors
pursuant to section 25A of said chapter 118E; provided further, that said
report shall include, but not be limited to: (a) the number of members who
are seniors whose household incomes, as determined by the executive
office, exceed 135 per cent of the federal poverty level that are enrolled in
Medicare Savings Programs during each month of the fiscal year; (b) total
enrollment in the Qualified Medicare Beneficiary program, Specified Low-
Income Medicare Beneficiary Program and Qualifying Individual Program;
(c) total annual spending on Medicare premiums and cost-sharing for such
members; and (d) total annual transfers from the prescription advantage
program in item 9110-1455 and the Health Safety Net Trust Fund to fund
the Medicare Savings Program expansion; provided further, that not less
than $2,973,456 shall be expended for the recognition of additional
allowable costs to the standard base rate for nursing facilities located
within 17 miles of 71 Hospital avenue in the city of North Adams; provided
further, that not less than $3,800,000 shall be expended for the recognition
of additional allowable costs to the standard base rate over the base year
rate established on October 1, 2024, for a nursing facility located on
Martha’s Vineyard Island and within 8 miles of a hospital that has received
federal government designation as a Critical Access Hospital; provided
further, that the executive office of health and human services shall convene
and consult with the PCA working group established under item 4000-0601
of section 2 of chapter 140 of the acts of 2024 to identify savings in addition
those identified in the November 28, 2025 report to effectuate the long-term
84

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
viability of the PCA program; and provided further, that no further reductions
to said PCA program may be implemented without the agreement of said
PCA working group ..........................................................................................$5,197,654,427
4000-0641 For nursing facility Medicaid rates; provided, that in fiscal year 2027, the
executive office of health and human services, in consultation with the
center for health information and analysis, shall establish rates that
cumulatively total not less than $342,100,000 more than the annual
payment rates established under the rates in effect as of June 30, 2002;
provided further, that not less than $30,000,000 shall be expended in base
rates for additional payments over the rate established in October 2025, as
supplemented January 2026 to reflect nursing facility resident care and
workforce costs including wages, hiring of staff and training for nursing
facility workers; provided further, that an amount for expenses related to the
collection and administration of assessments under section 63 of chapter
118E of the General Laws shall be transferred to the executive office; and
provided further, that the payments made under this item shall be allocated
in an amount sufficient to implement section 622 of chapter 151 of the acts
of 1996 ................................................................................................................$655,073,456
4000-0700 For health care services provided to medical assistance recipients under the
executive office of health and human services’ health care indemnity or
third-party liability plan to medical assistance recipients not otherwise
covered under the executive office’s managed care or senior care plans and
for MassHealth benefits provided to children, adolescents and adults under
section 9 of chapter 118E of the General Laws and clauses (a) to (d),
inclusive, and clause (h) of subsection (2) of section 9A of said chapter 118E
and section 16C of said chapter 118E; provided, that no funds shall be
expended from this item for children and adolescents under clause (c) of
said subsection (2) of said section 9A of said chapter 118E whose
household incomes, as determined by the executive office exceed 150 per
cent of the federal poverty level; provided further, that children who have
aged out of the custody of the department of children and families shall be
eligible for benefits through the age limit specified in MassHealth’s approved
state plan; provided further, that not less than $8,000,000 shall be
expended to the non-state, government public hospital system established
under chapter 147 of the acts of 1996; provided further, that the executive
office may reduce MassHealth premiums or copayments or offer other
incentives to encourage enrollees to comply with wellness goals; provided
further, that funds shall be expended to eliminate pharmacy copayments for
all MassHealth members; provided further, that funds shall be expended
from this item for members who qualify for early intervention services;
provided further, that notwithstanding this item, funds may be expended
from this item for the purchase of third-party insurance including, but not
limited to, Medicare for any medical assistance recipient; provided further,
that funds may be expended from this item for activities relating to customer
service; provided further, that funds may be expended from this item for
activities relating to disability determinations or utilization management and
review, including patient screenings and evaluations, regardless of whether
such activities are performed by a state agency, contractor, agent or
provider; provided further, that MassHealth shall expend $13,000,000 in the
aggregate for acute care hospitals that have greater than 63 per cent of their
gross patient service revenue from governmental payers and free care as
determined by the executive office; provided further, that in fiscal year 2027,
MassHealth shall maintain the same level of federally-optional chiropractic
services that were in effect in fiscal year 2016 and that were included in its
85

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
state plan or demonstration program in effect on January 1, 2002 for
members enrolled in the primary care clinician program; provided further,
that not later than March 3, 2027, the executive office shall report to the house
and senate committees on ways and means on: (i) dental coverage
available to MassHealth recipients as of January 1, 2027 as it compares to
dental coverage available to MassHealth recipients on January 1, 2010; (ii)
utilization of dental services in fiscal year 2026 and fiscal year 2027; (iii) the
actual and projected costs and revenue associated with dental coverage in
fiscal year 2026 and fiscal year 2027; and (iv) the estimated cost
effectiveness of dental coverage as a contributor to MassHealth total cost of
care; provided further, that in fiscal year 2027, the executive office shall not
fund programs relating to case management with the intention of reducing
length of stay for neonatal intensive care unit cases; provided further, that
funds may be expended from this item for health care services provided to
recipients in prior fiscal years; provided further, that no payments for special
provider costs shall be made from this item without the prior written approval
of the secretary of administration and finance; provided further, that not later
than December 4, 2026, $750,000 shall be equally distributed to the
teaching community health centers with family medicine residency
programs in the cities of Worcester and Lawrence and in the South Boston
section of the city of Boston; provided further, that the executive office shall
designate the Massachusetts League of Community Health Centers, Inc. to
administer the funds and shall retain 5 per cent of the total funds; and
provided further, that the executive office shall: (i) report to the house and
senate committees on ways and means on the use of the funds by teaching
community health centers; and (ii) audit said centers in order to confirm the
use of the funds by each center for training purposes ....................................$4,237,817,619
4000-0875 For the executive office of health and human services to expend for the
provision of benefits to eligible individuals who require medical treatment for
either breast or cervical cancer under section 2 of the Breast and Cervical
Cancer Prevention and Treatment Act of 2000, Public Law 106-354, codified
at 42 U.S.C. 1396a(a)(10)(A)(ii)(XVIII) and section 10D of chapter 118E of
the General Laws; provided, that the executive office shall provide these
benefits to individuals whose incomes, as determined by the executive
office, do not exceed 250 per cent of the federal poverty level, subject to
continued federal approval; and provided further, that funds may be
expended from this item for health care services provided to these recipients
in prior fiscal years .................................................................................................$18,500,000
4000-0880 For MassHealth benefits under clause (c) of subsection (2) of section 9A of
chapter 118E of the General Laws and section 16C of said chapter 118E for
children and adolescents whose household incomes, as determined by the
executive office of health and human services, exceed 150 per cent of the
federal poverty level; provided, that funds may be expended from this item
for health care subsidies provided to eligible individuals under the last
paragraph of section 9 of said chapter 118E and section 16D of said chapter
118E; and provided further, that funds may be expended from this item for
health care services provided to those children and adolescents in prior
fiscal years ...........................................................................................................$633,207,250
4000-0885 For the cost of health insurance subsidies paid to employees of small
businesses in the insurance reimbursement program under section 9C of
chapter 118E of the General Laws; provided, that funds may be expended
only for employees who are ineligible for subsidized insurance through the
commonwealth health insurance connector authority and ineligible for any
86

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
MassHealth program; provided further, that enrollment in this program may
be capped to ensure that MassHealth expenditures shall not exceed the
amount appropriated; provided further, that funds may be expended from
this item for health care services provided to individuals eligible under clause
(j) of subsection (2) of section 9A of said chapter 118E; and provided further,
that funds may be expended from this item for health care services provided
to those persons in prior fiscal years .....................................................................$34,042,020
4000-0940 For providing health care services related to the federal Patient Protection
and Affordable Care Act, Public Law 111-148; provided, that funds may be
expended from this item for health care services provided to individuals ages
19 to 64, inclusive, whose household incomes, as determined by the
executive office of health and human services, do not exceed 133 per cent
of the federal poverty level and those who are eligible under clauses (b) and
(d) of subsection (2) of section 9A of chapter 118E of the General Laws; and
provided further, that in fiscal year 2027, MassHealth shall maintain the
same level of vision services that were in effect in fiscal year 2026 for
members enrolled in the CarePlus program ....................................................$3,363,484,382
4000-0950 For administrative and program expenses associated with the children’s
behavioral health initiative to provide comprehensive, community-based
behavioral health services to children suffering from severe emotional
disturbances; provided, that the executive office of health and human
services shall submit biannual reports to the house and senate committees
on ways and means on the implementation of the initiative; provided further,
that said reports shall include, but not be limited to: (i) up-to-date results of
the scheduled plan, including a schedule detailing commencement of
services and associated costs by service type; (ii) an up-to-date analysis of
compliance with the terms of the settlement agreement to date; (iii) a
detailed itemization of services and service utilization by service type,
geographical location and the age of the member receiving the service; (iv)
data detailing the time that elapsed between a member’s request for
services and commencement of an initial assessment for services; (v) the
time to complete the initial assessment and the time that elapsed between
initial assessment for services and commencement of services; and (vi) a
quarterly update of whether projected expenditures are likely to exceed the
amount appropriated in this item; provided further, that the executive office
shall notify the house and senate committees on ways and means not less
than 30 days before any transfer of funds shall be made from this item;
provided further, that funds may be expended from this item for health care
services provided to these persons in prior fiscal years; and provided further,
that any unexpended balance in this item shall revert to the General Fund
on June 30, 2027 .................................................................................................$337,639,537
4000-0990 For the executive office of health and human services to expend for the
children’s medical security plan to provide health services for uninsured
children from birth through age 18, inclusive; provided, that the executive
office shall expend all necessary funds from this item to ensure the provision
of this program under section 10F of chapter 118E of the General Laws;
provided further, that the MassHealth benefit request shall be used as a joint
application to determine the eligibility for both MassHealth and the children’s
medical security plan; provided further, that the executive office shall
prescreen enrollees and applicants for Medicaid eligibility; provided further,
that the maximum benefit levels for this program shall be made available
only to those children who have been determined by the executive office to
be ineligible for MassHealth benefits; provided further, that no applicant shall
87

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
be enrolled in the program until the applicant has been denied eligibility for
the MassHealth program other than MassHealth Limited; provided further,
that the executive office shall maximize federal reimbursements for state
expenditures made on behalf of the children; and provided further, that
funds may be expended from this item for health care services provided to
those persons in prior fiscal years .........................................................................$42,600,000
4000-1400 For the provision of MassHealth benefits to persons diagnosed with human
immunodeficiency virus who have incomes that do not exceed 200 per cent
of the federal poverty level; provided, that funds may be expended from this
item for health care services provided to said persons in prior fiscal years .........$16,555,080
4000-1420 For payment to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services in
compliance with Title XIX of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. chapter 7,
subchapter XIX ....................................................................................................$721,675,586
4000-1426 For health care services provided to MassHealth members through the
following MassHealth waivers approved under section 1915(c) of the Social
Security Act: (i) the Acquired Brain Injury Residential Habilitation waiver; (ii)
the Acquired Brain Injury Non-Residential Habilitation waiver; (iii) the Moving
Forward Plan Residential Supports waiver; and (iv) the Moving Forward
Plan Community Living waiver; provided, that funds may be expended from
this item for administrative and program expenses associated with the
operation of said waivers; and provided further, that funds may be expended
from this item for health care services provided to members participating in
said waivers in prior fiscal years ..........................................................................$560,464,089
4000-1700 For the provision of information technology services within the executive
office of health and human services ....................................................................$183,495,208
Office for Refugees and Immigrants.
4003-0111 For the operation of the office for refugees and immigrants; provided, that
the office shall submit quarterly reports to the house and senate committees
on ways and means detailing: (i) a list of recipients of such funds; (ii) the
amounts distributed to each recipient; and (iii) the number of newly arrived
immigrants and refugees served by each recipient ....................................................$993,777
4003-0122 For a citizenship for new Americans program to assist legal permanent
residents of the commonwealth in becoming citizens of the United States;
provided, that the office for refugees and immigrants shall administer the
program; provided further, that the program funded under this item shall
provide assistance to persons who are within 3 years of eligibility to become
citizens of the United States; provided further, that not less than $50,000
shall be expended to Casa Dominicana Inc. to assist in ESL classes and
additional programming for low-income adults; provided further, that
services shall include: (i) English for Speakers of Other Languages/civics
classes; (ii) citizenship application assistance; (iii) interview preparation; and
(iv) support services including, but not limited to, interpretation and referral
services; provided further, that persons who would qualify for benefits under
chapter 118A of the General Laws but for their status as legal noncitizens
shall be given the highest priority for services; provided further, that persons
who currently receive state-funded benefits that could be replaced in whole
or in part by federally funded benefits if those persons become citizens shall
be given priority for services; provided further, that funds may be expended
for the programmatic and administrative support of the office’s refugee and
88

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
immigrant services; and provided further, that funds may be expended for
the programmatic and administrative support of the office’s refugee and
immigrant services ..................................................................................................$1,361,246
4003-0124 For the implementation of an immigration legal services program; provided,
that funds may be expended for costs associated with implementing the
program; provided further, that not less than $2,000,000 shall be expended
to the Immigrant Family Services Institute, Inc. (IFSI-USA.INC.) for
facilities, operations, programming, legal and mental health services at
their offices including but not limited to Mattapan, Brockton, Everett,
Worcester, Methuen and Lowell to support immigrants in Massachusetts;
and provided further, that, subject to appropriation, funds shall be distributed
by the office for refugees and immigrants to designated non-profit
organizations to increase access to legal representation for immigrants and
refugees in the commonwealth, including, but not limited to, legal assistance
in a single consultation or ongoing legal representation and all legal advice,
advocacy and related assistance ............................................................................$9,000,000
Center for Health Information and Analysis.
4100-0060 For the operation of the center for health information and analysis
established in section 2 of chapter 12C of the General Laws; provided, that
the estimated costs of the center shall be assessed in the manner
prescribed by section 7 of said chapter 12C; and provided further, that the
center for health information and analysis shall report to the house and
senate committees on ways and means not later than January 8, 2027 on: (i)
the MassHealth rates of payment for telehealth services; (ii) the MassHealth
rates of payment for comparable in-person services; and (iii) the utilization
rates of telehealth services where in person services are available .....................$32,001,638
4100-0063 For the operation of the Betsy Lehman center for patient safety and medical
error reduction established in section 15 of chapter 12C of the General
Laws; provided, that the estimated costs of the center shall be assessed in
the manner prescribed by section 7 of said chapter 12C; and provided
further, that not less than $1,183,136 shall be expended for a pilot program
of automated adverse event monitoring in hospitals in the commonwealth ...........$5,642,287
OFFICE OF DISABILITIES AND COMMUNITY SERVICES.
Massachusetts Commission for the Blind.
4110-0001 For the operation of the Massachusetts commission for the blind, including
the cost of sheltered workforce employee retirement benefits ...............................$2,143,271
4110-1000 For the community services program; provided, that the Massachusetts
commission for the blind shall work in collaboration with the Massachusetts
commission for the deaf and hard of hearing to provide assistance and
services to the deaf-blind community through the deaf-blind community
access network; and provided further, that not less than $850,000 shall
be expended by the Massachusetts commission for the blind to maximize the
independent living skills of legally blind residents of the commonwealth
through rehabilitation and the provision of accessible devices, assistive
software and equipment and supportive technology training by qualified
providers in community, residential, virtual and facility-based settings ..................$7,772,782
89

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
4110-2000 For the turning 22 program of the Massachusetts commission for the blind,
including deaf-blind extended supports; provided, that the commission shall
work in conjunction with the department of developmental services to
secure the maximum amount of federal reimbursements available for the
care of turning 22 program clients .........................................................................$18,320,679
4110-3010 For vocational rehabilitation services for the blind operated in cooperation
with the federal government; provided, that no funds from federal vocational
rehabilitation grants or state appropriations shall be deducted for pensions,
group health or life insurance or any other such indirect costs of federally
reimbursed state employees ...................................................................................$2,522,010
MassAbility.
4120-0200 For independent living centers; provided, that not later than April 1, 2027,
MassAbility shall report to the house and senate committees on ways and
means on the services provided by independent living centers, which shall
include, but not be limited to, the: (i) total number of consumers that request
and receive services; (ii) types of services requested and received by
consumers; (iii) total number of consumers moved from nursing homes; and
(iv) total number of independent living plans and goals set and achieved by
consumers ...............................................................................................................$8,000,000
4120-1000 For the operation of MassAbility; provided, that not less than 90 days prior
to any changes to the current eligibility criteria, MassAbility shall provide
written notification to the house and senate committees on ways and means;
provided further, that the commissioner shall report quarterly to the house
and senate committees on ways and means and the secretary of
administration and finance on the number of clients served and the amount
expended on each type of service; provided further, that upon the written
request of the commissioner of revenue, MassAbility shall provide lists of
individual clients to whom, or on behalf of whom, payments have been made
for the purpose of verifying eligibility and detecting and preventing fraud,
error and abuse in the programs administered by MassAbility; and provided
further, that said lists shall include client names and social security numbers
and payee names and other identification, if different from a client’s
identification ................................................................................................................$481,163
4120-2000 For vocational rehabilitation services operated in cooperation with the
federal government; provided, that funds from federal vocational
rehabilitation grants or state appropriations shall not be deducted for
pensions, group health or life insurance or any other indirect costs of
federally reimbursed state employees; and provided further, that the
commissioner of MassAbility, in making referrals to service providers, shall
take into account a client’s place of residence and the proximity of the
nearest provider to the client’s residence ..............................................................$29,194,031
4120-3000 For employment assistance services; provided, that vocational evaluation
and employment services shall be provided for severely disabled adults ..............$2,487,654
4120-4000 For community-based services, which shall include, but not be limited to,
protective services, adult support services, assistive technology services
and the annualization of funding for turning 22 program clients who began
receiving services in fiscal year 2026 under item 4120-4010 of chapter 28
of the acts of 2023 .................................................................................................$14,230,909
90

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
4120-4001 For the accessible housing registry for people with disabilities .................................$150,000
4120-4010 For the turning 22 program of MassAbility .................................................................$311,166
4120-5000 For homemaking services .......................................................................................$4,862,718
4120-6000 For services for individuals with head injuries; provided, that MassAbility
shall work with the executive office of health and human services to
maximize federal reimbursement for clients receiving head injury services .........$33,106,310
Massachusetts Commission for the Deaf and Hard of Hearing.
4125-0100 For the operation of and services provided by the Massachusetts
commission for the deaf and hard of hearing .......................................................$11,270,808
OFFICE OF CHILDREN, YOUTH AND FAMILY SERVICES.
Department of Youth Services.
4200-0010 For the administration of the department of youth services; provided, that
the department shall continue to collaborate with the department of
elementary and secondary education in order to align curriculum at the
department of youth services with the statewide curriculum frameworks and
to support the reintegration of youth from facilities at the department of youth
services into traditional public school settings; provided further, that the
commissioner of youth services may transfer funds between items 4200-
0100, 4200-0200, 4200-0300 and 4200-0600, as necessary, under an
allocation plan which shall detail, by object class, the distribution of the funds
to be transferred and which the commissioner shall submit to the house and
senate committees on ways and means not less than 15 days before any
such transfer; and provided further, that not more than 7 per cent of any such
item shall be transferred in fiscal year 2027 ............................................................$4,543,530
4200-0100 For supervision, counseling and other community-based services
provided to committed youths in nonresidential care programs of the
department of youth services ................................................................................$23,362,621
4200-0200 For pre-trial detention programs, including purchase-of-service and state-
operated programs ................................................................................................$26,537,843
4200-0300 For secure facilities, including purchase-of-service and state-operated
programs incidental to the operations of the facilities; provided, that funds
shall be expended to address the needs of the female population; and
provided further, that funds shall be expended for suicide prevention
services ................................................................................................................$117,780,790
4200-0500 For enhanced salaries for teachers at the department of youth services ...............$3,059,187
4200-0600 For the operation of secure facilities to detain arrested youth before
arraignment under the overnight arrest program ....................................................$2,606,922
4200-0700 For evidence-based delinquency prevention through diversion
programming that serves as an alternative to arresting or prosecuting youth
through the juvenile court ........................................................................................$1,627,403
91

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
Department of Transitional Assistance.
4400-1000 For the central administration of the department of transitional assistance;
provided, that all costs associated with verifying disability for all programs of
the department shall be paid from this item; provided further, that not less
than $100,000 shall be expended for the Bridge to Prosperity statewide
cliff effect pilot program led by Springfield WORKS to support the
continued implementation, evaluation and completion of a demonstration
program serving families across the commonwealth; provided further, that
not less than $75,000 shall be expended to Fresh Start Furniture Bank,
Inc. for the continuation of wrap around services; provided further, that not
less than $200,000 shall be expended for Cradles to Crayons’ Clothing
Insecurity relief and essentials distribution service; provided further, that
the department shall submit monthly status reports to the house and senate
committees on ways and means and the secretary of administration and
finance on program expenditures, savings and revenues, error rate
measurements and public assistance caseloads and benefits; provided
further, that the department shall collect all out-of-court settlement restitution
payments; provided further, that the restitution payments shall include, but
not be limited to, installment and lump sum payments; provided further, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary and unless
otherwise expressly provided, federal reimbursements received for the
department, including reimbursements for administrative, fringe and
overhead costs for the current fiscal year and prior fiscal years, shall be
credited to the General Fund; provided further, that an application for
assistance under chapter 118 of the General Laws shall also be an
application for assistance under chapter 118E of the General Laws;
provided further, that if the department denies assistance under said chapter
118, the department shall transmit the application to the executive office of
health and human services for a determination of eligibility under said
chapter 118E; provided further, that the department shall provide the
caseload forecasting office with enrollment data and any other information
pertinent to caseload forecasting that is requested by the office on a monthly
basis; provided further, that the information shall be provided in a manner
that meets all applicable federal and state privacy and security
requirements; provided further, that after April 1, 2027, the commissioner of
transitional assistance may transfer funds for identified deficiencies between
items 4403-2000, 4405-2000 and 4408-1000; provided further, that the
distribution of the funds to be transferred shall be included in an allocation
plan, which the commissioner shall submit to the executive office for
administration and finance and the house and senate committees on ways
and means not less than 15 days before any such transfer; and provided
further, that upon approval by the executive office for administration and
finance, the commissioner may transfer funds for identified deficiencies
between this item and item 4400-1100 ...............................................................$109,135,521
4400-1001 For programs to increase the commonwealth’s participation rate in the
Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program and other federal nutrition
programs; provided, that not less than $600,000 shall be expended for a
grant to Project Bread – The Walk for Hunger, Inc.; provided further, that the
work of employees of the department of transitional assistance paid for from
this item shall be restricted to processing supplemental nutrition assistance
program applications; provided further, that the department shall not require
supplemental nutrition assistance program applicants to provide
reverification of eligibility factors previously verified and not subject to
change; provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to
92

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
the contrary, the department shall require only 1 signature from
supplemental nutrition assistance program applicants; provided further, that
the department shall fund a unit staffed by department employees to
respond to supplemental nutrition assistance program inquiries and arrange
and conduct telephone interviews for initial supplemental nutrition
assistance program applications from this item; provided further, that the
department shall fund a system to image and catalog eligibility documents
electronically from this item; provided further, that funds may be expended
for supplemental nutrition assistance program outreach; and provided
further, that not later than February 3, 2027, the department shall report to
the house and senate committees on ways and means on the status of
these programs ........................................................................................................$5,762,115
4400-1004 For the project costs of the Massachusetts healthy incentives program;
provided, that when expanding the number of participating vendors, the
department shall prioritize improving access in areas with limited access to
fresh, local produce and that are historically underserved by the program;
provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the
Allston-Brighton Food Pantry for a community refrigerator support
program; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended
to the Dracut Food Pantry; provided further, that the department shall
collaborate with local food coalitions and nonprofit groups to develop
community outreach strategies that ensure equitable access to, and
knowledge of, the program; and provided further, that not later than April 1,
2027, the department shall submit a report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means that shall include, but not be limited to: (i)
the number of households utilizing the program; (ii) the number of program
transactions; (iii) the number of vendors processing program transactions;
(iv) a breakdown of the total number of program clients and vendors, by their
municipality; and (v) the department’s efforts, plans and timeline for
identifying geographic areas that are underserved by the program and
increasing program activity in those areas, including metrics and factors to
be used to make determinations for the addition and siting of vendors, prior
appropriation continued ........................................................................................$20,050,000
4400-1020 For the operation of the secure jobs connect program for employment
support, job training and job search services for homeless or previously
homeless families receiving assistance from the executive office of housing
and livable communities under items 7004-0101, 7004-0108, 7004-9024 or
7004-9316; provided, that participants receiving assistance under said items
7004-0101 and 7004-0108 shall receive not less than 12 months of housing
stabilization services under said items 7004-0101 and 7004-0108; provided
further, that services shall be delivered by community-based agencies that
have demonstrated experience working in partnership with regional
administering agencies including, but not limited to, Community Teamwork
Inc., Father Bill's & MainSpring, Inc., Way Finders, Inc., Jewish Vocational
Service, Inc., SER-Jobs for Progress, Inc., South Middlesex Opportunity
Council, Inc. and Worcester Community Action Council, Inc.; provided
further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the Main South
Community Development Corporation for efforts to promote the safety and
security of the University Park and Beacon Brightly neighborhoods;
provided further, that the executive office of housing and livable
communities shall make available rental assistance under item 7004-9024
to ensure effective participation in this program; provided further, that
service delivery agencies shall seek additional federal, state or private funds
to ensure the effective continuation of regional partnerships; and provided
further, that not later than April 1, 2027, the department of transitional
93

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
assistance shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on
ways and means, by type of service or program provided, on the: (i) housing
situation, including stability of housing, for program participants; (ii)
employment status, including the employment history, of program
participants; (iii) total number of program participants; and (iv) number of
program participants who are no longer receiving assistance under said
items 7004-0101, 7004-0108, 7004-9024 or 7004-9316 ........................................$5,000,000
4400-1025 For domestic violence specialists at local area offices ...........................................$2,411,075
4400-1100 For the payroll of the department of transitional assistance’s caseworkers;
provided, that only employees of bargaining unit 8 shall be paid from this
item ......................................................................................................................$121,991,351
4400-1979 For the department of transitional assistance to administer, in consultation
with the commonwealth corporation, an employment counseling and job
training program and the pathways to self-sufficiency program respectively
established in sections 3B and 3C of chapter 118 of the General Laws and
the full employment program established in section 110 of chapter 5 of the
acts of 1995, as amended by section 29 of chapter 158 of the acts of 2014 ............$980,171
4401-1000 For employment and training services for recipients of benefits provided
under the transitional aid to families with dependent children program;
provided, that funds from this item may be expended on former recipients of
the program for up to 1 year after termination of their benefits; provided
further, that the department of transitional assistance may expend funds on
such services for the noncustodial parents of dependent children receiving
transitional aid to families with dependent children; provided further, that the
department shall expend not less than the amounts expended in fiscal year
2026 for the young parents program and the competitive integrated
employment services program; provided further, that not less than $170,000
shall be expended for learning disability assessments through the University
of Massachusetts; provided further, that not less than $1,500,000 shall be
expended for the service providers with whom the office for refugees and
immigrants entered into service agreements in fiscal year 2026 under this
item; provided further, that certain parents who have not yet reached 18
years of age, including those who are ineligible for transitional aid to families
with dependent children and who would qualify for benefits under chapter
118 of the General Laws but for the consideration of the grandparents’
income, shall be eligible to receive services; provided further, that not later
than April 1, 2027, the department shall submit a report to the house and
senate committees on ways and means including, but not limited to: (i) the
number of clients served by these programs; (ii) the number of clients who
transition into employment, when applicable; (iii) the number of clients who
remain in employment after 90 days, when applicable; (iv) the number of
clients who remain in employment after 1 year, when applicable; and (v)
other quantifiable data related to client outcomes as designed by these
programs; provided further, that the department shall examine the outcomes
of these programs to determine which are effective in transitioning clients to
employment and increasing self-sufficiency; and provided further, that the
department shall consider other programs to meet the transitional
employment needs of clients .................................................................................$20,375,367
4403-2000 For a program of transitional aid to families with dependent children;
provided, that the payment standard and need standard in fiscal year 2027
shall be not less than the standards in effect in fiscal year 2026; provided
94

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
further, that the need standard shall be equal to the payment standard
established under the provisions of this item; provided further, that the
payment standard and need standard for fiscal year 2027 shall be not less
than the standards set forth in this item; provided further, that the
department of transitional assistance shall notify parents under 20 years of
age who are receiving benefits from the program of the requirements of
clause (2) of subsection (i) of section 110 of chapter 5 of the acts of 1995 or
any successor law; provided further, that a $40-per-month rental allowance
shall be paid to households incurring a rent or mortgage expense and not
residing in public or subsidized housing; provided further, that a
nonrecurring children’s clothing allowance of $450 shall be provided to each
child eligible under this program in September 2026; provided further, that
the children’s clothing allowance shall be included in the standard of need
for the month of September 2026; provided further, that benefits under this
program shall not be available to those families in which a child has been
removed from the household under a court order after a care and protection
hearing held under chapter 119 of the General Laws or to adult recipients
otherwise eligible for transitional aid to families with dependent children but
for the temporary removal of any dependent children from the home by the
department of children and families under department procedures; provided
further, that not less than $779,058 shall be expended for transportation
benefits for recipients of transitional aid to families with dependent children;
provided further, that any person experiencing homelessness, who: (i) has
no established place of abode, or lives in a temporary emergency shelter;
and (ii) is otherwise eligible under this item and chapter 118 of the General
Laws, shall receive the same payment rate as recipients who incur shelter
costs including, but not limited to, rent or a mortgage; provided further, that
the department of transitional assistance shall promulgate or revise any
such rules and regulations necessary to implement the preceding provision;
provided further, that notwithstanding section 2 of said chapter 118 or any
other general or special law to the contrary, the department of transitional
assistance shall render aid to pregnant women with no other eligible
dependent children only if the pregnancy has been medically verified and
who, if the child had been born and was living with that parent in the month
of payment, would be categorically and financially eligible for transitional aid
to families with dependent children benefits; provided further, that certain
families that suffer a reduction in benefits due to a loss of earned income
and participation in retrospective budgeting may receive a supplemental
benefit to compensate them for the loss; provided further, that the
department of transitional assistance shall, to the extent feasible within the
existing appropriation and any funding from other sources, review its
disability standards to determine the extent to which such standards reflect
the current medical and vocational criteria; provided further, that not less
than 75 days before any changes to the disability standards are publicly
proposed, the department of transitional assistance shall report to the house
and senate committees on ways and means and the joint committee on
children, families and persons with disabilities; provided further, that at the
time of application and on a semi-annual basis, the department of
transitional assistance shall provide oral and written notification to all
recipients of their child care benefits; provided further, that the notification
shall include the full range of child care options available, including center-
based child care, family-based child care and in-home, relative child care;
provided further, that the notification shall detail available child care benefits
for current and former recipients, including employment and training benefits
and transitional benefits; provided further, that the notice shall also advise
recipients of the availability of supplemental nutrition assistance program
95

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
benefits; provided further, that in promulgating, amending or rescinding its
regulations relative to eligibility for, or levels of, benefits under the program,
the department of transitional assistance shall take into account the
amounts available to it for expenditure from this item so as not to exceed
this appropriation; provided further, that not less than $986,640 shall be
expended for cash and transportation benefits for newly-employed
transitional aid to families with dependent children clients for a period not to
exceed 12 months to assist such clients with short-term self-sufficiency;
provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, the department of transitional assistance shall calculate benefits
provided under this item in the same manner as it calculated said benefits
in the previous fiscal year; provided further, that the department of
transitional assistance’s calculation of benefits shall not preclude the
department of transitional assistance from making eligibility or benefit
changes that lead to an increase in eligibility or benefits; provided further,
that not less than 75 days before adopting eligibility or benefit changes, the
department of transitional assistance shall submit a report on said changes
to the house and senate committees on ways and means, the joint
committee on children, families and persons with disabilities and the clerks
of the house of representatives and senate; provided further, that the report
shall include the text of, basis for and reasons for the proposed changes;
and provided further, that not later than January 1, 2027, the department of
transitional assistance shall submit a report to house and senate
committees on ways and means that shall include but not be limited to: (A)
the number of participants in the program, including available demographic
information; (B) the average benefit amount, including the methodology for
determining an individual's benefit amount; and (C) the number of
participants in the program who also receive benefits under items 7004-
0101, 7004-0108, 7004-9024 or 7004-9316 .......................................................$437,259,755
4403-2007 For a nutritional benefit program for low-income workers; provided, that
benefits shall be provided only to those for whom receiving these benefits
will improve the work participation rate under the federal Temporary
Assistance for Needy Families program ...............................................................$11,000,000
4403-2008 For participant support payments to pay for or reimburse supplemental
nutrition assistance program applicants and recipients for expenses that are
reasonably necessary and directly related to participation in the SNAP path
to work program ..........................................................................................................$352,972
4403-2119 For the provision of structured settings as provided under subsection (i) of
section 110 of chapter 5 of the acts of 1995 or any successor statute, for
parents under the age of 22 who are receiving benefits under the transitional
aid to families with dependent children program ...................................................$15,080,238
4405-2000 For the state supplement to the Supplemental Security Income program for
the aged and disabled, including a program for emergency needs for
Supplemental Security Income recipients; provided, that the expenses of
special grant recipients residing in rest homes, as provided under section
7A of chapter 118A of the General Laws, may be paid from this item;
provided further, that the department of transitional assistance, in
collaboration with the executive office of health and human services, may
fund an optional supplemental living arrangement category under the
Supplemental Security Income program that makes payments to persons
living in assisted living residences certified under chapter 19D of the General
Laws who meet the income and clinical eligibility criteria established by the
96

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
department and the executive office; provided further, that the optional
category of payments shall only be administered in conjunction with the
Medicaid group adult foster care benefit; and provided further, that
reimbursements to providers for services rendered in prior fiscal years may
be expended from this item .................................................................................$186,937,185
4408-1000 For a program of cash assistance to certain residents of the commonwealth,
entitled emergency aid to the elderly, disabled and children, who are found
by the department of transitional assistance to be eligible for the aid under
chapter 117A of the General Laws and regulations promulgated by the
department and subject to the limitations of appropriation for such purpose;
provided, that recipients shall not be subject to sponsor income-deeming or
related restrictions; provided further, that in implementing the program for
fiscal year 2027, the department shall include all eligibility categories
permitted in this item and the need standard and payment standard shall be
not less than the standard that was in effect in fiscal year 2026; provided
further, that any person experiencing homelessness, who: (i) has no
established place of abode, or lives in a temporary emergency shelter; and
(ii) is otherwise eligible under this item and said chapter 117A, shall receive
the same payment rate as recipients who incur shelter costs including, but
not limited to, rent or a mortgage; provided further, that the department shall
promulgate or revise any rules and regulations necessary to implement this
provision; provided further, that the department may provide benefits to
persons who are the age of 65 or older who have applied for benefits under
chapter 118A of the General Laws, to persons suffering from a medically
determinable impairment or combination of impairments that is expected to
last for a period determined by department regulations, which substantially
reduces or eliminates such individuals’ capacity to support themselves and
which has been verified by a competent authority, to certain persons caring
for a disabled person, to otherwise eligible participants in the vocational
rehabilitation program of MassAbility, to dependent children who are
ineligible for benefits under both chapter 118 of the General Laws and the
separate program under section 210 of chapter 43 of the acts of 1997 and
to parents or other caretakers of dependent children who are ineligible under
said chapter 118 and under said separate program; provided further, that no
person incarcerated in a correctional institution shall be eligible for benefits
under the program; provided further, that no funds shall be expended from
this item for the payment of expenses associated with any medical review
team, other disability screening process or costs associated with verifying
disability for this program; provided further, that the department shall adopt
emergency regulations under chapter 30A of the General Laws to
implement the changes to the program required by this item promptly and
within the appropriation; provided further, that in promulgating, amending or
rescinding its regulations with respect to eligibility or benefits, including the
payment standard, medical benefits and any other benefits under this
program, the department shall take into account the amount available to it
for expenditure by this item so as not to exceed the amount appropriated in
this item; provided further, that the department may promulgate emergency
regulations under said chapter 30A to implement these eligibility changes,
benefit changes or both; provided further, that nothing in this item shall be
construed to create any right accruing to recipients of the former general
relief program; provided further, that reimbursements collected from the
Social Security Administration on behalf of former clients of the emergency
aid to the elderly, disabled and children program or unprocessed payments
from the program that are returned to the department shall be credited to
the General Fund; provided further, that notwithstanding any general or
97

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
special law to the contrary, not less than 75 days prior to adopting any
eligibility or benefit changes, the commissioner of transitional assistance
shall submit to the house and senate committees on ways and means, the
joint committee on children, families and persons with disabilities and the
clerks of the senate and house of representatives a detailed and
comprehensive report setting forth the text of and the basis and reasons for
the proposed changes; provided further, that the report shall state exactly
which components of the current benefit package will be altered and the
department’s most accurate assessment of the effects of benefit or eligibility
changes upon recipient families; and provided further, that not later than
January 4, 2027, the department of transitional assistance shall submit a
report to house and senate committees on ways and means that shall
include but not be limited to: (A) the number of participants in the program,
including available demographic information; (B) the average benefit
amount, including the methodology for determining an individual's benefit
amount; and (C) the amount of those who receive benefits under this
program that also receive benefits from 7004-0101, 7004-0108, 7004-9024
and 7004-9316 ....................................................................................................$204,024,252
OFFICE OF HEALTH SERVICES.
Department of Public Health.
4510-0020 For the department of public health, which may expend not more than
$967,598 in retained revenues collected from fees charged by the food
protection program for costs of said program; provided, that notwithstanding
any general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating
timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
expenditures, the department may incur expenses and the comptroller may
certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or
the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting system
....................................................................................................................................$967,598
4510-0040 For the department of public health, which may expend not more than
$73,734 from fees assessed under chapter 111N of the General Laws for
the regulation of all pharmaceutical and medical device companies that
market their products in the commonwealth; provided, that notwithstanding
any general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating
timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
expenditures, the department may incur expenses and the comptroller may
certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or
the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting system
......................................................................................................................................$73,734
4510-0100 For the administration and operation of the department of public health,
including the personnel support of programmatic staff within the department,
including the health statistics program, the operation of the registry of vital
records and statistics and the cancer registry established under section
111B of chapter 111 of the General Laws; provided, that the department
shall give specific consideration to additional monies available under the
Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act of 2010, Public Law, 111-148
and the Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010, Public Law
111-152; and provided further, that not less than $650,000 shall be
expended to the city of Boston for contracted clinical support staff including,
98

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
but not limited to, three nurse practitioners, one psychiatrist, and two
addiction/mental health specialists ........................................................................$36,026,194
4510-0110 For community health center services; provided, that not less than
$500,000 shall be expended on a statewide program of technical assistance
to community health centers to be provided by a state primary care
association qualified under section 330A(f)(1) of the Public Health Service
Act, as codified at 42 U.S.C. section 254c(f)(1); provided further, that not
less than $150,000 shall be expended to Harbor Health Services Inc. to
support expanded access at the Plymouth Community Health Center;
provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to the
Public Health Institute of Western Massachusetts to support the 413Cares
centralized database of community services in western Massachusetts;
provided further, that not less than $200,000 shall be expended to Fenway
Health Center for the purpose of supporting a Medical Education and
Health Research Fellowship Program; provided further, that not less than
$250,000 shall be expended to NEW Health - Charlestown for the purpose
of operating and maintaining treatment of substance use disorder;
provided further, that not less than $400,000 shall be expended to the
North End Waterfront neighborhood health center; provided further, that
not less than $125,000 shall be expended to infrastructure and operational
upgrades related to expanding access to dental care and primary care
services at Geiger Gibson Community Health Center in the Dorchester
section of the city of Boston; provided further, that not less than $100,000
shall be expended to the continuation of a comprehensive substance
abuse and narcotic use reduction program at a federally qualified health
center located in South Boston; and provided further, that not less than
$4,000,000 shall be transferred from this item to the Affirming Health Care
Trust Fund established in section 2K of chapter 111 of the General Laws .........$11,443,222
4510-0112 For the department of public health to fund postpartum depression programs
at community health centers in the cities of Holyoke, Lynn, Worcester, Fall
River and Salem and the Jamaica Plain section of the city of Boston; provided,
that should a community health center decline funding, unexpended funds shall
be participating programs ..........................................................................................$860,000
4510-0600 For an environmental and community health hazards program, including
control of radiation and nuclear hazards, consumer products protection,
food and drugs, lead poisoning prevention under chapter 482 of the acts of
1993, lead-based paint inspections in day care facilities, inspection of
radiological facilities, licensing of x-ray technologists and the administration
of the bureau of climate and environmental health 111F of the General
Laws; provided, that the department may expend funds from this item to
monitor, survey and inspect nuclear power reactors, including those now
licensed by the Nuclear Regulatory Commission; and provided further, that
not less than $292,035 shall be expended for the Argeo Paul Cellucci
Amyotrophic Lateral Sclerosis Registry established under section 25A of
chapter 111 of the General Laws ..........................................................................$9,433,009
4510-0601 For the department of public health to fund implementation and ongoing
administration of the Parkinson's Disease Registry as established in
section 243 of chapter 111 of the General Laws, as amended by section
225 of chapter 238 of the acts of 2024............… ………….$100,000
4510-0615 For the department of public health, which may expend not more than
$2,300,888 from fees collected from licensing and inspecting users of
99

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
radioactive material within the commonwealth under licenses presently
issued by the Nuclear Regulatory Commission; provided, that the retained
revenues may be used for the costs of both programs, including the
compensation of employees; and provided further, that notwithstanding any
general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating
timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
expenditures, the department may incur expenses and the comptroller may
certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or
the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting system
.................................................................................................................................$2,300,888
4510-0616 For the department of public health, which may expend not more than
$1,525,556 for a drug registration and monitoring program from retained
revenues collected from fees charged to registered practitioners, including
physicians, dentists, veterinarians, podiatrists and optometrists, for
controlled substance registration; provided, that funds may be expended
from this item for the costs of personnel; and provided further, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose of
accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the department may incur expenses
and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the
lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported
in the state accounting system ................................................................................$1,525,556
4510-0710 For the operation of the bureau of health care safety and quality and the
office of patient protection; provided, that services funded through this item
shall include, but not be limited to, education, training, intervention, support,
surveillance and evaluation; provided further, that funds shall be expended
for the advancement of the prescription monitoring program and the
maintenance and enhancement of prescription drug monitoring information
exchange architecture to support interstate prescription drug monitoring
data sharing; provided further, that the bureau shall be responsible for
assuring quality of patient care provided by the commonwealth’s health care
facilities and services and for protecting the health and safety of patients
who receive care and services in nursing homes, rest homes, clinical
laboratories, clinics, institutions for individuals with intellectual or
developmental disabilities and the mentally ill, hospitals and infirmaries,
including the inspection of ambulance services; provided further, that
investigators shall conduct investigations of abuse, neglect, mistreatment
and misappropriation; provided further, that all investigators in the division of
health care quality responsible for the investigations shall receive training
by the Medicaid fraud control unit in the office of the attorney general;
provided further, that not less than $500,000 shall be expended for South
Shore Health to support its efforts to advance health equity and improve
access for underserved communities; and provided further, that funds shall
be expended for the full registration of practitioners, physician assistants
and registered nurses authorized by the board of registration in nursing to
practice in advanced practice nursing roles under section 7A of chapter 94C
of the General Laws ..............................................................................................$18,015,596
4510-0712 For the department of public health, which may expend not more than
$6,071,402 in retained revenues collected from the licensure of health
facilities and individuals applying for emergency medical technician
licensure and recertification for program costs of the bureau of health care
quality and improvement; provided, that notwithstanding any general or
special law to the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing
100

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
expenditures, the department may incur expenses and the comptroller may
certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or
the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting system
.................................................................................................................................$6,071,402
4510-0721 For the operation and administration of the boards of registration for health
professions licensure; provided, that funds shall be expended for the
operation and administration of the boards of registration in nursing,
pharmacy, dentistry, nursing home administrators, physician assistants,
naturopathy, perfusionists, genetic counselors, community health workers
and respiratory care .................................................................................................$4,140,620
4510-0723 For the operation and administration of the board of registration in
medicine and the committee on acupuncture .............................................................$190,234
4510-0724 For the board of registration in medicine, including the physician profiles
program; provided, that the board may expend revenues not to exceed
$300,503 from new revenues associated with increased license and
renewal fees ................................................................................................................$300,503
4510-0790 For regional emergency medical services; provided, that the regional
emergency medical services councils, designated under 105 C.M.R.
170.101, and the central medical emergency direction centers that were in
existence on January 1, 1992, shall remain the designated councils and
central medical emergency direction centers .............................................................$500,000
4510-0811 For grants to children’s advocacy centers, including those previously funded
through item 4800-0038 in prior fiscal years, and for services for child victims
of sexual abuse and assault; provided, that not less than the amount
allocated by the department of public health for each children’s advocacy
center in fiscal year 2026 shall be expended in fiscal year 2027 ...........................$5,500,000
4510-3010 For a grant to the Down Syndrome program at the Children’s Medical
Center at the University of Massachusetts medical center based on the
patient-centered medical home concept .....................................................................$150,000
4512-0103 For human immunodeficiency virus and acquired immune deficiency
syndrome, or HIV/AIDS, services, programs and related services for
persons affected by the associated conditions of viral hepatitis, sexually
transmitted infections, tuberculosis and other infections of public health
importance; provided, that funding shall be provided to proportionately serve
each of the demographic groups afflicted by HIV/AIDS and associated
conditions; provided further, that in compliance with the Patient Protection
and Affordable Care Act, Public Law 111-148, the department of public
health shall ensure that vendors delivering HIV/AIDS community testing and
screening shall seek third-party reimbursement for said services; provided
further, that the department shall ensure that at least the same level of
services will be made available as in the previous fiscal year; and provided
further, that no funds from this item shall be expended for disease research
in fiscal year 2027 ..................................................................................................$35,000,000
4512-0106 For the department of public health, which may expend not more than
$65,194,869 for the HIV Drug Assistance Program, or HDAP, from revenues
received from pharmaceutical manufacturers participating in the section
340B rebate program of the Public Health Service Act, as codified in 42
101

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
U.S.C. section 256b, administered by the Health Resources and Services
Administration and the Office of Pharmacy Affairs; provided, that such
services shall include activities that would be eligible for coverage through
the White Comprehensive AIDS Resources Emergency Act, Public Law 101-
381, with priority given to the human immunodeficiency virus and acquired
immune deficiency syndrome drug assistance program; provided further,
that any excess rebate revenue collected beyond the ceiling of this
appropriation shall be deposited in the General Fund; provided further, that
services in an amount equivalent to the amount deposited in the General
Fund shall be funded through item 4512-0103; and provided further, that the
department may make expenditures from the start of each fiscal year from
this item in anticipation of receipt of rebate revenues from pharmaceutical
manufacturers ........................................................................................................$65,194,869
4512-0200 For the bureau of substance addiction services, including a program to
reimburse driver alcohol education programs for services provided for court-
adjudicated, indigent clients; provided, that the department of public health
shall ensure that vendors providing methadone treatment shall seek third-
party reimbursement for such services; provided further, that in order to
support and strengthen public access to substance use disorder services,
funds shall be expended to maintain programming including, but not limited
to: (i) centralized intake capacity service under section 18 of chapter 17 of
the General Laws; (ii) the number and type of facilities that provide
treatment; and (iii) detoxification and clinical stabilization service beds in the
public system; provided further, that funds shall be expended to preserve
and expand the programs currently funded by the Massachusetts Access to
Recovery, or MA-ATR, program; provided further, that funds shall be
expended for opening 5 new recovery centers that are not currently funded
by the department; provided further, that in selecting such centers, the
department shall, to the maximum extent possible, ensure that no fewer
than 3 of said centers shall serve gateway municipalities as defined under
section 3A of chapter 23A of the General Laws; provided further, that funds
shall be expended for the extended release of naltrexone program under
section 158 of chapter 46 of the acts of 2015; provided further, that funds
shall be expended for a statewide program to improve training for the care
of newborns with neonatal abstinence syndrome at hospital-based facilities
that care for mothers and newborns, including the 10 level III neonatal
intensive care units; provided further, that under section 236 of chapter 111
of the General Laws, the department shall enhance data-sharing capabilities
and collaborate across agencies to ensure coordination of services for
newborns with neonatal abstinence syndrome; provided further, that funds
shall be expended to support municipalities utilizing grant funds from the
Massachusetts Opioid Abuse Prevention Collaborative (MOAPC) grant
program; provided further, that funds shall be expended for a voluntary
training and accreditation program for owners and operators of alcohol and
drug-free housing under section 18A of said chapter 17; provided further,
that funds shall be expended on MassAbility through an interagency service
agreement with the bureau to support workforce development; provided
further, that funds shall be expended for outpatient and mobile services for
deaf/hard of hearing, and deaf/hard of hearing/blind individuals with
substance use disorders; provided further, that funds shall be expended for
the bureau to address the addiction treatment workforce crisis through
outreach and recruitment efforts at local and regional educational
institutions and vocational-technical high schools; provided further, that not
less than $460,000 shall be expended to the Boston Public Health
Commission for an additional 30 Transitional Support Services (TSS) and
102

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
Clinical Stabilization Services (CSS) beds for up to 60 days to cover
shortages; provided further, that 20 of said beds shall be for women and 10
of said beds for men; provided further, that not less than $10,000,000 shall
be expended for expanding low-threshold housing, employing a “Housing
First” model, for homeless individuals with substance use and mental health
disorders at risk of HIV; provided further, that funds shall be expended for
substance use disorder step-down recovery services, known as level-B
beds and services, and other critical recovery services with severely
reduced capacity; provided further, that said funds shall be expended in the
AA object class; provided further, that funds shall be expended for jail
diversion programs primarily for nonviolent offenders with opioid or opiate
addiction to be procured by the department of public health; provided further,
that each jail diversion program shall have not fewer than 60 beds and shall
provide clinical assessment services to the respective courts, inpatient
treatment for not more than 90 days and ongoing case management
services for not more than 1 year; provided further, that individuals may be
diverted to this or other programs by a district attorney in conjunction with
the commissioner of probation if: (a) there is reason to believe that the
individual being diverted suffers from an addiction to opiates or another
substance use disorder; and (b) the diversion of the individual is clinically
appropriate and consistent with established clinical and public safety criteria;
provided further, that programs shall be established in separate counties in
locations deemed suitable by the department of public health; provided
further, that the department shall coordinate operations with the sheriffs, the
district attorneys, the commissioner of probation and the department of
correction; provided further, that funds shall be used to support the ongoing
treatment needs of clients after 90 days for which there is no other payer;
provided further that not less than $35,000 shall be expended to the city
of Lynn for the Lynn police department’s behavioral health unit; provided
further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to Community
Servings for the purposes of providing medically tailored meals to persons
battling chronic illnesses and workforce training programs to those
recovering from addiction; provided further, that not less than $25,000
shall be expended to the Merrimack Valley Prevention and Substance
Abuse Project, Inc., for resources, community outreach and programs in
the Merrimack Valley; provided further, that not less than $200,000 shall
be expended to the operation of The Dimock Center’s Behavioral Health
continuum of care to provide comprehensive treatment for individuals
suffering from substance use disorder and other behavioral health
challenges, address workforce challenges and reduce barriers to care;
provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to the
operation of the Gavin Foundation’s behavioral health continuum of
substance use care to provide comprehensive treatment for individuals
suffering from substance use disorder and other behavioral health
challenges; provided further, that not less than $200,000 shall be
expended to the Joseph Nee Collaborative Center for substance use
disorder programming; and provided further, that funds shall be expended
for family intervention and care management services programs, a young
adult treatment program and early intervention services for individuals who
are dependent on or addicted to alcohol, controlled substances or both
alcohol and controlled substances .....................................................................$184,705,689
Marijuana Regulation Fund ...................................86.31%
General Fund ........................................................13.69%
103

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
4512-0204 For the purchase, administration and training of first-responder and
bystander naloxone distribution programs; provided, that funds shall be
expended to maintain funding for first responder naloxone grants and
bystander distribution in communities with high incidence of overdose;
provided further, that the commissioner of public health may transfer funds
between this item and item 4512-0200 as necessary under an allocation
plan which shall detail the distribution of the funds to be transferred;
provided further, that not less than 30 days prior to any such transfer, the
commissioner shall submit the allocation plan to the house and senate
committees on ways and means; and provided further, that not later than
October 1, 2026, the department of public health shall submit a report to the
house and senate committees on ways and means on the: (i) communities
included in the program expansion; (ii) number of participants for each
community; and (iii) amount of naloxone purchased and distributed,
delineated by community .........................................................................................$1,298,718
4512-0205 For grants and contracts with substance use programs to provide
comprehensive prevention, intervention and recovery services; provided,
that not less than $300,000 shall be expended to for Office-Based
Addiction/Opioid Treatment, a program of the Greater New Bedford
Community Health Center; provided further, that not less than $175,000
shall be expended to Self Esteem Boston for direct service and provider
training programs; provided further, that not less than $200,000 shall be
expended to One Life at a Time, Inc., located in the city known as the town
of Braintree, for the facilitation of access to sober living programs and job
training services for people in recovery and associated operational costs;
provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the city
known as the town of Braintree for the Braintree Community Partnership
on Substance Use; provided further, that not less than $250,000 shall be
expended to Harbor Health Services, Inc. for a grant program to prevent
and treat addiction to opioid and related substances; provided further, that
not less than $2,000,000 shall be expended to RIZE Massachusetts
Foundation, Inc. to assist in their work to end the opioid epidemic in the
commonwealth; provided further, that not less than $75,000 shall be
expended to the purposes of the operation of Resources for Recovery Inc.
located in the Hyde Park section of the city of Boston; and provided further,
that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to continued capital
improvements to the Cambridge Community Center and for the expansion
of their community-based behavioral health program ..........................................$3,150,000
4512-0206 For the department of public health to coordinate a comprehensive
statewide strategy, in partnership with municipalities, public health harm
reduction organizations and other stakeholders, to promote existing
commonwealth harm reduction efforts, to foster a culture of harm reduction
and to promote community-based harm reduction services as
recommended by the harm reduction commission established under section
100 of chapter 208 of the acts of 2018 and to prioritize the health, safety and
dignity of individuals who use substances as recommended by the
commission on methamphetamine and other stimulant use in the
commonwealth established by section 131 of chapter 24 of the acts of 2021
.................................................................................................................................$6,478,000
4512-0225 For the department of public health, which may expend not more than
$500,000 for a compulsive gamblers’ treatment program from unclaimed
prize money held in the State Lottery and Gaming Fund established in
section 35 of chapter 10 of the General Laws, for more than 1 year from the
104

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
date of the drawing when the unclaimed prize money was won and from the
proceeds of a multi-jurisdictional lottery game under subsection (e) of
section 24A of said chapter 10; provided, that the comptroller shall transfer
the amount to the General Fund; and provided further, that notwithstanding
any general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating
timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
expenditures, the department may incur expenses and the comptroller may
certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or
the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting system
....................................................................................................................................$500,000
4512-2022 For grants to local and regional boards of health; provided, that funds shall
be expended to support the state action for public health excellence
program established in section 27D of chapter 111 of the General Laws;
provided further, that the department of public health shall prioritize a
geographically equitable distribution; provided further, that funds shall be
expended for a statewide data collection and reporting system,
implementation of intermunicipal shared service agreements and capacity
building for local and regional boards of health; provided further, that not
less than $50,000 shall be expended to the town of Plymouth’s office of
health and human services for the planning and implementation of an
equity survey, and to develop and implement trainings; and provided
further, that not later than February 3, 2027, the department shall report to
the house and senate committees on ways and means detailing the: (i)
recipients, their locations and amount per recipient; and (ii) dates that
funds were released to said recipients .................................................................$12,050,000
4513-0999 For a public information campaign to educate and promote awareness to
pharmacies and the public about individual’s eligibility to receive a 12-month
prescription for contraceptives in the commonwealth; provided, that
information shall include availability of a 12-month supply of contraceptives;
and provided further, that the commissioner of public health shall partner
with insurers, pharmacies, relevant advocacy organizations and employers
to ensure the campaign reaches pharmacists, clinicians and individuals
eligible to receive a 12-month prescription for contraceptives in the
commonwealth ...........................................................................................................$500,000
4513-1001 For grants to support improvements in reproductive health access,
infrastructure and security, including grants to: (i) Tides for Reproductive
Freedom, Incorporated; (ii) Abortion Rights Fund of Western
Massachusetts, Incorporated; and (iii) Eastern Massachusetts Abortion
Fund, Incorporated; provided, that not later than March 2, 2027, the
department of public health shall submit a report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means detailing: (a) the grant distribution
methodology; (b) a list of grant applicants; and (c) a list of successful grants
applicants, including the amounts awarded and the projects being
supported by the grants ...........................................................................................$2,460,200
4513-1002 For women, infants and children, or WIC, nutrition services in addition to
funds received under the federal nutrition program; provided, that funds from
this item shall supplement federal funds to enable federally-eligible women,
infants and children to be served through the WIC program .................................$15,500,388
4513-1005 For the provision of family and adolescent health services, including, but not
limited to, comprehensive sexual and reproductive health services, the birth
defects monitoring program and adolescent sexuality education; provided,
105

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
that not less than $14,749,060 shall be expended for family health services;
provided further, that not less than $7,831,000 of said funds shall be
expended for comprehensive family planning services, including HIV
counseling and testing, community-based health education and outreach
services provided by agencies certified as comprehensive family planning
agencies; provided further, that not less than $6,700,000 shall be expended
for enhancing comprehensive family planning services currently funded or
previously funded by Title X Family Planning funding due to federal
restrictions; provided further, that funds may be expended for the program’s
critical congenital heart defects screening activities; provided further, that
funds may be expended for the birth defects monitoring program; provided
further, that not less than $3,250,940 shall be expended for teenage
pregnancy prevention services; provided further, that applications for
pregnancy prevention funds shall be administered through the department
of public health upon receipt and approval of coordinated community service
plans to be evaluated under the guidelines issued by the department;
provided further, that portions of the grants may be used for state agency
purchases of designated services identified by the community service plans;
provided further, that funding shall be expended on those communities with
the highest teen birth rates according to an annual statistical estimate
conducted by the department; provided further, that funds shall be
expended on programming directed at children under the care of the
department of children and families who are at high risk for teenage
pregnancy; provided further, that the department shall collaborate with the
department of children and families on said programming; and provided
further, that not less than $1,700,000 shall be expended to Action for
Boston Community Development, Inc. to continue services previously
funded by Title X funding ......................................................................................$25,036,673
4513-1012 For the department of public health, which may expend not more than
$29,200,000 from retained revenues received from federal cost-
containment initiatives, including, but not limited to, infant formula rebates;
provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for
the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of
retained revenues and related expenditures, the department may incur
expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to
exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate
as reported in the state accounting system ...........................................................$29,200,000
4513-1020 For the early intervention program; provided, that the department of public
health shall submit quarterly reports to the house and senate committees on
ways and means on the total number of units of service purchased and the
total expenditures for the units of service paid by the department, the
executive office of health and human services and third-party payers for
early intervention services for the following service categories: (i) home visit;
(ii) center-based individual; (iii) child-focused group; (iv) parent-focused
group; and (v) screening and assessment; provided further, that the
department shall make all reasonable efforts to secure third-party and
Medicaid reimbursements for the services funded in this item; provided
further, that funds from this item shall be expended to provide respite
services to families of children enrolled in early intervention programs who
have complex care requirements, multiple disabilities and extensive medical
and health needs; provided further, that priority shall be given to low-income
and moderate-income families; provided further, that not later than February
2, 2027, the department shall submit a report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means on the number of families served by the
106

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
program and the amount of funds appropriated in this item granted to
qualified families; provided further, that no claim for reimbursement made
on behalf of an uninsured person shall be paid from this item until the
program receives notice of a denial of eligibility for the MassHealth program
from the executive office of health and human services; provided further,
that MassHealth shall cover the costs incurred for the transportation of
MassHealth members who participate in the early intervention program;
provided further, that nothing in this item shall give rise to, or shall be
construed as giving rise to, enforceable legal rights to any such services or
an enforceable entitlement to the early intervention services funded in this
item; provided further, that not less than 180 days prior to any change to
current eligibility criteria, the department shall provide written notification to
the house and senate committees on ways and means; provided further,
that no eligibility changes shall be made before April 1, 2027; provided
further, that funds in this item may be used to pay for current and prior year
claims; and provided further, that the department shall provide services to
eligible children through 1 service delivery model and shall not determine
eligibility for services based on family insurance status; ....................................$38,269,649
4513-1026 For the provision of statewide and community-based suicide prevention,
intervention, post-intervention and surveillance activities and the
implementation of a statewide suicide prevention plan; provided, that funds
shall be expended for a program to address elder suicide behavior and
attempts with the geriatric mental health services program within the
executive office of aging and independence; provided further, that not less
than $30,000 shall be expended to Sharing Kindness, Inc. to support
implementation of the Hope Squad peer-to-peer suicide prevention
program in schools; and provided further, that funds shall be expended for
a veterans-in-crisis hotline to be used by veterans or concerned family
members seeking counseling programs operated by the executive office of
veterans’ services so that they may be directed towards the programs and
services offered by their local or regional veterans’ services office to be
staffed by counselors or outreach program personnel contracted by the
department and trained in issues of mental health counseling and
veterans’ services ..................................................................................................$14,423,198
4513-1027 For The Samaritans, Inc.; provided, that funds shall be used for suicide
prevention services .................................................................................................$1,000,000
4513-1098 For the provision of statewide support services for survivors of homicide
victims, including outreach services, burial assistance, grief counseling and
other support services; provided, that funds shall be expended as grants in
the aggregate amount of not less than $200,000 to the Louis D. Brown
Peace Institute Corporation, a community-based support organization
dedicated to serving families and communities impacted by violence;
provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to
Survivors Say, Inc. for direct support services to survivors and victims of
both high-profile tragedies and other traumas and crimes; provided further,
that not less than $10,000 shall be expended to the Darrell Lee Jenkins
Jr. Resource Center, Inc. in the city of Springfield; and provided further,
that the Louis D. Brown Peace Institute Corporation shall establish and
administer a process to distribute not less than $100,000 to the
Massachusetts Survivors of Homicide Victims Network organizations
throughout the commonwealth in the form of grants .................................................$610,000
107

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
4513-1112 For the prevention and management of chronic diseases and their
associated risk factors, including, but not limited to, the Massachusetts
Tobacco Cessation and Prevention Program and oral health services and
programs; provided, that funds shall be provided for dental health services;
provided further, that funds shall be expended for the comprehensive dental
program for adults with developmental disabilities; provided further, that
$3,368,962 shall be expended for the promotion of health and disease
prevention including, but not limited to: (i) breast cancer prevention; (ii)
diabetes screening and outreach; (iii) ovarian cancer screening; (iv)
hepatitis C prevention and management; (v) multiple sclerosis screening,
information, education and treatment programs and the Multiple Sclerosis
Home Living Independently Navigating Key Services program administered
by the Greater New England Chapter of the National Multiple Sclerosis
Society; (vi) colorectal cancer prevention; (vii) prostate cancer screening,
education and treatment with a particular focus on individuals with African-
American, Hispanic or Latino heritage, family history of the disease and
other individuals at high risk; (viii) osteoporosis education; and (ix)
maintenance of the statewide lupus database; provided further, that funding
shall be expended for Mass in Motion community grants in an amount not
less than the amount expended in fiscal year 2026, contingent upon receipt
of matching federal prevention block grant funds; provided further, that not
less than $250,000 shall be expended for a grant to a statewide Alzheimer’s
disease advocacy and education organization for a public awareness and
education campaign as recommended by the federal Centers for Disease
Control and Prevention; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be
expended for education and support of patients diagnosed with
phenylketonuria or related disorders and their families through a grant to the
New England Connection for PKU and Allied Disorders, Inc.; provided
further, that not less than $6,752,977 shall be expended for smoking
prevention and cessation programs, including youth tobacco use
prevention and cessation programs at the Massachusetts Tobacco
Cessation and Prevention Program; provided further, that not less than
$475,000 shall be expended to the Forsyth Institute’s Center for Children’s
Oral Health to expand its Forsyth Kids programming focused on children
and adolescents and to explore the emerging association between oral
health status and academic performance; provided further, that not less
than $100,000 shall be expended to the operation of the Cranberry Health
Research Center at the University of Massachusetts at Dartmouth;
provided further, that not less than $150,000 shall be expended to
Amyotrophic Lateral Sclerosis Association, Massachusetts Chapter, Inc.
to provide care services for individuals suffering with amyotrophic lateral
sclerosis; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended
to the purposes of the operation of VITfriends LLC located in the Hyde
Park section of the city of Boston; provided further, that not less than
$25,000 shall be expended to the town of Winthrop for a resource
navigation and coordinator position in the Winthrop department of public
health and clinical services; provided further, that not less than $250,000
shall be expended to the Duchenne Program at the University of
Massachusetts medical school to advance clinical care, research and
innovation for patients with complex disorders affecting the human
nervous system; and provided further, that funds shall be expended for
smoking prevention and cessation programs, including youth tobacco use
prevention and cessation programs…….. $13,220,532
4513-1136 For sexual assault and domestic violence services; provided, that not less
than $7,900,449 shall be expended for a statewide sexual assault nurse
108

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
examiner program and pediatric sexual assault nurse examiner program for
the care of victims of sexual assault; provided further, that the program shall
operate under specific statewide protocols and by an on-call system of nurse
examiners; provided further, that not less than $2,500,000 shall be
expended for children’s advocacy centers, including those previously
funded through item 4800-0038 in prior fiscal years, and for services for child
victims of sexual abuse and assault; provided further, that the department
shall allocate available funding, above the amounts required to maintain not
less than the prior year funding levels for each center, among the 12
accredited centers in a manner to promote equity in the services available
to child victims of sexual abuse, assault and trafficking across the
commonwealth; provided further, that not less than $950,000 shall be
expended for the support of the statewide delivery system of children’s
advocacy centers with funding administered by the Massachusetts
Children’s Alliance, Inc.; provided further, that not later than January 29,
2027, the department shall submit a report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means that shall include, but not be limited to: (i)
the grants awarded to each center; (ii) the number of individuals served by
each center receiving funding; and (iii) recommendations on how to improve
the availability and delivery of services through these centers; provided
further, that not less than $56,084,884 shall be expended for domestic
violence and sexual assault prevention and survivor services including, but
not limited to: (i) intimate partner abuse education, formerly known as the
batterers intervention services; (ii) services for immigrants and refugees; (iii)
rape crisis center survivor services and prevention information; and (iv)
intervention services and crisis housing for sexual violence and intimate
partner violence in the lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, queer and
questioning communities; provided further, that funds shall be expended for
rape prevention and victim services, including the statewide Spanish
language hotline, community-based domestic violence response,
emergency and transitional residential services for sexual assault and
domestic violence victims and their children and supervised visitation and
trauma services for children who witness violence and targeted services for
department of children and families-involved families; provided further, that
the department of public health shall ensure that there shall not be a
disruption in survivor services and violence prevention activities or a negative
impact on program functioning during fiscal year 2027; provided further, that
not less than $1,000,000 shall be expended for a domestic violence and
sexual assault prevention program focused on teens in high-risk
communities; provided further, that said programming shall be aimed at
promoting healthy relationships and addressing teen dating violence for
teens of all sexualities and genders; provided further, that the department
shall partner with domestic violence and sexual assault service providers
and other community-based organizations or school-based organizations to
develop evidence-based and outcomes-focused prevention strategies;
provided further, that the program shall prioritize funding for schools and
communities in which the majority of students are eligible for free or reduced
lunch; provided further, that at least 1 program shall operate in a municipality
with a population of 25,000 or less; provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended to the Center for Women and Community at
the University of Massachusetts at Amherst to support community
services; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended
to the Cape Verdean Association, Inc. for domestic violence outreach in
the city of Brockton; and provided further, that said funds may be expended
for a competitive grant program ............................................................................$83,982,342
109

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
4513-2020 For funding to increase behavioral health outreach, access and support;
provided, that the department of public health, in consultation with the
department of mental health and the department of elementary and
secondary education, shall expend not less than $3,532,000 for a program
to increase student access to behavioral telehealth services in schools;
provided further, that not later than June 30, 2027, the department of public
health shall report to the joint committee on mental health, substance use
and recovery and the house and senate committees on ways and means
detailing the: (i) number of students participating in the program; (ii)
frequency with which students use the program; (iii) cost of the services
provided, including the use of support staff; and (iv) manner in which costs
have been supported by third-party reimbursement; provided further, that
the department of higher education, in consultation with the department of
mental health, shall expend not less than $500,000 for a mental health
workforce pipeline program to encourage a culturally, ethnically and
linguistically diverse behavioral health workforce through collaboration
between colleges and behavioral health providers; provided further, that not
later than April 1, 2027, the department of higher education shall report to
the clerks of the house of representatives and the senate, the joint
committee on higher education, the joint committee on mental health,
substance use and recovery and the house and senate committees on ways
and means detailing: (a) description of the partners in the pilot program; (b)
a demographic and geographic profile of the students served in the
program; (c) a summary of post-program employment or continuing
education of participating students; and (d) any budgetary
recommendations on ways to further expand the pilot program; provided
further, that not less than $2,500,000 shall be expended to address
emergency department mental and behavioral health boarding through
staffing investments and rate incentives associated with fully
operationalizing inpatient mental health acute care beds and intensive
inpatient psychiatric beds, intensive community-based acute treatment,
community-based acute treatment and partial hospitalization capacity;
provided further, that said grants may be utilized to maintain rate incentives
for beds made operational in calendar year 2023; provided further, that
priority shall be given to grants that support services and staff needs for
children and adolescents; provided further, that staffing investments shall
include sufficient funding for culturally and linguistically competent
workforce recruitment, retention and training including, but not limited to,
loan repayment programs and hiring and retention incentives to support the
full spectrum of hospital-based behavioral health providers including, but not
limited to, psychiatrists, mental health workers, social workers, registered
nurses, certified nursing assistants and sitters; provided further, that priority
shall be given to grants that support new beds that would be located in
underserved areas of the commonwealth; provided further, that not less
than $50,000 shall be expended to the Greater Lowell Community
Foundation, Inc. to fund local non-profit organizations and social services
agencies in the 16th Middlesex district; and provided further, that funds may
be expended for investments in crisis stabilization services for patients who
are boarding, including, but not limited to, de-escalation training for clinical
and ancillary staff ..................................................................................................$11,474,681
4516-0263 For the department of public health, which may expend not more than
$1,296,253 in retained revenues from blood lead testing fees collected from
insurers and individuals for the purpose of conducting such tests; provided,
that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the
purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of
110

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
retained revenues and related expenditures, the department may incur
expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to
exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate
as reported in the state accounting system .............................................................$1,296,253
4516-1000 For the operation of the bureau of infectious disease and laboratory
sciences, including infectious disease surveillance and the state public
health laboratory; provided, that funds shall be expended for an eastern
equine encephalitis testing program and for tuberculosis testing and
treatment services; provided further, that the department of public health
shall ensure that vendors delivering tuberculosis clinical services and
treatment shall seek third-party reimbursement for such services; provided
further, that no funds appropriated in this item shall be expended for
administrative, space or energy expenses of the department that are not
directly related to personnel or programs funded in this item; provided
further, that not less than $2,657,020 funds shall be expended for the
operation of the universal immunization program; provided further, that all
costs related to childhood vaccines shall be paid for through the Vaccine
Purchase Trust Fund established in section 24N of chapter 111 of the
General Laws; and provided further, that not later than September 16, 2026,
the department shall submit a report to the joint committee on public health
and the house and senate committees on ways and means detailing: (i) the
current departmental recommendations for the commonwealth's vaccine
distribution plan, including the role of local boards of health; (ii) the current
state of implementing the plan; (iii) any anticipated state investments
necessary to carry out the plan; and (iv) the department's plan to improve
vaccine distribution coordination efforts with local boards of health .....................$28,903,456
4516-1005 For the department of public health, which may expend not more than
$1,097,108 generated by fees collected from providers or insurers for
sexually-transmitted infections testing performed at the state public health
laboratory; provided, that collected retained revenues may be used to
supplement the costs of the laboratory; and provided further, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose of
accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the department may incur expenses
and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the
lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported
in the state accounting system ................................................................................$1,097,108
4516-1010 For state matching funds required by the federal Pandemic and All-
Hazards Preparedness Act, Public Law 109-417 ....................................................$1,518,847
4516-1022 For the department of public health, which may expend not more than
$364,592 generated by fees collected from insurers and providers for
tuberculosis tests performed at the state public health laboratory; provided,
that collected retained revenues may be used to supplement the costs of the
laboratory; and provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special
law to the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies
between the receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures, the
department may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment
amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent
revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting system ...................................$364,592
4516-1037 For the department of public health, which may expend for the
implementation of chapter 111O of the General Laws and rules and
111

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
regulations promulgated thereunder not more than $49,569 in retained
revenues collected from application fees for approval of mobile integrated
health care programs and renewals thereof and from fines and penalties
imposed by the department on mobile integrated health care programs;
provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for
the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of
retained revenues and related expenditures, the department may incur
expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to
exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate
as reported in the state accounting system ..................................................................$49,569
4516-1039 For the department of public health, which may expend not more than
$500,424 in retained revenues collected from application fees under section
25C of chapter 111 of the General Laws to support the operations of the
determination of need program and health care facility plan review within the
department; provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between
the receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures, the department
may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts
not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue
estimate as reported in the state accounting system .................................................$500,424
4518-0200 For the department of public health, which may expend not more than
$2,411,409 generated by fees collected from services provided at the
registry of vital records and statistics, including: (i) amendments of vital
records and requests for vital records not issued in person at the registry; (ii)
requests for heirloom certificates; and (iii) research requests performed by
registry staff at the registry; provided, that collected retained revenues may
be used for all program costs, including the compensation of employees;
provided further, that the registrar of vital records and statistics shall exempt
from payment of a fee any person requesting a verification of birth to
establish eligibility for Medicaid; and provided further, that notwithstanding
any general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating
timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
expenditures, the department may incur expenses and the comptroller may
certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or
the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting system
.................................................................................................................................$2,411,409
4590-0250 For school health services and school-based health centers in public and
nonpublic schools; provided, that not less than $3,000,000 shall be
expended for mental health services in public and nonpublic schools;
provided further, that funds shall be distributed to public and nonpublic
schools based on the percentage of students in the commonwealth enrolled
in each; provided further, that services shall include, but not be limited to: (i)
strengthening the infrastructure of school health services in the areas of
personnel and policy development, programming and interdisciplinary
collaboration; (ii) developing linkages between school health services
programs and community health providers; (iii) incorporating health
education programs, including tobacco prevention and cessation activities,
in school curricula and in the provision of school-based health services; and
(iv) incorporating obesity prevention programs, including nutrition and
wellness programs, in school curricula, to address the nutrition and lifestyle
habits needed for healthy development; provided further, that funds shall be
expended for school nurses and school-based health center programs;
provided further, that funds may be expended for mental health services in
112

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
public and nonpublic schools; provided further, that not less than $25,000
shall be expended to the North Quabbin Community Coalition, Inc.;
provided further, that not less than $75,000 shall be expended to assist in
programming efforts for the Southcoast LGBTQ Network, Inc. in the city of
New Bedford; and provided further, that funds may be expended to address
the recommendations of the commission on lesbian, gay, bisexual,
transgender, queer and questioning youth established in section 67 of
chapter 3 of the General Laws for the reduction of health disparities for gay,
lesbian, bisexual, transgender, queer and questioning youth ..............................$22,075,011
4590-0912 For the department of public health, which may expend not more than
$35,164,866 from reimbursements collected for Western Massachusetts
hospital services, subject to the approval of the commissioner of public
health; provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, the Western Massachusetts hospital shall be eligible to receive
and retain full payment under the medical assistance program administered
by the executive office of health and human services under chapter 118E of
the General Laws for all goods and services provided by the hospital under
federal requirements; and provided further, that notwithstanding any general
or special law to the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing
discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
expenditures, the department may incur expenses and the comptroller may
certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or
the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting system
...............................................................................................................................$35,164,866
4590-0913 For the department of public health, which may expend not more than
$1,578,230 for payments received for those services provided by the
Lemuel Shattuck hospital to incarcerated persons from county correctional
facilities; provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between
the receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures, the department
may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts
not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue
estimate as reported in the state accounting system ..............................................$1,578,230
4590-0915 For the maintenance and operation of Tewksbury hospital, Pappas
Rehabilitation Hospital for Children, Lemuel Shattuck hospital and the
hospital bureau, including the state office of pharmacy services; provided,
that reimbursements received for medical services provided at the Lemuel
Shattuck hospital to incarcerated persons from houses of correction not
managed by private health care vendors shall be credited to item 4590-0903
of section 2B provided further, that Tewksbury hospital shall maintain in
fiscal year 2027 no less than the number of beds maintained in in fiscal
year 2026; provided further, that not less than $75,000 shall be expended
to municipalities hosting a department of public health facility that also acts
as a department of mental health continuing care facility; provided further,
that said funds shall not be expended to a municipality if the department
of public health facility also operates as a department of correction facility;
and provided further, that the department shall seek to obtain federal
financial participation for care provided to incarcerated persons of the
department of correction and county correctional facilities who are treated
at the public health hospitals ...............................................................................$251,363,736
4590-0917 For the department of public health, which may expend not more than
$5,283,806 from payments received from the vendor managing health
113

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
services for state correctional facilities for medical services for incarcerated
persons provided by the Lemuel Shattuck hospital; provided, that the
payments may include capitation payments, fee-for-service payments,
advance payments and other compensation arrangements established by
contracts between the vendor and the hospital; and provided further, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose of
accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the department may incur expenses
and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower
of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the
state accounting system ..........................................................................................$5,283,806
4590-0918 For the state office of pharmacy services, which may expend not more than
$43,065,614 from retained revenues collected from vendors providing
health care services to the department of correction; provided, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose
of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the department of public health may
incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to
exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate
as reported in the state accounting system ...........................................................$43,065,614
4590-0924 For the department of public health, which may expend not more than
$2,311,959 from reimbursements collected by Tewksbury hospital based on
a revenue enhancement project to obtain Medicaid coverage for patients
whose services are not currently being reimbursed; provided, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose of
accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the department may incur expenses
and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the
lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in
the state accounting system ....................................................................................$2,311,959
4590-0925 For the costs of a prostate cancer awareness, education and research
program focusing on men with African-American, Hispanic or Latino
heritage, family history of the disease and other men at high risk; provided,
that the department of public health shall oversee and manage said program
and shall grant not less than 85 per cent of funds from this item to the
AdMeTech Foundation-led Prostate Cancer Action Council, which shall
leverage existing partnerships with other state-funded nonprofit research
organizations and current and past federally-funded, state-funded and
privately-funded prostate cancer programs aimed at saving lives,
improving quality of life and reducing health care costs ..........................................$1,250,000
4590-0930 For price reductions for municipalities purchasing naloxone through the
municipal naloxone bulk purchase program; provided, that when sourcing
intranasal naloxone products, the department of public health shall apply
evaluation criteria intended to expand access to lifesaving naloxone,
strengthen supply reliability for statewide distribution and reduce product
expiration waste, and shall give preference to drug manufacturers that
meet the following criteria: at least 2 continuous years of experience
manufacturing and assembling intranasal naloxone products in the United
States; demonstrated capacity to ship intranasal naloxone products to
dispersed sites across the state; a consistent history of maintaining
publicly accessible financial, governance and operational information, with
independent verification as required under applicable federal and state
114

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
laws or regulations; an established operational presence in the state;
demonstrated ability to provide distribution data insights and educational
and training materials; and ability to provide the maximum available shelf
life from date of manufacturing ...............................................................................$1,501,157
4590-1503 For the provision of statewide support services for maternal, child and family
health activities to pregnant people, parents, caregivers, infants, children
and youth, including those with special health needs to maintain the public
health infrastructure necessary for promoting racially equitable, evidence-
based, data-informed and family-engaged services and programs; provided,
that not less than $296,297 shall be expended for the universal newborn
hearing screening program; provided further, that funds appropriated in this
item shall be expended for the notification of and follow through with affected
families, primary care providers and early intervention programs upon the
department of public health's receipt of data indicative of potential hearing
disorders in newborns; provided further, that not less than $9,940,000 shall
be expended for the pediatric palliative care program established in section
24K of chapter 111 of the General Laws; provided further, that
notwithstanding said section 24K of said chapter 111, children less than 22
years of age shall be eligible for this program; provided further, that not less
than $75,000 shall be expended to Seven Sisters Midwifery LLC; provided
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to Worcester
Community Midwifery to provide midwifery care and birth center services
to families across the state; provided further, that not less than $200,000
shall be expended to the development and implementation of a pilot
program for MassHealth to partner with a mobile pregnancy application to
promote awareness of the commonwealth’s maternal and infant health
programs to prenatal, pregnant and postpartum individuals who are
enrolled in Medicaid or are eligible for Medicaid; provided further, that such
application shall have the capability to deliver education, resources and
support to prenatal, pregnant and postpartum individuals and their
families, including, but not limited to, information specific to the
commonwealth, links to programs administered by the department and
other state agencies and culturally and linguistically appropriate content;
provided further, that not later than January 30, 2028, the department shall
evaluate the effectiveness of the pilot program and report on utilization,
outcomes and recommendations for expansion; and provided further, that
funds shall be expended for universal newborn hearing screening and
perinatal-neonatal quality improvement ................................................................$14,885,830
4590-1504 For a neighborhood-based gun and violent crime prevention pilot program
for targeted work with out-of-school youth and young adults aged 17 to 24,
inclusive, intended to prevent gun violence and other violent crime in
neighborhoods and municipalities with the highest rates of violent crime in
the commonwealth; provided, that funds shall be awarded in consultation
with the executive office of public safety and security and the department of
elementary and secondary education; provided further, that funds shall be
awarded to nonprofit, community-based organizations located in and
serving high risk youth in eligible communities; provided further, that
preference shall be given to organizations that have: (i) demonstrated street
outreach capacity; (ii) effective partnerships with neighborhood health and
human services agencies, including mental health providers, and with
schools and other local educational institutions; and (iii) clearly outlined a
comprehensive plan in support of continued or expanded collaboration
efforts with such partners, including data related to measurable outcomes
of successful partner collaboration; provided further, that eligible expenses
115

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
for such grants shall include, but not be limited to, case workers, mental
health counselors, academic supports and other research-based practices
and related support services; provided further, that the department shall
ensure that every grant recipient establishes measurable outcomes in its
comprehensive plan and provides data related to those outcomes that
demonstrate program success; provided further, that preference shall be
given to proposals that demonstrate coordination with programs and
services funded through items 4000-0005, 7061-0010 and 7061-9612;
provided further, that the department shall allocate funding to support
training and technical assistance for all grantees; provided further, that not
later than March 2, 2027, the department shall submit a report to the
executive office for administration and finance, the joint committee on public
health, the joint committee on public safety and homeland security, the joint
committee on education and the house and senate committees on ways and
means detailing the awarding of grants and details of anticipated contracts
by district; provided further, that the department shall further report on the
effectiveness of the program including, but not limited to: (a) any measurable
data-driven results; (b) which strategies and collaborations have most
effectively reduced gun and other violence in the grantee neighborhoods;
(c) how spending through this item has been aligned with spending from
items 4000-0005, 7061-0010 and 7061-9612 in ways that enhance public
safety while avoiding programmatic duplication; and (d) what efforts have
been taken by the nonprofit community and municipalities to ensure the long-
term viability of the reforms funded by the pilot program; provided further,
that not less than $200,000 shall be expended to the Nubian Square
Safety Initiative; and provided further, that copies of the report shall be
provided to: (1) the joint committee on public safety and homeland
security; (2) the joint committee on public health; (3) the joint committee on
education; and (4) the house and senate committees on ways and means
not later than September 2, 2027 ..........................................................................$11,307,331
4590-1506 For a competitive grant program to be administered by the department of
public health to support the establishment of a comprehensive youth
violence prevention program; provided, that eligibility shall be determined by
the criteria set forth in item 4590-1506 of section 2 of chapter 182 of the acts
of 2008; provided further, that no grants shall be awarded to law
enforcement agencies; and provided further, that funds shall be
considered one-time and grants shall not annualize in fiscal year 2027 .................$4,001,578
4590-1507 For competitively procured grants to youth at-risk programs utilizing an
evidence-based positive youth development model, including programs that
serve lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, queer and questioning youth;
provided , that not less than $75,000 shall be expended to the Mildred C.
Hailey youth center for staffing and operations, resources and events that
support the residents of the Mildred C. Hailey development; provided
further, that not less than $250,000 shall be expended to the Big Brother
Big Sisters of Eastern Massachusetts; provided further, that not less than
$2,000,000 shall be expended to the Massachusetts Alliance of Boys &
Girls Clubs, Inc.; provided further, that not less than $1,500,000 shall be
expended to the Alliance of Massachusetts YMCAs, Inc., which shall be
distributed between the alliance’s member organizations to support
educational programming for youth; provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended to the Moving Mountains; provided further, that
not less than $25,000 shall be expended to Awake Youth Violence
Prevention; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended
to The Black Springfield Covid-19 Coalition; provided further, that not less
116

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
than $100,000 shall be expended to College Bound Dorchester, Inc. for
the administration of Uncornered and other services for at-risk youth;
provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to LTS
Grow with Success Academy to support professional development in the
cosmetology field and to provide job training for low-income residents in
the Merrimack Valley; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to Change the Play to support professional development and
mentorship efforts for at-risk youth in the Merrimack Valley; provided
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to Day Dreaming
Organization Inc to support baseball programming and youth mentoring in
the city of Lawrence; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be
expended to Sueños Basketball, Inc. to support the recreational, social
and health benefits the league provides to low-income youth in the city of
Lawrence; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended
to Methuen Youth Basketball Association, Inc. to enhance youth
mentorship initiatives, develop robust sports programming and strengthen
violence prevention efforts aimed at promoting teamwork, personal
development and community engagement among Methuen youth, and
programming shall prioritize underserved youth and promote life skills that
support academic success and leadership; provided further, that not less
than $25,000 shall be expended to Hoop and Handles in the city of
Methuen to provide targeted youth mentorship, individualized basketball
training and skill development programming for underserved and at-risk
youth; provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall be expended to
the city known as the town of Randolph for purposes of continued funding
for the town’s Enhanced Social Services Program; provided further, that
not less than $25,000 shall be expended to Friends and Mentors, Inc. for
costs associated with their at-risk youth mentoring programming in the city
of Brockton; provided further, that not less than $200,000 shall be
expended to The Possible Zone for Career and Technical Education (CTE)
initiatives in the cities of Lawrence, Lowell and Brockton; and provided
further, that not less than $600,000 shall be expended to the YWCA
organizations, which shall be distributed equally between the Alliance of
YWCAs member organizations ............................................................................$12,270,000
4590-2001 For the department of public health, which may expend not more than
$4,489,889 of payments received for services provided by Tewksbury
hospital to clients of the department of developmental services, including for
the provision of behavioral health services and the continuation of short-
term medical rehabilitation for clients of the department of developmental
services; provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between
the receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures, the department
of public health may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for
payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the most
recent revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting system .....................$4,489,889
OFFICE OF CHILDREN, YOUTH AND FAMILY SERVICES.
Department of Children and Families.
4800-0015 For central and area office administration and service coordination of the
department of children and families; provided, that the associated expenses
of employees whose AA and DD object class costs are paid from item 4800-
1100 shall be paid from this item; provided further, that the commissioner of
117

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
the department of children and families may transfer funds between items
4800-0030, 4800-0038, 4800-0040 and 4800-0041 as necessary, pursuant
to an allocation plan, which shall detail by object class the distribution of the
funds to be transferred and which the commissioner shall file with the house
and senate committees on ways and means 30 days prior to any such
transfer; provided further, that not more than 5 per cent of any item shall be
transferred in fiscal year 2027; provided further, that the commissioner may
transfer funds from line item 4800-1100 into line item 4800-0015 for the
purpose of maintaining appropriate staffing ratios; provided further, that the
commissioner shall notify the house and senate committees on ways and
means 30 days in advance of any such transfer; provided further, that not
more than 2 per cent of funds from line item 4800-1100 shall be transferred
in fiscal year 2027; provided further, that no funds shall be expended from
this item for the compensation of unit 8 employees; provided further, that the
department of children and families shall not place a child or adolescent
referred by, or discharged from, the care of the department of mental health
until the department of mental health forwards an assessment and
recommendation as to whether the child or adolescent may be appropriately
placed in foster care or if, due to severe emotional disturbance,
such child or adolescent is more appropriate for congregate care placement;
provided further, that the department of children and families shall assist the
department of mental health in making such assessments and
recommendations; provided further, that if the placement of a child with
someone other than a parent becomes necessary, the department of
children and families shall place the highest priority on identifying a family
resource within the child’s kinship or family circle and shall provide services
and support to partner with the family resource in meeting the child’s needs;
provided further, that unless otherwise authorized, all funds including federal
reimbursements received by the department of children and families shall be
credited to the General Fund, except for federal reimbursement used to
support revenue maximization projects; provided further, that the
department of children and families and the department of early education
and care shall provide standards for early education and care placements
made through the supportive child care program; provided further, that the
department of children and families, in collaboration with the department of
early education and care, shall maintain a centralized list detailing the
number of children eligible for supportive child care services, the number of
supportive slots filled and the number of supportive slots available; provided
further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the
department of children and families shall not reduce recoupment amounts
recommended by the state auditor; provided further, that there shall not be
a waiting list for the services; provided further, that all children eligible for
services under item 3000-3060 shall receive those services; provided
further, that the department of children and families shall maintain a timely,
independent and fair administrative hearing system; provided further, that
not later than December 2, 2026, and February 26, 2027, the department of
children and families shall submit reports to the joint committee on children,
families and persons with disabilities and the house and senate committees
on ways and means, which shall include, but not be limited to: (i) the fair
hearing requests filed in fiscal year 2027, using non-identifying information,
which shall state, for each hearing request: (a) the subject matter of the
appeal; (b) the number of days between the hearing request and the first
day of the hearing; (c) the number of days between the first day of the
hearing and the hearing officer’s decision; (d) the number of days between
the hearing officer’s decision and the agency’s final decision; (e) the number
of days of continuance granted at the appellant’s request; (f) the number of
118

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
days of continuance granted at the request of the department of children
and families or the hearing officer’s request, specifying which party made
the request; and (g) whether the department’s decision that was the subject
of the appeal was affirmed or reversed; and (ii) the fair hearing requests filed
before fiscal year 2027, which have been pending for more than 180 days,
stating the number of those cases, how many of those cases have been
heard but not decided and how many have been decided by the hearing
officer but not yet issued as a final decision of the agency; provided further,
that the department of children and families shall maintain and make
available to the public, during regular business hours, a record of its fair
hearings, with personal identifying information removed, including for each
hearing request: (1) the date of the request; (2) the date of the hearing
decision; (3) the decision rendered by the hearing officer; and (4) the final
decision rendered by the commissioner of children and families after review;
provided further, that the department shall make redacted copies of fair
hearing decisions available within 30 days of a written request; provided
further, that the department of children and families shall not make available
any information in violation of federal privacy regulations; provided further,
that not later than February 26, 2027, the department of children and families
shall submit a report to the joint committee on children, families and persons
with disabilities and the house and senate committees on ways and means
that shall include, but not be limited to, the: (A) number of medical and
psychiatric personnel and their level of training currently employed by or
under contract with the department; (B) number of foster care reviews
conducted by the department and the average length of time in which each
review was completed; (C) number of social workers and supervisors who
have earned a bachelor’s or master’s degree in social work; (D) total number
of social workers and the total number of social workers holding licensure,
by level; (E) number of the department’s contracts reviewed by the state
auditor and the number of corrective action plans issued; and (F) number of
corrective action plans entered into by the department; provided further, that
the department of children and families shall submit a report to the joint
committee on children, families and persons with disabilities and the house
and senate committees on ways and means on the caseload of the
department; provided further, that the report shall include, but not be limited
to: (I) the caseloads of residential placements, congregate care, foster care,
therapeutic foster care, adoption, guardianship, 51A reports, substantiated
51A reports, the number of children who die in the care and custody of the
department, the number of children currently eligible for supportive child
care, the number of children presently receiving supportive child care and
the number of medical and psychiatric consultation requests made by the
department’s social workers; (II) the number of approved foster care
placements; (III) the number of children in psychiatric hospitals and
community-based acute treatment programs who remain hospitalized
beyond their medically-necessary stay while awaiting placement and the
number of days each case remains in placement beyond that which is
medically necessary; (IV) the number of children in the department of
children and families’ care and custody who are receiving medical or
psychiatric care through other publicly-funded sources; (V) the number of
children served by supervised visitation centers and the number of those
children who are reunified with their families; (VI) the total number of children
served, their ages, the number of children served in each service plan, the
number of children in out-of-home placements and the number of
placements each child has had before receiving an out-of-home placement;
(VII) for each area office, the number of kinship guardianship subsidies
provided in the quarters covered by the report and the number of kinship
119

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
guardianship subsidies provided in that quarter for which federal
reimbursement was received; (VIII) for each area office, the total spending
amount on services other than case management services provided to
families to keep a child with the child’s parents or reunifying the child with
the child’s parents, detailing spending by the type of service provided
including, but not limited to, the number of children and a breakdown of
spending for respite care, intensive in-home services, client financial
assistance and flexible funding, community-based after-school social and
recreation program services, family navigation services and parent aide
services and the unduplicated number of families that receive the services;
(IX) for each area office, the total number of families residing in shelters paid
for by the department, a list of where the families are sheltered, the total cost
and average cost per family at those shelters and a description of how the
department determines who qualifies or does not qualify for a shelter; (X)
for each area office, the number of requests for voluntary services,
delineated by type of service requested, whether the request was approved
or denied, the number of families that were denied voluntary services and
received a 51A report, the reasons for denying such services and what, if
any, referrals were made for services by other agencies or entities; (XI) the
number of families receiving multiple 51A reports within a 10-month period,
the number of cases reopened within 6 months of being closed and the
number of children who return home and then reenter an out-of-home
placement within 6 months; (XII) the number of children and families served
by the family resource centers, delineated by area; and (XIII) the number of
children in the care and custody of the department whose whereabouts are
unknown; provided further, that not later than January 29, 2027, the
department of children and families shall submit a report to the joint
committee on children, families and persons with disabilities and the house
and senate committees on ways and means that details any changes to the
rules, regulations or guidelines established by the department in the
previous fiscal year to carry out its duties under chapter 119 of the General
Laws including, but not limited to: (aa) criteria used to determine whether a
child has been abused or neglected; (bb) guidelines for removal of a child
from the home; and (cc) standards to determine what reasonable efforts are
being made to keep a child in the home; provided further, that on a monthly
basis, the department of children and families shall provide the caseload
forecasting office with data on children receiving services, young adults
receiving services as defined in section 21 of said chapter 119 who continue
to receive services as authorized in subsection (f) of section 23 of said
chapter 119 and other pertinent data related to items 4800-0038 and 4800-
0041 that is requested by the office; provided further, that the report shall
also contain the number of children and families served by the family
resource centers, by area, and an evaluation of the services provided and
their effectiveness; provided further, that to the extent feasible within existing
appropriations, the department of children and families shall maintain
existing services for the aging-out population; provided further, that the
commissioner of children and families may transfer funds from item 4800-
1100 to this item to maintain appropriate staffing ratios under the
memorandum of agreement between the commonwealth and the
Alliance/Local 509, SEIU executed on March 25, 2013; provided further, that
not less than 15 days before any such transfer, the commissioner shall notify
the house and senate committees on ways and means; provided further,
that not more than 2 per cent of said funds from item 4800-1100 shall be
transferred in fiscal year 2027; provided further, that the commissioner may
transfer funds between items 4800-0030, 4800-0038, 4800-0040 and 4800-
0041 for services only and, as necessary, under an allocation plan, which
120

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
shall detail, by object class, the distribution of the funds to be transferred;
provided further, that transfers shall not be made for administrative costs;
provided further, that not less than 15 days before any such transfer, the
commissioner shall notify the house and senate committees on ways and
means; provided further, that not more than 5 per cent of any item shall be
transferred in fiscal year 2027; provided further, that not less than $125,000
shall be expended to Rick’s Place, Inc. of Wilbraham for providing grief
support to youth and their families in the Pioneer Valley; and provided
further, that funds shall be expended for a unit to help identify at-risk youth
and provide preventative services and to implement a missing or absent
youth recovery response policy ..........................................................................$156,573,247
4800-0016 For the department of children and families, which may expend for the
operation of the transitional employment program not more than
$2,000,000 from retained revenues collected from various state, county and
municipal government entities and state authorities for the costs related to
the provision of services by the participants and the overhead costs and
expenses incurred by the not-for-profit managing agent selected by the
commissioner of children and families for administering the program;
provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the
commissioner may enter into a contract with Roca, Inc. to manage the
transitional employment program and to provide services to participants
from the aging-out population, parolees, probationers, youth service
releasees and other community residents considered to have employment
needs .......................................................................................................................$2,000,000
4800-0025 For foster care review services ................................................................................$5,585,836
4800-0030 For the continuation of local and regional administration and coordination of
services provided by lead agencies through purchase-of-service contracts,
including flex services; provided, that not less than $150,000 shall be
expended to the Weymouth Teen Center for job skills training, technology
support, remedial education services and to promote a social service
program for growth and social welfare ................................................................$19,324,028
4800-0036 For a sexual abuse intervention network program to be administered in
conjunction with the district attorneys .........................................................................$971,752
4800-0038 For guardianship, foster care, adoption, family preservation and kinship
services provided by the department of children and families; provided, that
services funded through this item shall include shelter services, substance
use treatment, young parent programs, parent aides, education and
counseling services, foster care, adoption and guardianship subsidies,
tiered reimbursements used to promote the foster care placement of
children with special medical and social needs, assessment of the
appropriateness of adoption for children in the care of the department for
more than 12 months, protective services provided by partnership agencies,
targeted recruitment and retention of foster families, respite care services,
post-adoption services and support services for foster, kinship and adoptive
families and juvenile fire setter programs and services for people at risk of
domestic violence, including payroll costs; provided further, that funds may
be expended on programs that received funding in fiscal year 2013;
provided further, that funds may be expended to support reforms at the
department to improve foster care and placement stability and to ensure
positive permanency outcomes for children; provided further, that not less
than $50,000 shall be expended to the Rise Above Foundation, Inc. for
121

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
additional programming for additional youth; provided further, that not less
than $100,000 shall be expended to the Jewish Family and Children’s
Service, Inc.’s Center for Early Relationship Support for the fragile
beginnings program, project newborns exposed to substances: support
and therapy and related clinical and community services for vulnerable
families with children from birth to age 5; and provided further, that the
department may contract with provider agencies for the coordination and
management of services, including flex services ...............................................$343,331,153
4800-0040 For family preservation, reunification and service coordination; provided,
that services shall include family support and stabilization services
provided by the department of children and families ..........................................$129,614,767
4800-0041 For congregate care services; provided, that funds may be expended from
this item to provide community based services, including in-home support
and stabilization services, to children who would otherwise be placed in
congregate settings; and provided further, that the department of children
and families shall oversee area review teams that shall evaluate the
feasibility of maintaining the child in the community in this manner whenever
possible before recommending placement in a congregate care setting ............$450,734,746
4800-0058 For the support of a foster care campaign to recruit new foster parents;
provided, that not later than April 1, 2027, the department of children and
families shall submit a report to the joint committee on children, families and
persons with disabilities and the house and senate committees on ways and
means that shall include, but not be limited to, the: (i) number of new foster
care parents as a result of the foster care campaign; and (ii) methods in
which the department is recruiting foster care parents ...............................................$945,945
4800-0091 For the department of children and families, which may expend not more
than $5,142,531 in federal reimbursements received under Title IV-E of the
Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. 670 et. seq. during fiscal year 2027 to develop
a training institute for professional development at the department; provided,
that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the
purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of
retained revenues and related expenditures, the department may incur
expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to
exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate
as reported in the state accounting system; and provided further, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, federal
reimbursements received in excess of $5,142,531 shall be credited to the
General Fund ...........................................................................................................$5,142,531
4800-0200 For the support and maintenance of family resource centers throughout the
commonwealth; provided, that funds may be expended to expand services
at existing centers or to establish new centers in areas with identified
coverage gaps; provided further, that centers supported through this item
shall be subject to the selection and reporting requirements of item 4000-
0051; and provided further; that not less than $100,000 shall be expended
to the Eliot Family Resource Center in the city of Everett for the
implementation of additional programming; ........................................................$25,814,017
4800-1100 For the AA and DD object class costs of the department of children and
families’ social workers; provided, that funds shall mitigate social worker
caseloads in those area offices furthest above the statewide weighted
caseload standard and towards achieving a social worker caseload ratio of
122

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
15 to 1 statewide; and provided further, that only employees of bargaining
unit 8, as identified in the Massachusetts personnel administrative reporting
and information system, shall be paid from this item ..........................................$320,870,628
OFFICE OF HEALTH SERVICES.
Department of Mental Health.
5011-0100 For the operation of the department of mental health ...........................................$37,241,866
5042-5000 For child and adolescent services, including the costs of psychiatric and
related services provided to children and adolescents determined to be
medically-ready for discharge from acute hospital units or mental health
facilities and who are experiencing unnecessary delays in being discharged
due to the lack of more appropriate settings; provided, that to fund said
services, the commissioner of mental health may allocate funds from the
amount appropriated in this item to other departments within the executive
office of health and human services; provided further, that the department
of mental health shall not refer or discharge a child or adolescent to the
custody or care of the department of children and families until the
department of mental health forwards its assessment and recommendation
as to whether the child or adolescent is appropriate for foster care or, due
to severe emotional disturbance, is more appropriate for group care;
provided further, that not less than $9,800,000 shall be expended for an
intensive residential treatment program; provided further, that not less than
$5,200,000 shall be expended for a flexible support services program;
provided further, that not less than $4,500,000 shall be expended for a
program to provide assertive community treatment for individuals under the
age of 22 who exhibit symptoms of serious emotional disturbance,
demonstrate an inability to consistently use less intensive levels of care in
the community and have functional impairment and a history of difficulty in
functioning safely and successfully in community, school, home or
workplace settings; provided further, that the program shall: (i) include a
team-based approach to service delivery that tailors services to the specific
needs and acuity of each individual; (ii) provide mental health services and
social service assistance through a person-centered approach, which may
include, but shall not be limited to, clinical assessment and outreach,
medication treatment and outreach, care coordination including primary
care, symptom management, harm reduction, family services, housing
support and needs that arise in carrying out the acts of daily living; (iii) be
consistent, to the maximum extent possible, with the evidence-based
practice standards for assertive community treatment as found in the
Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services Administration’s assertive
community treatment evidence-based practices kit; and (iv) not limit
program services to a specific physical location; provided further, that the
department of mental health shall expend not less than $3,825,000 for the
Massachusetts Child Psychiatry Access Project, or MCPAP; provided
further, that not less than $675,000 of that amount shall be expended for
MCPAP for Moms statewide to address mental health concerns in pregnant
and postpartum people and to expand support for pregnant and postpartum
people by adding substance use disorder-specific education, training,
consultation and care coordination to the project’s existing capacity;
provided further, that amounts expended from this item for MCPAP that are
related to services provided on behalf of commercially-insured clients shall
be assessed by the commissioner on surcharge payors, as defined in section
123

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
64 of chapter 118E of the General Laws, and shall be collected in a manner
consistent with the department’s regulations; provided further, that not later
than March 12, 2027, the department shall report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means on: (a) an overview of MCPAP care
coordination efforts; (b) the number of psychiatric consultations, face-to-face
consultations and referrals made to specialists on behalf of children with
behavioral health needs in fiscal year 2026 and fiscal year 2027; and (c)
recommendations to: (1) increase the number of specialists receiving
referrals through MCPAP; (2) increase access to MCPAP in regions
currently underutilizing the project; and (3) improve care coordination efforts
to identify specialists available and accepting new child and adolescent
patients, with priority to those children and adolescents who exhibit complex
conditions and experience long wait lists for specialty psychiatry; provided
further, that not less than $75,000 shall be expended to Shrewsbury Youth
and Family Services, Inc. in the town of Shrewsbury to provide mental
health services in the commonwealth; provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended to Boston Community Pediatrics, Inc. to
support the Integrated Behavioral Health program; provided further, that
not less than $20,000 shall be expended to the Children's Room Center
for Grieving Children & Teenagers, Inc. in the town of Arlington for student
mental health support; provided further, that not less than $250,000 shall
be expended to The NAN Project to increase mental health awareness
and suicide prevention; and provided further, that not later than April 1,
2027, the department shall report to the house and senate committees on
ways and means on: (I) the distribution of funds, delineated by initiative; (II)
the number of individuals served; (III) the outcomes measured; and (IV)
recommendations for expanding cost-effective and evidence-based early
mental health identification and prevention programming for children and
adolescents in fiscal year 2027 and fiscal year 2028, prior appropriation
continued .............................................................................................................$137,063,638
5046-0000 For adult mental health and support services; provided, that the
department of mental health may allocate not more than $5,000,000 from
item 5095-0015 to this item, as necessary, under allocation plans submitted
to the house and senate committees on ways and means not less than 30
days before any such transfer, for residential and day services for clients
formerly receiving care at department facilities; provided further, that not later
than February 3, 2027, the department shall report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means on the distribution of funds per adult and
child planning population and the types of services received in each region
in fiscal year 2027; provided further, that the department shall maintain in
fiscal year 2027 the same amount of community-based placements as in
the previous 3 fiscal years; provided further, that in fiscal year 2027, the
department shall expend on clubhouses not less than the amount expended
on clubhouses in fiscal year 2026; provided further, funds shall be expended
for jail diversion programs in municipalities that provide equal matching
funds from other public or private sources; provided further, that not later
than February 3, 2027 the department shall report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means regarding the: (i) number of crisis
intervention team and jail diversion efforts; (ii) amount of funding per grant,
delineated by city, town or provider; (iii) potential savings achieved; (iv)
recommendations for expansion; and (v) outcomes measured; provided
further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended for a grant to the
Massachusetts Chapter of the National Association of Social Workers, Inc.
to provide assistance in connecting consumers to licensed clinical social
workers through the Therapy Matcher program; and provided further, that
124

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
not less than $250,000 shall be expended on the expansion of low threshold,
safe haven housing for mentally ill men and women who have been
chronically homeless and are currently living in emergency shelters or on
the streets in Boston, prior appropriation continued ...........................................$679,726,424
5046-2000 For homelessness services ...................................................................................$27,421,425
5046-4000 For the department of mental health, which may expend not more than
$125,000 in retained revenues collected from occupancy fees charged to
the tenants in the creative housing option in community environments, or
CHOICE, program under chapter 167 of the acts of 1987; provided, that all
fees collected under said CHOICE program shall be expended for the
routine maintenance and repair of facilities in the CHOICE program .........................$125,000
5047-0001 For emergency service programs and acute inpatient mental health care
services; provided, that the department of mental health shall require a
performance specification to be developed for safe aftercare options for
adults upon release from acute inpatient mental health care services; and
provided further, that the emergency service programs shall take all
reasonable steps to identify and invoice the third-party insurer of all persons
serviced by the programs .......................................................................................$22,035,765
5055-0000 For forensic services provided by the department of mental health; provided,
that not less than $1,500,000 shall be expended for juvenile court clinics ............$17,518,309
5095-0015 For the operation of hospital facilities and community-based mental health
services; provided, that in order to comply with the decision in Olmstead v.
L.C. ex rel. Zimring, 527 U.S. 581 (1999) and to enhance care for clients, the
department of mental health shall discharge clients residing in inpatient
facilities to residential services in the community if the following criteria are
met: (i) the client is deemed clinically suited for a more integrated setting; (ii)
the community residential service capacity and resources available are
sufficient to provide each client with an equal or improved level of service;
and (iii) the cost to the commonwealth of serving the client in the community
is less than or equal to the cost of serving the client in inpatient care; provided
further, that any client transferred to another inpatient facility as the result of
a facility closure shall receive a level of care that is equal to or greater than
the care that had been provided at the closed facility; provided further, that
the department may allocate funds of not more than $5,000,000 from this
item to item 5046-0000, as necessary, under allocation plans submitted to
the house and senate committees on ways and means not less than 30 days
before any transfer for residential and day services for clients formerly
receiving inpatient care at the centers and facilities; provided further, that the
department shall maintain not less than 671 inpatient beds in its system in
fiscal year 2027; provided further, that of said 671 beds, 45 beds shall be
continuing care inpatient beds on the campus of Taunton state hospital; and
provided further, that within the existing appropriation, the department may
operate more beds at Taunton state hospital ......................................................$395,160,989
5095-0017 For the purposes of a loan forgiveness program for clinical behavioral health
workers across the department of mental health; provided, that the
department shall create a loan forgiveness and tuition reimbursement
program for clinical behavioral health workers, including but not limited to
nurse practitioners, psychologists, psychiatrists, peer counselors and
behavioral health navigators; and provided further, that not later than
September 30, 2026, the department of mental health shall report to the
125

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
house and senate committees on ways and means detailing: (i) the
framework and eligibility criteria of the program; (ii) the number of
participants in the program; and (iii) the average amount forgiven per person
in the program ..........................................................................................................$3,000,000
Department of Developmental Services.
5911-1003 For the administration and operation of the department of developmental
services; provided, that the department shall not charge user fees for
transportation or community day services; provided further, that the
department shall not charge fees for eligibility determination for services
provided by the department or for applications or requests for transfer of
guardianship; provided further, that regional employment collaboratives
shall be funded at not less than the amount funded in fiscal year 2026;
provided further, that the department shall issue a report to the house and
senate committees on ways and means not later than February 19, 2027
detailing: (i) significant expense increases incurred by the department; (ii)
measures implemented by the department to reduce costs; and (iii)
improved outcomes in programs and services funded by the department;
provided further, that the commissioner of developmental services may
transfer funds between items 5920-2025, 5920-2000, 5911-2000 and 5920-
3000; provided further, that the commissioner shall notify the house and
senate committees on ways and means not less than 30 days before any
such transfer; provided further, that not less than $200,000 shall be
expended for the Massachusetts Down Syndrome Congress, Inc.; provided
further, that not less than $150,000 shall be expended to Operation House
Call at Arc Massachusetts, Inc. to maintain and expand training to medical
students and other graduate level health care professionals to work with
individuals with autism and other developmental and intellectual
disabilities; and provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be
expended for the Center for Autism and Neurodevelopmental Disorders at
the University of Massachusetts memorial medical center and the University
of Massachusetts medical school based on the patient-centered medical
home concept ......................................................................................................$107,612,218
5920-2000 For vendor-operated, community-based residential adult services,
including intensive individual supports; provided, that annualized funding
shall be expended for turning 22 clients who began receiving services in
fiscal year 2025 under item 5920-5000 of section 2 of chapter 126 of the
acts of 2022; provided further, that not later than February 26, 2027, the
department of developmental services shall submit a report to the house
and senate committees on ways and means detailing the use of shared-
living services which shall include, but not be limited to, the: (i) number of
clients living in shared-living placements, broken down by age and location;
(ii) average cost of shared-living services; (iii) number of clients living in a
shared-living placement with individuals they knew prior to the arrangement;
(iv) department’s oversight of the application and placement process; (v)
safeguards in place for clients receiving these services; and (vi) potential for
growth of the program; provided further, that the commissioner of
developmental services may transfer funds from this item to item 5920-
2010, as necessary, under an allocation plan that shall detail, by object
class, the distribution of the funds to be transferred and that shall be
submitted to the house and senate committees on ways and means not less
than 30 days before any such transfer; provided further, that not less than
$100,000 shall be expended to Cape Abilities, Inc. to create energy-
efficient exterior transformation of their primary service hub for individuals
126

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
with disabilities; and provided further, that not more than $5,000,000 shall
be transferred from this item in fiscal year 2027 .............................................$2,067,601,853
5920-2003 For supportive technology and remote services for individuals served by
the department of developmental services ..............................................................$5,227,910
5920-2010 For state-operated, community-based residential services for adults,
including community-based health services; provided further, that not less
than $50,000 shall be expended to Berkshire Family and Individual
Resources, Inc.; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be
expended to Harbor Health Services, Inc. to be used for equipment and
technology improvements at their Harbor Community Health Center in the
village of Hyannis in the city known as the town of Barnstable ....................…$372,359,320
5920-2025 For community-based day and work programs and associated
transportation costs for adults; provided, that the department of
developmental services shall provide transportation, which shall be
prioritized by need; provided further, that the department shall support
individuals with disabilities who transitioned from employment services
offered at sheltered workshops to community-based employment as part of
the commonwealth’s employment first initiative; provided further, that any
public-private partnerships with employers and nonprofits shall encourage
the highest level of independence among individuals with disabilities and
shall provide options to maximize community involvement and participation;
provided further, that not later than April 1, 2027, the department shall
submit a report to the joint committee on children, families and persons with
disabilities and the house and senate committees on ways and means
detailing: (i) the number of eligible individuals employed in community-based
employment in fiscal year 2026 and the number estimated for fiscal year
2027; (ii) the number and types of community-based employment partners;
(iii) the outcomes measured; and (iv) recommendations for expansion;
provided further, that the commissioner of developmental services may
transfer such funds from this item to items 5920-2000, 5911-2000, 5920-
3000, 5920-5000 and 5930-1000; and provided further, that the
commissioner shall notify the house and senate committees on ways and
means not less than 30 days before any such transfer ......................................$313,470,092
5920-3000 For respite services and intensive family supports ..............................................$131,417,406
5920-3010 For contracted support services for families of children with autism through
the autism division at the department of developmental services; provided,
that the department shall expend not less than $5,500,000 to provide
services under the children’s autism spectrum disorder waiver under section
1915 of the Social Security Act; provided further, that the waiver shall include
children with autism spectrum disorder ages 0 to 8, inclusive, including
children with autism spectrum disorder ages 0 to 3, inclusive, who are
receiving services through the department of public health’s early
intervention program; provided further, that the department of
developmental services shall take all steps necessary to ensure that the
waiver program is fully enrolled and that eligible children with autism
immediately begin to receive services under said waiver; provided further,
that the department shall immediately file any waiver amendment necessary
with the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to comply with
the requirements of this item; provided further, that not later than January
15, 2027, the department shall submit a report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means, the joint committee on education and the
127

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
joint committee on children, families and persons with disabilities on: (i) the
number of contracted support services provided for families with children
with autism under this item; (ii) the costs associated with such services; (iii)
the services provided by the children’s autism spectrum disorder waiver,
with information regarding the number of children enrolled in the waiver and
receiving services; (iv) the linguistic and cultural diversity, age, gender and
geographic representation of the applicants and the children enrolled in the
program; (v) the department’s plans to continue to assess the demand for
waiver services; (vi) any plans by the executive office of health and human
services to expand the waiver for children on the autism spectrum of all ages
in the future; and (vii) other information determined to be relevant by the
department; and provided further, that the department shall submit copies
of amended waivers to the house and senate committees on ways and
means, the joint committee on education and the joint committee on
children, families and persons with disabilities upon submission of the
amendment ..............................................................................................................$7,907,222
5920-3020 For the implementation of chapter 226 of the acts of 2014, including services
and supports for individuals with a developmental disability attributable to
autism spectrum disorder, Smith-Magenis syndrome or Prader-Willi
syndrome; provided, that the department shall submit quarterly reports to
the house and senate committees on ways and means detailing the: (i)
number of individuals eligible for services; (ii) number of eligible individuals
served; (iii) type of services provided; (iv) cost per service; and (v) cost of
services per individual; and provided further, that not less than $300,000
shall be expended for the commission on autism established in section 217
of chapter 6 of the General Laws ........................................................................$102,467,129
5920-3025 For funding to support initiatives to address the needs of individuals with
developmental disabilities who are aging including, but not limited to,
individuals with Down syndrome and Alzheimer’s disease, through the
identification of best practices for services for affected individuals, including:
(i) medical care coordination models that address conditions common to
individuals with developmental disabilities who are aging; (ii) training for
direct care and other staff in the identification of dementia or other age-
related conditions; and (iii) the collection of data regarding the effectiveness
of the initiatives included in this item; provided, that not later than April 1,
2027, the department of developmental services shall submit a report to the
executive office for administration and finance and the house and senate
committees on ways and means on the status of these initiatives, which shall
include, but not be limited to: (a) the number of participants served by each
initiative; (b) the participant outcomes, including impacts on the physical and
cognitive health of participants; (c) the cost of each initiative and the cost
per participant; (d) the implementation plans for these initiatives in fiscal
years 2028 and 2029; and (e) recommendations for enhancing the care of
individuals with developmental disabilities who are aging ...........................................$98,010
5920-5000 For services to clients of the department who turn 22 years of age during
fiscal years 2026 and 2027; provided, that not later than January 4, 2027
the department shall report to the house and senate committees on ways
and means on the use of any funds encumbered or expended from this item
including, but not limited to, the number of clients served in each region
and the types of services purchased in each region ...........................................$110,347,273
5930-1000 For the operation of facilities for individuals with intellectual disabilities;
provided, that in order to comply with the decision in Olmstead v. L.C. ex rel.
128

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
Zimring, 527 U.S. 581 (1999) and to enhance care for clients, the
department of developmental services shall discharge clients residing in
intermediate care facilities for individuals with intellectual disabilities, or an
ICF/IID, to residential services in the community if: (i) the client is deemed
clinically suited for a more integrated setting; (ii) community residential
service capacity and resources available are sufficient to provide each client
with an equal or improved level of service; and (iii) the cost to the
commonwealth of serving the client in the community is less than or equal to
the cost of serving the client in an ICF/IID; provided further, that any client
transferred to another ICF/IID as the result of a facility closure shall receive
a level of care that is equal to or greater than the level of care that had been
provided at the closed ICF/IID; provided further, that the department may
allocate funds from this item to items 5920-2000, 5920-2010 and 5920-
2025, as necessary, under allocation plans that shall be submitted to the
house and senate committees on ways and means not less than 30 days
before any transfer for residential and day services for clients formerly
receiving inpatient care at an ICF/IID; and provided further, that not later than
February 26, 2027, the department shall report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means, on: (a) all efforts to comply with the
decision in Olmstead v. L.C. ex rel. Zimring, 527 U.S. 581 (1999); (b) the
enhancement of care within available resources to clients served by the
department; and (c) the steps taken to consolidate or close an ICF/IID ............$134,334,811
BOARD OF LIBRARY COMMISSIONERS.
7000-9101 For the operation of the board of library commissioners ........................................$2,052,106
7000-9401 For state aid to regional public libraries; provided, that the board of library
commissioners may provide quarterly advances of funds as it deems
appropriate under clauses (1) and (3) of section 19C of chapter 78 of the
General Laws to regional public library systems throughout each fiscal year,
in compliance with the office of the comptroller’s regulations on state grants
pursuant to 815 C.M.R. 2.00; provided further, that not less than $50,000
shall be expended for the Worcester Public Library to provide funding and
support staff for the Library in Every Classroom Project; provided further,
that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to the Tufts Library in
Weymouth for material and equipment upgrades; provided further, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, in calculating the
fiscal year 2027 distribution of funds appropriated in this item, the board
shall employ the population figures used to calculate the fiscal year 2026
distribution; provided further, that the board shall provide funds for the
continued operation of a single regional library system to serve the different
geographic regions of the commonwealth; provided further, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the library for the
commonwealth shall receive not less than 47.5 cents for each resident of
the commonwealth; and provided further, that said amount shall not exceed
25 per cent of the amount appropriated under this item .......................................$19,530,000
7000-9402 For the talking book library at the Worcester public library ........................................$726,181
7000-9406 For the Perkins Braille and Talking Book Library in the city known as the
town of Watertown, including the operation of the machine lending agency ..........$4,134,510
7000-9501 For state aid to public libraries; provided, that notwithstanding any general
or special law to the contrary, no city or town shall receive funds from this
129

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
item in any year when the appropriation of the city or town for free public
library service is below an amount equal to 102.5 per cent of the average of
the appropriations for free public library services for the 3 years immediately
preceding; provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special law
to the contrary, the board of library commissioners may grant waivers in
excess of the waiver limit set forth under the second paragraph of section
19A of chapter 78 of the General Laws for fiscal year 2026 for not more than
1 year; provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to
the contrary, of the amount by which this item exceeds the amount
appropriated under item 7000-9501 of section 2 of chapter 194 of the acts
of 1998, funds shall be distributed under the guidelines of the municipal
equalization grant program, the library incentive grant program and the
nonresident circulation offset program; and provided further, that not less
than $50,000 shall be expended to the town of Halifax for the replacement
of the roof at the Holmes public library; and provided further, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, any payment
made under this item shall be deposited with the treasurer of the city or town
and held in a separate account and shall be expended by the public library
of that city or town without appropriation ..............................................................$20,450,000
7000-9506 For the technology and automated resource sharing networks ..............................$6,296,144
7000-9508 For the Massachusetts Center for the Book, Inc., chartered as the
commonwealth affiliate of the Center for the Book in the Library of Congress;
provided, that the Massachusetts Center for the Book, Inc. shall continue its
work as a public-private partnership ..........................................................................$428,400
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF LABOR AND WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT.
Office of the Secretary.
7002-1091 For the development and operation of career technical institutes in
vocational-technical schools in partnership with industry and community
stakeholders; provided, that career technical institutes shall build out
industry recognized credentialing pathways for adult learners in technical
and trade fields to retrain and grow the workforce; provided further, that at
the direction of the secretary of labor and workforce development,
development funds may be transferred to the Workforce Competitiveness
Trust Fund established in section 2WWW of chapter 29 of the General Laws
to issue competitive grants to support the start-up and educational costs of
career technical institutes ........................................................................................$8,898,244
7003-0100 For the operation of the executive office of labor and workforce
development; provided, that not later than February 23, 2027, the
department shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on
ways and means including, but not limited to: (i) sector by sector barriers to
workers returning to work during the 2019 novel coronavirus pandemic,
including the retail sector; and (ii) current programs that may be utilized to
target the workforce in each sector; provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended to the Leduc Center at the University of
Massachusetts Dartmouth for transportation costs related to the America
Reads/Counts program; provided further, that not less than $200,000 shall
be expended for the Urban League of Eastern of Massachusetts for
workforce development programming; provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended to support staffing at African Cultural Services
130

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
Inc in the city of Waltham; provided further, that not less than $100,000
shall be expended to Year Up, Inc. to implement workforce development
programs that provide job opportunities for young adults; and provided
further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to for a grant
program at St. Mary's Center for Women and Children, Inc. in the
Dorchester neighborhood of the city of Boston for workforce development
and educational programming for women .............................................................$2,852,440
7003-0101 For the costs of core administrative functions performed within the executive
office of labor and workforce development; provided, that common functions
that may be designated core administrative functions include, without
limitation, human resources, financial management, information technology,
legal, procurement and asset management; provided further, that the
executive office shall, in consultation with the comptroller, develop a detailed
plan for the expenditure of said funds, and for increasing efficiency and
reducing costs through shared services; provided further, that not later than
January 29, 2027, the secretary of labor and workforce development and
the comptroller shall jointly submit the plan to the joint committee on labor
and workforce development and the house and senate committees on ways
and means; and provided further, that the General Fund shall be reimbursed
the amount appropriated in this item attributed to the department of industrial
accidents based on rates approved by the office of the comptroller and for
associated indirect and direct fringe benefit costs from assessments levied
under section 65 of chapter 152 of the General Laws ..........................................$20,446,536
7003-0150 For the operation of a re-entry workforce development and supportive
services program for formerly incarcerated individuals transitioning from a
house of correction or the department of correction to a steady job or career;
provided, that funds shall be used for: (i) job training for formerly
incarcerated individuals in order to facilitate job placement; (ii) wage
subsidies to facilitate private sector employment and professional
development; and (iii) support services and programs for court-involved
youths; provided further, that the executive office of labor and workforce
development shall take all necessary steps to secure private sector funding
for this program; provided further, that the executive office shall coordinate
with a local public or private nonprofit university to examine and develop a
longitudinal evaluation framework to assess the efficacy and efficiency of
the program; provided further, that not less than $250,000 shall be
expended for New England Culinary Arts Training; provided further, that not
less than $50,000 shall be expended to the Liberal Arts for Returning
Citizens Project at Clark University to support its programs and operations;
and provided further, that not later than April 1, 2027, the executive office
shall submit a report to the executive office for administration and finance
and the house and senate committees on ways and means describing the
administrative functions of the program, client outcomes and plans for the
longitudinal evaluation framework ...........................................................................$2,500,250
General Fund ........................................................86.85%
Gaming Economic Development Fund .................13.15%
7003-0151 For the purposes of expanding and diversifying registered apprenticeships
including, but not limited to, in the priority manufacturing, health care and
information technology industries ...........................................................................$3,333,577
Department of Economic Research.
131

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
7003-0105 For the operation of the department of economic research .......................................$780,308
Department of Labor Standards.
7003-0152 For the operation of the division of apprenticeship standards ...................................$360,324
7003-0200 For the operation of the department of labor standards ..........................................$4,747,296
7003-0201 For the department of labor standards, which may expend not more than
$454,428 received from fees collected under section 3A of chapter 23 of the
General Laws and civil fines issued under section 197B of chapter 111 of the
General Laws, section 46R of chapter 140 of the General Laws and section
6F½ of chapter 149 of the General Laws ...................................................................$454,428
Department of Labor Relations.
7003-0900 For the operation of the department of labor relations ............................................$3,741,076
7003-0902 For the operation of the joint labor management committee for municipal
police and fire .............................................................................................................$314,604
Department of Career Services.
7002-0012 For a youth-at-risk program targeting high-risk areas; provided, that these
funds may be expended for the development and implementation of a year-
round employment program for youth-at-risk and existing year-round
employment programs, including programs that serve youth who are not
more than 25 years of age, including lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender,
queer and questioning youth, youth of color, youth of all abilities, national
origins and religions and low-income youth, including single income
households, youth who are experiencing housing insecurity and other youth
determined to be eligible by the Commonwealth Corporation; provided, that
not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the Allston-Brighton
Community Development Corporation to continue their youth development
grant program supporting local youth-based organizations in the Allston-
Brighton neighborhood of the city of Boston; provided further, that not less
than $100,000 shall be expended to the city of Malden for the Mayor’s
Youth Employment Program; provided further, that not less than $50,000
shall be expended to The Essex National Heritage for the Future Leaders
program to employ underserved youth in Essex County; and provided
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to LEAP for
Education for the New Era Fund program and operations to expand paid
internships, career readiness experiences, industry-aligned opportunities,
training systems and coordinated youth support across Salem and Lynn,
while strengthening alignment with MyCAP and other school-based career
readiness efforts; and provided further, that funds shall be available for
expenditure through September 1, 2027, prior appropriation continued ..............$17,565,000
Gaming Economic Development Fund .....................100%
7003-0606 For the operation and maintenance of the Massachusetts Manufacturing
Extension Partnership, Inc. to maintain and promote manufacturing as an
integral part of the economy, and for programs designed to assist small
and mid-sized manufacturing companies ...............................................................$2,000,000
132

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
7003-0607 For the Commonwealth Corporation for an employment training program for
unemployed young adults with disabilities; provided, that funds shall be
awarded competitively by the Commonwealth Corporation to community-
based organizations with recognized success in creating strong
collaborations with employers to consider young adults with disabilities; and
provided further, that a community-based organization that receives funding
under this item shall provide extensive training and internship programming
and ongoing post-placement support for participants and employers .................$1,000,000
Gaming Economic Development Fund ....................100%
7003-0608 For the 1199SEIU Training and Upgrading Fund to deliver innovative worker
training for eligible health care workers to improve the lives of health care
workers, reduce costs and improve the quality of health care provided by
MassHealth personal care attendants and provided at nursing homes,
community health centers, hospitals and health systems .......................................$1,000,000
7003-0800 For the operation of the MassHire department of career services; provided,
that funds may be expended for the MassHire Workforce System .........................$2,012,922
7003-0803 For the operation of the one-stop career centers, including workforce
development services for priority populations and emergency assistance
shelter clients; provided, that the career centers, in coordination with the
executive office of labor and workforce development, shall establish
parameters for regular data reporting .....................................................................$7,927,586
Gaming Economic Development Fund ....................100%
7003-1206 For the Massachusetts Service Alliance, Inc., to administer state service
corps grants and provide training and support to volunteer and service
organizations ...........................................................................................................$1,686,000
7003-1207 For the operation of the Massachusetts AFL-CIO Workforce Development
Programs, Inc. to provide dislocated worker assistance, layoff aversion and
job training with a focus on pathways to quality careers through traditional
and non-traditional apprenticeship and pre-apprenticeship training ..........................$150,000
Department of Industrial Accidents.
7003-0500 For the operation and administrative expenses of the department of
industrial accidents; provided, that not later than January 29, 2027, the
department shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on
ways and means detailing the scope, objective and results of grant
recipients’ safety training program; and provided further, that the General
Fund shall be reimbursed the amount appropriated in this item and for
associated indirect and direct fringe benefit costs from assessments levied
under section 65 of chapter 152 of the General Laws ..........................................$23,822,988
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT.
Office of the Secretary.
7002-0010 For the operation of the office of the secretary of economic development,
including the operation of the Massachusetts permit regulatory office and
the operation of the office of the director of wireless and broadband affairs;
133

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
provided, that agencies within the executive office may, with the prior
approval of the secretary, streamline and improve administrative operations
pursuant to interdepartmental service agreements; provided further, that
not less than $100,000 shall be expended for the Massachusetts
Association of Community Development Corporations, Inc., to offer
organizational capacity building, staff training, technical assistance and
other supports to certified community development corporations and other
community development non-profits; provided further, that not less than
$100,000 shall be expended for LEADS, Inc. to support leadership
development; provided further, that not less than $250,000 shall be
expended for MassChallenge, Inc. to provide support for entrepreneurial
programs; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended
for East Somerville Main Streets in the city of Somerville; provided further,
that not less than $100,000 shall be expended for the Asian American
Women's Political Initiative for programming needs; provided further, that
not less than $250,000 shall be expended for the Beacon Communities
Charitable Fund, Inc. for the Tierney Learning Center; provided further,
that not less than $250,000 shall be expended to the Historic New England
to support its Welcome Center, programs, and exhibits; provided further,
that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to Pal Pueblo, Inc.
community organization; and provided further, that not less than $150,000
shall be expended for the Pioneer Valley Planning Commission to develop
an industrial lands analysis for the region to help guide future land use
decisions, infrastructure investments and regional economic development
strategies; and provided further, that not less than $250,000 shall be
expended to the Massachusetts LGBT Chamber of Commerce, Inc. ...................$6,708,815
7002-0017 For the provision of information technology services within the executive
office of economic development ..............................................................................$2,176,276
7002-0025 For operational support grants to community action agencies; provided, that
criteria for the distribution of the grants, including minimum or maximum
grant size, eligible uses and any relevant reporting and accountability
measures shall be developed jointly with the Massachusetts Association for
Community Action, Inc. or MASSCAP; provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended for Community Action Pioneer Valley; and
provided further, that not less than $45,000 shall be expended to the
Berkshire Community Action Council, Inc.; and provided further, that the
grants shall be used to assist the agencies in their mission to assist
residents of the commonwealth living with low incomes to stabilize their lives
and achieve economic prosperity, and in creating and expanding
opportunity for those residents in the neighborhoods and municipalities
where they live and work ........................................................................................$5,095,000
7002-0040 For a transfer to the growth capital division at the Massachusetts
Development Finance Agency established in section 2 of chapter 23G of the
General Laws for the small business technical assistance grant program;
provided, that grants shall be disbursed to community development
corporations certified under chapter 40H of the General Laws, nonprofit
community development financial institutions certified by the United States
Department of the Treasury or nonprofit community-based organizations to
provide technical assistance or training programs to businesses with not
more than 20 employees; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall
be expended for the Jamaica Plain Neighborhood Development
Corporation; and provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be
expended to ACT Lawrence Inc. to empower residents with a range of
134

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
community development initiatives and activities such as affordable
housing, foreclosure prevention, first-time homebuyer education, family
financial literacy and business and youth development; and provided
further, that priority shall be given to those organizations that focus on
reaching underserved markets and to worker cooperatives and businesses
governed by employee stock ownership plans .......................................................$5,100,000
7002-0081 For the operation of the Social Enterprise grant program, to be administered
as a competitive grant by the executive office of economic development ..............$1,000,000
7002-1502 For the Transformative Development Fund established in section 46 of
chapter 23G of the General Laws; provided, that the initiative shall be
developed in consultation with the Massachusetts Association of
Community Development Corporations and the Massachusetts Institute for
a New Commonwealth, Inc. and shall focus on identifying and implementing
strategies for reclaiming vacant, abandoned and blighted properties and
restoring them to productive use as homeownership opportunities or rental
housing, as well as on capacity-building at the local level to address this
need ............................................................................................................................$750,000
Office of Consumer Affairs and Business Regulation.
7006-0000 For the office of consumer affairs and business regulation, including
expenses of an administrative services unit ...........................................................$1,803,593
7006-0043 For the office of consumer affairs and business regulation, which may
expend not more than $1,097,747 from fees collected from the registration
and renewal of home improvement contractor registrations under section 11
of chapter 142A of the General Laws for the administration and enforcement
of the home improvement contractor registration program; provided, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose
of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the office may incur expenses and the
comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this
authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state
accounting system ...................................................................................................$1,097,747
Division of Banks.
7006-0010 For the operation of the division of banks; provided, that notwithstanding any
general or special law to the contrary, the division shall assess 100 per cent
of the amount appropriated in this item and the associated fringe benefit
costs for personnel paid from this item upon financial institutions that the
division currently regulates under section 2 of chapter 167 of the General
Laws ......................................................................................................................$27,039,886
7006-0011 For the costs incurred by the division of banks associated with licensure of
loan originators under chapter 255F of the General Laws; provided, that the
division may expend revenues of not more than $3,000,000 from the
revenue received from administrative fees associated with the licensure
fees and from civil administrative penalties collected under said chapter
255F; provided further, that $1,500,000 shall be expended by the
commissioner of banks as grants for the operation of a program for best
lending practices, first-time homeowner counseling for nontraditional loans
and not less than 10 foreclosure education centers under section 16 of
chapter 206 of the acts of 2007 and that the grants shall be awarded through
135

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
a competitive application process using criteria established by the division;
and provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between
the receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures, the division may
incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to
exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate
as reported in the state accounting system ............................................................$3,000,000
Division of Insurance.
7006-0020 For the operation of the division of insurance, including the expenses of the
board of appeal on motor vehicle policies and bonds, the associated fringe
benefit costs for personnel paid from this item, certain other costs of
supervising motor vehicle liability insurance and the expenses of the
fraudulent claims board; provided, that notwithstanding any general or
special law to the contrary, 100 per cent of the amount appropriated in this
item and the associated fringe benefit costs for personnel paid from this item
shall be assessed upon the institutions which the division currently regulates
under general or special laws or regulations, except for licensed business
entity producers; and provided further, that the assessment shall be in
addition to any assessments currently assessed upon those institutions
...............................................................................................................................$16,708,706
7006-0029 For the operation of the health care access bureau under the division of
insurance; provided, that the full amount appropriated in this item and the
associated fringe benefit costs for personnel paid from this item shall be
assessed upon the carriers licensed under chapters 175, 176A, 176B, 176E
and 176G of the General Laws, as provided under section 7A of chapter 26
of the General Laws ................................................................................................$1,144,857
7006-0030 For the operation of pharmacy benefit manager regulation, oversight and
licensure under the division of insurance pursuant to section 2 of chapter
176Y of the General Laws ..........................................................................................$989,339
Division of Occupational Licensure.
7006-0040 For the operation and administration of the division of occupational
licensure ................................................................................................................$12,516,221
7006-0142 For the administration of the office of public safety and inspections under
the division of occupational licensure, which may expend not more than
$20,560,756 in revenues collected from fees or fines for annual elevator
inspections, building inspections, amusement park ride inspections, state
building code trainings and courses of instruction, licensing of pipefitters and
hoisting equipment operators, all licensing programs administered by the
office of public safety and inspections, revenues from fines collected under
section 65 of chapter 143 of the General Laws and fees for appeals of civil
fines issued under section 22 of chapter 22 of the General Laws and said
section 65 of said chapter 143; provided, that funds shall be expended for
the administration of the office of public safety and inspections including, but
not limited to: (i) inspectional services; (ii) licensing services; (iii) the
architectural access board; (iv) elevator inspections; (v) building
inspections; and (vi) amusement device inspections; provided further, that
the division shall employ not less than 70 full-time equivalent elevator
inspectors, including an additional engineer, and that funds shall be
expended to address the existing elevator inspection backlog and to defray
136

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
the costs associated with performing overtime elevator inspections;
provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended for a
reimbursement program to be managed by the division of occupational
licensure, which shall provide for the costs associated with the testing for
the presence of pyrrhotite; and provided further, that notwithstanding any
general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating
timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
expenditures, the office may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify
for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the
most recent revenue estimate .............................................................................$20,610,756
Division of Standards.
7006-0060 For the operation of the division of standards .........................................................$1,838,249
7006-0064 For the division of standards' oversight of motor vehicle repair shops ......................$320,000
7006-0065 For the division of standards, which may retain not more than $903,562 from
registration fees and fines collected under sections 184B to 184E, inclusive,
of chapter 94 of the General Laws and section 56D of chapter 98 of the
General Laws to support its enforcement activities as provided under
subsection (h) of section 184D of said chapter 94 and from revenues
received from item-pricing violations collected through municipal inspection
efforts and from weights and measures fees and fines collected from cities
and towns for enforcement of weights and measures laws; provided, that
notwithstanding said subsection (h) of said section 184D of said chapter 94,
the division shall not fund the municipal grant program as provided under
said subsection (h) of said section 184D of said chapter 94; and provided
further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for
the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of
retained revenues and related expenditures, the division may incur
expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to
exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate
as reported in the state accounting system ................................................................$903,562
7006-0066 For the support of municipal inspection efforts at the division of standards;
provided, that not more than 15 per cent of the amount appropriated in this
item shall be expended for administrative costs of the division .................................$160,372
Department of Telecommunications and Cable.
7006-0071 For the operation of the department of telecommunications and cable;
provided, that notwithstanding the second sentence of section 7 of chapter
25C of the General Laws, the assessments levied for fiscal year 2027 shall
be made at a rate sufficient to produce 100 per cent of the amount
appropriated in this item and the associated fringe benefit costs for
personnel paid from this item ..................................................................................$3,542,967
Massachusetts Office of Business Development.
7007-0150 For the Massachusetts office of business development for contracts with
regional economic development organizations under the program
established under sections 3J and 3K of chapter 23A of the General Laws ............$1,000,000
137

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
7007-0300 For the operation of the Massachusetts office of business development,
including the operation of the Massachusetts international trade office and
for marketing and promoting the commonwealth to attract and retain
targeted businesses and industries; provided, that not less than $25,000
shall be expended to the Massachusetts Center for Employee Ownership
for the purpose of contracting for services and other operational costs that
further the mission of the center ............................................................................$1,567,715
7007-0500 For the operation and maintenance of the Massachusetts Biomedical
Initiatives, Inc. for the commercialization of new, academic-based research
and development and raising the scientific awareness of the communities of
the commonwealth; provided, that the institute, in collaboration with the
Massachusetts office of business development, shall expend not less than
$250,000 for initiatives to increase diversity in the fields of life sciences and
biotechnology in the commonwealth; provided further, that such initiatives
may include, but shall not be limited to: (i) investments in minority-owned
businesses; (ii) grants to school districts with significant minority student
populations for the development of curricula, purchase of equipment and
the provision of internships; (iii) planning and implementation of strategies
to recruit, develop and retain a diverse workforce in the fields of life sciences
and biotechnology; and (iv) identifying structural and cultural obstacles to
the full inclusion of diverse populations in the life sciences and
biotechnology field, along with recommendations for removing those
obstacles; provided further, that not later than January 29, 2027, the institute
shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways and
means on the development, implementation and success of these initiatives,
including the disbursement of funds to specific entities as defined in this
item; and provided further, that the institute shall seek out private funds
necessary to match contributions equal to $1 for every $1 contributed by this
item .............................................................................................................................$750,000
7007-0800 For a state matching grant for the Small Business Development Center;
provided, that no funds shall be expended from this item until the United
States Small Business Administration has made a payment or has executed
a contract to pay the University of Massachusetts at Amherst for the
operation of the center; provided further, that the funds expended from this
item shall not exceed 25 per cent of the gross operating cost of the center;
provided further, that not more than $300,000 from this item shall be
expended for federal procurement technical assistance services within the
center; provided further, that such services shall include, but not be limited
to, assisting businesses in securing federal contracts, obtaining contract
financing, generating responses to requests for proposals, interpreting bid
documents, providing educational workshops and seminars and for the
electronic identification and tracking of federal bid opportunities; and
provided further, that funds expended for federal procurement technical
assistance services within the center shall be subject to the receipt of
matching funds from federal or private sources, including the United States
Department of Defense ...........................................................................................$1,426,222
7007-0952 For the operation of the Commonwealth Zoological Corporation
established in chapter 92B of the General Laws; provided, that funds
appropriated in this item shall be expended to promote private fundraising,
achieve self-sufficiency and serve as a catalyst for urban economic
development and job opportunities for local residents; provided further, that
the corporation shall take all steps necessary to increase the amount of
private funding available for the operation of the zoos; provided further, that
138

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
funding in this item shall not be transferred through interdepartmental service
agreements; provided further, that not later than January 29 2027, the
corporation shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on
ways and means on the status of, and amounts collected from, the private
fundraising and enhanced revenue efforts identified in the draft
Massachusetts zoos business and operations plan dated December 1996;
provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the Lupa
Zoo in Ludlow to support marketing and outreach efforts that expand
access to its conservation and educational programming; and provided
further, that funds may be expended on a matching program to encourage
private and corporate donations to support the Franklin Park zoo and the
Walter D. Stone Memorial zoo .............................................................................$6,675,000
Massachusetts Marketing Partnership.
7008-0900 For the operation and administration of the office of travel and tourism;
provided, that the office shall be the commonwealth’s official and lead
agency to facilitate and attract: (i) major sports events and championships;
and (ii) motion picture production and development; provided further, that
not less than $100,000 shall be expended for a matching grant program
to the Enrichment Center located in Dorchester neighborhood of the city
of Boston; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended
for No Books No Ball; provided further, that not less than $75,000 shall be
expended to Friends of Reggie Wong Park, Inc.; provided further, that not
less than $100,000 shall be expended for the Museum of African American
History, Incorporated; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to Lena Park Community Center; provided further, that not less
than $25,000 shall be expended for Dorchester Elite Eagles; provided
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended for Lady Raiders;
provided further, that not less than $350,000 shall be expended to the
Naismith Memorial Basketball Hall of Fame, Inc., for the replacement of
HVAC parts and 2 elevator pump systems; provided further, that not less
than $75,000 shall be expended to the Milford Highway Department for
increased public access improvements to the Upper Charles recreational
trail; provided further, that not less than $35,000 shall be expended for the
DeFillipo Playground in the city of Boston; provided further, that not less
than $25,000 shall be expended to the Milford Legion Baseball Club Inc.,
for increased public awareness, outreach and education; provided further,
that not less than $100,000 shall be expended for the 60th Head of the
Charles Regatta to cover costs associated with public safety; provided
further, that not less than $75,000 shall be expended for the Waltham
Tourism Council, Inc.; provided further, that not less than $150,000 shall
be expended to Boston Asian: Youth Essential Service, Inc.; provided
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended for Beverly Main
Streets; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to
the International Volleyball Hall of Fame, Inc. to expand international
tourism; provided further, that not less than $375,000 shall be expended
to the Commonwealth Shakespeare Company, Inc. for the purpose of free
programming on the Boston Common; provided further, that not less than
$150,000 shall be expended for the New American Association of
Massachusetts, Inc.; provided further, that not less than $75,000 shall be
expended to the West End Museum, Incorporated to support growing
capacity and to promote awareness of the West End and Boston's central
role in shaping modern urban planning; provided further, that not less than
$35,000 shall be expended to the Friends of Quabbin, Inc. to support their
marketing and operations for their annual Quabbin Days event; provided
139

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
further, that not less than $125,000 shall be expended for the Bay State
Games; provided further, that not less than $175,000 shall be expended
for the moving ahead program at the St. Francis House in the city of
Boston; provided further, that not less than $250,000 shall be expended
for the Boch Center’s Folk Americana Roots Hall of Fame (FARHOF)
located in the city of Boston to support the Hall of Fame’s educational
mission as well as local economic development through programming and
performances at the FARHOF; provided further, that not less than $50,000
shall be expended to the Fenway Community Center, in the Fenway
neighborhood of the city of Boston; provided further, that not less than
$1,300,000 shall be expended to the city of Boston for the HBCU Kickoff
Classic Weekend at Harvard University, including but not limited to
providing career fairs and mentorship opportunities for students; provided
further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the Quincy Asian
Resources, Inc. in the city of Quincy; provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended to the Germantown Neighborhood Center in
the city of Quincy; provided further, that not less than $35,000 shall be
expended to North End Youth Organization Inc.; provided further, that not
less than $175,000 shall be expended to the Boston Children’s Museum
for waterfront climate resilience planning and related improvements,
including flood mitigation and the protection of facilities along the Fort
Point Channel; provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall be
expended to the Italian Cultural Center of Western Massachusetts, Inc. in
the city of Springfield; provided further, that not less than $10,000 shall be
expended to the Dennis Chamber of Commerce, Inc. for marketing
initiatives for small businesses in the town of Dennis; provided further, that
not less than $75,000 shall be expended to Chinatown Business
Association Inc.; provided further, that not less than $10,000 shall be
expended to the Brewster Chamber of Commerce, Inc. for marketing
initiatives for small businesses in the town of Brewster; provided further,
that not less than $10,000 shall be expended to the Yarmouth Chamber
of Commerce, Inc. for marketing initiatives for small businesses in the town
of Yarmouth; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to Boston LGBTQIA+ Museum for an artist support program;
and provided further, that not later than March 5, 2027 the office shall
submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways and means
that shall include, but not be limited to: (A) an overview of the tourism
industry in the commonwealth; (B) the economic impact of domestic and
international travelers to the commonwealth; (C) a breakdown of the
regional tourism council grant allocations; and (D) initiatives undertaken to
promote travel and tourism in the
commonwealth……………………………………………… ..............................….$4,549,000
General Fund……………….………….71.42%
Sports and Entertainment Fund ……….28.58%
7008-1116 For the commonwealth’s local economic development projects; provided
further, that not less than $15,000 shall be expended to Oxford public
schools for transportation needs; provided further than not less than
$15,000 shall be expended to the town of Douglas for IT system
improvements; provided further, that not less than $12,500 shall be
expended to the Westborough public library to purchase a book bike;
provided further, that not less than $500,000 shall be expended to the
Black Economic Council of Massachusetts, Inc.; provided further, that not
140

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
less than $100,000 shall be expended to the town of Wilbraham for the
purchase of materials and installation of permanent bleachers at the
Wilbraham Athletic Facility; provided further, that not less than $20,000
shall be expended to the town of Monson to provide camera coverage with
access control and camera with multi-lens, pan/tilt/zoom camera, switch,
and boom lift for the back parking area of town offices/police station and
the Veterans Field; provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be
expended to the Wilbraham Nature and Cultural Council for tourism,
marketing and advertising purposes; provided further, that not less than
$100,000 shall be expended to Springfield Symphony Orchestra, Inc. for
creating new, diverse concert performances and targeting special events
for youth education and performance opportunities that are vital to
revitalize the performing arts in Springfield; provided further, that not less
than $250,000 shall be expended to Wharf District Council, Inc., for climate
resiliency planning; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to the town of Carlisle for capital improvements and renovations
to the Gleason public library; provided further, that not less than $25,000
shall be expended to the town of Concord for improvements and upgrades
to the playground at the Alcott elementary school; provided further, that
not less than $40,000 shall be expended to the town of Rutland for support
of the engineering and design services necessary to advance the
rehabilitation of the Rutland community pool; provided further, that not less
than $75,000 shall be expended to the city of Framingham to establish a
small business university to provide entrepreneurs with specialized
guidance and support to improve equity and economic development;
provided further, that not less than $85,000 shall be expended to NEADS,
Inc. Service Dogs for Veterans program; provided further, that not less
than $25,000 shall be expended to the city of Lowell for improvements and
upgrades to the Bailey school playground; provided further, that not less
than $50,000 shall be expended to the Quaboag regional school district
academy; provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended
to the town of Ashland for pedestrian accessibility improvements; provided
further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to the city of
Framingham for pedestrian accessibility improvements; provided further,
that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to ABCD North End;
provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the Lynn
Veterans Council to organize the North Shore Veterans and First
Responders Parade; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to the Whitfield-Manjiro Friendship Society, Inc.; provided
further, that not less than $10,000 shall be expended to the city of Fall
River for improvements to Abbott Court playground park; provided further,
that not less than $20,000 shall be expended to the Bellingham senior
center for parking lot improvements; provided further, that not less than
$20,000 shall be expended to the Blackstone-Millville-regional school
district for security system and safety upgrades; provided further, that not
less than $20,000 shall be expended to the town of Uxbridge for planning
of the town’s 300th Anniversary; provided further, that not less than
$20,000 shall be expended to Millville elementary school for a generator
replacement; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be
expended to the town of Pembroke for the planning of the re-use of the
former police station building; provided further, that not less than $50,000
shall be expended to the town of Kingston for the restoration of the Historic
Reed Building; provided further, that not less than $15,000 shall be
expended for Responsible Urbanites For Fido, Inc.; provided further, that
not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the town of Plympton for
infrastructure improvements at the town complex; provided further, that
141

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
not less than $75,000 shall be expended to the town of Danvers for the
replacement of the ceiling at the Peabody Institute library of Danvers;
provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the
Neponset River Regional Chamber of Commerce to support the creation
of a business incubator to assist in the development and growth of new
regional businesses; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to the Everett Haitian Community Center to support youth
enrichment; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended
to the city of Chelsea’s Resiliency Fund; provided further, that not less than
$25,000 shall be expended to the Chelsea Chamber of Commerce for
programming initiatives; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall
be expended to GreenRoots, Inc.; provided further, that not less than
$25,000 shall be expended to La Colaborativa, Inc. to support economic
development; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be
expended to Bay Village Neighborhood Association, Inc.; provided further,
that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the New Bedford Festival
Theatre, Inc.; provided further, that not less than $75,000 shall be
expended to AHA! Art, History & Architecture in the city of New Bedford;
provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the
Frederick Douglass House in the city of New Bedford; provided further,
that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the Cape Verdean
Association of New Bedford; provided further, that not less than $50,000
shall be expended to the Zeiterion Performing Arts Center in city of New
Bedford for production programming; provided further, that not less than
$15,000 shall be expended to Bay State Performing Arts, Inc. in the city of
Boston; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to
the city of Revere for a child safety program; provided further, that not less
than $25,000 shall be expended to the Revere Chamber of Commerce,
Inc.; provided further, that not less than $75,000 shall be expended to the
city of Revere’s senior home improvement fund; provided further, that not
less than $75,000 shall be expended to the city of Revere McMackin field
for infrastructure improvements; provided further, that not less than
$25,000 shall be expended to the town of Hingham to support Revolution
250 celebrations; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to the town of Hull to support Revolution 250 celebrations;
provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the
Cohasset Community Assistance Fund to build capacity and expand its
direct financial assistance program; provided further, that not less than
$25,000 shall be expended to the city of Lynn for the maintenance of
Goldfish Pond; provided further, that not less than $10,000 shall be
expended to Riverwalk Arts, Inc. for improvements along the ten-mile river
walkway; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended
to the Inquilinos Boricuas en Acción, Inc. (IBA Boston) to address critical
technology and programmatic capacity gaps necessary to fully
operationalize IBA – La CASA, and sustain core high-quality educational
and youth development opportunities; provided further, that not less than
$75,000 shall be expended to the Soccer Unity Project Inc. for increasing
play for girls and youth with disabilities, as well as providing programming
for their three new locations in low-income areas; provided further, that not
less than $150,000 shall be expended to the Community Music Center of
Boston; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to
the Cape Verdean Association of Boston; provided further, that not less
than $50,000 shall be expended to the Boston Food Access Council;
provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the
Waltham Chamber of Commerce for staffing; provided further, that not less
than $20,000 shall be expended to the town of Southbridge for veterans’
142

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
monuments; provided further, that not less than $175,000 shall be
expended for Boston Chinatown Post 328 Association; provided further,
that not less than $10,000 shall be expended to the town of New Braintree
for New Braintree 250th Anniversary Celebration; provided further, that not
less than $25,000 shall be expended to ABCD for the operation,
administration and programming of the West End Neighborhood Center;
provided further, that not less than $15,000 shall be expended to the town
of Swansea for the redesign, study, permitting, and engineering of the
intersection at Gardners Neck Road at route 103 and New Gardners Neck
road; provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to
the Boston Landmarks Orchestra, Inc. for the purpose of providing free
public concerts in Boston; provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall
be expended to the town of Great Barrington for upgrades to the assessors
software; provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended
to the town of Burlington to enhance and modernize interior and exterior
signage across the town campus to improve navigation, accessibility, and
compliance with current ADA and safety standards; provided further, that
not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the city of Beverly for
maintenance, repairs, and improvements to the Beverly council on
aging/senior center building; provided further, that not less than $25,000
shall be expended for the Age Strong commission in the city of Boston for
senior programming in the North End, Chinatown, Downtown and Bay
Village neighborhoods of the city of Boston; provided further, that not less
than $20,000 shall be expended to the town of Merrimac to refurbish a
basketball court floor; provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall
be expended to the Fitchburg Public Market for the capital maintenance
costs of the food hub services; provided further, that not less than
$250,000 shall be expended to Latinos for Education, Inc; provided further,
that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the North Quabbin
Chamber of Commerce, Inc; provided further, that not less than $75,000
shall be expended to the historic Chevalier Theatre in Medford; provided
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended for a project
celebrating Fiestas Patronales to its fiscal agent Nueva Esperanza, Inc.;
provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the town
of Hamilton for a backup generator for the historic town hall to ensure
continuity of operations during winter storms; provided further, that not less
than $25,000 shall be expended to the Asian Community Development
Corporation for the purposes of expanding their retirement matched
savings program for low-income Asian elders; provided further, that not
less than $50,000 shall be expended to the Jones library in the town of
Amherst to support the construction of a gender inclusive ADA compliant
restroom; provided further, that not less than $9,000 shall be expended to
the Puerto Rican Art Comic Conference to its fiscal agent, the Holyoke
public library; provided further, that not less than $75,000 shall be
expended to the town of North Reading for flooring maintenance at the
Flint Memorial library in the town of North Reading; provided further, that
not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the town of Bridgewater for
roadway and public safety improvements in Central square; provided
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the Benevento
Little League fields in the town of North Reading; provided further, that not
less than $75,000 shall be expended to Lynnfield middle school auditorium
for lighting and sound repairs, replacement and upgrades; provided
further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the town of
Lynnfield for playground upgrades at Newhall park; provided further, that
not less than $75,000 shall be expended to Boston Village for the purpose
of improving their capacity to expand technological improvements and the
143

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
provision of programming services for older adults; provided further, that
not less than $25,000 shall be expended for the Coconut Grove Memorial
Committee in the city of Boston; provided further, that not less than
$25,000 shall be expended to the town of Raynham to continue building a
gravel parking lot and canoe launch on the Taunton river off South street
west in Raynham; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to Three Saints, Inc. in the city of Lawrence to support
community services and promote Italian heritage; provided further, that not
less than $25,000 shall be expended to the Merrimack Valley Chamber of
Commerce to support business development, networking, and economic
opportunity initiatives in the Merrimack Valley; provided further, that not
less than $50,000 shall be expended to Middleton Council on Aging for the
purchase of an ADA compliant van; provided further, that not less than
$10,000 shall be expended for the development a new Easthampton skate
park; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the
Age Strong commission in the city of Boston for senior programming in the
South End neighborhood in the city of Boston; provided further, that not
less than $50,000 shall be expended for the Boston Chinatown
Neighborhood Center for the purposes of arts and cultural programming
at the Pao Arts Center; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall
be expended to Age Strong commission in the city of Boston for senior
programming in the Dorchester and Roxbury neighborhoods in the city of
Boston; provided further, that not less than $1,000,000 shall be expended
to the New Commonwealth Fund to assist in their work of expanding grant
opportunities for Black and Brown-led nonprofits across the
commonwealth; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to the Springfield Black Chambers community outreach;
provided further, that not less than $10,000 shall be expended for the
Harambee Festival; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended for the Caribbean Festival; provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended to the historic West Medford Community
Center; provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to
the Stoughton Community Center for exterior work; provided further, that
not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the Paul Revere Heritage Site
in the town of Canton; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to the Stone Soul, Inc. Festival; provided further, that not less
than $25,000 shall be expended to Martin Luther King Jr. Family Services,
Inc.; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to
Springfield Partners for Community Action, Inc.; provided further, that not
less than $175,000 shall be expended to the Western Massachusetts
Sports Commission; provided further, that not less than $75,000 shall be
expended to the city known as the town of Agawam for a feasibility study
of a new and modernized recreational center at Perry Lane park; provided
further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the Haymarket
Pushcart Association; provided further, that not less than $150,000 shall
be expended to the city known as the town of West Springfield for
infrastructure improvement projects to Mittineague park; provided further,
that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the Brookline Interactive
Group to support cablecasting and streaming of Brookline town meetings,
hearings and committees to catalyze and maintain vital civic engagement;
provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the
Brookline Teen Center, Inc. for facility upgrades consistent with the YMCA
of Greater Boston merger; provided further, that not less than $75,000
shall be expended to The Urban League of Springfield; provided further,
that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to the Boys & Girls Club of
Greater Haverhill, Inc. for the capital campaign project for the construction
144

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
of a new state of the art facility in the city of Haverhill; provided further, that
not less than $25,000 shall be expended to Whittier Birthplace in Haverhill;
provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall be expended to the
Haverhill Downtown Boxing Club; provided further, that not less than
$10,000 shall be expended to Build Boston LLC for entrepreneurship
programming at the Gateway Academy in Haverhill; provided further, that
not less than $70,000 shall be expended to the town of Westborough for
conducting a study of the Route 9 corridor and abutting lands for various
purposes; provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended
for the North End/Waterfront Resilience Alliance for Climate Resiliency
planning; provided further, that not less than $30,000 shall be expended
to the town of Northborough for sidewalk and roadway projects; provided
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the city of Haverhill
for the purchase of street lighting and pedestrian safety measures;
provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended for
Belchertown Animal Control to replace its current vehicle and acquire
modern animal transport equipment; provided further, that not less than
$20,000 shall be expended to St. Vincent de Paul Diaper Bank; provided
further, that not less than $20,000 shall be expended to Sarah’s Place
Adult Day Health Center, Inc.; provided further, that not less than $350,000
shall be expended to the Westmass Area Development Corporation to
offset and pay any and all costs incurred and related to, but not limited to,
operational costs and expenses involved with the revitalization of the
Ludlow Mills Industrial Complex; provided further, that not less than
$30,000 shall be expended to the town of Hopkinton for energy-efficiency
renovations and upgrades at Hopkinton senior center; provided further,
that not less than $20,000 shall be expended to the town of Millis for the
continued renovation of the original town offices and the revitalization of
unused spaces; provided further, that not less than $10,000 shall be
expended to Springfield Black Tennis program; provided further, that not
less than $200,000 shall be expended to the renovation of laboratory
space and equipment upgrades to support the life and health science
programs at American International College; provided further, that not less
than $50,000 shall be expended to Rites of Passage & Empowerment, Inc.
in the city of Pittsfield to fund supportive programming for young women
of color in Berkshire county; provided further, that not less than $75,000
shall be expended to Berkshire Black Economic Council Inc. for technical
support to Black-owned businesses in the city of Pittsfield; provided
further, that not less than $150,000 shall be expended for Rose Kennedy
Greenway Conservancy; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall
be expended to the Franklin Downtown Partnership, Inc. to promote
economic development in the town of Franklin; provided further, that not
less than $25,000 shall be expended to the town of Acton for the design,
construction and installation of building improvements at the West Acton
Citizens' library, including but not limited to building accessible shelving
units for the storage of all library books, and other related expenses;
provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall be expended to the city
of Attleboro for rehabilitation, redesign, renovation and other costs
associated with the otter exhibit at the Capron Park zoo; provided further,
that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the Dedham Greenspace
Coalition, Inc.; provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be
expended to the Gardner Community Action Committee, Inc. to support
capital improvements and operations; provided further, that not less than
$35,000 shall be expended to North End Athletic Association, Inc. in the
city of Boston; provided further, that not less than $250,000 shall be
expended to the Planning Office for Urban Affairs, Inc. for capital
145

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
improvements for the affordable and workforce housing units at The Hayes
at Railroad Square development in downtown Haverhill; provided further,
that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to Families First to support
their free, multilingual parenting education programs across
Massachusetts, partnering with childcare centers, schools and community
sites to reach families with young children in the commonwealth; provided
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the Age Strong
Commission in the city of Boston for senior programming in the Jamaica
Plain and Roxbury neighborhoods in the city of Boston; provided further,
that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to the Bunker Hill Day
Parade Committee, in the Charlestown section of the city of Boston, for
promoting tourism, production and promotional expenditures; provided
further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the Cape Cod
Cape Verdean Museum and Cultural Center, Inc. in the town of Falmouth
for programs and meeting space expansion; provided further, that not less
than $500,000 shall be expended to the Tufts Cummings School of
Veterinary Medicine; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be
expended to the Cape Cod Children’s Museum in the town of Mashpee for
upgrades to the fire alarm and prevention systems and required ADA
accessibility upgrades; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall
be expended for the North End Historical Society, Inc.; provided further,
that not less than $20,000 shall be expended to the Old Colony YMCA,
Plymouth Branch, for Camp Clark, in recognition of its 100th anniversary,
for the purchase, replacement and installation of new docks on Hyles pond
in Plymouth; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be
expended to Project D.E.E.P Assoc., Inc; provided further, that not less
than $40,000 shall be expended to the Lawrence recreation department
for the procurement of a vehicle to support the department’s efforts to
provide summertime support to the at-risk youth of the city; provided
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to Barnstable public
schools for maintenance and improvements to school playgrounds and
play spaces; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be
expended to North Shore Latino Business Association, Inc. to support
small business development, technical assistance and entrepreneurial
growth initiatives for minority and immigrant-owned businesses in Lynn
and across the North Shore; provided further, that not less than $100,000
shall be expended to the town of Sharon for roadway and pedestrian
safety improvements at the Sharon public library; provided further, that not
less than $50,000 shall be expended to the town of Stoughton for planning
and implementation of Stoughton’s 300th Anniversary Celebration;
provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the town
of Walpole for sidewalk paving and maintenance equipment; provided
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to Paws & Pets &
Prayers Rescue Inc. in the city of Revere for operations costs; provided
further, that not less than $700,000 shall be expended for the 7UICE
Foundation, Inc. to bridge opportunity gaps and empower youth in
underserved communities through education and innovation; provided
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to South End
Baseball; provided further, that not less than $75,000 shall be expended
to the Age Strong Commission in the city of Boston for senior programming
in the Dorchester neighborhood in the city of Boston; provided further, that
not less than $150,000 shall be expended to the Association of Haitian
Women, Inc. in the city of Boston; provided further, that not less than
$25,000 shall be expended to the Haitian Community Partners in the city
of Brockton for staffing and other purposes; provided further, that not less
than $50,000 shall be expended to the Massachusetts Law Enforcement
146

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
Memorial Foundation, Inc. for the maintenance and upkeep of the
Massachusetts law enforcement memorial; provided further, that not less
than $25,000 shall be expended to the town of Carver for the purchase of
a veteran's shuttle bus; provided further, that not less than $250,000 shall
be expended to Revolutionary Spaces, Inc. to address deferred
maintenance and make improvements necessary for the operation of the
Old State House and Old South Meeting House in Boston; provided
further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the Age Strong
Commission in the city of Boston for senior programming in the West End,
Back Bay, Fenway and Beacon Hill neighborhoods in the city of Boston;
provided further, that not less than $500,000 shall be expended to the First
Night Boston Inc. for operations in Boston; provided further, that not less
than $100,000 shall be expended to the Friends of the Public Garden, Inc.
to activate the Brewer Plaza area in the Boston common in Boston to
enhance public safety and quality of life for residents; provided further, that
not less than $150,000 shall be expended to the city of Fall River for
infrastructure upgrades to Lafayette park; provided further, that not less
than $40,000 shall be expended to the Day of Portugal Fall River Inc;
provided further, that not less than $30,000 shall be expended to
Community Connections in the city of Fall River for young adult day
programming; provided further, that not less than $30,000 shall be
expended to the Fall River Arts and Culture Coalition; provided further,
that not less than $250,000 shall be expended to Massachusetts Alliance
for Economic Development, Inc. for technical assistance to the region and
municipalities of the commonwealth; provided further, that not less than
$25,000 shall be expended to the town of Cheshire for improvements to
Cheshire lake; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be
expended to the town of Needham for the contracting of an economic
development consultant; provided further, that not less than $100,000
shall be expended to the Asian Business Empowerment Council in the city
of Boston; provided further, that not less than $200,000 shall be expended
for the St. Francis House in the city of Boston for renovations, repairs and
ongoing maintenance of the day shelter; provided further, that not less
than $25,000 shall be expended to OCA-APAA-NE, INC.; provided further,
that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the Newton Suzuki School
of Music, to improve ADA compliance and add educational and community
space as part of a larger restoration of a 1750 farmhouse housing a full-
day music and arts pre-school serving the greater Newton community and
families throughout eastern Massachusetts; provided further, that not less
than $25,000 shall be expended to the Menino Arts Center, an arts
organization located in the Hyde Park section of the city of Boston;
provided further, that not less than $10,000 shall be expended to the
purposes of the operation of the programs of Riverside Theatre Works,
Inc. located in the Hyde Park section of the city of Boston; provided further,
that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to LGBTQ Senior Housing
Inc. to facilitate access to welcoming, safe and affordable housing for low-
income LGBTQ seniors through development of affordable housing,
inclusive housing services and programming that addresses the needs of
LGBTQ seniors, and to support and preserve open space to serve seniors
in Boston; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended
to the Pond Plain Improvement Association in the city known as the town
of Weymouth; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to Boston’s Forgotten Felines, Inc.; provided further, that not
less than $20,000 shall be expended to the town of Pepperell for the
replacement of carpeting at the Lawrence library; provided further, that not
less than $20,000 shall be expended to the town of Townsend for roof
147

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
repairs at the Townsend library; provided further, that not less than
$40,000 shall be expended to the Hampshire regional school district for
technology, curricular materials, resources, consumables and
professional development; provided further, that not less than $50,000
shall be expended for the replacement or repair of the damaged floating
dock at the state boat ramp located in Westport; provided further, that not
less than $20,000 shall be expended to the city of Fall River for the
purchase of upgrades to Desmarias park for the support and promotion of
outdoor activities; provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall be
expended to the East Springfield Neighborhood Council, Inc. in Springfield
for neighborhood beautification and community engagement; provided
further, that not less than $200,000 shall be expended for the Addiction
Treatment Center of New England, Inc. for the expansion of the three-
quarter step unit program; provided further, that not less than $20,000
shall be expended to the Indian Orchard Citizens Council, Inc. in
Springfield for neighborhood beautification and community engagement;
provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall be expended to the Pine
Point Community Council, Inc. in Springfield for neighborhood
beautification and community engagement; provided further, that not less
than $20,000 shall be expended to the 16 Acres Civic Association in
Springfield for neighborhood beautification and community engagement;
provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to
Springfield Community Resources, Inc; provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended to the Idlewell Educational Improvement
Association Inc. in the city known as the town of Weymouth; provided
further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to the town of
Millbury for the improvements and upgrades of Asa Waters Historical
Mansion; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended
to Millbury public schools for new chromebooks in the town of Millbury;
provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the Ella
Fleming building in the town of Tewksbury for the repair, rehabilitation or
other supporting work; provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall
be expended to Human Relations Service, Inc. in the town of Wellesley to
address the mental and behavioral health needs of families and children;
provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to the town
of Burlington for town campus and public space improvements; provided
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the town of Sterling
for rehabilitation and improvement work at the 1835 Town Hall; provided
further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to the town of
Lancaster for the replacement and upgrade of the HVAC system at the
Thayer Memorial library, including related improvements to support the
long-term maintenance and operation of the facility; provided further, that
not less than $30,000 shall be expended to the Penn’s Hill Neighborhood
Association, Inc. in the city of Quincy; provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended to the town of Clinton for downtown
beautification, including the purchase of furnishings, related improvements
and the installation of drinking water fountains in Depot square and Central
park; provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to
the town of Berlin for the purchase of advanced life support equipment for
its ambulances, including cardiac monitoring, ventilation, ultrasound and
infusion pump equipment; provided further, that not less than $75,000
shall be expended to The Tech Foundry to expand workforce development
and digital literacy programming in Western Massachusetts; provided
further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended for Friends of Herter
Park, Inc. for the maintenance of the outdoor theater in Artesani park with
approval from the department of conservation and recreation; provided
148

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the Age Strong
Commission in the city of Boston for senior programming in the South
Boston neighborhood in the city of Boston; provided further, that not less
than $25,000 shall be expended to the Boston Music Project, Inc. to
provide educational instruction and social-emotional learning practices in
the South Boston section of the city of Boston; provided further, that not
less than $20,000 shall be expended to the town of Milton for purposes of
dugout improvements at Andrews park; provided further, that not less than
$75,000 shall be expended to the restoration of the Edward F. Searles
estate in the city of Methuen; provided further, that not less than $50,000
shall be expended to the Greater Haverhill Chamber of Commerce to
support local businesses and promote the local economy in the Merrimack
Valley; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to
Creative Haverhill, Incorporated in support of their new location in the city
of Haverhill; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended
to the city of Quincy for the Quincy high school baseball field practice
facilities; provided further, that not less than $640,000 shall be expended
to the Adams Presidential Center in the city of Quincy; provided further
that not less than $20,000 shall be expended to Debbie's Treasure Chest,
Inc. to continue their ongoing support of local communities; provided
further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to Irish Cultural
Centre, Inc. for the restoration and improvements of the Cultural Centre in
the town of Canton; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be
expended to Roslindale Village Main Street, Inc. to further support
economic and community development opportunities in its business
district; provided further, that not less than $40,000 shall be expended to
Mutual Aid Eastie to facilitate mutual aid programming in the East Boston
section of the city of Boston; provided further, that not less than $40,000
shall be expended to Neighbors United for a Better East Boston to facilitate
their work in civic engagement and community programming; provided
further, that not less than $40,000 shall be expended to the Center for
Cooperative Development and Solidarity, Inc. in the East Boston section
of the city of Boston to facilitate their work in the community including, but
not limited to, the acquisition of a permanent organization space; provided
further, that not less than $30,000 shall be expended to the Indian Lake
Community Association, Inc.’s Community Teaching Garden Literacy
project located at 149 West Boylston drive in the city of Worcester to
improve infrastructure, programing and design work including, but not
limited to expanding Americans with Disabilities Act compliant accessibility
for all visitors; provided further, that not less than $150,000 shall be
expended to Americans with Disabilities Act compliant pedestrian access
improvements to Woodland park and the surrounding greater
neighborhoods in the town of West Boylston; provided further, that not less
than $100,000 shall be expended to the Latino Economic Development
Corporation, Inc. for start-up and existing small businesses in the
downtown section of the city of Springfield with directed mini-grants to be
used for marketing and direct operational support; provided further, that
not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the Hispanic-American Library,
Inc. in the city of Springfield; provided further, that not less than $50,000
shall be expended to the Women’s Fund of Western Massachusetts, Inc.
in the city of Springfield; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall
be expended to Dress for Success of Western Massachusetts, Inc. in the
city of Springfield; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be
expended to The Spirit of Springfield, Inc. to produce events that provide
a sense of community, civic pride and opportunities for celebration;
provided further, that not less than $10,000 shall be expended to the New
149

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
North Citizens Council, Inc. in the city of Springfield for the Latino Health
Salsa in the Parks Family Summertime Intervention; provided further, that
not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the Greater Springfield
Convention and Visitors Bureau, Inc. for the Latino marketing initiative;
provided further, that not less than $200,000 shall be expended to the
Developspringfield Corporation to offset and pay any and all costs incurred
and related to, but not limited to, operational costs and expenses involved
with the management and revitalization of the Springfield Innovation
Center on Bridge street in the city of Springfield; provided further, that not
less than $25,000 shall be expended to Blues to Green, Inc. for the
operation of the Springfield Jazz & Roots festival; provided further, that not
less than $15,000 shall be expended to East Boston Main Streets to
support their operations and efforts to revitalize signage in neighborhood
business corridors; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to the town of Mansfield to study and create a targeted
economic development strategy that will help modernize industrial areas,
improve infrastructure readiness and position the town for future economic
growth; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to
the town of West Boylston for a landfill monitoring program to prevent the
contamination of groundwater; provided further, that not less than $10,000
shall be expended to the Starboard Institute, Inc. for the development of
the Golden Thread project highlighting history and culture in the East
Boston section of the city of Boston; provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended to the Age Strong Commission in the city of
Boston for senior programming in the East Boston neighborhood in the city
of Boston; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended
to the Garrison-Trotter Neighborhood Association, Inc.; provided further,
that not less than $50,000 shall be expended for the Charles River
Watershed Association to engage with Allston-Brighton residents in
understanding and reviewing the climate resilience implications of planned
development in the Allston-Brighton sections of the city of Boston;
provided further, that not less than $1,000,000 shall be expended to the
New England Aquarium Corporation for their operations in the cities of
Boston and Quincy; provided further, that not less than $175,000 shall be
expended to the Woburn Golf and Ski Authority in the city of Woburn for
capital improvements; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to the Friends of the Robbins Town Gardens, Inc. in the town of
Arlington; provided further, that not less than $45,000 shall be expended
to the Arlington Historical Society; provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended to the town of Tewksbury for water
infrastructure repairs and improvements; provided further, that not less
than $250,000 shall be expended to the city of Waltham for downtown
revitalization as well as public safety infrastructure improvements along
Moody street and in the south side of the city; provided further, that not
less than $25,000 shall be expended to the town of Andover to support
public art; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended
to the town of Boxford for the purchase of a department of public works
dump truck; provided further, that not less than $125,000 shall be
expended for the Let’s Row Boston program administered by Community
Rowing, Inc. in the city of Boston; provided further, that not less than
$10,000 shall be expended to Easton Wings of Hope for youth substance
use prevention; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to the Arc of Greater Brockton for building improvements;
provided further, that not less than $45,000 shall be expended to the town
of North Andover for security cameras at major intersections; provided
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the Nonantum
150

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
Neighborhood Association in the city of Newton; provided further, that not
less than $25,000 shall be expended to St. Mary of Carmen Society in the
Nonantum section of the city of Newton to support families and individuals
in need; and provided further, that not less than $125,000 shall be
expended to the Armenian Cultural Association of America, Inc.
Watertown Education project in the city of Watertown .......................................$18,711,500
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF HOUSING AND LIVABLE COMMUNITIES.
7004-0001 For the operation of the commission on Indian affairs ...............................................$157,954
7004-0099 For the operation of the executive office of housing and livable communities;
provided, that the executive office may make expenditures against federal
grants for certain direct and indirect costs under a cost overhead allocation
plan approved by the comptroller; provided further, that the comptroller shall
maintain an account on the state accounting and reporting system to make
these expenditures; provided further, that not less than $200,000 shall be
expended to Revitalize Community Development Corporation to support
the growth of service to more low-income individuals in need and filling a
gap in serving individuals at home to prevent the need for hospitalization;
provided further, that not less than $40,000 shall be expended for
Maverick Landing Community Services, Inc. to provide information,
education and assistance on housing rights and eviction and foreclosure
issues including, completing and submitting housing assistance
applications for tenants and small homeowners, through a housing support
station in the East Boston section of the city of Boston; provided further,
that expenditures made against the account shall not be subject to
appropriation and may include the cost of personnel; provided further, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the executive
office may conduct annual verifications of household income levels based
upon state tax returns to administer the state and federal housing subsidy
programs funded by items 7004-0108, 7004-9005, 7004-9024, 7004-9030,
7004-9033 and 7004-9316 of this section and items 7004-9009, 7004-9014,
7004-9019 and 7004-9020 of section 2D; provided further, that as a
condition of eligibility or continued occupancy by an applicant or tenant, the
executive office may require disclosure of the social security numbers of the
applicant or tenant and members of the applicant’s or tenant’s household
solely for use in verification of income eligibility; provided further, that the
executive office may deny or terminate participation in subsidy programs for
failure by an applicant or tenant to provide a social security number for use
in verification of income eligibility; provided further, that the executive office
may consult with the department of revenue, the department of transitional
assistance or any other state or federal agency to conduct said income
verification; provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special law
to the contrary, these state agencies shall consult and cooperate with the
executive office and furnish any information in the possession of the
agencies including, but not limited to, tax returns and applications for public
assistance or financial aid; provided further, that in conducting income
verifications, the executive office may enter into an interdepartmental
service agreement with the department of revenue to utilize the department
of revenue’s wage reporting and bank match system to verify the income
and eligibility of participants in federally assisted housing programs and that
of members of the participants’ households; provided further, that
notwithstanding section 12 of chapter 490 of the acts of 1980, the executive
office may authorize neighborhood housing services corporations to retain,
151

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
reassign and reloan funds received in repayment of loans made under the
neighborhood housing services rehabilitation program; provided further, that
not later than September 16, 2026, the executive office shall promulgate
and uniformly enforce regulations clarifying that a household that otherwise
qualifies for any preference or priority for state-subsidized housing based on
homeless or at-risk status shall retain that preference or priority
notwithstanding receipt of assistance that is intended to be temporary
including, but not limited to, any temporary or bridge subsidies provided with
state or federal funds, which shall include households receiving assistance
under item said 7004-0108 after July 1, 2013; provided further, that the
executive office shall operate local offices in the 10 cities and towns in which
the executive office maintained office locations as of January 1, 2026 in
order to continue to accept in-person applications and provide other
services related to the emergency housing assistance program funded by
item 7004-0101; provided further, that the offices shall have sufficient
staffing to determine eligibility promptly and provide other program services
to families; provided further, that the executive office may operate additional
local offices in other municipalities that are geographically convenient to
those families who are experiencing homelessness or are at risk of
homelessness; provided further, that not later than September 2, 2026, the
executive office shall submit a report to the house and senate committees
on ways and means that shall include, but not be limited to, for each local
office: (i) the municipality in which each office is located; (ii) the ways in
which applicants can submit applications and connect with staff, including,
if available, in-person, by telephone and online; (iii) the daily business hours
of in-person and telephonic operation of each office; (iv) the number of full-
time equivalent staff assigned to each office; (v) the average wait time for
direct communication with a staff member whether in-person or by
telephone; and (vi) any steps the executive office plans to take to increase
accessibility to intake services related to emergency housing assistance
programs across the commonwealth; provided further, that at least annually,
the executive office shall conduct staff trainings, which shall include, but not
be limited to, notice of changes in laws related to items of appropriation
under the administration of the executive office; provided further, that the
executive office shall provide the caseload forecasting office with enrollment
data and any other information pertinent to caseload forecasting that is
requested by the office on a monthly basis; and provided further, that such
information shall be provided in a manner that meets all applicable federal
and state privacy and security requirements ........................................................$22,025,301
7004-0100 For the operations of the homeless shelter and services unit, including the
compensation of caseworkers and support personnel; provided, that the
executive office of housing and livable communities shall take steps to
extend intake hours for families seeking assistance from item 7004-0101;
and provided further, that not less than $2,240,000 shall be expended to the
city of Boston for a grant program to providers as contracted service
coordinators, to provide supportive recovery housing, such as sober and
halfway housing, for individuals to continue their recovery ...................................$29,515,982
7004-0101 For certain expenses of the emergency housing assistance program under
section 30 of chapter 23B of the General Laws, including homelessness
prevention, diversion and strategic re-housing, and contracted family
shelters; provided, that eligibility shall be limited to families with incomes at
or below 115 per cent of the 2026 or a later-issued higher federal poverty
level; provided further, that any family whose income exceeds 200 per cent
of the federal poverty level for a sustained and consecutive period of 120
152

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
days while the family is receiving assistance funded by this item shall
become ineligible for assistance; provided further, that families who are
eligible for assistance through a temporary emergency family shelter shall
include families who: (i) are at risk of domestic abuse in their current housing
situation or are homeless because they fled domestic violence and have not
had access to safe, permanent housing since leaving the housing situation
that they fled; (ii) through no fault of their own, are homeless due to fire,
flood or natural disaster; (iii) through no fault of their own, have been subject
to eviction from their most recent housing due to: (a) foreclosure; (b)
condemnation; (c) conduct by a guest or former household member who is
not part of the household seeking emergency shelter and over whose
conduct the remaining household members had no control; or (d)
nonpayment of rent caused by a documented medical condition or
diagnosed disability or caused by a documented loss of income within the
last 12 months directly as a result of a change in household composition or
a loss of income source through no fault of the family; or (iv) are in a housing
situation where they are not the primary leaseholder or are in a housing
situation not meant for human habitation and where there is a substantial
health and safety risk to the family that is likely to result in significant harm
should the family remain in the housing situation; provided further, that not
less than $40,000 shall be expended to Boston GLASS programming
through Justice Resource Institute Health program to reengage the
community into services offered by bolstering its 3 main service areas
which are the drop-in space, STI testing, and therapy; provided further,
that not less than $350,000 shall be expended for Horizons for Homeless
Children, Inc.; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be
expended for Jewish Family Services of Metrowest to develop a
collaborative partnership for implementing innovative housing solutions,
including the education related to and development of accessory dwelling
units; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended for El
Buen Samaritano Food Program, Inc, in partnership with the city of
Worcester’s division of emergency management, to support the creation
and administration of a support center for individuals displaced by building
fires; provided further, that benefits under this item shall only be provided to
families consisting entirely of residents of the commonwealth who are
citizens of the United States or persons lawfully admitted for permanent
residence or otherwise permanently residing under the color of law in the
United States, except in cases where a child in the family is a citizen of the
United States, a person lawfully admitted for permanent residence or a
person permanently residing under color of law in the United States;
provided further, that temporary emergency assistance shall be provided to
families who, on the date of application for emergency assistance, have no
other feasible alternative housing as defined under 760 CMR 67.06(1)(b),
whether in the commonwealth or elsewhere, and who, but for not having
spent 1 night in a public or private place not designed for or ordinarily used
as a regular sleeping accommodation for human beings including, but not
limited to, a car, park, abandoned building, medical facility, bus or train
station, airport or campground, would be eligible for emergency assistance
under clauses (i) to (iv), inclusive; provided further, that the executive office
of housing and livable communities shall submit quarterly reports, broken
down by month, to the house and senate committees on ways and means
detailing expenditures under the preceding proviso, including: (1) the
number of families who received emergency assistance under the
preceding proviso; (2) the number of families entering the emergency
assistance system after having already stayed in a place not meant for
human habitation; (3) the number of families entering the emergency
153

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
assistance system having stayed in a place not meant for human habitation
after having requested services provided for in this item within the preceding
6 months and within the preceding week; (4) the number of families
described under clause (3) who received a written denial of their request for
services prior to staying in a place not meant for human habitation and the
number who neither entered the emergency shelter system nor received a
written denial on the day of their request; and (5) available data on the race
and ethnicity of the families described under clauses (1) to (4) inclusive;
provided further, that nothing contained in this item shall require that
emergency assistance be provided to a family that, on the date of application
for emergency assistance, has other feasible housing as defined under said
760 CMR 67.06(1)(b), whether in the commonwealth or elsewhere, and that
said housing adequately accommodates the size and disabilities of the
family; provided further, that not less than annually, the executive office shall
provide training to relevant staff to ensure compliance with legal
requirements related to eligibility for the emergency housing assistance
program, including eligibility based on a family having no other feasible
alternative housing as defined under said 760 CMR 67.06(1)(b); provided
further, that the executive office shall collaborate with the executive office of
health and human services, the Massachusetts interagency council on
housing and homelessness and family homelessness service providers on
strategies and best practices for the prevention of family homelessness;
provided further, that the health and safety risk shall be determined by the
department of children and families or a department-approved entity through
risk assessments; provided further, that a family who receives emergency
housing assistance due to domestic abuse shall be connected to the
appropriate social service agency; provided further, that temporary
assistance under this item shall be terminated upon the offer of available
housing or other assistance sufficient to maintain or stabilize housing;
provided further, that a family may not decline an offer for available housing
if the offer adequately accommodates the size and disabilities of the family
and the new housing placement would not result in a job loss for the client;
provided further, that any family who declines an adequate offer of available
housing or other assistance sufficient to maintain or stabilize housing shall
become ineligible for assistance from this item; provided further, that
families receiving benefits under this item shall have 30 per cent of their
income set aside in a savings account, subject to reasonable exceptions as
set forth under executive office regulations in effect in fiscal year 2027;
provided further, that the amount saved shall be exempt from otherwise
applicable asset limits; provided further, that the family may withdraw the
amount placed in savings upon transition to permanent housing or losing
eligibility for shelter services; provided further, that families receiving
emergency assistance shall receive housing search assistance that
attempts to facilitate a sustainable housing placement within 4 weeks of
entry into the emergency assistance shelter, motel or hotel; provided further,
that families receiving assistance for longer than 32 weeks shall have an
executable shelter exit plan that facilitates a housing placement in a new
sustainable tenancy or a safe residence including, but not limited to, a
placement for which the family is not the primary leaseholder, as soon as
possible; provided further, that funds may be advanced to contracted
service providers to cover 1-time upfront costs needed to operate shelters;
provided further, that as part of executive office efforts to prevent abuse of
the emergency assistance program, the executive office shall enter into a
wage match agreement with the department of revenue; provided further,
that eligibility for shelter by an otherwise eligible family shall not be impaired
by prior receipt of any non-shelter benefit; provided further, that an eligible
154

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
household that is approved for shelter placement shall be placed in a shelter
as close as possible to the household’s home community, unless a
household requests otherwise; provided further, that if the closest available
placement is not within 20 miles of the household’s home community, the
executive office shall, to the extent practicable, make best efforts to transfer
the household to an appropriate shelter within 20 miles of its home
community at the earliest possible date, unless the household requests
otherwise; provided further, that the executive office shall notify local school
departments of the placement of a family in its district within 5 days of
placement; provided further, that the executive office shall make every effort
to ensure that children receiving services from this item shall continue
attending school in the community in which they lived before receiving
services funded from this item; provided further, that the executive office
shall use its best efforts to ensure that a family placed by the emergency
housing assistance program shall be provided with access to refrigeration
and basic cooking facilities; provided further, that if a family with a child
under the age of 3 is placed in a hotel or motel, the executive office shall
ensure that the hotel or motel provides a crib that meets all state and federal
safety codes for each child under the age of 3; provided further, that the
executive office may require identity and custody verifications needed to
ensure the safety of children prior to placement into shelter; provided further,
that the executive office shall verify, through third-party verification or
otherwise, prior to placement in an emergency shelter, for each emergency
housing assistance applicant, their: (A) identity; (B) Massachusetts
residency; (C) relationship status; (D) pregnancy status; and (E) other
eligibility requirements in this item and pursuant to 760 CMR 67.00 or any
successor regulations; provided further, that the executive office shall not
be required to provide shelter to families who are unable to provide required
verifications pursuant to the previous proviso prior to placement; provided
further, that the executive office may offer a case-specific waiver for exigent
circumstances and at the discretion of the executive office pursuant to
regulations promulgated by the executive office including case-specific
waivers for: (I) an imminent threat of domestic violence; (II) families with a
family member who has a documented disability; (III) a qualified veteran
under clause Forty-third of section 7 of chapter 4 of the General Laws who
is not enrolled in services specifically tailored to veterans including, but not
limited to, those administered by the executive office of veterans services;
and (IV) families with a family member who has a high-risk pregnancy or
who has recently given birth; provided further, that the executive office shall
require each applicant for emergency housing assistance program benefits
to establish residency in the commonwealth; provided further, that an
applicant shall be required to show an intent to remain in in the
commonwealth, which may be shown through sources of verification
accepted by the executive office pursuant to regulations, including
documentation showing a person receives MassHealth, documentation
showing a person receives public benefits in the commonwealth, a bill or
other insurance documentation with an address, email, letter or statement
from a licensed health care worker on office letterhead or office email stating
that the person lives in the commonwealth or a photo identification issued
by the commonwealth; provided further, that families receiving shelter
benefits who are found ineligible for continuing shelter benefits shall be
eligible for aid pending a timely appeal under said chapter 23B; provided
further, that this item shall be subject to appropriation and in the event of a
deficiency, nothing in this item shall give rise to or shall be construed as
giving rise to any enforceable right or entitlement to services in excess of
the amounts appropriated in this item; provided further, that notwithstanding
155

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
any general or special law to the contrary, not less than 90 days before
promulgating or amending any regulations, administrative practices or
policies that would alter eligibility for or the level of benefits under this
program, other than that which would benefit the clients, the executive office
shall submit a report to the joint committee on children, families and persons
with disabilities, the house and senate committees on ways and means and
the clerks of the house of representatives and the senate setting forth
justification for such changes including, but not limited to, any determination
by the secretary of housing and livable communities that available
appropriations will be insufficient to meet projected expenses and the
projected savings from any proposed changes; provided further, that no
funds from this item shall be expended for personnel or administrative costs;
provided further, that the executive office shall submit quarterly reports,
broken down by month, to the house and senate committees on ways and
means detailing emergency assistance system capacity; provided further,
that the executive office shall submit quarterly reports to the house and
senate committees on ways and means, broken down by month, with the
most recently available monthly data, including data on the race and
ethnicity of all families where available and applicable expressed as a
percentage of the total, on: (1) applications for services provided for in this
item and in item 7004-0108 and requests for services under this item and
item 7004-0108, with a request for services defined as any point at which
the household seeking services provides information to the executive office
as part of any enrollment, triage or eligibility determination, regardless of
whether a formal application is completed and regardless of whether the
contact is by telephone, by office visit or by other means; (2) front-door
entries into the emergency assistance system; (3) applications and requests
for services provided for in this item and in said item 7004-0108 that are
denied and the bases of all such denials expressed as a percentage of the
total; (4) applications and requests for services provided for in this item and
in said item 7004-0108 that do not result in a formal denial, a front-door entry
into the emergency assistance system or verified diversion as a result of
HomeBASE household assistance expressed as a percentage of the total;
(5) the number of households submitting multiple applications or making
multiple requests for services within the previous 1-month period and the
previous 6-month period; (6) diversions as a result of HomeBASE
household assistance; (7) exits from the emergency assistance system,
delineated by reason for exit, including at-fault terminations, exits because
the household is no longer income eligible, exits through HomeBASE
household assistance with no other subsidy and exits to affordable,
subsidized or otherwise assisted housing; (8) the number of applications
and requests that do not result in the household entering emergency
assistance shelter within 48 hours and for which such non-entry is
attributable to each of the following: written denial, pending documentation
or verifications, no imminent homelessness or household withdrawal of the
application; (9) the average, minimum and maximum cost per family of
emergency assistance under this item; (10) the number of families served
under this item who required further assistance under this item or under said
item 7004-0108 at a later date; (11) the type of assistance later required and
provided; (12) the total number of families receiving assistance under item
7004-0101 that have received assistance under this item or said item 7004-
0108 during each of the previous 1, 2 and 3 years; (13) the number of
children served under this item broken down by age; (14) the number of
applications and requests from households that became homeless within 12
months of depleting their HomeBASE household assistance under said item
7004-0108; (15) the reasons for homelessness in the applications and
156

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
requests received under clause (14) and the number of applications and
requests received under said clause (14) that are denied; and (16) the
average and maximum length of stay for families currently staying in an
emergency assistance shelter placement; provided further, that said
quarterly reports shall also include the following information from the
department of children and families: (I) the number of families assessed for
a health and safety risk in the previous quarter; (II) the number of families
determined to be at a substantial health and safety risk; (III) the number of
families receiving multiple health and safety assessments within the
previous 6-month period; and (IV) the standards used to determine a
substantial health and safety risk; provided further, that said quarterly
reports shall also include: (i) the number of families that applied for a transfer
from their current shelter placement to a unit that can accommodate their
disability-related needs, delineated by reason for the application; (ii) the
number of families whose applications for reasonable accommodation have
been approved but that are waiting for transfer due to lack of available units
able to accommodate their disability-related needs, delineated by category
of accommodation including, but not limited to, access to cooking facilities,
first-floor or elevator access, non-carpeted unit, physical modification to unit,
scattered site unit, geographic proximity to service providers and wheelchair
accessibility; (iii) the number of families currently in shelter units located
more than 20 miles away from their home community; (iv) the number of
families with at least 1 child who attends a school other than the child’s
school of origin as a result of placement in a shelter unit outside of their
home community; (v) both the average and maximum number of days that
families spend in placements under the circumstances described in clauses
(ii) to (iv), inclusive, prior to being transferred to a shelter unit for which none
of the circumstances in said clauses (ii) to (iv), inclusive, apply; (vi) the
percentage of applications for a transfer that were approved; and (vii) the
average number of days and the maximum number of days between the
application submission and the approval; provided further, that funds shall
be expended on shelter units suitable to meet the needs of households with
disabilities requiring reasonable accommodation; and provided further, that
funds shall be expended for expenses incurred as a result of families being
housed in hotels due to the unavailability of contracted shelter beds ................$259,100,649
7004-0102 For the homelessness program to assist individuals who are homeless or in
danger of becoming homeless, including assistance to organizations that
provide shelter, transitional housing and services that help individuals avoid
entry into shelters or successfully exit shelters; provided, that no
organization providing services to the homeless shall receive less than an
average per bed, per night rate of $25; provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended for the United Way of Pioneer Valley on behalf
of the Western Massachusetts Network to End Homelessness to facilitate
regional coordination across Hampden, Hampshire, Franklin and
Berkshire Counties to prevent and end homelessness with a Housing First
approach that centers around racial equity; provided further, that no funds
shall be expended for costs associated with the homeless management
information system; provided further, that the executive office shall submit
quarterly reports to the house and senate committees on ways and means
on the contracts awarded to service providers; provided further, that the
reports shall include, but not be limited to: (i) each contracted service
provider; (ii) the amount of the contracts; (iii) a description of the services to
be provided; (iv) the length of said contract; and (v) the date upon which
each contract was executed; provided further, that not less than
$95,000,000 appropriated in this item shall be allocated to contracted
157

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
service providers of homeless individuals in fiscal year 2020; and provided
further, that programs currently providing shelter may renegotiate how to
use said program's shelter fund, with the agreement of the executive office
and the host municipality, to provide alternative services proven to be
effective, including housing first models, transitional housing and diversion
away from shelters ..............................................................................................$115,050,000
7004-0104 For the home and healthy for good program operated by the Massachusetts
Housing and Shelter Alliance, Inc. to reduce the incidence of chronic and
long-term homelessness in the commonwealth; provided, that not less than
$250,000 shall be expended to continue a supportive housing initiative for
unaccompanied homeless young adults who identify as lesbian, gay,
bisexual, transgender, queer or questioning; provided further, that the
Massachusetts Housing and Shelter Alliance, Inc. shall be solely
responsible for the administration of this program; provided further, that not
later than March 3, 2027, the Massachusetts Housing and Shelter Alliance,
Inc. shall submit a report to the executive office of housing and livable
communities, the joint committee on housing, the house and senate
committees on ways and means and the clerks of the house of
representatives and the senate, detailing: (i) the number of people served,
including available demographic information; (ii) the average cost per
participant; (iii) whether participants have previously received services from
the executive office; and (iv) any projected cost-savings to the
commonwealth associated with this program; and provided further, that not
less than $500,000 shall be expended to the Massachusetts Housing and
Shelter Alliance, Inc. for the purpose of promotion, resource development
and technical assistance related to the creation of permanent supportive
housing for persons with disabilities who are experiencing homelessness
and other solutions to homelessness ......................................................................$8,890,000
7004-0105 For permanent supportive housing units to house individuals experiencing
homelessness and mitigate overcrowding in homeless shelters; provided,
that not less than $2,100,000 may be expended to sustain low-threshold
sponsor-based leasing that had been previously linked to the pay-for-
success projects funded through the Social Innovation Financing Trust Fund
established under section 35VV of chapter 10 of the General Laws; provided
further, that the executive office of housing and livable communities shall
prioritize geographic equity when expending funds from this item; provided
further, that the executive office may contract directly with the organizations
that received Social Innovation Financing vouchers funded under item 7004-
9024 in fiscal year 2022; and provided further, that not later than March 3,
2027, the executive office shall submit a report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means detailing the distribution methodology and
locations of units supported by this item ...............................................................$10,072,875
7004-0106 For the continued implementation and evaluation of the homeless family
preference in private multi-family housing program established by New
Lease for Homeless Families, Inc. .............................................................................$250,000
7004-0107 For the administration of local housing programs; provided, that not less
than $125,000 shall be expended for the Friendly House, Inc. in the city of
Worcester; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended
for the Quinsigamond Village Community Center,Inc. at Greenwood park
in the city of Worcester; provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall
be expended to the Housing Assistance Corporation for the development
of housing and project feasibility studies to expedite the creation of year-
158

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
round housing, and for technical assistance related to accessory dwelling
units for year-round rentals; provided further that not less than $50,000
shall be expended to Action for Boston Community Development, Inc. to
support its mobile homeless outreach team in the cities of Everett, Malden,
Medford, and Boston; provided further that not less than $50,000 shall be
expended to Housing Families Inc. homeless children program in Malden;
provided further, that not less than $30,000 shall be expended to Emmaus,
Inc. to support their shelter and services to the homeless population of
Haverhill; provided further, that not less than $5,000 shall be expended to
the North Attleborough Housing Authority to purchase furniture and other
needs for the properties’ common areas; provided, that not less than
$5,000 shall be expended to the Mansfield Housing Authority to purchase
furniture and other needs for the properties’ common areas; provided
further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the Greater
Lawrence Community Action Council, Inc. to support the Heal Lawrence
program in providing critical emergency relocation assistance,
comprehensive stabilization services, and proactive community education
for families displaced by fires and other residential emergencies in the city
of Lawrence; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be
expended to Quincy Community Action Programs, Inc. for homelessness
prevention service; provided further, that not less than $500,000 shall be
expended for the Saving Towards Affordable and Sustainable
Homeownership program administered by the Massachusetts Affordable
Homeownership Alliance, Inc. to assist first-generation homebuyers in a
regionally equitable manner to benefit communities throughout the
commonwealth; and provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be
expended for a van for the Housing Corporation of Arlington ..............................$1,065,000
7004-0108 For a program of short-term housing assistance to help families eligible for
temporary emergency shelter under item 7004-0101 in addressing
obstacles to maintaining or securing housing; provided, that the assistance
shall include not less than 12 months of housing stabilization and economic
self-sufficiency case management services for each family receiving
benefits under this item; provided further, that a family shall not receive more
than $30,000 in a 24-month period from this item; provided further, the
executive office of housing and livable communities shall provide household
assistance in an amount up to $15,000, or a higher cap established in item
7004-0108, for a subsequent 12-month period to eligible families; provided
further, that not more than $2,500,000 shall be made available to
administering agencies for circumstances in which the administering agency
believes an award greater than $30,000 in a 24-month period is essential to
resolve a housing crisis, in accordance with guidance from the executive
office of housing and livable communities; provided further, that so long as
a family meets the requirements of its housing stabilization plan, a family
that received household assistance under this item whose income increases
shall not become ineligible for assistance due to exceeding the income limit
for the first 12 months from the date their income initially increased; provided
further, that a family shall not be deemed ineligible as a result of any single
violation of a self-sufficiency plan; provided further, that the executive office
of housing and livable communities shall take all steps necessary to enforce
regulations to prevent abuse in the short-term housing transition program,
including a wage match agreement with the department of revenue;
provided further, that a family that was terminated from the program or did
not make a good faith effort to follow its housing stabilization plan during the
term of its assistance shall be ineligible for benefits under said item 7004-
0101 and this item for 12 months from the last date the family received
159

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
financial assistance under said item 7004-0101 and this item; provided
further, that a family’s housing stabilization plan shall adequately
accommodate the ages and disabilities of the family members; provided
further, that families receiving benefits under this program who are found
ineligible for continuing benefits shall be eligible for aid pending a timely
appeal under chapter 23B of the General Laws; provided further, that
families who are denied assistance under this item may appeal that denial
under said chapter 23B, including subsection (F) of section 30 of said
chapter 23B and regulations adopted to implement said chapter 23B;
provided further, that the executive office, as a condition of continued
eligibility for assistance under this program, may require disclosure of social
security numbers by all members of a family receiving assistance under this
item for use in verification of income with other agencies, departments and
executive offices; provided further, that if a family member fails to provide a
social security number for use in verifying the family's income and eligibility,
then the family shall no longer be eligible to receive benefits from this
program; provided further, that the executive office shall administer this
program through the following agencies unless administering agencies are
otherwise procured by the executive office: the Hearthway, Inc.; Central
Massachusetts Housing Alliance, Inc.; Community Teamwork Inc.; the
Housing Assistance Corporation; the Franklin county regional housing and
redevelopment authority; Way Finders, Inc.; Metropolitan Boston Housing
Partnership, Inc., d/b/a Metro Housing Boston; the Lynn Housing Authority
Development Group, Inc.; the South Middlesex Opportunity Council, Inc.;
NeighborWorks LLC; and RCAP Solutions, Inc.; provided further, that the
executive office shall reallocate funding based on performance-based
statistics from underperforming service providers to above average service
providers in order to move as many families from hotels, motels or shelters
into more sustainable housing; provided further, that the executive office
shall use funds provided under this program for stabilization workers to
focus efforts on housing retention and to link households to supports,
including job training, education, job search and child care opportunities
available, and may enter into agreements with other public and private
agencies for the provision of such services; provided further, that a
stabilization worker shall be assigned to each household; provided further,
that funds shall be used to more rapidly transition families served by the
program into temporary or permanent sustainable housing; provided further,
that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, not less than
90 days before promulgating or amending any regulation, administrative
practice or policy that would alter eligibility for or the level of benefits under
this program to less than the benefit level available on June 30, 2026, the
executive office shall submit a report to the house and senate committees
on ways and means and the clerks of the house of representatives and the
senate setting forth the justification for such changes including, but not
limited to, any determination by the secretary of housing and livable
communities that available appropriations will be insufficient to meet
projected expenses; provided further, that the executive office shall submit
quarterly reports to the house and senate committees on ways and means,
which shall include, but not be limited to, the: (i) number of families served,
including available demographic information, as well as the number of
children served under this item broken down by age; (ii) type of assistance
given; (iii) average, minimum and maximum cost per family of said
assistance; (iv) total number of families receiving benefits under said item
7004-0101 that have received assistance under this item during the
previous 1, 2 and 3 years, including available demographic information; (v)
the amount of shelter exits created by this line item; and (vi) the amount of
160

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
families diverted from emergency assistance shelters; provided further, that
the executive office shall expend funds under this item on families residing
in temporary emergency shelters and family residential treatment or sober
living programs under item 4512-0200 if said families otherwise meet all
eligibility requirements applicable to emergency shelter under said item
7004-0101, except that, solely for the purposes of this item, the fact that a
family is in a family residential treatment or sober living program under said
item 4512-0200 shall not preclude said family from receiving assistance;
provided further, that this item shall be subject to appropriation and, in the
event of a deficiency, nothing in this item shall give rise to, or shall be
construed as giving rise to, any enforceable right or entitlement to services
in excess of the amounts appropriated in this item; provided further, the
executive office of housing and livable communities shall submit quarterly
reports to the house and senate committees on ways and means, which
shall include, but not be limited to, efforts made to work in collaboration with
the office for refugees and immigrants and resettlement agencies; and
provided further, that household assistance funds shall be advanced to the
administering agencies at the end of each month and before the next
month's disbursement, the amount of which shall be estimated based on the
prior month’s expenditure with a reconciliation not less than annually .................$82,322,001
7004-0109 For the shelter workforce development initiative, to provide pathways to
careers in fields related to housing and homelessness; provided, that funds
shall be expended to address barriers to obtaining and sustaining shelter
employment including, but not limited to, transportation, loan repayment,
tuition or certification fee reimbursement and child care; provided further,
that, not less than $5,000,000 be made available to shelters contracted
through item 7004-0101; provided further, that not less than $5,000,000 be
made available to shelters contracted through item 7004-0102; and
provided further, that not later than March 3, 2027, the secretary of housing
and livable communities shall submit a report to the joint committee on
housing and the house and senate committees on ways and means
detailing the expenditures and hiring outcomes of the program ......................$10,000,000
7004-0111 For the provision of grants to support winter shelter beds for homeless
individuals and overnight warming center capacity; provided, that grants be
for a period no greater than 6 months to ensure flexibility to meet emergent
needs each winter ...................................................................................................$8,000,000
7004-0202 For the rapid transition of homeless individuals into sustainable permanent
housing; provided, that programs under this item shall be administered by
direct service providers contracted under item 7004-0102; provided further,
that these programs may include, but shall not be limited to, vocational
training, temporary assistance and permanent supportive housing; and
provided further, that not later than February 3, 2027, the executive office of
housing and livable communities shall submit a report to the house and
senate committees on ways and means on the: (i) total number of people
served; (ii) total number of people transitioned into permanent housing; (iii)
types of programs implemented; (iv) vocational training programs,
delineated by job type; (v) number of people participating in said training
programs; (vi) number of people who transitioned from said training
programs into full time employment; (vii) number of people exiting the shelter
system as a result of full time employment; and (viii) number of people
diverted from the shelter system ...........................................................................$5,000,000
161

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
7004-3036 For housing services and counseling; provided, that funds shall be
expended as grants to 9 regional housing consumer education centers
operated by the regional nonprofit housing authorities; provided further, that
the grants shall be awarded through a competitive application process under
criteria established by the executive office of housing and livable
communities; provided further, that the executive office shall submit annual
reports to the secretary of administration and finance, the house and senate
committees on ways and means and the joint committee on housing
detailing all expenditures of the program, including each regional housing
consumer education center, the total number of persons who received
information and referral services, the costs for such services rendered per
consumer and the identification of consumer issues and trends; provided
further, that not later than January 4, 2027, the executive office shall submit
a report to the house and senate committees on ways and means on
possible savings and efficiencies that may be realized through the
consolidation of said services; and provided further, that not less than
$200,000 shall be made available to the Regional Housing Network of
Massachusetts, Inc. for coordination and information technology ..........................$5,200,000
7004-4314 For the expenses of a service coordinators program established by the
executive office of housing and livable communities to assist tenants
residing in housing developed under sections 39 and 40 of chapter 121B of
the General Laws ....................................................................................................$6,500,000
7004-9005 For subsidies to housing authorities and nonprofit organizations, including
funds for deficiencies caused by certain reduced rentals in housing for the
elderly, handicapped, veterans, families and relocated persons under
sections 32 and 40 of chapter 121B of the General Laws; provided, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, all housing
authorities operating elderly public housing shall offer first preference for
elderly public housing units that are vacant on the effective date of this act,
and thereafter, to those persons 60 years of age or older as of June 30,
2026 receiving rental assistance from the Massachusetts rental voucher
program; provided further, that the executive office of housing and livable
communities may expend funds appropriated under this item for deficiencies
caused by certain reduced rentals that may be anticipated in the operation
of housing authorities for the first quarter of the subsequent fiscal year;
provided further, that no funds shall be expended from this item to reimburse
the debt service reserve included in the budgets of housing authorities;
provided further, that not less than $15,000 shall be expended for
necessary repairs within the Norwell Housing Authority in the town of
Norwell; provided further, that not less than $15,000 shall be expended for
necessary repairs within the Rockland Housing Authority in the town of
Rockland; provided further, that no funds shall be expended from this item
in the AA object class for the compensation of state employees; provided
further, that the amount appropriated in this item shall be considered to meet
all obligations under said sections 32 and 40 of said chapter 121B; provided
further, that new reduced rental units developed in fiscal year 2027 and
eligible for subsidies under this item shall not cause any annualization that
results in an amount exceeding the amount appropriated in this item;
provided further, that all funds in excess of normal utilities, operations and
maintenance costs may be expended for capital repairs; and provided
further, that the executive office shall make every attempt to direct efforts
toward rehabilitating housing authority family units requiring $10,000 or less
in repairs ..............................................................................................................$117,840,000
162

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
7004-9007 For costs associated with the implementation of the duties of the executive
office of housing and livable communities under chapter 235 of the acts of
2014; provided, that in conjunction with said duties, funds may be expended
on the creation and implementation of an information technology platform
for state-aided public housing to be administered by the executive office;
and provided further, that the executive office, in making changes to said
information technology platform, shall collaborate and coordinate with
housing authorities to ensure equitable and effective systems ..............................$1,243,831
7004-9024 For the Massachusetts rental voucher program to provide rental assistance
for low-income families and elderly persons through mobile and project-
based vouchers; provided, that the income of eligible households shall not
exceed 80 per cent of the area median income; provided further, that the
executive office of housing and livable communities may require that not
less than 75 per cent of newly issued vouchers be targeted to households
whose income at initial occupancy does not exceed 30 per cent of the area
median income; provided further, that the executive office may award mobile
vouchers to eligible households currently occupying project-based units that
shall expire due to the non-renewal of project-based rental assistance
contracts; provided further, that the executive office, as a condition of
continued eligibility for vouchers and voucher payments, may require
disclosure of social security numbers by participants and members of a
participant’s household in the Massachusetts rental voucher program for
use in verification of income with other agencies, departments and executive
offices; provided further, that if a participant or member of a participant’s
household fails to provide a social security number for use in verifying the
household’s income and eligibility, then that household shall no longer be
eligible for a voucher or to receive benefits from the voucher program;
provided further, that a household receiving assistance with a project-based
voucher shall pay 30 per cent of its monthly net income towards gross rent,
with gross rent defined as the contract rent plus an amount allowed by the
executive office for tenant-paid utilities, except that the household payment
in any project-based unit that is subsidized under another federal or state
subsidy or public housing program shall be subject to applicable limits on
tenant-paid rent under such federal or state program; provided further, that
until the implementation of such payment standard, the monthly dollar
amount of each voucher shall be the executive office-approved monthly rent
of the unit less the monthly amount paid for rent by the household; provided
further, that any household that is proven to have caused intentional
damage to its rental unit in an amount exceeding 2 months of rent during
any 1-year period shall be terminated from the program; provided further,
that if the use of a mobile voucher is or has been discontinued, then the
mobile voucher shall be reassigned; provided further, that the executive
office shall pay regional administering agencies not less than $50 per
voucher per month for the costs of administering the program; provided
further, that subsidies shall not be reduced due to the cost of inspections;
provided further, that the executive office shall provide assistance using a
payment standard so that the required household payment for a household
choosing a unit with gross rent less than or equal to the payment standard
shall be not more than 30 per cent of the household’s monthly adjusted
income, with gross rent defined as the contract rent plus an amount allowed
by the executive office for tenant-paid utilities; provided further, that the
payment standard shall be set, at the discretion of the executive office, at
either 110 per cent of the current area-wide fair market rent or 110 per cent
of the current small area fair market rent, both as established by the United
States Department of Housing and Urban Development for the same size
163

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
of dwelling unit in the same region, except as necessary as a reasonable
accommodation for a household member with a disability or as otherwise
directed by the executive office, except that a reduction by the United States
Department of Housing and Urban Development in such fair market rental
shall not reduce the payment standard applied to a household continuing to
reside in a unit without a change in voucher size for which the household
was receiving assistance at the time the fair market rent or small area fair
market rent was reduced; provided further, that if the gross rent for the unit
does not exceed the applicable payment standard, the monthly assistance
payment for the household for a mobile voucher shall be equal to the gross
rent less the required household payment; provided further, that for a
household receiving a mobile voucher under this item, if the household
chooses a unit with a gross rent that exceeds the applicable payment
standard, the monthly assistance payment for the household shall be limited
to the amount by which the applicable payment standard exceeds 30 per
cent of the monthly adjusted income of the household; provided further, that
even if a household with tenant-based assistance chooses a unit with gross
rent exceeding the payment standard, at the time the household initially
receives tenant-based assistance with respect to any dwelling, the total
amount that the household may be required to pay for gross rent, including
the amount by which the gross rent exceeds the payment standard, shall
not exceed 40 per cent of the monthly adjusted income of the household at
the time the household initially receives tenant-based assistance with
respect to any dwelling; provided further, that households receiving tenant-
based assistance under this section may pay more than 40 per cent of the
monthly adjusted income of the household, at their option; provided further,
that the executive office shall establish the amounts of the mobile and
project-based vouchers so that the appropriation in this item shall not be
exceeded by payments for rental assistance and administration; provided
further, that the executive office shall not enter into commitments that shall
cause it to exceed the appropriation set forth in this item; provided further,
that participating local housing authorities may take all steps necessary to
enable them to transfer mobile voucher program participants from the
Massachusetts rental voucher program into another housing subsidy
program; provided further, that the executive office’s approved monthly rent
limits for mobile vouchers issued or leased on or after July 1, 2026 shall be
equal to 110 per cent of the area-wide or small area fair market rent, except
as necessary as a reasonable accommodation for a household member
with a disability, as determined by the executive office, based on unit size
as established annually by the United States Department of Housing and
Urban Development; provided further, that the requested rent level for
mobile vouchers shall be determined reasonable by the administering
agency; provided further, that for mobile vouchers currently leased, the new
rent limit shall not begin until the anniversary date of the lease; provided
further, that the executive office may assist housing authorities at their
written request, in the immediate implementation of a homeless prevention
program utilizing alternative housing resources available to them for low-
income families and the elderly by designating participants in the
Massachusetts rental voucher program as at risk of displacement by public
action through no fault of their own; provided further, that not later than
December 2, 2026, the executive office of housing and livable communities
shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways and
means and the joint committee on housing on the utilization of rental
vouchers during the last 3 fiscal years under this item and item 7004-9030;
provided further, that the report shall include, but not be limited to, the: (i)
number and average value of rental vouchers currently distributed in the
164

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
commonwealth in each county and in each municipality; (ii) average number
of days that it takes for a household to utilize a voucher after receiving it
from the administering agency; (iii) number of households that reach the
date by which they must lease up their voucher without having found an
available unit; (iv) number of households that apply for an extension by the
deadline to lease up their voucher and the number of extensions granted;
(v) actions taken by the executive office to reduce the wait time for
households to lease up their voucher; (vi) number of distributed vouchers
available to be utilized; (vii) number and type of new vouchers issued after
July 1, 2026, including the costs associated with each type of new voucher;
(viii) number of families on a waitlist for an available rental voucher; (ix)
average number of days that it takes for project-based vouchers awarded
by the executive office to be utilized after the award is made; (x) number of
new project-based vouchers delineated by project, including the: (A) type of
housing; and (B) number of affordable units including area median income
levels and total rental cost to the household; and (xi) obstacles faced by the
executive office in its efforts to provide the information detailed in the
preceding provisos, if applicable; provided further, that the report shall
comply with state and federal privacy standards; and provided further, that
the executive office may expend funds from this item for costs related to the
completion of the voucher management system, prior appropriation
continued .............................................................................................................$281,341,728
7004-9030 For the rental assistance program established in section 16 of chapter 179
of the acts of 1995; provided, that notwithstanding any general or special
law to the contrary, assistance may be provided in the form of either mobile
vouchers or project-based vouchers; provided further, that the vouchers
shall be in varying dollar amounts set by the executive office of housing and
livable communities based on considerations including, but not limited to,
household size, composition, income and geographic location; provided
further, that the executive office’s approved monthly rent limits for vouchers
newly issued or leased after a date set by the executive office, but not later
than June 30, 2027, shall be set, at the discretion of the executive office, at
either up to 110 per cent of the current area-wide fair market rent or up to
110 per cent of the current small area fair market rent, except as necessary
as a reasonable accommodation for a household member with a disability
or as otherwise directed by the executive office, both based on unit size as
established annually by the United States Department of Housing and
Urban Development for the same size of dwelling unit in the same region;
provided further, that the requested rent level for vouchers shall be
determined reasonable by the administering agency; provided further, that
for vouchers currently leased, the new rent limit shall not begin until the
anniversary date of the lease; provided further, that any household that is
proven to have caused intentional damage to its rental unit in an amount
exceeding 2 months of rent during any 1-year period shall be terminated
from the program; provided further, that notwithstanding any general or
special law to the contrary, there shall be no maximum percentage
applicable to the amount of income paid for rent by each household holding
a mobile voucher; provided further, that each household shall be required to
pay not less than 25 per cent of its net income as defined under regulations
promulgated by the executive office for units if payment of utilities is not
provided by the unit owner or not less than 30 per cent of its income for units
if payment of utilities is provided by the unit owner; provided further, that
payments for the rental assistance program may be provided in advance;
provided further, that the executive office shall establish the amounts of the
mobile vouchers so that the appropriation in this item is not exceeded by
165

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
payments for rental assistance and administration; provided further, that the
executive office shall not enter into commitments that shall cause it to
exceed the appropriation set forth in this item; provided further, that the
amount of a rental assistance voucher payment for an eligible household
shall not exceed the rent less the household’s minimum rent obligation; and
provided further, that not later than December 16, 2026, the executive office
shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways and
means detailing: (i) expenditures from this item; (ii) the number of
outstanding rental vouchers; and (iii) the number and types of units leased,
prior appropriation continued .................................................................................$19,263,183
7004-9033 For rental subsidies to eligible clients of the department of mental health;
provided, that the executive office of housing and livable communities shall
establish the amounts of such subsidies so that payment of the rental
subsidies and of any other commitments from this item shall not exceed the
amount appropriated in this item ...........................................................................$20,000,000
7004-9034 For a housing assistance for re-entry transition pilot program; provided, that
the program shall be administered by the executive office of housing and
livable communities in consultation with the executive office of public safety
and security; provided further, that funds shall be expended for rental
subsidies to participants in re-entry programs funded under items 8000-
0655 and 8900-1100 and nonprofit re-entry programs serving participants
returning to the community from a county correctional facility or state prison;
provided further, that the executive office of housing and livable
communities shall establish the amount of said subsidies so that executive
office spending does not exceed the amount appropriated; provided further,
that not less than $200,000 shall be expended to Justice 4 Housing, Inc
for housing, vocational and family reunification services for justice involved
individuals; and provided further, that not later than October 2, 2026, the
executive office shall report to the house and senate committees on ways
and means on the program design and implementation, including the: (i)
amount proposed for said subsidies; (ii) estimated number of individuals
who would qualify for said subsidies, including the methodology for
determining said subsidy amounts; (iii) number of individuals who qualify for
said subsidies, including available demographic information; (iv) planned
distribution of funds; (v) other re-entry services and programs available to
said participants; and (vi) amount of average subsidy in fiscal year 2027
compared to the preceding 2 fiscal years, prior appropriation continued ..............$3,200,000
7004-9315 For the executive office of housing and livable communities, which may
expend for the administration and monitoring of the low-income housing tax
credit and local administration programs not more than $3,651,061 from
fees collected under these programs; provided, that funds may be expended
for the costs of administering and monitoring the programs, including the
costs of personnel, subject to the approval of the secretary of housing and
livable communities; and provided further, that notwithstanding any general
or special law to the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing
discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
expenditures, the executive office may incur expenses and the comptroller
may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this
authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state
accounting system ...................................................................................................$3,651,061
7004-9316 For a program to provide assistance in addressing obstacles to maintaining
or securing housing for families with a household income: (i) not more than
166

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
30 per cent of area median income who are homeless and moving into
subsidized or private housing or are at risk of becoming homeless; or (ii)
more than 30 per cent but not more than 50 per cent of area median income
who are homeless and moving into subsidized or private housing or are at
risk of becoming homeless due to a significant reduction of income or
increased expenses; provided, that assistance shall be administered by the
executive office of housing and livable communities through contracts with
the regional HomeBASE agencies; provided further, that not less than 50
per cent of the funds shall be provided to households with an income not
more than 30 per cent of area median income, subject to the executive
office’s discretion based on data reflecting program demand and usage;
provided further, that in distributing 50 per cent of the funds, the executive
office shall prioritize those families most likely to otherwise require shelter
services under item 7004-0101; provided further, that the amount of
financial assistance shall not exceed $7,000 in any 12-month period;
provided further, not less than $60,000 shall be expended to Northern
Bristol County Assistance Collaborative for costs associated with the
construction of low to mid-income senior housing; provided further, that
residential assistance payments may be made through direct vendor
payments according to standards to be established by the executive office;
provided further, that the agencies shall establish a system for referring
families approved for residential assistance payments, who the agencies
determine would benefit from these services, to existing community-based
programs that provide additional housing stabilization supports, including
assistance in obtaining housing subsidies and locating alternative housing
that is safe and affordable for any such families; provided further, that the
program shall be administered under guidelines established by the
executive office; provided further, that income verification shall be
conducted by using: (a) documentation provided by the household, requiring
the same documentation and process used to conduct income verification
under this item in fiscal year 2026 or fewer documents as directed by the
executive office; (b) third-party income verification; or (c) validated receipt of
certain MassHealth or department of transitional assistance benefits
demonstrating that the household earns less than 50 per cent of area
median income; provided further, that the manner in which income
verification is conducted shall be at the discretion of the executive office but
that the executive office shall not discontinue the use of said options for
income verification listed in the preceding proviso; provided further, that the
executive office shall allow a short, simple application requiring minimal
processing time; provided further, that the executive office shall submit
quarterly reports to the house and senate committees on ways and means
detailing the: (1) number of families who applied for assistance; (2) number
of families approved for assistance; (3) minimum, median and average
amount of financial assistance awarded; (4) total amount of assistance
awarded to date, including a breakdown by income category; and (5)
number of families falling into each income category; provided further, that
the executive office shall track a family’s reason for assistance by the same
categories used in said item 7004-0101; provided further, that not less than
$3,000,000 shall be expended to provide assistance to households of all
sizes and configurations including, but not limited to, elders, persons with
disabilities and unaccompanied youths; provided further, that household
assistance funds shall be advanced to the administering agencies at the end
of each month and prior to the next month’s disbursement, the amount of
which shall be estimated based on the prior month’s expenditure with a
reconciliation not less than annually; provided further, that notwithstanding
clauses (i) and (ii), funds shall be expended to families and individuals who
167

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
are at risk of injury or harm due to domestic violence in their current housing
situation and whose household income is not more than 60 per cent of the
area median income; provided further, that families and individuals that are
at risk of injury or harm from domestic violence who meet the qualifications
of enrollment in the address confidentiality program shall be afforded the
opportunity to register with and become enrolled in the address
confidentiality program as offered by the secretary of the commonwealth;
and provided further, that the executive office shall distribute funds under
this item as well as federal sources and other public and private sources of
short-term rental and mortgage assistance in a manner that prioritizes
geographic equity ................................................................................................$210,060,000
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF EDUCATION.
Office of the Secretary.
7009-1700 For the operation of information technology services within the executive
office of education .................................................................................................$28,086,218
7009-6379 For the operation of the office of the secretary of education ..................................$3,372,215
7009-6600 For the development and initial implementation of high-quality early
college programs; provided, that such programs shall incorporate the
guiding principles of designated early college pathways, as developed jointly
by the department of higher education and the department of elementary
and secondary education; provided further, that priority shall be given to
programs that serve students who are currently underrepresented in college;
provided further, that not less than $175,000 shall be expended to
Westfield State University, for early college programming for nursing and
health science pathways to support labor force development with western
Massachusetts hospitals and health care providers; provided further, that
not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the Cape Cod Maritime
Museum, Inc. for the expansion of youth access to summer programming
of Blue Economy History; and provided further, that funds may be expended
for programs or activities during the summer months ..........................................$15,200,000
DEPARTMENT OF ELEMENTARY AND SECONDARY EDUCATION.
7010-0005 For the operation of the department of elementary and secondary
education; provided, that notwithstanding chapter 66A of the General Laws,
the department of elementary and secondary education, the department of
early education and care, the department of children and families and the
disabled persons protection commission may share with each other
personal data regarding students who receive services in special education
programs approved, licensed, monitored or regulated by the department of
elementary and secondary education and the department of early education
and care to carry out their respective responsibilities under state and federal
law; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the
town of Winchester for the implementation of literacy programming in the
Winchester public school system; and provided further, that the department
of elementary and secondary education may fund direct support to teachers
and administrators who are providing services to assist in state education
initiatives ................................................................................................................$13,464,723
168

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
7010-0012 For grants to cities, towns and regional school districts for payments of
certain costs and related expenses for the program to eliminate racial
imbalance, established under section 12A of chapter 76 of the General
Laws; provided, that funds shall be made available for payment for services
rendered by the Metropolitan Council for Educational Opportunity (METCO),
Inc. and Springfield public schools; provided further, that all grant
applications submitted to and approved by the department of elementary
and secondary education shall include a detailed line item budget specifying
how such funds shall be allocated and expended; provided further, that not
later than January 4, 2027, the department shall submit a report to the joint
committee on education and the house and senate committees on ways and
means on the impact of the grant program on student outcomes, the
expenditure of funds by districts and the extent to which the services
rendered by METCO support the goals of the grant program; and provided
further, that funds appropriated in this item for fiscal year 2027 shall not
revert to the General Fund but shall be available until December 31, 2027 ........$35,000,000
7010-0033 For literacy and early literacy grant programs; provided, that literacy and
early literacy programs receiving funding through this item shall submit
ongoing evaluations and documentation of outcomes to the department of
elementary and secondary education; provided further, that said evaluations
shall be compared to measurable goals and benchmarks developed by the
department; provided further, that not less than $440,000 shall be expended
for HILL for Literacy, Inc.; provided further, that funds provided to HILL for
Literacy, Inc. in fiscal year 2027, may be expended through June 30, 2028;
and provided further, that funds may be expended for programs or activities
during the summer months ......................................................................................$5,706,750
7010-1192 For grants to cities, towns, school districts and nonprofit entities for
educational improvement projects; provided, that not less than $75,000
shall be expended to Leominster public schools for the purpose of
launching new adult and after hours educational vocational programming;
provided further, that not less than $70,000 shall be expended to Monson
public schools, for the purchase of 280 chromebooks to sustain equitable
access to instructional technology; provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended for the E-Team Machinist Program in the city
of Lynn; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to
the city of Chicopee for financial assistance and waivers for applications
in youth sports programs; provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall
be expended for youth programs at Dennison Memorial Community
Center, Inc. in New Bedford; provided further, that not less than $150,000
shall be expended to the city of Boston for a study of the redevelopment
and economically integrated housing at Jackson Mann community center
complex in the Union Square section of Allston in the city of Boston;
provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended for a grant
to Collaborative for Educational Services, Inc. located in the city of
Northampton for the trauma-informed Hampshire county initiative;
provided further, that not less than $10,000 shall be expended to the
Kiwanis Club for the purpose of expanding assistance for local students
pursuing higher education in Massachusetts; provided further, that not less
than $100,000 shall be expended to the city of Medford for Robotics 360
programming for elementary and high school students; provided further,
that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the city of Medford for
transportation to career technical education co-op programming for
students in the city of Medford; provided further that not less than $25,000
shall be expended to Easton public schools for programming with Raising
169

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
Multicultural Kids; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to the Taunton Performing Arts Center for the purchase of their
building; provided further, that not less than $30,000 shall be expended to
the town of Salisbury for repairs to the Salisbury elementary school
playground; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended
to Third Sector New England, Inc. for the Commonwealth Seminar to
support its civic education, training, and leadership program focused on
underserved communities; provided further, that not less than $100,000
shall be expended to the Coalition for Anti-Racism and Equity, Inc. and the
Commonwealth Seminar for a joint fellowship program for high school and
college students from underrepresented communities of color; provided
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to Beyond Soccer,
Inc. for innovative health, athletic and leadership programming for low-
income youth in the city of Lawrence; provided further, that not less than
$25,000 shall be expended to Kinetic Smiles, Inc. to support youth cycling,
fitness, and wellness programming for children in the city of Lawrence and
surrounding communities; provided further, that not less than $20,000
shall be expended to the Hill View Montessori Foundation, Inc. for a
security system at Hill View Montessori Charter Public School; provided
further, that not less than $75,000 shall be expended to the city known as
the town of North Attleborough for the construction of a new playground
for the Community School; provided further, that not less than $40,000
shall be expended to the town of Mansfield for renovation, repair and
replacement of equipment at the Mansfield high school auditorium;
provided further, that not less than $5,000 shall be expended to Unique
Steps Dance Academy in North Attleborough; provided further, that not
less than $100,000 shall be expended to the Dedham Education
Foundation, Inc. to support their mission of student enrichment programs
for Dedham public schools; ; provided further, that not less than $25,000
shall be expended to Haverhill public schools for the renovation of the
Haverhill high school weight room and related athletic activities; provided
further, that not less than $150,000 shall be expended to Braintree public
schools for mental health services; provided further, that not less than
$100,000 shall be expended for the All Dorchester Sports League, Inc. for
educational support, nutrition, and other community benefits; provided
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to Asociación
Carnavalesca de Massachusetts, Inc. in the city of Lawrence, to highlight
the colorful tradition of Dominican Carnival in the Merrimack Valley and to
provide at-risk youth with assistance programming and after school
activities; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended
to Instituto Cultural de Puerto Rico, Inc. in the City of Lawrence, to highlight
the colorful tradition of Puerto Rican culture in the Merrimack Valley;
provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to Ateneo
Dominicano Del Merrimack Valley to maintain and promote Dominican
culture throughout the Merrimack Valley through history, literature, arts,
customs, and family values; provided further, that not less than $25,000
shall be expended to the P2P Basketball Corp. for the costs of expanding
their programming to serve youth in Salem; provided further, that not less
than $50,000 shall be expended for grants to support hands-on CPR
training in public schools across the commonwealth; provided further, that
not less than $250,000 shall be expended for Catie’s Closet, Inc. to
provide students in schools with a high percentage of low-income and
homeless students with: (i) in-school access to clothing, toiletries, and
basic necessities; and (ii) community-based resources including, but not
limited to, social services, mental health services and behavioral health
services; provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall be expended
170

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
to the Lunenburg public schools for technology upgrades; provided further,
that not less than $10,000 shall be expended to the Acushnet council on
aging and community center to replace its outdated HVAC system;
provided further, that not less than $10,000 shall be expended to the
Westport public schools for the replacement of HVAC filters, parts, and
service; provided further, that not less than $10,000 shall be expended to
the Acushnet public schools for the replacement of HVAC filters, parts,
and service; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended
for Community Investors, Inc.’s PowerPlay Initiative in the town of
Wellesley in support of the expansion of an inclusive after-school and out-
of-school-time recreational program at urban and suburban
Massachusetts schools; provided further, that not less than $15,000 shall
be expended to the West Newton Cinema Foundation, Inc. for accessibility
improvements; provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be
expended to BPE, Inc., to support the educator career pathways program;
provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the
Newton Cultural Alliance, Inc./The Allen Center for the purchasing of
equipment and related technical support to expand access; provided
further, that not less than $125,000 shall be expended to Stonehill College
for the development of a nursing simulation lab to enhance clinical training
and expand the health workforce pipeline; provided further, that not less
than $100,000 shall be expended to the John F. Kennedy Library for the
expansion and modernization of digital infrastructure; provided further,
that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the Community Music
School of Springfield, Inc.; provided further, that not less than $50,000
shall be expended to Newton public schools for professional development
opportunities for educators including diversity, equity and inclusion
initiatives and to support a leadership network across the Newton public
schools; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to
Woburn public schools for computer lab upgrades at the Woburn memorial
high school in the city of Woburn; provided further, that not less than
$20,000 shall be expended to the Cuniff Elementary School
Parent/Caregiver Teacher Organization in the city of Watertown to
improve the academic and social experiences of students through
enhanced volunteer partnerships between students, parents, caregivers
and teachers; provided further, that not less than $200,000 shall be
expended to the city of Worcester for the Recreation Worcester program;
provided further, that not less than $200,000 shall be expended to the
Behavioral Health Integrated Resources for Children (BIRCH) project for
the operations of the school-based behavioral health technical assistance
center; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to
the Belmont public schools for stipends for afterschool programs; and
provided further, that not less than $15,000 shall be expended to Belmont
Against Racism for afterschool transportation and other student
programing; provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, no funds shall be transferred from this item to any other item of
appropriation; and provided further, that funds shall be expended fully and,
on a schedule, consistent with the provisions of section 9B of chapter 29 of
the General Laws ....................................................................................................$2,895,000
7010-1196 For programs and services offered by Smart from the Start, Inc. to promote
the healthy development of young children and their families living in
underserved communities in the city of Boston through trauma-informed,
multi-generational family support and community engagement ................................$500,000
171

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
7027-0019 For school-to-career connecting activities; provided, that notwithstanding
any general or special law to the contrary, the board of elementary and
secondary education, in cooperation with the executive office of labor and
workforce development and the state workforce investment board, may
establish and support a public-private partnership to link high school
students with economic and learning opportunities on the job as part of the
school-to-career transition program; provided further, that this program may
include the award of matching grants to workforce investment boards or
other local public-private partnerships involving local community job
commitments and worksite learning opportunities for students; provided
further, that the grants shall require at least a 200 per cent match in wages
for the students from private sector participants; provided further, that the
program shall include, but not be limited to, a provision that business leaders
commit resources to pay salaries, to provide mentoring and instruction on
the job and to work closely with teachers; provided further, that public funds
shall pay for the costs of connecting schools and businesses to ensure that
students serve productively on the job; provided further, that not less than
$200,000 shall be expended to Girls Inc. for the operation of the SMART
and Eureka programs at the Framingham, Holyoke, Lowell, Lynn, Pittsfield
and Worcester chapters of Girls Inc.; and provided further, that the program
shall partner with the YouthWorks program at the Commonwealth
Corporation to develop appropriate connections between the 2 programs ...........$6,672,801
7027-0020 For the implementation, operation and expansion of innovation pathway
programs; provided, that such programs shall incorporate the guiding
principles of innovation pathway programs, as developed jointly by the
department of elementary and secondary education and the department of
higher education; and provided further, that preference shall be given to
programs that encourage career opportunities in high demand
industries .................................................................................................................$4,764,496
7027-1004 For services that improve outcomes for English language learners,
including, but not limited to, English language acquisition professional
development to improve the academic performance of English language
learners; provided, that funds shall be expended to implement the programs
under chapter 71A of the General Laws; provided further, that funds may be
expended for the professional development of vocational-technical
educators who educate English language learners; provided further, that
funds may be expended to administer the requirements under chapter 138
of the acts of 2017; provided further, that not less than $1,000,000 shall
be expended on grants to high-quality, intensive English language learning
programs in districts serving gateway municipalities as defined under
section 3A of chapter 23A of the General Laws; provided further, that funds
shall be expended for districts to provide support for middle and high school
students deemed to be at risk of dropping out of school as a result of
language barriers or challenges in English language acquisition; provided
further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the Hudson
Maynard Adult Learning Center; and provided further, that funds may be
expended for programs or activities during the summer months ...........................$3,762,905
7028-0031 For the expenses of school-age children in institutional schools under
section 12 of chapter 71B of the General Laws; provided, that the
department of elementary and secondary education may provide special
education services to eligible incarcerated persons in houses of correction;
provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to
Fundacion CEMDPCD to support, educate, and advocate on behalf of low-
172

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
income parents of students with learning disabilities in the city of
Lawrence; and provided further, that the department of elementary and
secondary education shall continue to collaborate with the department of
youth services to align curriculum at the department of youth services with
the statewide curriculum frameworks and to support the reintegration of
youth from facilities at the department of youth services into regular public
school settings .........................................................................................................$8,775,748
7035-0001 For a program to be run by the department of elementary and secondary
education for planning grants and implementation grants for regional and
local partnerships to expand existing and develop new career and technical
education programs, including the establishment and support of career
technical institutes, including technical institutes established in chapter 74
of the General Laws; provided, that preference shall be given in awarding
planning and implementation grants to vocational schools with demonstrable
waitlists for admission ..............................................................................................$3,087,315
7035-0002 For the provision and improvement of adult basic education services;
provided, that grants shall be distributed to a diverse network of
organizations that have demonstrated a commitment and an effectiveness in
the provision of such services and that are selected competitively by the
department of elementary and secondary education; provided further, that
such grants shall support the successful transition of students from other
adult basic education programs to community college certificate and
degree-granting programs; provided further, that the grants shall be
contingent upon satisfactory levels of performance as defined and
determined by the department; provided further, that preference in awarding
grants shall be given to organizations providing services to high percentages
of parents of infants, toddlers and preschool and school-age children;
provided further, that funds shall be expended to reduce the waitlist of
students for English language learning services; provided further, that
grants shall not be considered an entitlement to a grant recipient; provided
further, that the department shall consult with community colleges and other
service providers in supporting and implementing content, performance and
professional standards for adult basic education programs and services;
provided further, that the department shall fund a professional development
system to provide training and support for adult basic education programs
and services; provided further, that funds shall be expended on phase 2
pay-for-performance contracts based on outcomes-based contract
measuring and funding services that result in employment and wage gains
and that require bridge funding while final performance results are being
analyzed; and provided further, that efforts shall be taken to reduce the wait
list ...........................................................................................................................$58,391,405
7035-0006 For reimbursements to regional school districts for the transportation of
pupils; provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, the commonwealth’s obligation shall not exceed the amount
appropriated in this item; provided further, that the department of elementary
and secondary education shall explore alternative transportation delivery,
contracting and reimbursement models to identify possible economical and
efficient approaches by which districts can transport students to public
schools and related opportunities; provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended to the town of Hopedale for the planning,
design and implementation of a security system for the Hopedale Junior
Senior High School; and provided further, that not later than February 2,
2027, the department shall submit the results of its review to the joint
173

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
committee on education, the house and senate committees on ways and
means and the executive office for administration and finance ...........................$57,162,492
7035-0008 For reimbursements to cities, towns and regional school districts for the cost
of transportation of nonresident pupils as required by the federal McKinney-
Vento Homeless Assistance Act, Public Law 100-77, as amended; provided,
that not later than February 12, 2027, the department of elementary and
secondary education shall submit to the house and senate committees on
ways and means a preliminary estimate of the costs eligible for
reimbursement under this item in fiscal year 2028; and provided further, that
the commonwealth’s obligation shall not exceed the amount appropriated in
this item .................................................................................................................$35,219,466
7035-0035 For a competitively bid, statewide, performance-based integrated program to
increase participation and performance in advanced placement courses,
particularly among underserved populations, to prepare students for college
and career success in science, technology, engineering, mathematics and
English; provided, that funds shall support all of the following program
elements for each school: (i) open access to courses; (ii) identifying
underserved students and increasing their rates of participation in advanced
placement courses; (iii) equipment and supplies for new and expanded
advanced placement courses; (iv) support for the costs of advanced
placement exams; and (v) support for student study sessions; provided
further, that these funds may support teacher professional development,
including a College Board-endorsed advanced placement summer institute
for math, science and English advanced placement teachers; provided
further, that said program shall provide a matching amount of not less than
$1,000,000 in private funding for direct support of educators; provided
further, that funds shall be disbursed by the beginning of the 2026-2027
school year to cover costs expended between August 3, 2026 and July 30,
2027, inclusive; provided further, that this program shall work in conjunction
with an existing, separately funded, statewide pre-advanced placement
program; and provided further, that funds may be expended for programs
or activities during the summer months ................................................................$2,250,320
7053-1909 For reimbursements to cities and towns for partial assistance in the
furnishing of lunches to school children, including partial assistance in the
furnishing of lunches to school children under section 6 of chapter 548 of
the acts of 1948, as inserted by chapter 538 of the acts of 1951, and for
supplementing funds allocated for the special milk program; provided, that
authorized payments in the aggregate for partial assistance in the furnishing
of lunches to school children shall not exceed the required state revenue
match contained in the National School Lunch Act, 42 U.S.C. 1751 et seq.,
as amended, and implementing regulations; and provided further, that all
cities and towns shall publish and disseminate meal charge policies in
accordance with the United States Department of Agriculture guidance
memorandum SP 46-2016, issued July 8, 2016, in a format that is easily
accessible and, if possible, made available for parents and guardians before
the start of the 2026-2027 school year, but not later than September 30,
2026 .........................................................................................................................$5,314,176
7053-1925 For the school breakfast program for public and nonpublic schools and for
grants to improve summer food programs during the summer school
vacation period; provided, that within the summer food program, priority
shall be given to extending such programs for the full summer vacation
period and promoting increased participation in such programs; provided
174

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
further, that the department of elementary and secondary education shall
solicit proposals from returning sponsors and school food authorities in time
for implementation of such grant program during the summer of 2027;
provided further, that such grants shall only be awarded to sponsors who
can demonstrate their intent to offer full summer programs or increase
participation; provided further, that the department shall require sufficient
reporting from each grantee to measure the success of such grant program;
provided further, that not later than April 1, 2027, the department shall select
grantees for the program authorized by this item; provided further, that funds
shall be expended for the universal school breakfast program through which
all children in schools receiving funds under such program shall be provided
free, nutritious breakfast; provided further, that subject to regulations by the
board of education that specify time and learning standards, breakfast shall
be served during regular school hours; provided further, that participation
shall be limited to those elementary schools mandated to serve breakfast
under section 1C of chapter 69 of the General Laws where not less than 60
per cent of the students are eligible for free or reduced price meals under
the federally funded school meals program; provided further, that not later
than November 13, 2026, the department shall select school sites for
programs authorized by this item and shall report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means on the preliminary results of these grants
not later than February 5, 2027; provided further, that kindergarten to grade
12, inclusive, public schools that are required to serve breakfast under said
section 1C of said chapter 69 and where not less than 60 per cent of students
are eligible for free or reduced price meals shall offer school breakfast after
the instructional day has begun and the tardy bell rings; provided further,
that not later than September 4, 2026, the department shall submit a report
to the house and senate committees on ways and means on the status of
school district compliance with this requirement including, but not limited to,
all data regarding breakfast-delivery models utilized and participation rates;
and provided further, that not less than $700,000 shall be expended for a
grant with Project Bread-The Walk for Hunger, Inc., to enhance and expand
the summer food service outreach program and the school breakfast
outreach program, prior appropriation continued ....................................................$4,429,965
7061-0008 For school aid to cities, towns, regional school districts, counties
maintaining agricultural schools, independent vocational schools and
independent agricultural and technical schools to be distributed under
chapters 70 and 76 of the General Laws and section 3 ..................................$7,055,613,071
General Fund ........................................................93.70%
Student Opportunity Act Investment Fund ..............5.67%
Education Fund .......................................................0.63%
7061-0012 For the reimbursement of extraordinary special education costs under
section 5A of chapter 71B of the General Laws; provided, that the approved
costs threshold for fiscal year 2027 shall be as defined in said section 5A of
said chapter 71B and the program shall reimburse municipalities for both
the eligible instructional costs and for the cost of required out-of-district
transportation associated with implementing individual education plans of
students receiving special education services in a manner consistent with
said section 5A of said chapter 71B; provided further, that notwithstanding
section 27 of chapter 132 of the acts of 2019, the program shall reimburse
75 per cent of all required out-of-district transportation costs eligible for
reimbursement in fiscal year 2027; provided further, that reimbursements
shall be prorated as necessary so that the expenses of this item shall not
175

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
exceed the amount appropriated in this item; provided further, that upon
receipt by the department of elementary and secondary education of
required special education cost reports from school districts, the department
of elementary and secondary education shall reimburse districts based on
fiscal year 2026 claims; provided further, that the department of elementary
and secondary education may expend funds to continue and expand
voluntary residential placement prevention programs between the
department of elementary and secondary education and other departments
within the executive office of health and human services that develop
community-based support services for children and their families; provided
further, that the department of elementary and secondary education shall
provide not less than $10,500,000 to the department of developmental
services for the voluntary residential placement prevention program;
provided further, that the department of elementary and secondary
education shall fully cooperate in providing information and assistance
necessary for the department of developmental services to maximize
federal reimbursement and to effectively serve students in less restrictive
settings; provided further, that not less than $750,000 shall be expended for
students with intellectual disabilities through the Massachusetts chapter of
Best Buddies International, Inc.; provided further, that the department of
elementary and secondary education shall expend not less than $200,000:
(i) to provide books in accessible synthetic audio format that are made
available through the National Instructional Materials Access Center
repository; and (ii) for outreach to and training of teachers and students on
the use of National Instructional Materials Accessibility Standard format and
the use of human speech audio digital textbooks; provided further, that the
department of elementary and secondary education shall expend funds for
the costs of borrowing audio textbooks by special education students;
provided further, that funds may be expended for the monitoring and follow-
up activities of the department of elementary and secondary education’s
complaint management system, review and approval of local educational
authority applications and local school districts’ compliance with the
requirements of part B of the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, as
amended in 2004, by the Individuals with Disabilities Education
Improvement Act of 2004, Public Law 108-446, 20 U.S.C. 1400 et seq., in
the provision of special education and related services to children with
disabilities; provided further, that funds may be expended to administer the
reimbursements funded in this item; provided further, that funds may be
expended to reimburse districts for extraordinary increases in costs incurred
during fiscal year 2027 that would be reimbursable under said section 5A of
said chapter 71B; provided further, that reimbursements for current year
costs shall be limited to school districts that experience increases of greater
than 25 per cent from costs reimbursable under said section 5A of said
chapter 71B and incurred during fiscal year 2026 to costs reimbursable
under said section 5A of said chapter 71B and incurred during fiscal year
2027 or other cases of extraordinary hardship where special education costs
increase in relationship to total district costs as the department of elementary
and secondary education may define through regulations or guidelines;
provided further, that reimbursements for current year costs shall be
allocated as 1-time grants and shall not decrease reimbursements in the
following fiscal year; provided further, that the department of elementary and
secondary education shall conduct audits of fiscal year 2026 claims;
provided further, that if the fiscal year 2026 claims are found to be
inaccurate, the department of elementary and secondary education shall
recalculate the fiscal year 2027 reimbursement amount and adjust the third
and fourth quarter payments to the districts to reflect the new reimbursement
176

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
amount; provided further, that not later than January 29, 2027, the
department of elementary and secondary education shall submit a report to
the house and senate committees on ways and means on the results of the
audit; and provided further, that not later than February 26, 2027, the
department of elementary and secondary education shall submit to the
house and senate committees on ways and means a preliminary estimate
of the costs eligible for reimbursement through this item in fiscal year 2028,
prior appropriation continued ...............................................................................$653,444,886
General Fund ........................................................74.27%
Student Opportunity Act Investment Fund ............25.73%
7061-0029 For the office of school and district accountability established in section
55A of chapter 15 of the General Laws; provided, that notwithstanding said
section 55A of said chapter 15, the office shall perform not less than 20
school district audits for fiscal year 2027 ................................................................$1,599,268
7061-0033 For a reserve to assist towns negatively impacted by shortfalls in federal
impact aid for the education of children in families employed by the federal
government on military reservations located within a town’s limits; provided,
that any grants provided under this item shall be expended by a school
committee without further appropriation and provided further, that not less
than $150,000 shall be expended to the town of Lincoln to mitigate the
costs of educating the children of retired-military families ....................................$1,432,545
7061-9010 For fiscal year 2027 reimbursements to certain cities, towns and regional
school districts of charter school tuition and the per-pupil capital facilities
component included in the charter school tuition amount for commonwealth
charter schools, as calculated under subsections (ff) and (gg) of section 89
of chapter 71 of the General Laws; provided, that notwithstanding said
subsection (ff) of said section 89 of said chapter 71 or any other general or
special law to the contrary, the per-pupil capital facilities component of the
commonwealth charter school tuition rate for fiscal year 2027 shall be
$1,288; provided further, that under section 25 of chapter 132 of the acts of
2019, the department shall provide under this appropriation not less than 100
per cent of the total eligible state obligation in fiscal year 2027; and provided
further, that if the amount appropriated is insufficient to fully fund all
reimbursements required by said section 89 of said chapter 71, the
department shall fund the reimbursements in accordance with the following
priorities: (i) the payment of the first year tuition for students previously
enrolled in a private or parochial school or students who are homeschooled;
(ii) the payment of tuition for siblings where required by subsection (i) of said
section 89 of said chapter 71; (iii) the per-pupil capital facilities component;
(iv) the 100 per cent increase reimbursement; and (v) the remaining increase
reimbursements, beginning with the most recent year .......................................$200,402,605
7061-9200 For the department’s education data analysis and support for local districts ..........$1,302,145
7061-9400 For student and school assessment, including the administration of the
Massachusetts Comprehensive Assessment System exam established by
the board of elementary and secondary education under sections 1D and 1I
of chapter 69 of the General Laws and for grants to school districts to
develop portfolio assessments for use in individual classrooms as an
enhancement to student assessment; provided, that the portfolio
assessments shall not replace the statewide standardized assessment
based on the curriculum frameworks; provided further, that funds may be
177

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
expended for any further exams approved by the board under said sections;
provided further, that funds may also be expended on the development and
implementation of related curriculum standards and instructional support;
provided further, that the department of elementary and secondary
education shall expend funds for school and student assessment in
accordance with the determination made by the board of elementary and
secondary education as to the method of assessment in the 2026-2027
school year; provided further, that funds may be expended for the
development of new high school assessments and assessments in history
and social science; and provided further, that all school assessments shall
center on the academic standards embodied in the curriculum frameworks
and shall involve gauges which shall be relevant and meaningful to
students, parents, teachers, administrators and taxpayers under the first
paragraph of said section 1I of said chapter 69 ....................................................$40,832,690
7061-9406 For a statewide college and career readiness program implemented by
JFYNetWorks, a nonprofit corporation, to: (i) provide online instructional
curricula to help students meet the Massachusetts state standards at each
grade level and reduce learning loss and achievement gaps; and (ii) prepare
students for required assessments and college placement tests in middle
and high schools .........................................................................................................$875,000
7061-9408 For targeted assistance and support to schools and districts at risk of or
determined to be underperforming or chronically underperforming under
sections 1J and 1K of chapter 69 of the General Laws, including schools
and districts that have been identified as in need of “focused
support/targeted support” or “broad/comprehensive support” within the
state’s framework for accountability and assistance under departmental
regulations and guidelines; provided, that no funds shall be expended in any
school or district that fails to file a comprehensive school or district plan
under section 1I of said chapter 69; provided further, that the department
shall only approve reform plans with proven, replicable results in improving
student performance, using research-based effective practices for
turnaround to build multi-tiered systems of support; provided further, that the
department shall only prioritize funding for turnaround efforts which are
based on the turnaround practices identified by the department as key focus
areas for successful school turnaround including, but not limited to: (i)
leadership, shared responsibility and professional collaboration; (ii)
intentional practices for improving student instruction; (iii) student-specific
supports and instruction provided to all students; and (iv) school climate and
culture that provide a safe, orderly and respectful environment for students
and families; provided further, that in carrying out this item, the department
may contract with school support specialists, turnaround partners and such
other external assistance as necessary in the expert opinion of the
commissioner of elementary and secondary education to successfully turn
around failing school and district performance; provided further, that no
funds shall be expended on targeted assistance unless the department has
approved, as part of the comprehensive district improvement plan, a
professional development plan that addresses the needs of the district as
determined by the department; provided further, that grants made under this
item shall be awarded in coordination with the departments of early
education and care and higher education; provided further, that funds shall
be available for the establishment of a new school leadership initiative
through cohort-based training and coaching; provided further, that funds
may be expended for the purchase of instructional materials under section
57 of chapter 15 of the General Laws; provided further, that no funds shall
178

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
be expended on instructional materials except where the purchase of such
materials is part of a comprehensive plan to align the school or district
curriculum with the Massachusetts curriculum frameworks; provided further,
that preference in distributing funds shall be given to proposals that
coordinate reform efforts within all schools in a district in order to prevent
conflicts between multiple reforms and interventions among the schools,
and which demonstrate innovative approaches that have improved student
performance including, but not limited to, partnerships between community-
based organizations and school districts; provided further, that not later than
January 15, 2027, the department shall submit a report describing and
analyzing all targeted assistance efforts funded by this item; provided
further, that the report shall be submitted to the secretary of administration
and finance, the senate president, the speaker of the house, the house and
senate committees on ways and means and the joint committee on
education; provided further, that no funds shall be expended on recurring
school or school district expenditures unless the department and school
district have developed a long-term plan to fund such expenditures from the
district’s operational budget; provided further, that for the purposes of this
item, appropriated funds may be expended for programs or activities during
the summer months; provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be
expended for the recruitment and training of educators offered by Teach
for America Massachusetts to expand the teacher corps to address
teacher vacancies in high need public schools and to close achievement
gaps; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the
Gravel Pit Academy Foundation for the expansion of equitable access to
high-quality athletic development and educational support for underserved
youth across the south shore; and provided further, that any funds
distributed from this item to a city, town or regional school district shall be
deposited with the treasurer of such city, town or regional school district and
held in a separate account and shall be expended by the school committee
of such city, town or regional school district without further appropriation,
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary ..................................$16,533,966
7061-9601 For the department of elementary and secondary education; provided, that
the department shall expend not more than $2,620,882 for teacher
preparation and certification services from fees related to such services; and
provided further, that for the purpose of accommodating timing
discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
expenditures, the department may incur expenses and the comptroller may
certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or
the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting system
.................................................................................................................................$2,620,882
7061-9607 For the administrative and programmatic costs of recovery high schools;
provided, that the department of elementary and secondary education shall
work collaboratively with the bureau of substance addiction services for the
successful transition and continued operation of the recovery high schools
model; provided further, that not later than April 1, 2027, the department
shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways and
means that shall include, but not be limited to, the: (i) number of youths
served per high school; (ii) outcomes measured for youths; and (iii)
recommendations for new recovery high schools in fiscal year 2027 and
fiscal year 2028; and provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be
expended for the implementation of recovery high schools ..................................$2,775,683
179

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
7061-9611 For grants or subsidies for after-school and out-of-school programs;
provided, that preference shall be given to after-school proposals developed
collaboratively and that support quality enhancements and increased
access to after-school and summer learning programs by public and
nonpublic schools and private community-based programs; provided
further, that the department of elementary and secondary education shall
fund only those applications which contain accountability systems and
measurable outcomes, under guidelines to be determined by the
department in consultation with the department of early education and care;
provided further, that applicants shall detail funds received from all public
sources for existing after-school and out-of-school programs and the types
of programs and students served by the funds; provided further, that funds
shall be expended for services that actively include children with disabilities
in after-school programs that also serve nondisabled children, and services
that include children for whom English is a second language and children
identified as low-income; provided further, that the department of
elementary and secondary education shall consult with the executive office
of health and human services and the department of early education and
care to maximize the provision of wraparound services and to coordinate
programs and services for children and youths during after-school and out-
of-school programs; provided further, that not later than September 30,
2026, the department of elementary and secondary education shall select
the grant recipients and shall report on the preliminary results of said grants
not later than January 8, 2027 to the secretary of administration and finance,
the joint committee on education and the house and senate committees on
ways and means; provided further, that funds may be expended for
programs or activities during the summer months; provided further, that
funds shall be expended to convene regional networks to work with the
department of elementary and secondary education and the department of
early education and care to support the implementation of school and
community partnerships; provided further, that funds shall be expended for
the continued operation of a pilot data-sharing program designed to provide
school districts with funds to partner with local community-based
organizations and share identifiable student data to the extent allowed by
law; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the
city of Lowell to provide more than 20 teens from the Acre neighborhood
section of the city of Lowell with hands-on training in podcast creation;
provided further, that not less than $75,000 shall be expended to the city
of New Bedford for the Girls Design Academy; provided further, that not
less than $50,000 shall be expended to Steps to Success to provide
academic and personal support for low-income students from 4th grade to
college graduation; provided further, that not less than $75,000 shall be
granted to the Cape Verdean Association of Brockton for employment
positions for at-risk youth within their YEP! We Can Summer Program;
provided further, that not less than $15,000 shall be expended to the Paris
Street Council to support programming, including expanded accessible
recreation and partnerships with the Special Olympics; provided further,
that not less than $10,000 shall be expended to Harlem Lacrosse Boston
to support operations and programming at their East Boston site; provided
further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to Natick public
schools to support targeted academic initiatives and family engagement
efforts to accommodate multilingual learners at Natick public schools and
to support programs designed to aid students who may benefit from
additional academic support; and provided further, that not later than June
30, 2027, the grantee shall submit a report to the house and senate
180

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
committees on ways and means on the effects of the pilot program on
students participating in the programs partnered with the school districts .............$7,503,178
General Fund ........................................................75.16%
Youth Development & Achievement Fund ............24.84%
7061-9612 For the implementation of subsection (f) of section 1P of chapter 69 of the
General Laws to create safe and supportive school environments; provided,
that funds shall be expended for the safe and supportive schools grant
program and for a full-time staff member devoted to carrying out the
responsibilities under said subsection (f) of said section 1P of said chapter
69; provided further, that funds shall be expended for: (i) an annual
statewide safe and supportive schools conference that shall highlight the
grant program, include presentations by grantee schools and districts about
their work, teach attendees about the safe and supportive schools
framework and self-assessment tool, include presentations about the grant
application process and emphasize best practices for incorporating
developmentally appropriate input from students into safe and supportive
schools grant applications and school-wide action plans; (ii) expert
technological assistance in upgrading the usability of the online self-
assessment tool; and (iii) an evaluation of the grant program; provided
further, that funds shall be expended for leadership summits to assist
superintendents and principals with developing safe and supportive school
and district cultures including, but not limited to, the implementation of the
online self-assessment tool; provided further, that grants shall be awarded to
schools and school district teams that create schoolwide action plans based
on all the elements of the safe and supportive schools framework and self-
assessment tool; provided further, that grant awards shall be prioritized for
applications that include a process for developmentally appropriate input
from students who are reflective of the school population; provided further,
that schools receiving continuation grants to implement schoolwide action
plans shall incorporate such action plans into their school improvement
plans developed under section 1I of said chapter 69; provided further, that
the safe and supportive schools commission shall conduct an analysis of
such schoolwide action plans and school improvement plans, which the
department shall provide to the commission, and shall include in its annual
report the results of such analysis and any recommendations, including any
recommendations related to improving the framework or the self-
assessment tool; provided further, that not later than November 3, 2026,
grant awards under this item shall be allocated by the department of
elementary and secondary education to schools and school districts;
provided further, that districts shall create district plans that support recipient
schools; and provided further, that any unexpended funds in this item shall
not revert to the General Fund but shall be made available for this item until
June 30, 2028 .............................................................................................................$648,949
7061-9619 For the Benjamin Franklin Cummings Institute of Technology; provided, that
the institute shall have access to the Massachusetts education computer
system; and provided further, that the institute may join the state buying
consortium .............................................................................................................................$1
7061-9624 For the School of Excellence program at the Worcester Polytechnic Institute;
provided, that every effort shall be made to recruit and serve equal numbers
of male and female students; provided further, that sending districts of
students attending the institute shall not be required to expend any funds for
the cost of these students while in attendance at the institute; and provided
181

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
further, that the Massachusetts Academy of Math and Science at the
Worcester Polytechnic Institute shall provide professional development
activities at the academy, including salary and benefits for teachers and
visiting scholars .......................................................................................................$2,000,000
7061-9626 For grants to the members of the Massachusetts YouthBuild Coalition,
Inc., for the purpose of providing comprehensive education, workforce
training and skills development to youth; provided, that not less than
$100,000 shall be expended to the city of Everett’s Youth Development
and Enrichment Department for the workforce development and summer
jobs program in the city of Everett; and provided further, that not less than
$35,000 shall be expended to the Everett Art Labs in the city of Everett to
support Listening Works, a youth development and apprenticeship
program ...................................................................................................................$1,885,000
7061-9634 For the Mass Mentoring Partnership, Inc., which shall be responsible for
administering a competitive statewide grant program for public and private
agencies to start or expand youth mentoring programs according to current
best practices and for purposes including advancing academic
performance, self-esteem, social competence and workforce development;
provided, that the department of elementary and secondary education shall
transfer the amount appropriated in this item to the Mass Mentoring
Partnership, Inc., for these grants; provided further, that in order to be eligible
to receive funds from this item, each public or private agency shall provide a
matching amount equal to $1 for every $1 disbursed from this item; and
provided further, that not later than March 12, 2027, the Mass Mentoring
Partnership, Inc. shall submit a report to the department detailing the impact
of the grants, expenditure of funds and the amount and source of matching
funds raised .............................................................................................................$1,500,000
7061-9650 For the Supporting Healthy Alliances Reinforcing Education (SHARE)
grant program to provide an integrated student wellness grant program to
assist schools with addressing nonacademic barriers to student success;
provided, that grants shall be used to support school districts establishing an
infrastructure to facilitate integrated coordination of school and community-
based resources including, but not limited to, social services, mental health
and behavioral health resources; provided further, that not less than
$500,000 shall be awarded by the department to schools and school districts
serving high percentages of low-income students; provided further, that said
supports may include funding to assist public school districts in contracting
with licensed community-based health care service providers, including
mental and behavioral health providers; provided further, that said program
shall be administered by the department of elementary and secondary
education in coordination with the executive office of health and human
services; provided further, that the department shall prioritize applications
for such services that are submitted by school districts whose applications
are consistent with infrastructure and coordination efforts linking schools to
community-based resources in accordance with item 7061-9612 of section
2 of chapter 154 of the acts of 2018; provided further, that such support
grants may be expended to assist school districts in connecting students
with community-based services to maximize coordination with service
providers and establish more comprehensive continuums of care; provided
further, that such grants may also be expended to support increased
professional development opportunities for public school employees to
identify students in need of mental and behavioral health support; provided
further, that not later than December 30, 2026, the department shall issue a
182

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
report outlining all student support efforts funded by this item; provided
further, that the report shall be provided to the senate president, the speaker
of the house of representatives, the house and senate committees on ways
and means and the joint committee on education; provided further, that for
the purposes of this item, appropriated funds may be expended for programs
or activities during the summer months; provided further, that any
unexpended funds in this item shall not revert but shall be made available
for the purposes of this item until August 27, 2027; and provided further, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, any funds
distributed from this item to a city, town or regional school district shall be
deposited with the treasurer of such city, town or regional school district and
held in a separate account and shall be expended by the school committee
of such city, town or regional school district without further appropriation,
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary ....................................$1,000,000
7061-9813 For rural school aid to eligible towns and regional school districts,
excluding vocational schools, independent agricultural, technical schools
and charter schools; provided, that a school district shall be eligible for rural
school aid if a school district has a student density of not more than 35
students per square mile and an average annual per capita income of not
more than the average annual per capita income for the commonwealth for
the same period; provided further, that rural school aid shall be allocated
equitably in the following priority order: (i) school districts serving less than
11 students per square mile; (ii) school districts serving not more than 21
students per square mile; and (iii) school districts serving not more than 35
students per square mile; provided further, that not later than December 1,
2026, the department of elementary and secondary education shall submit
a report to the house and senate committees on ways and means detailing:
(a) its recommendations for additional adjustments to the rural school aid
calculation for fiscal year 2028 to improve the accuracy and equity of the
student density component and the per capita income component; and (b)
the calculation and planned distribution of funds to school districts; provided
further, that not later than January 29, 2027, any district receiving funds
under this item shall submit a plan to the department of elementary and
secondary education outlining steps the district will take to increase regional
collaboration, consolidation or other efficiencies over the next 3 fiscal years;
provided further, that not later than April 1, 2027, that the department of
elementary and secondary education shall submit a report to the joint
committee on education and the house and senate committees on ways and
means detailing steps that participating districts have taken in
regionalization and consolidation; and provided further, that funds
distributed from this item shall not be considered chapter 70 aid for the
calculation of the minimum required local contribution for fiscal year 2028 .........$10,000,000
7061-9814 For a competitive grant program to support the development and
expansion of high-quality, comprehensive summer learning opportunities for
students in districts with high concentrations of low-income students;
provided, that the department of elementary and secondary education shall
develop the criteria for grants; provided further, that grants shall be awarded
to programs that: (i) include not less than 150 hours of programming with a
focus on academic and college and career readiness skills, including critical
thinking, collaboration and perseverance; (ii) are research-based summer
programs; and (iii) engage with a variety of organizations and leverage cost-
sharing partnerships with local districts, private funders and nonprofit
institutions; and provided further, that funds may be expended for programs
or activities during the summer months ..................................................................$2,940,300
183

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
7061-9815 For a grant program administered by the department of elementary and
secondary education in coordination with the executive office of public
safety and security for the prevention of hate crimes, as defined under
section 32 of chapter 22C of the General Laws, and incidences of bias in
public schools; provided, that grants shall be used for education,
professional development, prevention or community outreach; provided
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended on Mosaic Interfaith
Youth Action; and provided further, that the department of elementary and
secondary education shall develop guidelines for grant distribution
including, but not limited to, prioritizing schools that have experienced
hate crimes or incidences of bias within the last 2 years .........................................$425,000
DEPARTMENT OF HIGHER EDUCATION.
7066-0000 For the operation of the department of higher education; provided, that the
department shall recommend savings proposals that permit public
institutions of higher education to achieve administrative and program cost
reductions, resource reallocation and program reassessment and to utilize
resources otherwise available to such institutions; provided further, that not
less than $1,000,000 shall be expended for the state university internship
incentive program established in item 7066-0000 of section 2 of chapter 139 of
the acts of 2012; provided further, that the commonwealth shall contribute
funds to each institution in an amount necessary to match private
contributions in the current fiscal year to the institution's internship incentive
program; provided further, that the commonwealth's contribution shall be
equal to $1 for every $1 privately contributed to each university's board of
trustees or foundation; provided further, that the maximum total
contributions from the commonwealth shall be not more than the amount
appropriated in this item; provided further, that funds from this program shall
not result in a direct or an indirect reduction in the commonwealth's
appropriations to the institutions for operations, scholarships, financial aid
or any state appropriation and the department shall promulgate regulations
and criteria for the program; provided further, that in order to meet the
estimated costs of employee fringe benefits provided by the commonwealth
on account of employees of the Massachusetts State College Building
Authority and the University of Massachusetts Building Authority and in
order to meet the estimated cost of heat, light, power and other services, if
any, to be furnished by the commonwealth to projects of these authorities,
the boards of trustees of the community colleges, state universities and the
University of Massachusetts shall transfer to the General Fund, from the
funds received from the operations of the projects, the costs, if any, as shall
be incurred by the commonwealth for these purposes in the current fiscal
year as determined by the appropriate building authority, verified by the
commissioner of higher education and approved by the secretary of
administration and finance; provided further, that not less than $150,000
shall be expended for a campus violence prevention administrator and such
other activities as are needed to fund the full implementation of chapter 337
of the acts of 2020 to advance statewide campus safety initiatives, including
sexual violence prevention; and provided further, that funds shall be
expended to meet existing statutory requirements and provide orientation,
professional development and support for the boards of trustees in areas
including, but not limited to, recruitment, training and accountability ....................$3,833,186
7066-0009 For the New England Board of Higher Education ......................................................$433,525
184

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
7066-0015 For the community college workforce training incentive grant program
established in section 15F of chapter 15A of the General Laws; provided,
that eligible incentive revenues under this program may also include
workforce training contracts administered or paid through public agencies,
municipalities, public grants, nonprofit organizations or private gifts; and
provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to Holyoke
Community College for the Recompete Program to provide wraparound
services in partnerships with local employers .......................................................$1,444,842
7066-0016 For a program of financial aid to support the matriculation at public and
private institutions of higher education of persons in the custody of the
department of children and families under a care and protection petition
upon reaching 18 years of age or persons in the custody of the department
matriculating at such an institution at an earlier age; provided, that no such
person shall be required to remain in the custody of the department beyond
18 years of age to qualify for such aid; provided further, that said aid shall
not exceed $6,000 per recipient per year; and provided further, that said aid
shall only be granted after exhausting all other sources of financial support
.................................................................................................................................$1,470,150
7066-0019 For the department of higher education to support the dual enrollment
program allowing qualified high school students to take college courses;
provided, that public, municipal and private institutions of higher education
may offer courses in high schools in addition to courses offered at the
institutions or online if the number of students is sufficient; provided further,
that preference in awarding grants for early college programs shall be given
to public institutions of higher education; and provided further, that
appropriated funds may be expended for programs or activities during the
summer months .....................................................................................................$12,900,000
7066-0021 For reimbursements to public institutions of higher education for foster and
adopted child fee waivers under section 19 of chapter 15A of the General
Laws; provided, that reimbursements to public institutions of higher
education for fee waivers granted in prior fiscal years may be expended from
this item ...................................................................................................................$7,221,962
7066-0040 For adult college transition services focused on low-income and entry-level
workers; provided, that funds shall be awarded competitively by the board of
higher education to adult basic education providers, including local
education agencies, community-based organizations, community colleges
and correctional facilities with recognized success in bridging academic
gaps of underserved populations and resulting in college entrance, retention
and completion; provided further, that not less than $250,000 shall be
expended for Jewish Vocational Service, Inc. with a targeted focus on
academic and coaching support for immigrants and refugees; provided
further, that not later than February 12, 2027, program awardees shall report
to the department of higher education on attendees’ successful transition to
college and that the department of higher education shall deliver to the joint
committee on education and the house and senate committees on ways and
means an evaluation of the program and its impact on student achievement,
particularly as it relates to closing achievement gaps; and provided further,
that appropriated funds may be expended for programs or activities during
the summer months ....................................................................................................$500,000
185

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
7066-9600 For a discretionary grant program to provide funds to school districts and
public institutions of higher education partnering together to offer inclusive
concurrent enrollment programs for school age children with disabilities, as
defined in section 1 of chapter 71B of the General Laws, who are between
the ages of 18 and 22, inclusive; provided, that the grant program shall be
limited to students who are considered to have severe disabilities and, in the
case of students age 18 or 19, shall be limited to students with severe
disabilities who have been unable to achieve the competency determination
necessary to pass the Massachusetts Comprehensive Assessment
System exam; provided further, that on a discretionary basis, public
institutions of higher education may choose to additionally include students
with severe developmental disabilities over 21 years of age through the
grant program; provided further, that such students with disabilities shall be
offered enrollment in credit and noncredit courses that include students
without disabilities, including enrollment in credit and noncredit courses in
audit status for students who may not meet course prerequisites and
requirements; provided further, that the partnering school districts shall
provide supports, services and accommodations necessary to facilitate a
student’s enrollment; provided further, that the department of higher
education shall develop guidelines to ensure that the grant program
promotes civic engagement and mentoring of faculty in public institutions of
higher education and supports college success, work success, participation
in student life of the college community and provision of a free appropriate
public education in the least restrictive environment; provided further, that
the department shall develop strategies and procedures to help sustain and
replicate the existing inclusive concurrent enrollment programs initiated
through the grant program including, but not limited to: (i) providing funds to
retain employment specialists; (ii) assisting students in meeting integrated
competitive employment and other transition-related goals; (iii) adopting
procedures and funding mechanisms to ensure that new partnerships of
public institutions of higher education and school districts providing inclusive
concurrent enrollment programs fully utilize the models and expertise
developed in existing partnerships; and (iv) conducting evaluations and
research to further identify student outcomes and best practices; provided
further, that the department shall develop a mechanism to encourage
existing and new partnerships to expand the capacity to respond to
individual parents and schools in underserved areas that request an
opportunity for their children to participate in the inclusive concurrent
enrollment initiative; provided further, that tuition for courses shall be waived
by the state institutions of higher education for students enrolled through this
grant program; provided further, that the department shall maintain the
position of inclusive concurrent enrollment coordinator who shall be
responsible for administering the grant program, coordinating the advisory
committee, developing new partnerships, assisting existing partnerships in
creating self-sustaining models and overseeing the development of videos
and informational materials as well as evaluation and research through the
institute for community inclusion to assist new colleges and school districts;
provided further, that not later than July 15, 2026, the department shall
select grant recipients and shall distribute a request for grant proposals
subject to future appropriation not later than May 28, 2027; provided further,
that not later than January 29, 2027, the department of higher education, in
consultation with the department of elementary and secondary education,
shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways and
means, the joint committee on education and the joint committee on higher
education on student outcomes in programs funded under this item; and
186

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
provided further, that funds may be expended for programs or activities
during the summer months ......................................................................................$4,000,000
7070-0065 For a scholarship program to provide financial assistance to
Massachusetts students enrolled in and pursuing a program of higher
education in any approved public or independent college, university, school
of nursing or any other approved institution furnishing a program of higher
education; provided, that funds from this item may be expended on the
administration of said scholarship program; provided further, that the
commissioner of higher education, in coordination with the Massachusetts
state scholarship office, shall follow adopted guidelines governing the
eligibility for and the awarding of financial assistance; provided further, that
funds from this item shall be made available for the MASSGrant and
MASSGrant Plus programs in an amount not less than the amount made
available in fiscal year 2026; provided further, that not less than $22,000,000
shall be made available for the Gilbert Grants; provided further, that not less
than $430,000 shall be made available for One Family, Inc. for any costs in
connection with the One Family Scholars program; and provided further,
that not less than $3,600,000 shall be made available for early educator
scholarships, prior appropriation continued ........................................................$176,688,311
7077-0023 For the Cummings School of Veterinary Medicine at Tufts University;
provided, that funds shall be expended under a resident veterinary tuition
remission plan as approved by the commissioner of higher education for
supportive veterinary services provided to the commonwealth; provided
further, that funds from this item may support collaborative arrangements
that may include teaching partnerships, articulation agreements or both with
community colleges and vocational-technical schools that offer veterinary
technician programs, veterinary health care programs or both approved by
the board of higher education; provided further, that the school may work in
consultation with the Norfolk county agricultural high school on veterinary
programs; provided further, that the school may work in consultation with the
Bristol county agricultural high school on veterinary programs; and provided
further, that funds appropriated in this item shall support bioterrorism
prevention research conducted in consultation with emergency authorities
in the commonwealth relative to diseases that can be transmitted from
animals to humans ..................................................................................................$5,500,000
7518-0120 For state university and community college collaboration and efficiency
efforts through the Partnership to Advance Collaboration and Efficiencies
initiative .......................................................................................................................$300,000
7520-0424 For a health and welfare reserve for eligible personnel employed at the
community colleges and state universities ..............................................................$7,131,153
UNIVERSITY OF MASSACHUSETTS.
7100-0200 For the operation of the University of Massachusetts; provided, that not later
than January 29, 2027, the university shall meet with the chairs of the house
and senate committees on ways and means and the chairs of the joint
committee on higher education to review: (i) the 5-year projected spending
plan for academic years 2026 to 2031, inclusive, including anticipated
cost savings initiatives and efforts to reduce student tuition and fees; and (ii)
a comprehensive report on spending over the previous academic year;
provided further, that the report shall include, but not be limited to: (a)
187

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
personnel costs, delineated by staff type and type of pay including, but not
limited to, base pay and bonus pay; (b) the number of full-time equivalent
employees, delineated by staff type; (c) noninstructional administrative
costs; (d) costs related to asset management and acquisition; (e) annual
enrollment growth; (f) annual tuition and fee growth; (g) fee structure; (h)
expenditures on direct student financial aid; and (i) average financial aid
award per financial aid recipient; provided further, that funding for each
center and institute at the University of Massachusetts at Boston shall be
provided at an amount not less than in fiscal year 2018; provided further,
that if, as a result of extraordinary or unforeseen circumstances, the
university deems it necessary to reduce funding to any of said centers or
institutes, the university shall submit a report detailing: (1) the reasons for
such reductions; (2) all steps taken to avoid such reductions including, but
not limited to, the identification of other sources of existing funds, raising of
new revenues and the pursuit of savings initiatives and efficiencies; and (3)
a mitigation plan to ameliorate the effects on students and university staff of
such reductions, for which input from students and university staff shall be
solicited; provided further, that the report shall be submitted to the joint
committee on higher education and the house and senate committees on
ways and means not less than 120 days prior to any such funding reduction
or institutional closure; provided further, that not later than January 4, 2027,
the University of Massachusetts at Boston shall submit a report to the joint
committee on higher education and the house and senate committees on
ways and means detailing the progress made on implementing the April 2019
taskforce on centers and institutes' recommendations; provided further, that
the university shall expend funds for the University of Massachusetts at
Amherst Cranberry Station; provided further, that the university shall expend
funds for the operation of the Massachusetts office of public collaboration at
the University of Massachusetts at Boston; provided further, that not less
than $10,000,000 shall be expended for SUCCESS programming to provide
wraparound supports and services to improve outcomes for their most
vulnerable populations including, but not limited to, low-income, first-
generation, minority and disabled students and lesbian, gay, bisexual,
transgender, queer and questioning students; provided further, that not
less than $15,000 shall be expended for the University of Massachusetts at
Amherst health services to support access to women's health care; and
provided further, that not less than $4,000,000 shall be expended by the
university on student behavioral health services including, but not limited to,
crisis services, therapy, the assessment of learning disorders, responses to
sexual assault, substance use disorder services and assistance to students
struggling with stress, anxiety or other mental health needs ..............................$866,520,000
General Fund ........................................................99.38%
Education Fund .......................................................0.62%
7100-0700 For the operation of the community mediation center grant program
administered by the office of public collaboration at the University of
Massachusetts at Boston under section 47 of chapter 75 of the General
Laws; provided, that funding from this item shall be made available for pre-
court mediation services to promote housing stabilization; and provided
further, that not less than $200,000 shall be expended for the
Massachusetts prisoner re-entry mediation program, prior appropriation
continued .................................................................................................................$3,213,465
188

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
7100-0702 For the Institute for Asian American Studies at the University of
Massachusetts at Boston to study the history and experiences of anti-
Asian racism in the United States and in the commonwealth ....................................$300,000
State Universities.
7109-0100 For Bridgewater State University ..........................................................................$75,953,788
7110-0100 For Fitchburg State University ...............................................................................$46,942,816
7112-0100 For Framingham State University ..........................................................................$45,987,985
7113-0100 For the Massachusetts College of Liberal Arts ......................................................$25,351,763
7114-0100 For Salem State University ....................................................................................$70,013,015
7115-0100 For Westfield State University ...............................................................................$44,099,532
7116-0100 For Worcester State University; provided, that not less than $125,000 shall
be expended to the John J. Binienda Center for Civic Education; and
provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended for the
Latino Education Institute and pre-collegiate programs .....................................$43,867,881
7117-0100 For the Massachusetts College of Art and Design ................................................$28,845,407
7118-0100 For the Massachusetts Maritime Academy ...........................................................$27,029,977
Community Colleges.
7502-0100 For Berkshire Community College ........................................................................$16,278,126
7503-0100 For Bristol Community College .............................................................................$33,643,230
7504-0100 For Cape Cod Community College .......................................................................$18,300,828
7505-0100 For Greenfield Community College .......................................................................$16,423,542
7506-0100 For Holyoke Community College ........................................................................$29,613,654
7507-0100 For Massachusetts Bay Community College ........................................................$24,154,335
7508-0100 For Massasoit Community College .......................................................................$31,590,662
7509-0100 For Mount Wachusett Community College ............................................................$22,775,620
7509-0101 For the Senator Stephen M. Brewer Center for Civic Learning and
Community Engagement at Mount Wachusett Community College to
increase service learning and volunteerism in the north central
Massachusetts region of the commonwealth, to support the development of
a food pantry and other emergency services for students at risk of dropping
out due to financial circumstances, for deliberative dialogues within the
community addressing issues of concern within society and for
programmatic development, updates and technologies within the center .................$150,000
7510-0100 For Northern Essex Community College ...............................................................$29,344,939
189

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
7511-0100 For North Shore Community College ....................................................................$32,481,189
7512-0100 For Quinsigamond Community College ................................................................$32,355,003
7514-0100 For Springfield Technical Community College ......................................................$36,611,994
7515-0100 For Roxbury Community College ..........................................................................$16,293,886
7515-0120 For the operation of the Reggie Lewis Track and Athletic Center at
Roxbury Community College ..................................................................................$2,028,694
7515-0121 For the Reggie Lewis Track and Athletic Center at Roxbury Community
College; provided, that the college may expend an amount not to exceed
$2,500,000 received from fees, rentals and facility expenses associated with
the running and operation of national track meets, high school track meets,
high school dual meets, Roxbury Community College athletic events and
other special athletic events, conferences, meetings and programs;
provided further, that only expenses for contracted services associated with
these events, event staff, utilities and capital needs of the facility shall be
funded from this item; and provided further, that notwithstanding any general
or special law to the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing
discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
expenditures, the college may incur expenses and the comptroller may
certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or
the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting
system .....................................................................................................................$2,500,000
7516-0100 For Middlesex Community College .......................................................................$34,823,916
7518-0100 For Bunker Hill Community College ......................................................................$40,441,103
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND SECURITY.
Office of the Secretary.
8000-0038 For the operation of a witness protection program under chapter 263A of
the General Laws ........................................................................................................$245,025
8000-0070 For the research and analysis of the committee on criminal justice,
established in section 156 of chapter 6 of the General Laws; provided, that
funds may be expended to support the work of the Massachusetts
sentencing commission, established in section 1 of chapter 211E of the
General Laws ..............................................................................................................$136,262
8000-0202 For the purchase and distribution of sexual assault evidence collection kits ...............$91,768
8000-0313 For local public safety projects and grant programs; provided, that not less
than $15,000 shall be expended to the Uxbridge police department for the
purpose of purchasing uniforms and equipment; provided further, that not
less than $50,000 shall be expended to the city of Leominster for the
purpose of upgrading the IT servers at Leominster City Hall; provided
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the city of
Leominster for the purpose of acquiring a camera system for the
monitoring of Doyle Field in the city of Leominster; provided further, that
not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the Norton police department
190

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
for the purpose of acquiring conducted energy weapons for the police
department in the town of Norton; provided further, that not less than
$25,000 shall be expended to the Seekonk police department for body
worn cameras; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to the Swansea police department for a digital training
simulator; provided further, that not less than $125,000 shall be expended
to Recidiviz, Inc. for technology and data integration with the
Massachusetts parole board; provided further, that not less than $20,000
shall be expended to the East Bridgewater police department for
equipment and vehicles purchases; provided further, that not less than
$25,000 shall be expended to the Nahant fire department for public safety
equipment upgrades; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to the town of Mattapoisett for the replacement of end-of-life
automated external defibrillators; provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended to the Chicopee police department for public
safety upgrades; provided further, that not less than $125,000 shall be
expended to the Dismas House of Massachusetts, Inc. in Worcester;
provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the town
of Saugus police department for gear and equipment purchases; provided
further, that not less than $13,500 shall be expended to the town of
Spencer police department for body cameras; provided further, that not
less than $25,000 shall be expended to the Boston Human Exploitation
Advocacy Team for a mobile triage van for service delivery; provided
further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to the town of
Bedford for the replacement of aging vehicles within the Bedford police
department; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended
to the town of Manchester-by-the-Sea for purchasing a police motorcycle;
provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall be expended to the town
of Rockport for the purpose of purchasing body worn cameras for the
Rockport police department; provided further, that not less than $150,000
shall be expended to Portal to Hope Corp. for services related to domestic
violence, at-risk youth and school-based violence prevention education;
provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the town
of Raynham for computer and technological equipment at the new public
safety building; provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall be
expended to the town of Walpole for a community policing vehicle;
provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall be expended to the
Medfield police department for the implementation of the Blue Voice
application; provided further, that not less than $30,000 shall be expended
to the town of Southborough police department for aerial drones; provided
further, that not less than $30,000 shall be expended to the town of
Holliston for the reimbursement of local non-profits for police details at
town events; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to the town of Harvard for police station and equipment
upgrades; provided further, that not less than $250,000 shall be expended
for Recidiviz Inc. for reentry support in the department of correction;
provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to the city
known as the town of Braintree police department for the family services
unit; provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to the
city known as the town of Braintree fire department for equipment
purchases; provided further, that not less than $40,000 shall be expended
to the town of Grafton for public safety improvements; provided further,
that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the town of Northbridge
for public safety improvements; provided further, that not less than
$25,000 shall be expended to the town of Upton for public safety
improvements; provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be
191

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
expended to the Northeastern Massachusetts Law Enforcement Council,
Inc.; provided further, that not less than $25,000 be expended to the city
of Everett police department for a drone unit; provided further, that not less
than $25,000 shall be expended to the town of Tyngsborough for the
marine patrol unit for use on Lake Mascuppic; provided further, that not
less than $60,000 shall be expended to the town of Tyngsborough for
replacement fire alarm panels; provided further, that not less than $75,000
be expended to the town of Freetown for the procurement of a rescue boat;
provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall be expended to the town
of Dover police department for technological improvements; provided
further, that not less than $20,000 shall be expended to the city of Boston
for the payroll costs of the Boston police department for dedicated patrols
of the Fairmount housing development in the Hyde Park section of the city
of Boston; provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall be expended
to the town of Dunstable police department for bullet-proof vests; provided
further, that not less than $20,000 shall be expended to the town of Groton
for new automated external defibrillators for the police and fire
departments; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to the town of Auburn police department for public safety
equipment and programs; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall
be expended to the town of Wilmington for traffic mitigation planning,
surveying and construction of pedestrian and road safety infrastructure on
the property of and roads adjacent to public schools in the town of
Wilmington; provided further, that not less than $150,000 be expended to
the town of Stoneham police department for gear and facility upgrades;
provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the city
of Fitchburg police department for report, roll call and training room
upgrades; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended
to the town of Randolph police department for portable radios and
emergency communications upgrades; provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended to the city of Revere for Revere fire department
fleet maintenance and acquisition; provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended to the town of Westford police department for
a wellness center; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be
expended to the city of Boston for the payroll costs of the Boston police
department for dedicated patrols of the Foley apartments, Monsignor
Powers apartments and West 9th Street apartments in the South Boston
section of the city of Boston; provided further, that not less than $25,000
shall be expended to the town of Pembroke police department for law
enforcement equipment upgrades; provided further, that not less than
$25,000 shall be expended to the town of Easton fire department; and
provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the city
of Waltham police department for public safety initiatives ...................................$2,498,500
8000-0600 For the office of the secretary of public safety and security, including the
highway safety bureau, to provide matching funds for a planning and
administration grant under 23 U.S.C. 402 and the costs associated with the
implementation of chapter 122 of the acts of 2019; provided, that the
executive office of public safety and security staff may provide administrative
processing for departments under the executive office’s purview; provided
further, that not less than $3,126,872 shall be provided for the Boston,
Cambridge and Everett fire department hazardous material response
teams; provided further, that not less than $150,000 shall be expended to
the city of Boston for a Co-Response Mobile Operations Center vehicle and
ongoing operating expenses; and provided further, that local police
departments, sheriffs’ offices, the department of state police, the department
192

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
of correction and other state agencies, authorities and educational
institutions with law enforcement functions as determined by the secretary
that receive funds for the cost of the replacement of bulletproof vests through
the office of the secretary may expend without further appropriation these
funds to purchase additional vests in the fiscal year in which they receive
such reimbursements ............................................................................................$10,029,784
8000-0605 For efforts to combat human trafficking, including a competitive grant
program to be administered by the executive office of public safety and
security; provided, that not later than March 1, 2027, the executive office
shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways and
means detailing expenditures from this item, including a list of grant
recipients ....................................................................................................................$100,000
8000-0655 For a grant program to be administered by the executive office of public
safety and security for emerging adults re-entry programs to reduce
recidivism among individuals between the ages of 18 and 25, inclusive, who
are returning to the community from state prisons and county correctional
facilities; provided, that the secretary of public safety and security shall
distribute funds through a competitive grant program; provided further,
that grants shall be awarded to applicants that: (i) are community-based
nonprofit programs; (ii) have a demonstrated commitment from the
department of correction or a sheriff’s office to work collaboratively to deliver
services in their respective facilities; (iii) provide both pre-release and post-
release services to individuals between the ages of 18 and 25, inclusive,
who are returning to the community from state prisons and county
correctional facilities including, but not limited to, probationers and parolees;
(iv) provide a continuum of programming from state prisons or county
correctional facilities into the community; (v) provide pre-release services for
all participating individuals that include transition plans, education programs,
workforce readiness and life skills programs and counseling; (vi) provide
post-release services that include case management for not less than 12
months after participating individuals have been released; and (vii) provide
a plan for ensuring that proposed programs shall be implemented with
adherence to a research-based, evidence-based or evidence-informed
program design; provided further, that not more than 6 grants shall be
awarded; provided further, that not more than 7.5 per cent of the total
appropriation in this item shall be used to provide administrative support and
training to grantees, including program design, technical assistance and
program evaluation, and to provide training and technical assistance to any
other organization or institution working on emerging adult justice initiatives;
provided further, that contracts for grantees may be awarded for periods of
not more than 5 years; and provided further, that not later than March 3,
2027, the executive office shall submit a report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means that shall include, but not be limited to, the:
(a) successful grant applications and the services they provide; (b) amount
of funds awarded to each grantee; (c) criteria used to evaluate grant
applications; (d) number of participants served by each program and the
communities they are returning to; and (e) outcomes and recidivism rates of
the participants in each of the programs, prior appropriation continued .................$6,930,000
Marijuana Regulation Fund ......................................100%
8000-1001 For the Boston regional intelligence center, or BRIC, to upgrade, expand
and integrate technology and protocols related to anti-terrorism, anti-crime,
anti-gang and emergency response; provided, that intelligence developed
193

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
shall be shared with the BRIC communities and other state, municipal and
federal agencies as necessary; and provided further, that the BRIC shall
provide technology required to access the intelligence with its municipal
partners, the department of state police, the Massachusetts Bay
Transportation Authority, the Massachusetts Port Authority and appropriate
federal agencies to assure maximum interagency collaboration for public
safety and homeland security .....................................................................................$750,000
8000-1127 For a nonprofit security grant program to provide support for target
hardening and other security enhancements to nonprofit organizations that
are at high risk of terrorist attacks or hate crimes, as defined under section
32 of chapter 22C of the General Laws; provided, that prioritization shall be
given to nonprofit organizations that have experienced instances of terrorist
attacks or hate crimes, as defined under said section 32 of said chapter 22C;
provided further, that: (i) at least 1 such grant shall be awarded to a nonprofit
organization in the eastern region of the commonwealth; (ii) at least 1 such
grant shall be awarded to a nonprofit organization in the central region of
the commonwealth; and (iii) at least 1 such grant shall be awarded to a
nonprofit organization in the western region of the commonwealth; and
provided further, that the grants shall be distributed in a geographically
equitable manner across the eastern, central and western regions of the
commonwealth ........................................................................................................$4,000,000
8000-1213 For the school of reentry; provided, that funds may be spent on the credible
messenger program ................................................................................................$1,294,519
8000-1225 For the operation of the office of grants and research ...............................................$281,611
8000-1700 For the provision of information technology services within the executive
office of public safety and security .........................................................................$21,055,192
8100-0111 For a grant program to be known as the Senator Charles E. Shannon, Jr.
community safety initiative, to be administered by the executive office of
public safety and security to support regional, multidisciplinary approaches to
combat gang violence through coordinated programs for prevention and
intervention, coordinated law enforcement, including regional gang task
forces and regional crime mapping strategies, focused prosecutions and
reintegration strategies for formerly incarcerated persons; provided, that the
secretary of public safety and security shall distribute grant funds through a
competitive grant program that gives preference to applications that: (i)
demonstrate high levels of youth violence, gang problems and substance
use in a region; (ii) demonstrate a commitment to regional, multi-
jurisdictional strategies to deal with such community safety issues, including
written commitments for municipalities, law enforcement agencies,
community-based organizations and government agencies to work
together; (iii) clearly outline a comprehensive plan that establishes
measurable outcomes for municipalities to work with law enforcement,
community-based organizations and government agencies to address gang
activity; (iv) outline measurable outcomes that demonstrate program
success, detail a plan for collecting data related to achieving said
measurable outcomes and commit to sharing the data with the executive
office; (v) make a written commitment to match grant funds with a 25 per
cent match provided by either municipal or private contributions; and (vi)
identify a local governmental unit to serve as the fiscal agent; provided
further, that clusters of municipalities, in partnership with nonprofit
organizations and other agencies, including district attorneys’ offices, may
194

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
apply for such grant funds; provided further, that such grant funds shall be
considered 1-time grants awarded to public agencies and shall not
annualize into fiscal year 2028 or subsequent years; provided further, that
administrative costs for successful grant applications shall not exceed 10
per cent of the value of the grant; provided further, that no grant funds shall
be awarded to the department of state police; provided further, that not later
than August 17, 2026, the executive office shall publish guidelines and an
application for the competitive portion of the grant fund program; provided
further, that not later than December 16, 2026, grant funds shall be made
available to applicants; provided further, that not later than 60 days after the
distribution of grant funds, the executive office shall submit a report to the
executive office for administration and finance and the house and senate
committees on ways and means detailing the distribution of grant funds; and
provided further, that not later than March 3, 2027, the office shall submit a
report to the house and senate committees on ways and means that shall
include, but not be limited to: (a) the number of young adults served by the
grant program during fiscal year 2027; (b) executive summaries of the
programs currently operating under the grant program; and (c) outcomes
and findings that demonstrate program success from the grant awards from
fiscal year 2026 .....................................................................................................$10,087,424
Chief Medical Examiner.
8000-0105 For the operation of the office of the chief medical examiner established in
section 2 of chapter 38 of the General Laws; provided, that not later than
January 15, 2027, the office shall submit a report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means that shall include, but not be limited to: (i)
the current caseload of the office and each of its medical examiners and the
caseload for fiscal year 2026; (ii) the number of procedures performed in
fiscal year 2026; (iii) the current turnaround time and backlogs; (iv) the
current response time to scenes; (v) the number of cases completed in fiscal
year 2026; (vi) the current status of accreditation with the National
Association of Medical Examiners; (vii) progress in identification and
completion of reports; and (viii) progress in improving delays in decedent
release ...................................................................................................................$19,761,334
8000-0122 For the office of the chief medical examiner, which may expend for its
operations not more than $8,851,118 in revenues collected from fees for
services provided by the office; provided, that notwithstanding any general or
special law to the contrary, for accommodating timing discrepancies
between the receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures, the
office may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment
amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent
revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting system ...............................$8,851,118
Department of Criminal Justice Information Services.
8000-0110 For the operation of the department of criminal justice information
services, including criminal justice information services, criminal offender
record information services, firearms support services and victim services;
provided, that funds may be expended to enable housing authorities to have
access to criminal offender record information when qualifying applicants
for state-assisted housing .......................................................................................$3,469,021
8000-0111 For the operation of the public safety information system and the criminal
records review board within the department of criminal justice information
195

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
services, which may expend for the operation of the board not more than
$5,816,920 in revenues collected from fees for services provided by the
board; provided, that funding from this item may be retained and expended
from fees charged and collected under section 172A of chapter 6 of the
General Laws; provided further, that funds may be expended to assist
formerly incarcerated persons in obtaining and maintaining employment and
to provide education and assistance regarding criminal records under said
section 172A of said chapter 6; provided further, that the commissioner of
criminal justice information services may make funds from this item
available for a competitive grant process to provide such training and
education; provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special law
to the contrary, for accommodating timing discrepancies between the
receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures, the board may incur
expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to
exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate
as reported in the state accounting system; and provided further, that any
unexpended funds in this item shall not revert but shall be made available for
this item until June 30, 2028 ....................................................................................$5,816,920
Sex Offender Registry.
8000-0125 For the operation of the sex offender registry including, but not limited to,
the costs of maintaining a computerized registry system and the
classification of persons subject to the registry; provided, that the
registration fee paid by convicted sex offenders under section 178Q of
chapter 6 of the General Laws shall be retained and expended by the sex
offender registry board; and provided further, that not later than December
16, 2026, the sex offender registry shall submit a report to the house and
senate committees on ways and means outlining: (i) the utilization of data-
sharing agreements with state agencies to find addresses of offenders that
are out of compliance; (ii) plans to establish new data-sharing agreements
with other executive branch agencies; and (iii) detailed plans to improve
overall data collection and registry maintenance to enhance public safety ............$7,406,884
Department of State Police.
8100-0006 For the department of state police, which may expend for the costs of private
police details, including administrative costs, an amount not more than
$52,000,000 from revenues collected from fees charged for such details;
provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for
accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the department may incur expenses
and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the
lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported
in the state accounting system ..............................................................................$52,000,000
8100-0012 For the department of state police, which may expend for the costs of
security services provided by state police officers, including overtime and
administrative costs, not more than $3,500,000 from fees charged for said
services; provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, for accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of
retained revenues and related expenditures, the department may incur
expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to
exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as
reported in the state accounting system .................................................................$3,500,000
196

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
8100-0018 For the department of state police, which may expend not more than
$3,205,922 from revenues collected for certain police activities provided
under agreements authorized in this item; provided, that for fiscal year 2027,
the colonel of the state police may enter into service agreements with the
commanding officer or other person in charge of a military reservation of the
United States located within the Massachusetts Development Finance
Agency and any other service agreements as necessary to enhance the
protection of persons, assets and infrastructure from possible external threat
or activity; provided further, that said agreements shall establish the
responsibilities pertaining to the operation and maintenance of police
services including, but not limited to: (i) provisions governing payment to the
department for the cost of regular salaries, overtime, retirement and other
employee benefits; and (ii) provisions governing payment to the department
for the cost of furnishings and equipment necessary to provide the police
services; provided further, that the department may charge any recipients of
police services for the cost of the services under this item; provided further,
that the colonel may expend from this item for costs associated with joint
federal and state law enforcement activities from federal reimbursements
received; and provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special
law to the contrary, for accommodating timing discrepancies between the
receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures, the department may
incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to
exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as
reported in the state accounting system .................................................................$3,205,922
8100-0102 For the costs associated with state police personnel assigned to the
Massachusetts Port Authority, which may expend for the costs of police
activities provided by state police officers, including overtime and
administrative costs, not more than $52,000,000 from fees collected for
such activities; provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to
the contrary, for accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt
of retained revenues and related expenditures, the department of state
police may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment
amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent
revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting system .............................$52,000,000
8100-0515 For the expenses of hiring, equipping and training state police recruits to
maintain appropriate staffing levels for the state police; provided, that funds
shall be expended to promote diversity and inclusion in the hiring of police
recruits; and provided further, that funds shall be expended to implement
comprehensive racial bias training within the department of state police to
address racial inequities in policing practices .......................................................$10,434,091
8100-1001 For the administration and operation of the department of state police;
provided, that the department shall expend funds from this item to maximize
federal grants for the operation of a counter-terrorism unit and the payment
of overtime for state police officers; provided further, that the department
shall maintain the division of field services, which shall include, but not be
limited to, the bureau of metropolitan district operations; provided further,
that not less than 40 officers shall be provided to the department of
conservation and recreation to patrol its watershed property; provided
further, that the department of state police shall enter into an interagency
agreement with the department of conservation and recreation to provide
police coverage on department of conservation and recreation properties
and parkways; provided further, that not less than $1,200,000 shall be
expended for the payroll costs of the department of state police directed
197

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
patrols; provided further, that not less than $30,000 of said funds shall be
expended for Troop A of the department of state police to conduct
mounted, directed patrols throughout Revere beach, the Lynn Fells and
the Middlesex Fells Reservation park among other identified areas;
provided further, that subject to appropriation communities receiving funds
for directed patrols in fiscal year 2008 shall receive an equal disbursement
of funds in proportion to the current appropriation in fiscal year 2024;
provided further, that funds shall be expended for directed patrols at
Constitution beach in the East Boston section of the city of Boston;
provided further, that not less than $95,000 of said funds shall be
expended for additional patrols for the summer season at Wollaston beach
and Furnace Brook parkway in the city of Quincy; provided further, that not
less than $95,000 shall be expended for department of state police patrols
in the Wollaston beach and Quincy Shore drive area and Furnace Brook
parkway of the city of Quincy from May 31 to September 1; provided
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended for department of
state police patrols and traffic enforcement functions on the Harry Truman
parkway, Neponset Valley parkway and Dedham parkway in the Hyde
Park section of the city of Boston; provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended for directed patrols in the South Boston section
of the city of Boston including, but not limited to, Day boulevard, Carson
beach, M Street beach, Marine park and Castle Island; provided further,
that funds shall be expended for the administration and operation of an
automated fingerprint identification system and for the motor carrier safety
assistance program; provided further, that the creation of a new or an
expansion of the existing statewide communications network shall include
the office of law enforcement in the executive office of energy and
environmental affairs at no cost to or compensation from the executive
office; provided further, that the department of state police may expend
funds from this item for the administration of budgetary, procurement, fiscal,
human resources, payroll and other administrative services of the office of
the chief medical examiner, the municipal police training committee and the
department of criminal justice information services; provided further, that the
department shall submit quarterly reports to the house and senate
committees on ways and means; and provided further, that each report shall
include, but not be limited to: (i) the total compensation paid to each trooper,
delineated by category of payout; (ii) the total compensation paid to each
troop in the aggregate, delineated by regular and overtime compensation;
(iii) the average hours of overtime accumulated, delineated by trooper and
reason for the use of overtime; (iv) the average hours of overtime
accumulated, delineated by troop in the aggregate; and (v) a detailed plan
outlining steps to decrease overtime usage and increase accountability and
oversight within the department ..............................................................................$407,718,479
State Police Crime Laboratory.
8100-1004 For the operation and related costs of the state police crime laboratory,
including the analysis of samples used in the prosecution of controlled
substance offenses conducted at the former department of public health
facilities; provided, that the analysis of narcotic drug synthetic substitutes,
poisons, drugs, medicines and chemicals shall be funded from this item in
order to support the law enforcement efforts of the district attorneys, the
state police and municipal police departments; provided further, that the
practices and procedures of the state police crime laboratory shall be
informed by the recommendations of the forensic science oversight board;
provided further, that the department of state police shall submit quarterly
198

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
reports to the house and senate committees on ways and means that shall
include, but not be limited to: (i) the caseload of each lab; (ii) all relevant
information regarding turnaround time and backlogs by type of case; and
(iii) the accreditation status of each lab; provided further, that not later than
October 5, 2026, the first such report shall be submitted; provided further,
that funds shall be spent on phase II of the processing of sexual assault
evidence kits; and provided further, that not later than March 3, 2027, the
department of state police shall submit a report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means that shall include, but not be limited to: (a)
the status of phase II of the processing of sexual assault evidence kits; (b)
an anticipated timeline for completion of phase II; and (c) the year to date
cost of processing sexual assault evidence kits as part of phase II .....................$30,718,350
8100-1005 For the analysis of narcotic drug synthetic substitutes, poisons, drugs,
medicines and chemicals at the University of Massachusetts medical school
to support the law enforcement efforts of the district attorneys, the
department of state police and municipal police departments ...................................$651,506
Municipal Police Training Committee.
8200-0200 For the operation of veteran, reserve and in-service training programs
conducted by the municipal police training committee; provided, that no
expenditures authorized by this item shall be charged to item 8200-0222 ..........$18,895,529
General Fund ........................................................93.67%
Public Safety Training Fund ....................................6.33%
8200-0222 For the municipal police training committee, which may collect and expend
not more than $2,800,000 to provide training to new recruits; provided, that
the committee shall charge $3,200 per recruit for the training; provided
further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the
committee shall charge a fee of $3,200 per person for training programs
operated by the committee for all persons who begin training not later than
July 1, 2026; provided further, that said fee shall be retained and expended
by the committee; provided further, that the trainee or, if the trainee is a
recruit, the municipality in which the recruit shall serve, shall provide the fee
in full to the committee not later than the first day of orientation for the
program in which the trainee or recruit has enrolled; provided further, that
no recruit or person shall begin training unless the municipality or the person
has provided the fee in full to the committee; provided further, that for recruits
of municipalities, upon the completion of the program, the municipality shall
deduct the fee from the recruit’s wages in 23 equal monthly installments
unless otherwise negotiated between the recruit and the municipality in
which the recruit shall serve; provided further, that if a recruit withdraws from
the training program prior to graduation, the committee shall refund the
municipality in which the recruit was to have served a portion of the fee
according to the following schedule: (i) if a recruit withdraws from the
program prior to the start of week 2, 75 per cent of the fee shall be refunded;
(ii) if a recruit withdraws from the program after the start of week 2 but prior
to the start of week 3, 50 per cent of the fee shall be refunded; (iii) if a recruit
withdraws from the program after the start of week 3 but prior to the start of
week 4, 25 per cent of the fee shall be refunded; and (iv) if a recruit withdraws
after the start of week 4, the fee shall not be refunded; provided further, that
a recruit who withdraws from the program shall pay the municipality in which
the recruit was to have served the difference between the fee and the
amount forfeited by the municipality according to the schedule; provided
199

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
further, that the schedule shall also apply to trainees other than recruits who
enroll in the program; provided further, that no expenditures shall be
charged to this item that are not directly related to new recruit training;
provided further, that no expenditures shall be charged to this item that are
related to chief, veteran, in-service or reserve training or any training not
directly related to new recruits; provided further, that the committee shall
submit a report on the status of recruit training, including the number of
classes, start and end dates of each class, total number of recruits enrolled
and graduating in each class, cost per recruit and cost per class for fiscal
years 2026 and 2027; provided further, that not later than January 8, 2027,
the report shall be submitted to the house and senate committees on ways
and means; and provided further, that notwithstanding any general or
special law to the contrary, for accommodating timing discrepancies
between the receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures, the
committee may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment
amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent
revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting system ................................$2,800,000
Department of Fire Services.
8324-0000 For the administration of the department of fire services, including the office
of the state fire marshal, the hazardous materials emergency response
program, the board of fire prevention regulations established in section 4 of
chapter 22D of the General Laws, the expenses of the fire safety
commission and the Massachusetts firefighting academy, including the
Massachusetts fire training council certification program, municipal and
non-municipal fire training and expenses of the council; provided, that the fire
training program shall use the split days option; provided further, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, 100 per cent of
the amount appropriated in this item for the administration of the department
of fire services, the office of the state fire marshal, the Massachusetts
firefighting academy, critical incident stress management programs, the On-
Site Academy, other fire department training academies, the regional
dispatch centers, the radio and dispatch center improvements and the
associated fringe benefit costs of personnel paid from this item for these
purposes shall be assessed upon insurance companies writing fire,
homeowners multiple peril or commercial multiple peril policies on property
situated in the commonwealth and paid within 30 days after receiving notice
of this assessment from the commissioner of insurance; provided further,
that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, 100 per cent
of the amount appropriated in item 8100-1001 for all purposes related to fire
and arson investigation shall be assessed upon insurance companies
writing fire, homeowners multiple peril or commercial multiple peril policies
on property situated in the commonwealth, and paid within 30 days after
receiving notice of this assessment from the commissioner of insurance;
provided further, that not more than 10 per cent of the amount designated
for the arson prevention program shall be expended for the administrative
cost of the program; provided further, that notwithstanding any general or
special law to the contrary, 100 per cent of the amount appropriated in this
item for the operation of the hazardous materials emergency response
program and the associated fringe benefit costs of personnel paid from this
item for these purposes shall be assessed upon insurance companies
writing commercial multiple peril, non-liability portion policies on property
situated in the commonwealth and commercial auto liability policies as
referenced in line 5.1 and line 19.4, respectively, in the most recent annual
statement on file with the commissioner of insurance; provided further, that
200

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
not less than $100,000 shall be allocated by the department for critical
incident stress management; provided further, that not less than $2,000,000
shall be allocated by the department for the student awareness fire
education program; provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be
expended to the town of Holbrook for the Holbrook Regional Emergency
Communication Center; provided further, that not less than $1,700,000
shall be expended for the Boston fire department training academy to
provide training and instruction for public safety agencies in the city of
Boston and municipal and political subdivisions across the
commonwealth; provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be
expended for a municipal grant program administered by the fire marshal
for firefighter cancer screenings including advanced blood testing and
imaging; and provided further, that not less than $500,000 shall be allocated
by the department for On-Site Academy for critical incident stress
management services ...........................................................................................$44,000,031
8324-0050 For the commonwealth’s local fire departments; provided further, that not
less than $55,000 shall be expended to the city of Quincy for a hazardous
materials emergency response program; provided, that not less than
$15,000 shall be expended to the town of Webster for firefighter turnout
gear or other related expenses for the Webster fire department; provided
further, that not less than $75,000 shall be expended to the town of North
Andover for a fire life safety training trailer replacement; provided further,
that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the town of Boxford for
the replacement of Boxford fire department hydraulic rescue tools used for
vehicle extrication; provided further, that not less than $35,000 shall be
expended to the city of Framingham for the Framingham fire department
to establish a senior home safety initiative to provide free home safety
assessments for seniors; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall
be expended to the town of Rehoboth fire department for the purchase of
turnout gear; provided further, that not less than $12,000 shall be
expended to the East Bridgewater fire department for maintenance and
infrastructure improvements; provided further, that not less than $50,000
shall be expended to the Plymouth fire department to support the
modernization of its radio communications system and transition to a
platform that is aligned with the Commonwealth of Massachusetts
Interoperable Radio System (CoMIRS); provided further, that not less than
$75,000 shall be expended to the town of Mendon fire department for the
purchase of an electric pickup truck; provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended to the Topsfield fire department for the
procurement of a new fire compression and oxygen cylinder fill station;
provided further, that not less than $40,000 shall be expended to the
Marblehead fire department for a replacement boiler; provided further, that
not less than $45,000 shall be expended to the Dudley fire department for
security and access system repairs and upgrades; provided further, that
not less than $20,000 shall be expended to the Charlton fire department
to establish community fire safety and fire extinguisher training programs;
provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall be expended to the West
Brookfield fire department for turnout gear; provided further, that not less
than $75,000 shall be expended to the Saugus fire department for the
replacement of safety gear and equipment; provided further, that not less
than $45,000 shall be expended to the Lunenburg fire department for the
replacement of aging portable radios; provided further, that not less than
$25,000 shall be expended to the Lynn fire department for the purchase
of a self-contained breathing air system trailer; provided further, that not
less than $50,000 shall be expended to the town of Wakefield for the
201

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
acquisition of a high speed washer-extractor and dryer-extractor for the
fire department; provided further, that not less than $24,000 shall be
expended to the town of Wakefield for a new lighting grid for use by
Wakefield Community Access Television; provided further, that not less
than $50,000 shall be expended to the Amherst fire department to support
the purchase of equipment, including, but not limited to, a station alerting
system; provided further, that not less than $60,000 shall be expended to
the Granby fire department to support the purchase of equipment,
including, but not limited to, portable communication radios; provided
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the Bridgewater
fire department for battery-powered extrication tools; provided further, that
not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the South Hadley fire
department (district 2) to upgrade personal radios to P25-compliant
equipment; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended
to the Easthampton fire department to upgrade vehicle extrication
equipment; provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall be expended
to the city known as the town of North Attleborough for firefighter gear,
equipment or other related expenses; provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended to the Westwood fire department for the
Westwood fire station 1 project; provided further, that not less than
$30,000 shall be expended to the Milton fire department for a replacement
pump for the department’s brush truck; provided further, that not less than
$25,000 shall be expended to the Bourne fire department for equipment
purchases, maintenance and personnel training; provided further, that not
less than $25,000 shall be expended to the Everett fire department for
active shooter training; provided further, that not less than $60,000 shall
be expended to the town of Dracut for the design of a rescue boat ramp
for the Merrimack river in the town of Dracut; provided further, that not less
than $15,000 shall be expended to the Ashby fire department for extracting
equipment; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended
to the Stoneham fire department for gear and equipment purchases and
maintenance; provided further, that not less than $150,000 be expended
to the town of Winchester for first responder and dispatch communication
upgrades; provided further, that not less than $75,000 shall be expended
to the town of Weston for updates and modifications to a fire vehicle;
provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to the town
of Weston for design funds for the fire department project; provided further,
that not less than $150,000 shall be expended to the town of Stow for new
firefighting water cisterns; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall
be expended to the city known as the town of Winthrop for thermal imaging
cameras and related equipment for the Winthrop fire department; provided
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the city known as
the town of Winthrop for required evidence room upgrades at the Winthrop
police department; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to the Norton fire department for safety gear and equipment
replacements; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended for rescue and water rescue training for the Hanson fire
department and members of the Massachusetts Helicopter Aquatic
Rescue Team; and provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be
expended for the Andover fire rescue department for any costs related to
a replacement vehicle and outfitting materials to support emergency
response and firefighter safety ..............................................................................$1,971,000
8324-0304 For the department of fire services, which may expend for enforcement and
training not more than $8,500 from revenue generated under chapter 148A
of the General Laws; provided, that notwithstanding any general or special
202

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
law to the contrary, for accommodating timing discrepancies between the
receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures, the department may
incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to
exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate
as reported in the state accounting system ....................................................................$8,500
8324-0500 For the department of fire services, which may expend not more than
$2,410,369 in revenues collected from fees for annual issuance of boiler
and pressure vessel certificates and inspections; provided, that funds shall
be expended for the operation of the department and to address the existing
boiler and pressure vessel inspection backlog; provided further, that funds
shall be expended for hiring additional engineering inspectors or engineers;
and provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, for accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of
retained revenues and related expenditures, the department may incur
expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to
exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate
as reported in the state accounting system ............................................................$2,410,369
Military Division.
8700-0001 For the operation of the military division, including the offices of the adjutant
general and state quartermaster, the operation of the armories, the Camp
Curtis Guild rifle range and certain national guard aviation facilities;
provided, that notwithstanding chapter 30 of the General Laws, certain
military personnel in the military division may be paid salaries according to
military pay grades; provided further, that the division may expend funds
appropriated in this item for the administration of budgetary, procurement,
fiscal, human resources, payroll and other administrative services; and
provided further, that the adjutant general shall maintain a roster of
Massachusetts veterans as directed by section 15 of chapter 33 of the
General Laws ........................................................................................................$13,675,135
8700-1140 For the military division, which may expend for the costs of national guard
missions and division operations not more than $1,900,000 from fees
charged for the nonmilitary rental or use of armories and from
reimbursements generated by national guard missions; provided, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for
accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the division may incur expenses and
the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of
this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the
state accounting system ..........................................................................................$1,900,000
8700-1150 For reimbursement of the costs of the national guard tuition and fee waivers
under section 19 of chapter 15A of the General Laws; provided, that no
funds shall be distributed from this item prior to certification by the state
universities, community colleges and the University of Massachusetts of the
actual amount of tuition and fees waived for national guard members
attending public institutions of higher education under said section 19 of said
chapter 15A that would otherwise have been retained by the campuses
according to procedures and regulations promulgated by the military division;
provided further, that funds from this item may be expended for the
reimbursement of the tuition and fees waived for classes taken during the
summer months; and provided further, that the funds appropriated under
203

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
this item shall not revert but shall be made available for these purposes until
June 30, 2028 ..........................................................................................................$8,028,077
8700-1160 For life insurance premiums under section 88B of chapter 33 of the
General Laws ...........................................................................................................$1,153,552
Massachusetts Emergency Management Agency.
8800-0001 For the operations of the Massachusetts emergency management
agency; provided, that expenditures from this item shall be contingent upon
the prior approval of the proper federal authorities; provided further, that the
funds appropriated under this item shall not revert but shall be made
available for these purposes through June 30, 2028; provided further, that
the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed $5,000,000
in excess of the current appropriation; and provided further, that such
expenditures shall be approved by the secretary of public safety and
security, who shall cite a state of emergency declaration for each approved
expenditure, in consultation with the secretary of administration and finance
.................................................................................................................................$7,163,274
Department of Correction.
8900-0001 For the operation of the department of correction; provided, that not later
than January 6, 2027, the commissioner of correction and the secretary of
public safety and security shall report to the house and senate committees
on ways and means and the joint committee on public safety and homeland
security on the point score compiled by the department’s objective
classification system for all prisoners confined in each prison operated by
the department; provided further, that to maximize bed capacity and re-entry
capability, the department shall submit quarterly reports, utilizing
standardized reporting definitions developed mutually with the
Massachusetts Sheriffs Association, Inc. on caseload, admissions,
classification, releases and recidivism of all pre-trial, sentenced and federal
incarcerated persons; provided further, that the department shall submit the
reports on a quarterly basis not more than 30 days following the last day
of the quarter; provided further, that not less than $125,000 shall be
expended for the Disability Law Center, Inc. to monitor the efficacy of service
delivery reforms at Bridgewater state hospital, including units at the Old
Colony correctional center and the treatment center; provided further, that
the Disability Law Center, Inc. may investigate the physical environment of
said facilities, including infrastructure issues, and may use methods
including, but not limited to, testing and sampling the physical and
environmental conditions, whether or not they are utilized by patients or
incarcerated persons; provided further, that the Disability Law Center, Inc.
may monitor the continuity of care for persons who are discharged from
Bridgewater state hospital to county correctional facilities or department of
mental health facilities, including assessment of the efficacy of admission,
discharge and transfer planning procedures and coordination between the
department of correction, Wellpath LLC, the department of mental health
and county correctional facilities; and provided further, that at least once
every 6 months, the Disability Law Center, Inc. shall report on the impact of
these reforms on those served at Bridgewater state hospital to the joint
committee on mental health, substance use and recovery, the joint
committee on the judiciary, the house and senate committees on ways and
means, the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of
representatives ....................................................................................................$858,650,607
204

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
8900-0002 For the operation of the Massachusetts Alcohol and Substance Abuse
Center ....................................................................................................................$24,521,860
8900-0003 For the implementation of mandated reforms to mental and behavioral
health and residential treatment related to the department of correction
under chapter 69 of the acts of 2018; provided, that funds from this item may
be expended for contracted service providers specializing in relevant areas
including, but not limited to, behavioral health and residential treatment; and
provided further, that said funds shall only be expended in the AA or DD
object classes if said funds are to be utilized for counselors, teachers, mental
health personnel, medical personnel or additional legal staff .................................$4,831,338
8900-0010 For prison industries and farm services; provided, that the commissioner of
correction or a designee shall determine the cost of manufacturing motor
vehicle registration plates and certify to the comptroller the amounts to be
transferred from the Commonwealth Transportation Fund established in
section 2ZZZ of chapter 29 of the General Laws to the department of
correction revenue source; and provided further, that not later than March
11, 2027 the department shall submit a report to the executive office of
public safety and security, the joint committee on the judiciary, the joint
committee on public safety and homeland security and the house and
senate committees on ways and means that shall include, but not be limited
to: (i) a comprehensive quantitative analysis of the impact that the program
has on participating incarcerated persons as compared to non-participating
incarcerated persons, including their disciplinary record while in custody,
their recidivism rate after release and their employment rate after release;
(ii) information on the demographics of participants; (iii) information on the
customers of the program, including whether they are a public entity, a
private business or a nonprofit; and (iv) the compensation rates for
participants ..............................................................................................................$7,129,800
8900-0011 For the prison industries and farm services program, which may expend for
the operation of the program not more than $5,600,000 in revenues
collected from the sale of products, for materials, supplies, equipment,
maintenance of facilities and compensation of employees; provided, that the
commissioner of correction may allocate year-end net profits to the cost of
drug, substance use and rehabilitative programming; and provided further,
that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for
accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the department of correction may incur
expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to
exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue
estimate as reported in the state accounting system ..............................................$5,600,000
8900-0050 For the department of correction, which may expend not more than
$8,600,000 in revenues collected from existing assessments, and the state
criminal alien assistance program; provided, that notwithstanding any
general or special law to the contrary, for accommodating timing
discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
expenditures, the department may incur expenses and the comptroller may
certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or
the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting system
.................................................................................................................................$8,600,000
205

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
8900-1100 For re-entry programs at the department of correction that are intended to
reduce recidivism rates; provided, that said programs shall be in addition to
such provided in fiscal year 2026; provided further, that not later than
January 15, 2027, the department shall report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means on re-entry programming at the department;
and provided further, that said report shall include information on the type of
programs provided and the recidivism rate of the offenders who successfully
completed said programs .........................................................................................$1,473,777
Parole Board.
8950-0001 For the operation of the parole board ....................................................................$25,527,789
8950-0002 For the victim and witness assistance program under chapter 258B of the
General Laws ..............................................................................................................$270,032
Sheriffs.
Hampden Sheriff’s Office.
8910-0102 For the operation of the Hampden sheriff’s office; provided, that not later
than December 16, 2026, the office shall provide a comprehensive inventory
of all current programs and practices, in a manner to be determined by the
executive office of public safety and security, to the executive office for
administration and finance, the executive office of public safety and security
and the house and senate committees on ways and means; provided
further, that the office shall provide relevant data to the executive office of
public safety and security to allow for the reporting of recidivism rates for all
pre-trial, county-sentenced and state-sentenced incarcerated persons on a
quarterly basis beginning in the quarter ending September 30, 2026 which
shall be due not later than 30 days after the last day of each quarter;
provided further, that no funds in this item shall be expended out of the AA
or DD object classes; provided further, that not later than November 2, 2026
the Hampden sheriff’s office shall submit a report to the secretary of
administration and finance as well as the chairs of the house and senate
committees on ways and means; provided further, that said report shall
include, but not be limited to: (i) a detailed breakdown of all programs and
services provided by the Hampden sheriff’s office in and outside of the
sheriff’s office facilities; (ii) a breakdown of the cost of providing each
program and service; (iii) information on the participants or customers of the
program, including whether they are incarcerated persons, a public entity, a
private business or a nonprofit; (iv) comprehensive quantitative analysis of
the impact that the program has on said participants, including their
disciplinary record while in custody, their recidivism rate after release and
their employment rate after release when applicable; and (v) the
compensation rates for participants; and provided further, that the office
shall provide relevant data to the Massachusetts Sheriffs Association, Inc.
to allow for the reporting of all requirements under item 8910-7110 ......................$3,671,223
8910-0103 For the AA and DD object class costs of the Hampden sheriff’s office;
provided, that staffing costs shall not be projected to exceed the amount
appropriated in this item; provided further, that not later than November 2,
2026, the Hampden sheriff’s office shall file a report with the executive office
for administration and finance and to the house and senate committees on
ways and means on the current fiscal year payroll spending projections; and
206

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
provided further, that said report shall include, but shall not be limited to: (i)
the number of full time equivalent employees; (ii) the current salary of each
employee; (iii) the bargaining unit of each employee; (iv) the additional costs
of implementing any collective bargaining agreement for each employee
over the next 12 months; (v) any plans to hire additional employees and the
costs associated with those employees; and (vi) the ratio of full time
equivalent employees to average daily supervisory population ...........................$92,276,918
8910-0104 For the operation of a regional section 35 program under section 35 of
chapter 123 of the General Laws in western Massachusetts for the counties
of Hampden, Hampshire, Worcester, Franklin and Berkshire that provides
involuntary commitment to a treatment facility for not more than 90 days of
an individual who has an addiction to alcohol or drugs; provided, that the
program shall be located in Hampden county to provide treatment, case
management, medical and mental health services, withdrawal management
and ongoing monitoring, medication addiction treatment and safety and
security staffing as well as release planning and after care services; and
provided further, that additional costs associated with said program shall
include medication, food, clothing, medical needs and psychiatric
services ..................................................................................................................$14,000,000
8910-1000 For the Hampden sheriff’s office, which may expend for the operation of a
prison industries program not more than $3,631,252 in revenues collected
from the sale of products for materials, supplies, equipment, maintenance of
facilities, reimbursement for community service projects and compensation
of employees of the program; provided, that not later than March 16, 2027,
the office shall submit a report to the executive office of public safety and
security, the joint committee on the judiciary, the joint committee on public
safety and homeland security and the house and senate committees on
ways and means that shall include, but not be limited to: (i) a comprehensive
quantitative analysis of the impact that the program has on participating
incarcerated persons as compared to non-participating incarcerated
persons, including their disciplinary record while in custody, their recidivism
rates after release and their employment rates after release; (ii) information
on the demographics of participants; (iii) information on the customers of the
program, including whether they are a public entity, a private business or a
nonprofit organization; and (iv) the compensation rates for participants; and
provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, for accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of
retained revenues and related expenditures, the office may incur expenses
and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower
of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the
state accounting system ..........................................................................................$3,631,252
8910-1010 For the operation of a regional behavioral evaluation and stabilization unit to
provide forensic mental health services within existing physical facilities for
incarcerated persons in the care of correctional facilities; provided, that the
unit shall be located in Hampden county to serve the needs of incarcerated
persons in the care of Berkshire, Franklin, Hampden, Hampshire and
Worcester counties; provided further, that the services of the unit shall be
made available to incarcerated persons in the care of the department of
correction; provided further, that the Hampden sheriff’s office shall work in
cooperation with the Middlesex sheriff’s office to determine a standardized
set of definitions and measurements for patients at both regional behavioral
evaluation and stabilization units; provided further, that not later than
February 9, 2027, the Hampden sheriff’s office, in cooperation with the
207

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
department of correction and the Massachusetts Sheriffs Association, Inc.,
shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways and
means that shall include, but not be limited to, the: (i) number of incarcerated
persons in facilities located in counties that were provided services in each
unit; (ii) number of incarcerated persons in department of correction facilities
that were provided services in each unit; (iii) alleviation of caseload at
Bridgewater state hospital associated with fewer incarcerated persons in the
care of counties being attended to at the hospital; (iv) estimated and
projected cost savings in fiscal year 2027 to the sheriffs’ offices and the
department of correction associated with the regional units; and (v)
deficiencies in addressing the needs of incarcerated women; and provided
further, that the department of mental health shall maintain the monitoring
and quality review functions of the unit ...................................................................$1,413,224
8910-1020 For costs related to department of correction incarcerated persons with not
more than 2 years of their sentence remaining who have been
transferred to the care of the Hampden sheriff’s office ..............................................$667,691
8910-1030 For the operation of the western Massachusetts regional women’s
correctional center ...................................................................................................$5,041,957
8910-1040 For the delivery of a medication-assisted treatment program in Hampden
sheriff’s office facilities across Hampden county; provided, that no funds in
this item shall be expended out of the AA or DD object classes; provided
further, that not later than November 2, 2026, the Hampden sheriff’s office
shall submit a report to the secretary of administration and finance as well
as the chairs of the house and senate committees on ways and means; and
provided further, that said report shall include, but not be limited to: (i) the
number of participants in said program; (ii) the breakdown of dosage and
type of medications administered; and (iii) the cost breakdown of said
medications ..............................................................................................................$2,333,907
8910-1060 For the costs of providing voice communication services, including phone
calls, and other communication services free of charge to the person
initiating and the person receiving the communication pursuant to section
87A of chapter 127 of the General Laws; provided, that no funds in this item
shall be expended out of the AA or DD object classes; provided further, that
starting on November 2, 2026, the Hampden sheriff’s office shall submit
quarterly reports to the secretary of administration and finance and to the
chairs of the house and senate committees on ways and means on
documentation of communication services provided free of charge,
including but not limited to, the following information for each facility: (i)
amounts expended for communication services; (ii) a breakdown of the cost
of each call by minute; (iii) a breakdown of the cost of each other
communication service offered by minute; (iv) the number of phone calls,
video communications, electronic communications and other
communications services at each facility; and (v) any changes in contracts
for voice communication services, including any progress in maximizing
purchasing power and consolidating contracts between the sheriffs and the
department of correction; and provided further, that the secretary of
administration and finance may require additional documentation as
deemed necessary by the secretary ..........................................................................$486,538
Worcester Sheriff’s Office.
208

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
8910-0105 For the operation of the Worcester sheriff’s office; provided, that not later
than December 16, 2026, the office shall provide a comprehensive inventory
of all current programs and practices, in a manner to be determined by the
executive office of public safety and security, to the executive office for
administration and finance, the executive office of public safety and security
and the house and senate committees on ways and means; provided
further, that the office shall provide relevant data to the executive office of
public safety and security to allow for the reporting of recidivism rates for all
pre-trial, county-sentenced and state-sentenced incarcerated persons on a
quarterly basis beginning in the quarter ending September 30, 2026 and
shall be due not later than 30 days after the last day of each quarter;
provided further, that no funds in this item shall be expended out of the AA
or DD object classes; provided further, that not later than November 2, 2026
the Worcester sheriff’s office shall submit a report to the secretary of
administration and finance as well as the chairs of the house and senate
committees on ways and means; provided further, that said report shall
include, but not be limited to: (i) a detailed breakdown of all programs and
services provided by the Worcester sheriff’s office in and outside of the
sheriff’s office facilities; (ii) a breakdown of the cost of providing each
program and service; (iii) information on the participants or customers of the
program, including whether they are incarcerated persons, a public entity, a
private business or a nonprofit; (iv) comprehensive quantitative analysis of
the impact that the program has on said participants, including their
disciplinary record while in custody, their recidivism rate after release and
their employment rate after release when applicable; and (v) the
compensation rates for participants; and provided further, that the office
shall provide relevant data to the Massachusetts Sheriffs Association, Inc.
to allow for the reporting of all requirements under item 8910-7110 ......................$7,407,247
8910-0106 For the AA and DD object class costs of the Worcester sheriff’s office;
provided, that staffing costs shall not be projected to exceed the amount
appropriated in this item; provided further, that not later than November 2,
2026, the Worcester sheriff’s office shall file a report with the executive office
for administration and finance and to the house and senate committees on
ways and means on the current fiscal year payroll spending projections; and
provided further, that said report shall include, but shall not be limited to: (i)
the number of full time equivalent employees; (ii) the current salary of each
employee; (iii) the bargaining unit of each employee; (iv) the additional costs
of implementing any collective bargaining agreement for each employee
over the next 12 months; (v) any plans to hire additional employees and the
costs associated with those employees; and (vi) the ratio of full time
equivalent employees to average daily supervisory population ...........................$55,104,159
8910-1011 For the delivery of a medication-assisted treatment program in Worcester
sheriff’s office facilities across Worcester county; provided, that no funds in
this item shall be expended out of the AA or DD object classes; provided
further, that not later than November 2, 2026, the Worcester sheriff’s office
shall submit a report to the secretary of administration and finance as well
as the chairs of the house and senate committees on ways and means; and
provided further, that said report shall include, but not be limited to: (i) the
number of participants in said program; (ii) the breakdown of dosage and
type of medications administered; and (iii) the cost breakdown of said
medications .................................................................................................................$733,951
8910-1012 For the costs of providing voice communication services, including phone
calls, and other communication services free of charge to the person
209

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
initiating and the person receiving the communication pursuant to section
87A of chapter 127 of the General Laws; provided, that no funds in this item
shall be expended out of the AA or DD object classes; provided further, that
starting on November 2, 2026, the Worcester sheriff’s office shall submit
quarterly reports to the secretary of administration and finance and to the
chairs of the house and senate committees on ways and means on
documentation of communication services provided free of charge,
including but not limited to, the following information for each facility: (i)
amounts expended for communication services; (ii) a breakdown of the cost
of each call by minute; (iii) a breakdown of the cost of each other
communication service offered by minute; (iv) the number of phone calls,
video communications, electronic communications and other
communications services at each facility; and (v) any changes in contracts
for voice communication services, including any progress in maximizing
purchasing power and consolidating contracts between the sheriffs and the
department of correction; and provided further, that the secretary of
administration and finance may require additional documentation as
deemed necessary by the secretary .......................................................................$1,470,000
Middlesex Sheriff’s Office.
8910-0107 For the operation of the Middlesex sheriff’s office; provided, that not later
than December 16, 2026, the office shall provide a comprehensive inventory
of all current programs and practices, in a manner to be determined by the
executive office of public safety and security, to the executive office for
administration and finance, the executive office of public safety and security
and the house and senate committees on ways and means; provided
further, that the office shall provide relevant data to the executive office of
public safety and security to allow for the reporting of recidivism rates for all
pre-trial, county sentenced and state sentenced incarcerated persons on a
quarterly basis beginning in the quarter ending September 30, 2026 and
which shall be due not later than 30 days after the last day of each quarter;
provided further, that no funds in this item shall be expended out of the AA
or DD object classes; provided further, that not later than November 2, 2026
the Middlesex sheriff’s office shall submit a report to the secretary of
administration and finance as well as the chairs of the house and senate
committees on ways and means; provided further, that said report shall
include, but not be limited to: (i) a detailed breakdown of all programs and
services provided by the Middlesex sheriff’s office in and outside of the
sheriff’s office facilities; (ii) a breakdown of the cost of providing each
program and service; (iii) information on the participants or customers of the
program, including whether they are incarcerated persons, a public entity, a
private business or a nonprofit; (iv) comprehensive quantitative analysis of
the impact that the program has on said participants, including their
disciplinary record while in custody, their recidivism rate after release and
their employment rate after release when applicable; and (v) the
compensation rates for participants; and provided further, that the office
shall provide relevant data to the Massachusetts Sheriffs Association, Inc.
to allow for the reporting of all requirements under item 8910-7110 ......................$6,925,992
8910-1013 For the AA and DD object class costs of the Middlesex sheriff’s office;
provided, that staffing costs shall not be projected to exceed the amount
appropriated in this item; provided further, that not later than November 2,
2026, the Middlesex sheriff’s office shall file a report with the executive office
for administration and finance and to the house and senate committees on
ways and means on the current fiscal year payroll spending projections; and
210

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
provided further, that said report shall include, but shall not be limited to: (i)
the number of full time equivalent employees; (ii) the current salary of each
employee; (iii) the bargaining unit of each employee; (iv) the additional costs
of implementing any collective bargaining agreement for each employee
over the next 12 months; (v) any plans to hire additional employees and the
costs associated with those employees; and (vi) the ratio of full time
equivalent employees to average daily supervisory population ...........................$72,711,719
8910-1014 For the delivery of a medication-assisted treatment program in Middlesex
sheriff’s office facilities across Middlesex county; provided, that no funds in
this item shall be expended out of the AA or DD object classes; provided
further, that not later than November 2, 2026, the Middlesex sheriff’s office
shall submit a report to the secretary of administration and finance as well
as the chairs of the house and senate committees on ways and means; and
provided further, that said report shall include, but not be limited to: (i) the
number of participants in said program; (ii) the breakdown of dosage and
type of medications administered; and (iii) the cost breakdown of said
medications ..............................................................................................................$1,539,813
8910-1015 For the costs of providing voice communication services, including phone
calls, and other communication services free of charge to the person
initiating and the person receiving the communication pursuant to section
87A of chapter 127 of the General Laws; provided, that no funds in this item
shall be expended out of the AA or DD object classes; provided further, that
starting on November 2, 2026, the Middlesex sheriff’s office shall submit
quarterly reports to the secretary of administration and finance and to the
chairs of the house and senate committees on ways and means on
documentation of communication services provided free of charge,
including but not limited to, the following information for each facility: (i)
amounts expended for communication services; (ii) a breakdown of the cost
of each call by minute; (iii) a breakdown of the cost of each other
communication service offered by minute; (iv) the number of phone calls,
video communications, electronic communications and other
communications services at each facility; and (v) any changes in contracts
for voice communication services, including any progress in maximizing
purchasing power and consolidating contracts between the sheriffs and the
department of correction; and provided further, that the secretary of
administration and finance may require additional documentation as
deemed necessary by the secretary .......................................................................$1,498,608
8910-0450 For the Middlesex sheriff's office, which may expend not more than
$100,000 in revenues collected from public or private entities or persons for
community programs; provided, that notwithstanding any general or special
law to the contrary, for accommodating timing discrepancies between the
receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures, the office may incur
expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to
exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate
as reported in the state accounting system ................................................................$100,000
8910-1100 For the Middlesex sheriff’s office, which may expend for the operation of a
prison industries program not more than $75,000 in revenues collected from
the sale of products, for materials, supplies, equipment, recyclable
reimbursements, printing services, maintenance of facilities and
compensation of employees of said program; provided, that not later than
March 16, 2027, the office shall submit a report to the executive office of
public safety and security, the joint committee on the judiciary, the joint
211

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
committee on public safety and homeland security and the house and
senate committees on ways and means that shall include, but not be limited
to: (i) a comprehensive quantitative analysis of the impact that the program
has on participating incarcerated persons as compared to non-participating
incarcerated persons, including their disciplinary record while in custody,
their recidivism rates after release and their employment rates after release;
(ii) information on the demographics of participants; (iii) information on the
customers of the program, including whether they are a public entity, a
private business or a nonprofit organization; and (iv) the compensation rates
for participants; and provided further, that notwithstanding any general or
special law to the contrary, for accommodating timing discrepancies
between the receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures, the office
may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts
not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue
estimate as reported in the state accounting system ...................................................$75,000
8910-1101 For the operation of a regional behavioral evaluation and stabilization unit to
provide forensic mental health services within existing physical facilities for
incarcerated persons in the care of correctional facilities; provided, that the
unit shall be located in Middlesex county to serve the needs of incarcerated
persons in the care of the counties of Barnstable, Bristol, Dukes County,
Essex, Nantucket, Middlesex, Norfolk, Plymouth and Suffolk; provided
further, that the services of the unit shall be made available to incarcerated
persons in the care of the department of correction; provided further, that
the Middlesex sheriff’s office shall work in cooperation with the Hampden
sheriff’s office to determine a standardized set of definitions and
measurements for patients at both regional behavioral evaluation and
stabilization units; provided further, that not later than February 9, 2027, the
Middlesex sheriff’s office, in cooperation with the department of correction
and the Massachusetts Sheriffs Association, Inc., shall submit a report to
the house and senate committees on ways and means that shall include,
but not be limited to, the: (i) number of incarcerated persons in facilities
located in counties that were provided services in each unit; (ii) number of
incarcerated persons in department of correction facilities that were
provided services in each unit; (iii) alleviation of caseload at Bridgewater
state hospital associated with fewer incarcerated persons in the care of
counties being attended to at the hospital; and (iv) estimated and projected
cost savings in fiscal year 2027 to the sheriffs’ offices and the department of
correction associated with the regional units; and provided further, that the
department of mental health shall maintain the monitoring and quality review
functions of the unit .................................................................................................$1,822,285
Hampshire Sheriff’s Office.
8910-0110 For the operation of the Hampshire sheriff’s office; provided, that not later
than December 15, 2026, the office shall provide a comprehensive inventory
of all current programs and practices, in a manner to be determined by the
executive office of public safety and security, to the executive office for
administration and finance, the executive office of public safety and security
and the house and senate committees on ways and means; provided
further, that the office shall provide relevant data to the executive office of
public safety and security to allow for the reporting of recidivism rates for all
pre-trial, county sentenced and state sentenced incarcerated persons on a
quarterly basis beginning in the quarter ending September 30, 2026 and
which shall be due not later than 30 days after the last day of each quarter;
provided further, that no funds in this item shall be expended out of the AA
212

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
or DD object classes; provided further, that not later than November 2, 2026
the Hampshire sheriff’s office shall submit a report to the secretary of
administration and finance as well as the chairs of the house and senate
committees on ways and means; provided further, that said report shall
include, but not be limited to: (i) a detailed breakdown of all programs and
services provided by the Hampshire sheriff’s office in and outside of the
sheriff’s office facilities; (ii) a breakdown of the cost of providing each
program and service; (iii) information on the participants or customers of the
program, including whether they are incarcerated persons, a public entity, a
private business or a nonprofit; (iv) comprehensive quantitative analysis of
the impact that the program has on said participants, including their
disciplinary record while in custody, their recidivism rate after release and
their employment rate after release when applicable; and (v) the
compensation rates for participants; and provided further, that the office
shall provide relevant data to the Massachusetts Sheriffs Association, Inc.
to allow for the reporting of all requirements under item 8910-7110 ......................$1,916,369
8910-0111 For the AA and DD object class costs of the Hampshire sheriff’s office;
provided, that staffing costs shall not be projected to exceed the amount
appropriated in this item; and provided further, that not later than November
2, 2026, the Hampshire sheriff’s office shall file a report with the executive
office for administration and finance and to the house and senate
committees on ways and means on the current fiscal year payroll spending
projections; provided further, that said report shall include, but shall not be
limited to: (i) the number of full time equivalent employees; (ii) the current
salary of each employee; (iii) the bargaining unit of each employee; (iv) the
additional costs of implementing any collective bargaining agreement for
each employee over the next 12 months; (v) any plans to hire additional
employees and the costs associated with those employees; and (vi) the ratio
of full time equivalent employees to average daily supervisory population ..........$18,200,523
8910-0112 For the delivery of a medication-assisted treatment program in Hampshire
sheriff’s office facilities across Hampshire county; provided, that no funds in
this item shall be expended out of the AA or DD object classes; provided
further, that not later than November 2, 2026, the Hampshire sheriff’s office
shall submit a report to the secretary of administration and finance as well
as the chairs of the house and senate committees on ways and means; and
provided further, that said report shall include, but not be limited to: (i) the
number of participants in said program; (ii) the breakdown of dosage and
type of medications administered; and (iii) the cost breakdown of said
medications .................................................................................................................$222,721
8910-0113 For the costs of providing voice communication services, including phone
calls, and other communication services free of charge to the person
initiating and the person receiving the communication pursuant to section
87A of chapter 127 of the General Laws; provided, that no funds in this item
shall be expended out of the AA or DD object classes; provided further, that
starting on November 2, 2026, the Hampshire sheriff’s office shall submit
quarterly reports to the secretary of administration and finance and to the
chairs of the house and senate committees on ways and means on
documentation of communication services provided free of charge,
including but not limited to, the following information for each facility: (i)
amounts expended for communication services; (ii) a breakdown of the cost
of each call by minute; (iii) a breakdown of the cost of each other
communication service offered by minute; (iv) the number of phone calls,
video communications, electronic communications and other
213

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
communications services at each facility; and (v) any changes in contracts
for voice communication services, including any progress in maximizing
purchasing power and consolidating contracts between the sheriffs and the
department of correction; and provided further, that the secretary of
administration and finance may require additional documentation as
deemed necessary by the secretary ..........................................................................$107,472
Berkshire Sheriff’s Office.
8910-0145 For the operation of the Berkshire sheriff’s office; provided, that not later
than December 16, 2026, the office shall provide a comprehensive inventory
of all current programs and practices, in a manner to be determined by the
executive office of public safety and security, to the executive office for
administration and finance, the executive office of public safety and security
and the house and senate committees on ways and means; provided
further, that the office shall provide relevant data to the executive office of
public safety and security to allow for the reporting of recidivism rates for all
pre-trial, county sentenced and state sentenced incarcerated persons on a
quarterly basis beginning in the quarter ending September 30, 2026 and
which shall be due not later than 30 days after the last day of each quarter;
provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended for the
Berkshire county opioid education and awareness task force; provided
further, that no funds in this item shall be expended out of the AA or DD
object classes; provided further, that not later than November 2, 2026 the
Berkshire sheriff’s office shall submit a report to the secretary of
administration and finance as well as the chairs of the house and senate
committees on ways and means; provided further, that said report shall
include, but not be limited to: (i) a detailed breakdown of all programs and
services provided by the Berkshire sheriff’s office in and outside of the
sheriff’s office facilities; (ii) a breakdown of the cost of providing each
program and service; (iii) information on the participants or customers of the
program, including whether they are incarcerated persons, a public entity, a
private business or a nonprofit; (iv) comprehensive quantitative analysis of
the impact that the program has on said participants, including their
disciplinary record while in custody, their recidivism rate after release and
their employment rate after release when applicable; and (v) the
compensation rates for participants; and provided further, that the office
shall provide relevant data to the Massachusetts Sheriffs Association, Inc.
to allow for the reporting of all requirements under item 8910-7110 ......................$2,464,088
8910-0146 For the AA and DD object class costs of the Berkshire sheriff’s office;
provided, that staffing costs shall not be projected to exceed the amount
appropriated in this item; provided further, that not later than November 2,
2026, the Berkshire sheriff’s office shall file a report with the executive office
for administration and finance and to the house and senate committees on
ways and means on the current fiscal year payroll spending projections; and
provided further, that said report shall include, but shall not be limited to: (i)
the number of full time equivalent employees; (ii) the current salary of each
employee; (iii) the bargaining unit of each employee; (iv) the additional costs
of implementing any collective bargaining agreement for each employee
over the next 12 months; (v) any plans to hire additional employees and the
costs associated with those employees; and (vi) the ratio of full time
equivalent employees to average daily supervisory population ...........................$19,997,381
8910-0147 For the delivery of a medication-assisted treatment program in Berkshire
sheriff’s office facilities across Berkshire county; provided, that no funds in
214

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
this item shall be expended out of the AA or DD object classes; provided
further, that not later than November 2, 2026, the Berkshire sheriff’s office
shall submit a report to the secretary of administration and finance as well
as the chairs of the house and senate committees on ways and means; and
provided further, that said report shall include, but not be limited to: (i) the
number of participants in said program; (ii) the breakdown of dosage and
type of medications administered; and (iii) the cost breakdown of said
medications .................................................................................................................$749,840
8910-0148 For the costs of providing voice communication services, including phone
calls, and other communication services free of charge to the person
initiating and the person receiving the communication pursuant to section
87A of chapter 127 of the General Laws; provided, that no funds in this item
shall be expended out of the AA or DD object classes; provided further, that
starting on November 2, 2026, the Berkshire sheriff’s office shall submit
quarterly reports to the secretary of administration and finance and to the
chairs of the house and senate committees on ways and means on
documentation of communication services provided free of charge,
including but not limited to, the following information for each facility: (i)
amounts expended for communication services; (ii) a breakdown of the cost
of each call by minute; (iii) a breakdown of the cost of each other
communication service offered by minute; (iv) the number of phone calls,
video communications, electronic communications and other
communications services at each facility; and (v) any changes in contracts
for voice communication services, including any progress in maximizing
purchasing power and consolidating contracts between the sheriffs and the
department of correction; and provided further, that the secretary of
administration and finance may require additional documentation as
deemed necessary by the secretary ..........................................................................$414,956
8910-0155 For the operation of the Berkshire aquaponics program at the Berkshire
County house of correction .........................................................................................$150,000
8910-0445 For the Berkshire sheriff’s office, which may expend not more than
$100,000 in revenues generated from the operation of the Berkshire county
communication center’s 911 dispatch operations and other law
enforcement-related activities, including the Berkshire sheriff’s prison
industries program; provided, that notwithstanding any general or special
law to the contrary, for accommodating timing discrepancies between the
receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures, the office may incur
expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to
exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as
reported in the state accounting system ....................................................................$100,000
8910-0760 For the Berkshire sheriff’s office, which may expend for the costs of private
police details, including administrative costs, an amount not more than
$1,500,000 from fees charged for such details; provided, that
notwithstanding any general or specific law to the contrary, for
accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the department may incur expenses
and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the
lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in
the state accounting system ....................................................................................$1,500,000
Franklin Sheriff’s Office.
215

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
8910-0108 For the operation of the Franklin sheriff’s office; provided, that not later than
December 15, 2026, the office shall provide a comprehensive inventory of
all current programs and practices, in a manner to be determined by the
executive office of public safety and security, to the executive office for
administration and finance, the executive office of public safety and security
and the house and senate committees on ways and means; provided
further, that the office shall provide relevant data to the executive office of
public safety and security to allow for the reporting of recidivism rates for all
pre-trial, county sentenced and state sentenced incarcerated persons on a
quarterly basis beginning in the quarter ending September 30, 2026 and
shall be due not later than 30 days after the last day of each quarter;
provided further, that no funds in this item shall be expended out of the AA
or DD object classes; provided further, that not later than November 2, 2026
the Franklin sheriff’s office shall submit a report to the secretary of
administration and finance as well as the chairs of the house and senate
committees on ways and means; provided further, that said report shall
include, but not be limited to: (i) a detailed breakdown of all programs and
services provided by the Franklin sheriff’s office in and outside of the sheriff’s
facilities; (ii) a breakdown of the cost of providing each program and service;
(iii) information on the participants or customers of the program, including
whether they are incarcerated persons, a public entity, a private business or
a nonprofit; (iv) comprehensive quantitative analysis of the impact that the
program has on said participants, including their disciplinary record while in
custody, their recidivism rate after release and their employment rate after
release when applicable; and (v) the compensation rates for participants;
provided further, that the office shall provide relevant data to the
Massachusetts Sheriffs Association, Inc. to allow for the reporting of all
requirements under item 8910-7110; provided further, that not less than
$100,000 shall be provided for a pilot program for training active bystanders;
and provided further, that not less than $150,000 shall be expended for the
Franklin county opioid education and awareness task force ..................................$1,734,857
8910-1021 For the AA and DD object class costs of the Franklin sheriff’s office;
provided, that staffing costs shall not be projected to exceed the amount
appropriated in this item; provided further, that not later than November 2,
2026, the Franklin sheriff’s office shall file a report with the executive office
for administration and finance and to the house and senate committees on
ways and means on the current fiscal year payroll spending projections; and
provided further, that said report shall include, but shall not be limited to: (i)
the number of full time equivalent employees; (ii) the current salary of each
employee; (iii) the bargaining unit of each employee; (iv) the additional costs
of implementing any collective bargaining agreement for each employee
over the next 12 months; (v) any plans to hire additional employees and the
costs associated with those employees; and (vi) the ratio of full time
equivalent employees to average daily supervisory population ...........................$22,866,495
8910-1022 For the delivery of a medication-assisted treatment program in Franklin
sheriff’s office facilities across Franklin county; provided, that no funds in this
item shall be expended out of the AA or DD object classes; provided further,
that not later than November 2, 2026, the Franklin sheriff’s office shall
submit a report to the secretary of administration and finance as well as the
chairs of the house and senate committees on ways and means; and
provided further, that said report shall include, but not be limited to: (i) the
number of participants in said program; (ii) the breakdown of dosage and
type of medications administered; and (iii) the cost breakdown of said
medications .................................................................................................................$105,932
216

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
8910-1023 For the costs of providing voice communication services, including phone
calls, and other communication services free of charge to the person
initiating and the person receiving the communication pursuant to section
87A of chapter 127 of the General Laws; provided, that no funds in this item
shall be expended out of the AA or DD object classes; provided further, that
starting on November 2, 2026, the Franklin sheriff’s office shall submit
quarterly reports to the secretary of administration and finance and to the
chairs of the house and senate committees on ways and means on
documentation of communication services provided free of charge,
including but not limited to, the following information for each facility: (i)
amounts expended for communication services; (ii) a breakdown of the cost
of each call by minute; (iii) a breakdown of the cost of each other
communication service offered by minute; (iv) the number of phone calls,
video communications, electronic communications and other
communications services at each facility; and (v) any changes in contracts
for voice communication services, including any progress in maximizing
purchasing power and consolidating contracts between the sheriff’s office
and the department of correction; and provided further, that the secretary of
administration and finance may require additional documentation as
deemed necessary by the secretary ..........................................................................$369,955
Essex Sheriff’s Office.
8910-0618 For the Essex sheriff’s office, which may expend for the costs of private
police details, including administrative costs, an amount not more than
$1,850,000 from fees charged for those details; provided, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for
accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the office may incur expenses and the
comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this
authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state
accounting system ...................................................................................................$1,850,000
8910-0619 For the operation of the Essex sheriff’s office; provided, that not later than
December 16, 2026, the office shall provide a comprehensive inventory of
all current programs and practices, in a manner to be determined by the
executive office of public safety and security, to the executive office for
administration and finance, the executive office of public safety and security
and the house and senate committees on ways and means; provided
further, that the office shall provide relevant data to the executive office of
public safety and security to allow for the reporting of recidivism rates for all
pre-trial, county sentenced and state sentenced incarcerated persons on a
quarterly basis beginning in the quarter ending September 30, 2026 and
shall be due not later than 30 days after the last day of each quarter; provided
further, that no funds in this item shall be expended out of the AA or DD
object classes; provided further, that not later than November 2, 2026 the
Essex sheriff’s office shall submit a report to the secretary of administration
and finance as well as the chairs of the house and senate committees on
ways and means; provided further, that said report shall include, but not be
limited to: (i) a detailed breakdown of all programs and services provided by
the Essex sheriffs’ office in and outside of the sheriffs facilities; (ii) a
breakdown of the cost of providing each program and service; (iii)
information on the participants or customers of the program, including
whether they are incarcerated persons, a public entity, a private business or
a nonprofit; (iv) comprehensive quantitative analysis of the impact that the
217

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
program has on said participants, including their disciplinary record while in
custody, their recidivism rate after release and their employment rate after
release when applicable; and (v) the compensation rates for participants;
and provided further, that the office shall provide relevant data to the
Massachusetts Sheriffs Association, Inc. to allow for the reporting of all
requirements under item 8910-7110 .....................................................................$19,070,296
8910-0620 For the AA and DD object class costs of the Essex sheriff’s office; provided,
that staffing costs shall not be projected to exceed the amount appropriated
in this item; provided further, that not later than November 2, 2026, the
Essex sheriffs’ office shall file a report with the executive office for
administration and finance and to the house and senate committees on
ways and means on the current fiscal year payroll spending projections; and
provided further, that said report shall include, but shall not be limited to: (i)
the number of full time equivalent employees; (ii) the current salary of each
employee; (iii) the bargaining unit of each employee; (iv) the additional costs
of implementing any collective bargaining agreement for each employee
over the next 12 months; (v) any plans to hire additional employees and the
costs associated with those employees; and (vi) the ratio of full time
equivalent employees to average daily supervisory population ...........................$68,990,765
8910-0621 For the delivery of a medication-assisted treatment program in Essex
sheriff’s office facilities across Essex county; provided, that no funds in this
item shall be expended out of the AA or DD object classes; provided further,
that not later than November 2, 2026, the Essex sheriff’s office shall submit
a report to the secretary of administration and finance as well as the chairs
of the house and senate committees on ways and means; and provided
further, that said report shall include, but not be limited to: (i) the number of
participants in said program; (ii) the breakdown of dosage and type of
medications administered; and (iii) the cost breakdown of said medications .........$1,952,717
8910-0622 For the costs of providing voice communication services, including phone
calls, and other communication services free of charge to the person
initiating and the person receiving the communication pursuant to section
87A of chapter 127 of the General Laws; provided, that no funds in this item
shall be expended out of the AA or DD object classes; provided further, that
starting on November 2, 2026, the Essex sheriff’s office shall submit
quarterly reports to the secretary of administration and finance and to the
chairs of the house and senate committees on ways and means on
documentation of communication services provided free of charge,
including but not limited to, the following information for each facility: (i)
amounts expended for communication services; (ii) a breakdown of the cost
of each call by minute; (iii) a breakdown of the cost of each other
communication service offered by minute; (iv) the number of phone calls,
video communications, electronic communications and other
communications services at each facility; and (v) any changes in contracts
for voice communication services, including any progress in maximizing
purchasing power and consolidating contracts between the sheriff’s office
and the department of correction; and provided further, that the secretary of
administration and finance may require additional documentation as
deemed necessary by the secretary .......................................................................$1,562,732
Massachusetts Sheriffs Association.
8910-7110 For the operation of the Massachusetts Sheriffs Association, Inc.;
provided, that the sheriffs shall appoint persons to serve as executive
218

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
director, assistant executive director, research director and other staff
positions as necessary for the coordination and standardization of services
and programs, the collection and analysis of data related to incarceration,
recidivism and generation of reports, technical assistance and training to
ensure standardization in organization, operations and procedures;
provided further, that said staff shall not be subject to section 45 of chapter 30
of the General Laws or chapter 31 of the General Laws and shall serve at the
pleasure of a majority of the sheriffs; provided further, that not later than
January 29, 2027, the executive director of the association shall submit a
report to the house and senate committees on ways and means detailing
the amounts of all grants awarded to each sheriff’s office in fiscal year 2026;
provided further, that the association shall post on its website the average
daily incarcerated persons population for the month by the fifteenth day of
the subsequent month; provided further, that not later than August 17, 2026,
the first such post shall be completed; provided further, that each sheriff’s
office, in conjunction with the association, shall provide specific data to the
executive office of public safety and security to allow for the reporting of
recidivism rates for all pre-trial, county sentenced and state sentenced
incarcerated persons on a quarterly basis beginning in the quarter ending
September 30, 2026 and due not later than 30 days after the last day of each
quarter; provided further, that each sheriff’s office shall submit said report
directly to the executive office for administration and finance, the house and
senate committees on ways and means, the joint committee on public safety
and homeland security, the executive office of public safety and security, the
association and the department of correction; provided further, that not later
than January 29, 2027, the association shall submit a report to the house
and senate committees on ways and means detailing, for each sheriff’s
office: (i) all services and goods provided to incarcerated persons in which
the sheriff’s office receives revenue; (ii) all fees imposed on incarcerated
persons, delineated by services or goods provided; (iii) the mechanism used
to inform incarcerated persons of such fees and of their opportunities to
waive certain fees; and (iv) all commissary and trust funds administered,
including the total revenues and expenditures for fiscal year 2026, revenue
projections for fiscal years 2027 and 2028 and the current balances of such
funds; and provided further, that all expenditures made by the sheriffs’
offices shall be subject to chapter 29 of the General Laws and recorded
on the state accounting system ..................................................................................$919,337
Barnstable Sheriff’s Office.
8910-8200 For the operation of the Barnstable sheriff’s office; provided, that not later
than December 16, 2026, the office shall provide a comprehensive inventory
of all current programs and practices, in a manner to be determined by the
executive office of public safety and security, to the executive office for
administration and finance, the executive office of public safety and security
and the house and senate committees on ways and means; provided
further, that the office shall provide relevant data to the executive office of
public safety and security to allow for the reporting of recidivism rates for all
pre-trial, county-sentenced and state sentenced incarcerated persons on a
quarterly basis beginning in the quarter ending September 30, 2026 and
shall be due not later than 30 days after the last day of each quarter;
provided further, that no funds in this item shall be expended out of the AA
or DD object classes; provided further, that not later than November 2, 2026
the Barnstable sheriff’s office shall submit a report to the secretary of
administration and finance as well as the chairs of the house and senate
committees on ways and means; provided further, that said report shall
219

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
include, but not be limited to: (i) a detailed breakdown of all programs and
services provided by the Barnstable sheriffs’ office in and outside of the
sheriffs facilities; (ii) a breakdown of the cost of providing each program and
service; (iii) information on the participants or customers of the program,
including whether they are incarcerated persons, a public entity, a private
business or a nonprofit; (iv) comprehensive quantitative analysis of the
impact that the program has on said participants, including their disciplinary
record while in custody, their recidivism rate after release and their
employment rate after release when applicable; and (v) the compensation
rates for participants; and provided further, that the office shall provide
relevant data to the Massachusetts Sheriffs Association, Inc. to allow for the
reporting of all requirements under item 8910-7110 ...............................................$4,801,100
8910-0201 For the AA and DD object class costs of the Barnstable sheriff’s office;
provided, that staffing costs shall not be projected to exceed the amount
appropriated in this item; provided further, that not later than November 2,
2026, the Barnstable sheriff’s office shall file a report with the executive
office for administration and finance and to the house and senate
committees on ways and means on the current fiscal year payroll spending
projections; and provided further, that said report shall include, but shall not
be limited to: (i) the number of full time equivalent employees; (ii) the current
salary of each employee; (iii) the bargaining unit of each employee; (iv) the
additional costs of implementing any collective bargaining agreement for
each employee over the next 12 months; (v) any plans to hire additional
employees and the costs associated with those employees; and (vi) the ratio
of full time equivalent employees to average daily supervisory population ..........$31,462,659
8910-0202 For the delivery of a medication-assisted treatment program in Barnstable
sheriff’s office facilities across Barnstable county; provided, that no funds in
this item shall be expended out of the AA or DD object classes; provided
further, that not later than November 2, 2026, the Barnstable sheriff’s office
shall submit a report to the secretary of administration and finance as well
as the chairs of the house and senate committees on ways and means; and
provided further, that said report shall include, but not be limited to: (i) the
number of participants in said program; (ii) the breakdown of dosage and
type of medications administered; and (iii) the cost breakdown of said
medications .....................................................................................................................$8,548
8910-0203 For the costs of providing voice communication services, including phone
calls, and other communication services free of charge to the person
initiating and the person receiving the communication pursuant to section
87A of chapter 127 of the General Laws; provided, that no funds in this item
shall be expended out of the AA or DD object classes; provided further, that
starting on November 2, 2026, the Barnstable sheriff’s office shall submit
quarterly reports to the secretary of administration and finance and to the
chairs of the house and senate committees on ways and means on
documentation of communication services provided free of charge,
including but not limited to, the following information for each facility: (i)
amounts expended for communication services; (ii) a breakdown of the cost
of each call by minute; (iii) a breakdown of the cost of each other
communication service offered by minute; (iv) the number of phone calls,
video communications, electronic communications and other
communications services at each facility; and (v) any changes in contracts
for voice communication services, including any progress in maximizing
purchasing power and consolidating contracts between the sheriff’s office
and the department of correction; and provided further, that the secretary of
220

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
administration and finance may require additional documentation as
deemed necessary by the secretary ..........................................................................$541,490
8910-8213 For the Barnstable sheriff's office, which may expend not more than
$1,500,000 in revenues collected from municipalities and other entities for
regional emergency and public safety communication services to support
the operations, development, membership and maintenance of the office;
provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for
accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the office may incur expenses and the
comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this
authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state
accounting system ...................................................................................................$1,500,000
8910-8227 For the Barnstable sheriff's office, which may expend for the operation of a
prison industries program an amount not to exceed $50,000 from revenues
collected from the sale of prison industries products; provided, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose
of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the office may incur expenses and the
comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this
authorization or the most recent revenue estimate, as reported in the state
accounting system ........................................................................................................$50,000
Bristol Sheriff’s Office.
8910-8300 For the operation of the Bristol sheriff’s office; provided, that not later than
December 16, 2026, the office shall provide a comprehensive inventory of all
current programs and practices, in a manner to be determined by the
executive office of public safety and security, to the executive office for
administration and finance, the executive office of public safety and security,
and the house and senate committees on ways and means; provided
further, that the office shall provide relevant data to the executive office of
public safety and security to allow for the reporting of recidivism rates for all
pre-trial, county sentenced and state sentenced incarcerated persons on a
quarterly basis beginning in the quarter ending September 30, 2026 and
shall be due not later than 30 days after the last day of each quarter;
provided further, that no funds in this item shall be expended out of the AA
or DD object classes; provided further, that not later than November 2, 2026,
the Bristol sheriff’s office shall submit a report to the secretary of
administration and finance as well as the chairs of the house and senate
committees on ways and means; provided further, that said report shall
include, but not be limited to: (i) a detailed breakdown of all programs and
services provided by the Bristol sheriff’s office in and outside of the sheriff’s
facilities; (ii) a breakdown of the cost of providing each program and service;
(iii) information on the participants or customers of the program, including
whether they are incarcerated persons, a public entity, a private business or
a nonprofit; (iv) comprehensive quantitative analysis of the impact that the
program has on said participants, including their disciplinary record while in
custody, their recidivism rate after release and their employment rate after
release when applicable; and (v) the compensation rates for participants;
and provided further, that the office shall provide relevant data to the
Massachusetts Sheriffs Association, Inc. to allow for the reporting of all
requirements under item 8910-7110 .....................................................................$14,186,576
221

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
8910-8301 For the AA and DD object class costs of the Bristol sheriff’s office; provided,
that staffing costs shall not be projected to exceed the amount appropriated
in this item; provided further, that not later than November 2, 2026, the
Bristol sheriff’s office shall file a report with the executive office for
administration and finance and to the house and senate committees on
ways and means on the current fiscal year payroll spending projections; and
provided further, that said report shall include, but shall not be limited to: (i)
the number of full time equivalent employees; (ii) the current salary of each
employee; (iii) the bargaining unit of each employee; (iv) the additional costs
of implementing any collective bargaining agreement for each employee
over the next 12 months; (v) any plans to hire additional employees and the
costs associated with those employees; and (vi) the ratio of full time
equivalent employees to average daily supervisory population ...........................$47,097,864
8910-8302 For the delivery of a medication-assisted treatment program in Bristol
sheriff’s office facilities across Bristol county; provided, that no funds in this
item shall be expended out of the AA or DD object classes; provided further,
that not later than November 2, 2026, the Bristol sheriff’s office shall submit
a report to the secretary of administration and finance as well as the chairs
of the house and senate committees on ways and means; and provided
further, that said report shall include, but not be limited to: (i) the number of
participants in said program; (ii) the breakdown of dosage and type of
medications administered; and (iii) the cost breakdown of said medications ............$549,587
8910-8303 For the costs of providing voice communication services, including phone
calls, and other communication services free of charge to the person
initiating and the person receiving the communication pursuant to section
87A of chapter 127 of the General Laws; provided, that no funds in this item
shall be expended out of the AA or DD object classes; provided further, that
starting on November 2, 2026, the Bristol sheriff’s office shall submit
quarterly reports to the secretary of administration and finance and to the
chairs of the house and senate committees on ways and means on
documentation of communication services provided free of charge,
including but not limited to, the following information for each facility: (i)
amounts expended for communication services; (ii) a breakdown of the cost
of each call by minute; (iii) a breakdown of the cost of each other
communication service offered by minute; (iv) the number of phone calls,
video communications, electronic communications and other
communications services at each facility; and (v) any changes in contracts
for voice communication services, including any progress in maximizing
purchasing power and consolidating contracts between the sheriff’s office
and the department of correction; and provided further, that the secretary of
administration and finance may require additional documentation as
deemed necessary by the secretary .......................................................................$1,771,495
Dukes County Sheriff’s Office.
8910-8400 For the operation of the Dukes county sheriff’s office; provided, that not later
than December 15, 2026, the office shall provide a comprehensive inventory
of all current programs and practices, in a manner to be determined by the
executive office of public safety and security, to the executive office for
administration and finance, the executive office of public safety and security
and the house and senate committees on ways and means; provided
further, that the office shall provide relevant data to the executive office of
public safety and security to allow for the reporting of recidivism rates for all
pre-trial, county sentenced and state sentenced incarcerated persons on a
222

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
quarterly basis beginning in the quarter ending September 30, 2026 and
shall be due not later than 30 days after the last day of each quarter;
provided further, that no funds in this item shall be expended out of the AA
or DD object classes; provided further, that not later than November 2, 2026,
the Dukes county sheriff’s office shall submit a report to the secretary of
administration and finance as well as the chairs of the house and senate
committees on ways and means; provided further, that said report shall
include, but not be limited to: (i) a detailed breakdown of all programs and
services provided by the Dukes county sheriff’s office in and outside of the
sheriff’s facilities; (ii) a breakdown of the cost of providing each program and
service; (iii) information on the participants or customers of the program,
including whether they are incarcerated persons, a public entity, a private
business or a nonprofit; (iv) comprehensive quantitative analysis of the
impact that the program has on said participants, including their disciplinary
record while in custody, their recidivism rate after release and their
employment rate after release when applicable; and (v) the compensation
rates for participants; and provided further, that the office shall provide
relevant data to the Massachusetts Sheriffs Association, Inc. to allow for the
reporting of all requirements under item 8910-7110 ...............................................$1,272,892
8910-8401 For the Dukes county sheriff's office, which may expend not more than
$300,000 in revenues collected from municipalities and other entities for
regional emergency and public safety communication services to support
the operations, development, membership and maintenance of the office;
provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for
accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the office may incur expenses and the
comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this
authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state
accounting system ......................................................................................................$300,000
8910-8402 For the AA and DD object class costs of the Dukes county sheriff’s office;
provided, that staffing costs shall not be projected to exceed the amount
appropriated in this item; provided further, that not later than November 2,
2026, the Dukes county sheriff’s office shall file a report with the executive
office for administration and finance and to the house and senate
committees on ways and means on the current fiscal year payroll spending
projections; and provided further, that said report shall include, but shall not
be limited to: (i) the number of full time equivalent employees; (ii) the current
salary of each employee; (iii) the bargaining unit of each employee; (iv) the
additional costs of implementing any collective bargaining agreement for
each employee over the next 12 months; (v) any plans to hire additional
employees and the costs associated with those employees; and (vi) the ratio
of full time equivalent employees to average daily supervisory population ............$4,830,458
8910-8403 For the delivery of a medication-assisted treatment program in Dukes
county sheriff’s office facilities across Dukes county; provided, that no funds
in this item shall be expended out of the AA or DD object classes; provided
further, that not later than November 2, 2026, the Dukes county sheriff’s
office shall submit a report to the secretary of administration and finance as
well as the chairs of the house and senate committees on ways and means;
and provided further, that said report shall include, but not be limited to: (i)
the number of participants in said program; (ii) the breakdown of dosage
and type of medications administered; and (iii) the cost breakdown of said
medications ...................................................................................................................$50,179
223

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
8910-8404 For the costs of providing voice communication services, including phone
calls, and other communication services free of charge to the person
initiating and the person receiving the communication pursuant to section
87A of chapter 127 of the General Laws; provided, that no funds in this item
shall be expended out of the AA or DD object classes; provided further, that
starting on November 2, 2026, the Dukes county sheriff’s office shall submit
quarterly reports to the secretary of administration and finance and to the
chairs of the house and senate committees on ways and means on
documentation of communication services provided free of charge,
including but not limited to, the following information for each facility: (i)
amounts expended for communication services; (ii) a breakdown of the cost
of each call by minute; (iii) a breakdown of the cost of each other
communication service offered by minute; (iv) the number of phone calls,
video communications, electronic communications and other
communications services at each facility; and (v) any changes in contracts
for voice communication services, including any progress in maximizing
purchasing power and consolidating contracts between the sheriff’s office
and the department of correction; and provided further, that the secretary of
administration and finance may require additional documentation as
deemed necessary by the secretary ............................................................................$17,505
Nantucket Sheriff’s Office.
8910-8500 For the operation of the Nantucket sheriff’s office; provided, that not later
than December 15, 2026, the office shall provide a comprehensive inventory
of all current programs and practices, in a manner to be determined by the
executive office of public safety and security, to the executive office for
administration and finance, the executive office of public safety and security
and the house and senate committees on ways and means; provided
further, that the office shall provide relevant data to the executive office of
public safety and security to allow for the reporting of recidivism rates for all
pre-trial, county sentenced and state sentenced incarcerated persons on a
quarterly basis beginning in the quarter ending September 30, 2026 and
shall be due not later than 30 days after the last day of each quarter; and
provided further, that the office shall provide relevant data to the
Massachusetts Sheriffs Association, Inc. to allow for the reporting of all
requirements under item 8910-7110 ..........................................................................$442,789
8910-8501 For the AA and DD object class costs of the Nantucket sheriff’s office;
provided, that staffing costs shall not be projected to exceed the amount
appropriated in this item; provided further, that not later than November 2,
2026, the Nantucket sheriff’s office shall file a report with the executive office
for administration and finance and to the house and senate committees on
ways and means on the current fiscal year payroll spending projections; and
provided further, that said report shall include, but shall not be limited to: (i)
the number of full time equivalent employees; (ii) the current salary of each
employee; (iii) the bargaining unit of each employee; (iv) the additional costs
of implementing any collective bargaining agreement for each employee
over the next 12 months; (v) any plans to hire additional employees and the
costs associated with those employees; and (vi) the ratio of full time
equivalent employees to average daily supervisory population ................................$456,901
Norfolk Sheriff’s Office.
8910-8600 For the operation of the Norfolk sheriff’s office; provided, that not later than
December 15, 2026, the office shall provide a comprehensive inventory of all
224

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
current programs and practices, in a manner to be determined by the
executive office of public safety and security, to the executive office for
administration and finance, the executive office of public safety and security
and the house and senate committees on ways and means; provided
further, that the office shall provide relevant data to the executive office of
public safety and security to allow for the reporting of recidivism rates for all
pre-trial, county sentenced and state sentenced incarcerated persons on a
quarterly basis beginning in the quarter ending September 30, 2026 and
shall be due not later than 30 days after the last day of each quarter; provided
further, that no funds in this item shall be expended out of the AA or DD
object classes; provided further, that not later than November 2, 2026, the
Norfolk sheriff’s office shall submit a report to the secretary of administration
and finance as well as the chairs of the house and senate committees on
ways and means; provided further, that said report shall include, but not be
limited to: (i) a detailed breakdown of all programs and services provided by
the Norfolk sheriff’s office in and outside of the sheriff’s facilities; (ii) a
breakdown of the cost of providing each program and service; (iii)
information on the participants or customers of the program, including
whether they are incarcerated persons, a public entity, a private business or
a nonprofit; (iv) comprehensive quantitative analysis of the impact that the
program has on said participants, including their disciplinary record while in
custody, their recidivism rate after release and their employment rate after
release when applicable; and (v) the compensation rates for participants;
and provided further, that the office shall provide relevant data to the
Massachusetts Sheriffs Association, Inc. to allow for the reporting of all
requirements under item 8910-7110 .......................................................................$6,720,762
8910-0601 For the AA and DD object class costs of the Norfolk sheriff’s office; provided,
that staffing costs shall not be projected to exceed the amount appropriated
in this item; provided further, that not later than November 2, 2026, the
Norfolk sheriffs’ office shall file a report with the executive office for
administration and finance and to the house and senate committees on
ways and means on the current fiscal year payroll spending projections; and
provided further, that said report shall include, but shall not be limited to: (i)
the number of full time equivalent employees; (ii) the current salary of each
employee; (iii) the bargaining unit of each employee; (iv) the additional costs
of implementing any collective bargaining agreement for each employee
over the next 12 months; (v) any plans to hire additional employees and the
costs associated with those employees; and (vi) the ratio of full time
equivalent employees to average daily supervisory population ...........................$34,407,310
8910-0602 For the delivery of a medication-assisted treatment program in Norfolk
sheriff’s office facilities across Norfolk county; provided, that no funds in this
item shall be expended out of the AA or DD object classes; provided further,
that not later than November 2, 2026, the Norfolk sheriff’s office shall submit
a report to the secretary of administration and finance as well as the chairs
of the house and senate committees on ways and means; and provided
further, that said report shall include, but not be limited to: (i) the number of
participants in said program; (ii) the breakdown of dosage and type of
medications administered; and (iii) the cost breakdown of said medications ............$855,328
8910-0603 For the costs of providing voice communication services, including phone
calls, and other communication services free of charge to the person
initiating and the person receiving the communication pursuant to section
87A of chapter 127 of the General Laws; provided, that no funds in this item
shall be expended out of the AA or DD object classes; provided further, that
225

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
starting on November 2, 2026, the Norfolk sheriff’s office shall submit
quarterly reports to the secretary of administration and finance and to the
chairs of the house and senate committees on ways and means on
documentation of communication services provided free of charge,
including but not limited to, the following information for each facility: (i)
amounts expended for communication services; (ii) a breakdown of the cost
of each call by minute; (iii) a breakdown of the cost of each other
communication service offered by minute; (iv) the number of phone calls,
video communications, electronic communications and other
communications services at each facility; and (v) any changes in contracts
for voice communication services, including any progress in maximizing
purchasing power and consolidating contracts between the sheriff’s office
and the department of correction; and provided further, that the secretary of
administration and finance may require additional documentation as
deemed necessary by the secretary ..........................................................................$788,836
8910-8629 For the Norfolk sheriff's office, which may expend not more than $55,430 in
revenues collected from municipalities and other entities for regional
emergency and public safety communication services to support the
operations, development, membership and maintenance of the office;
provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for
accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the office may incur expenses and the
comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this
authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state
accounting system ........................................................................................................$55,430
8910-8630 For the Norfolk sheriff's office, which may expend not more than $160,000
in revenues collected from public or private entities or persons for
community programs; provided, that notwithstanding any general or special
law to the contrary, for accommodating timing discrepancies between the
receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures, the office may incur
expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to
exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate
as reported in the state accounting system ................................................................$160,000
Plymouth Sheriff’s Office.
8910-8700 For the operation of the Plymouth sheriff’s office; provided, that not later than
December 15, 2026, the office shall provide a comprehensive inventory of
all current programs and practices, in a manner to be determined by the
executive office of public safety and security, to the executive office for
administration and finance, the executive office of public safety and security
and the house and senate committees on ways and means; provided
further, that the office shall provide relevant data to the executive office of
public safety and security to allow for the reporting of recidivism rates for all
pre-trial, county sentenced and state sentenced incarcerated persons on a
quarterly basis beginning in the quarter ending September 30, 2026 and
shall be due not later than 30 days after the last day of each quarter;
provided further, that no funds in this item shall be expended out of the AA
or DD object classes; provided further, that not later than November 2, 2026,
the Plymouth sheriff’s office shall submit a report to the secretary of
administration and finance as well as the chairs of the house and senate
committees on ways and means; provided further, that said report shall
include, but not be limited to: (i) a detailed breakdown of all programs and
services provided by the Plymouth sheriff’s office in and outside of the
226

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
sheriff’s facilities; (ii) a breakdown of the cost of providing each program and
service; (iii) information on the participants or customers of the program,
including whether they are incarcerated persons, a public entity, a private
business or a nonprofit; (iv) comprehensive quantitative analysis of the
impact that the program has on said participants, including their disciplinary
record while in custody, their recidivism rate after release and their
employment rate after release when applicable; and (v) the compensation
rates for participants; and provided further, that the office shall provide
relevant data to the Massachusetts Sheriffs Association, Inc. to allow for the
reporting of all requirements under item 8910-7110 ...............................................$2,727,801
8910-0701 For the AA and DD object class costs of the Plymouth sheriff’s office;
provided, that staffing costs shall not be projected to exceed the amount
appropriated in this item; provided further, that not later than November 2,
2026, the Plymouth sheriff’s office shall file a report with the executive office
for administration and finance and to the house and senate committees on
ways and means on the current fiscal year payroll spending projections; and
provided further, that said report shall include, but shall not be limited to: (i)
the number of full time equivalent employees; (ii) the current salary of each
employee; (iii) the bargaining unit of each employee; (iv) the additional costs
of implementing any collective bargaining agreement for each employee
over the next 12 months; (v) any plans to hire additional employees and the
costs associated with those employees; and (vi) the ratio of full time
equivalent employees to average daily supervisory population ...........................$77,163,818
8910-8702 For the delivery of a medication-assisted treatment program in Plymouth
sheriff’s office facilities across Plymouth county; provided, that no funds in
this item shall be expended out of the AA or DD object classes; provided
further, that not later than November 2, 2026, the Plymouth sheriff’s office
shall submit a report to the secretary of administration and finance as well
as the chairs of the house and senate committees on ways and means; and
provided further, that said report shall include, but not be limited to: (i) the
number of participants in said program; (ii) the breakdown of dosage and
type of medications administered; and (iii) the cost breakdown of said
medications ..............................................................................................................$1,493,412
8910-8703 For the costs of providing voice communication services, including phone
calls, and other communication services free of charge to the person
initiating and the person receiving the communication pursuant to section
87A of chapter 127 of the General Laws; provided, that no funds in this item
shall be expended out of the AA or DD object classes; provided further, that
starting on November 2, 2026, the Plymouth sheriff’s office shall submit
quarterly reports to the secretary of administration and finance and to the
chairs of the house and senate committees on ways and means on
documentation of communication services provided free of charge,
including but not limited to, the following information for each facility: (i)
amounts expended for communication services; (ii) a breakdown of the cost
of each call by minute; (iii) a breakdown of the cost of each other
communication service offered by minute; (iv) the number of phone calls,
video communications, electronic communications and other
communications services at each facility; and (v) any changes in contracts
for voice communication services, including any progress in maximizing
purchasing power and consolidating contracts between the sheriff’s office
and the department of correction; and provided further, that the secretary of
administration and finance may require additional documentation as
deemed necessary by the secretary .......................................................................$1,217,818
227

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
8910-8718 For the Plymouth sheriff's office, which may expend not more than
$300,000 in revenues collected from municipalities and other entities for
regional emergency and public safety communication services to support
the operations, development, membership and maintenance of the office;
provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for
accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the office may incur expenses and the
comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this
authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state
accounting system ......................................................................................................$300,000
Suffolk Sheriff’s Office.
8910-8800 For the operation of the Suffolk sheriff’s office; provided, that not later than
December 15, 2026, the office shall provide a comprehensive inventory of
all current programs and practices, in a manner to be determined by the
executive office of public safety and security, to the executive office for
administration and finance, the executive office of public safety and security
and the house and senate committees on ways and means; provided
further, that the office shall provide relevant data to the executive office of
public safety and security to allow for the reporting of recidivism rates for all
pre-trial, county sentenced and state sentenced incarcerated persons on a
quarterly basis beginning in the quarter ending September 30, 2026 and
shall be due not later than 30 days after the last day of each quarter;
provided further, that no funds in this item shall be expended out of the AA
or DD object classes; provided further, that not later than November 2, 2026,
the Suffolk sheriff’s office shall submit a report to the secretary of
administration and finance as well as the chairs of the house and senate
committees on ways and means; provided further, that said report shall
include, but not be limited to: (i) a detailed breakdown of all programs and
services provided by the Suffolk sheriff’s office in and outside of the sheriff’s
facilities; (ii) a breakdown of the cost of providing each program and service;
(iii) information on the participants or customers of the program, including
whether they are incarcerated persons, a public entity, a private business or
a nonprofit; (iv) comprehensive quantitative analysis of the impact that the
program has on said participants, including their disciplinary record while in
custody, their recidivism rate after release and their employment rate after
release when applicable; and (v) the compensation rates for participants;
and provided further, that the office shall provide relevant data to the
Massachusetts Sheriffs Association, Inc. to allow for the reporting of all
requirements under item 8910-7110 .....................................................................$14,827,915
8910-8801 For a 3-year pilot program in the Suffolk sheriff’s office to enhance current
employee assistance programs for correctional officers to promote a work
culture focused on vocational, mental and physical wellness; provided, that
the pilot program shall include, but not be limited to; (i) robust training for
employee assistance programs and peer support teams; (ii) increasing
administrative support and supervision for employee assistance programs;
(iii) strengthening referral pathways to professional behavioral health
programs; and (iv) promoting greater services available for correction
officers; and provided further, that not later than March 15, 2027, the office
shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways and
means on the program’s impact on correctional officers’ mental health,
wellness and engagement in services, as well as work-related outcomes,
including the impacts on the incarcerated ...............................................................$2,000,000
228

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
8910-8802 For the AA and DD object class costs of the Suffolk sheriff’s office; provided,
that staffing costs shall not be projected to exceed the amount appropriated
in this item; provided further, that not later than November 2, 2026, the
Suffolk sheriff’s office shall file a report with the executive office for
administration and finance and to the house and senate committees on
ways and means on the current fiscal year payroll spending projections; and
provided further, that said report shall include, but shall not be limited to: (i)
the number of full time equivalent employees; (ii) the current salary of each
employee; (iii) the bargaining unit of each employee; (iv) the additional costs
of implementing any collective bargaining agreement for each employee
over the next 12 months; (v) any plans to hire additional employees and the
costs associated with those employees; and (vi) the ratio of full time
equivalent employees to average daily supervisory population .........................$115,043,090
8910-8803 For the delivery of a medication-assisted treatment program in Suffolk
sheriff’s office facilities across Suffolk county; provided, that no funds in this
item shall be expended out of the AA or DD object classes; provided further,
that not later than November 2, 2026, the Suffolk sheriff’s office shall submit
a report to the secretary of administration and finance as well as the chairs
of the house and senate committees on ways and means; and provided
further, that said report shall include, but not be limited to: (i) the number of
participants in said program; (ii) the breakdown of dosage and type of
medications administered; and (iii) the cost breakdown of said medications .........$2,904,064
8910-8804 For the costs of providing voice communication services, including phone
calls, and other communication services free of charge to the person
initiating and the person receiving the communication pursuant to section
87A of chapter 127 of the General Laws; provided, that no funds in this item
shall be expended out of the AA or DD object classes; provided further, that
starting on November 2, 2026, the Suffolk sheriff’s office shall submit
quarterly reports to the secretary of administration and finance and to the
chairs of the house and senate committees on ways and means on
documentation of communication services provided free of charge,
including but not limited to, the following information for each facility: (i)
amounts expended for communication services; (ii) a breakdown of the cost
of each call by minute; (iii) a breakdown of the cost of each other
communication service offered by minute; (iv) the number of phone calls,
video communications, electronic communications and other
communications services at each facility; and (v) any changes in contracts
for voice communication services, including any progress in maximizing
purchasing power and consolidating contracts between the sheriff’s office
and the department of correction; and provided further, that the secretary of
administration and finance may require additional documentation as
deemed necessary by the secretary .......................................................................$2,163,497
8910-8900 For the Suffolk sheriff's office, which may expend for the operation of the
Suffolk county regional lockup not more than $1,800,000 in revenue;
provided, that the office shall enter into agreements to provide detention
services to various law enforcement agencies and municipalities and shall
determine and collect fees for such detentions from the law enforcement
agencies and municipalities; and provided further, that notwithstanding any
general or special law to the contrary, for accommodating timing
discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
expenditures, the office may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify
229

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the
most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting system ...........$1,800,000
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF AGING AND INDEPENDENCE.
Office of the Secretary.
9110-0100 For the operation of the executive office of aging and independence and the
regulation of assisted living facilities .....................................................................$19,007,751
9110-0600 For health care services provided to MassHealth members who are older
adults eligible for community-based waiver services; provided, that funds
may be expended from this item for health care services provided to
recipients in prior fiscal years; provided further, that subject to the assessed
needs of consumers or the terms of the waiver, the funding for benefits of
community-based waiver services shall not be reduced below the level of
services provided in fiscal year 2026; provided further, that the eligibility
requirements for this program shall not be more restrictive than those
established in fiscal year 2026; and provided further, that funds from this
item may be expended for the clinical assessment and eligibility program
and the comprehensive service and screening model program .........................$505,421,502
9110-1455 For the costs of the subsidized catastrophic prescription drug insurance
program under section 39 of chapter 19A of the General Laws and the
prescription advantage program; provided, that funds shall be expended for
the operation of the pharmacy outreach program under section 4C of said
chapter 19A; provided further, that the executive office of aging and
independence shall allow those who meet the program eligibility criteria to
enroll in the program at any time during the year; provided further, that the
executive office shall take steps for the coordination of benefits with the
Medicare prescription drug benefit created under the Medicare Prescription
Drug, Improvement, and Modernization Act of 2003, Public Law 108-173,
as amended, to ensure that residents of the commonwealth take advantage
of this benefit; provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special
law to the contrary or unless otherwise prohibited by state or federal law,
prescription drug coverage or benefits payable by the executive office and
the entities with which it has contracted for administration of the subsidized
catastrophic prescription drug insurance program under said section 39 of
said chapter 19A shall be the payer of last resort for this program for eligible
persons with regard to any other third-party prescription drug coverage or
benefits available to eligible persons; provided further, that funds shall be
expended from this item to implement the pre-admission counseling and
assessment program under the fourth paragraph of section 9 of chapter
118E of the General Laws, which shall be implemented on a statewide
basis through the Aging and Disability Resource Consortia; provided
further, that amounts received by the executive office’s vendor as premium
revenue for this program may be retained and expended by the vendor for
the program; provided further, that the executive office shall seek to obtain
maximum federal funding for discounts on prescription drugs available to
the executive office and to prescription advantage enrollees; provided
further, that not less than 90 days before any action to limit or cap the
number of enrollees in the program, the executive office shall notify the
house and senate committees on ways and means; provided further, that
not less than 30 days before any coverage or benefits expansions, the
executive office shall notify the house and senate committees on ways and
230

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
means; and provided further, that not less than $1,000,000 shall be
expended for the Serving the Health Insurance Needs of Everyone, or
SHINE, program, administered by the executive office in partnership with
local community-based organizations including, but not limited to, councils
on aging, aging service access points and others, in order to support the
operational costs incurred by these programs ........................................................$5,630,889
9110-1604 For the operation of the supportive senior housing program at state or
federally-assisted housing sites; provided, that for fiscal year 2027 the
executive office shall maintain the same number of sites as in fiscal year
2026, prior appropriation continued; and provided further, that not less than
$200,000 shall be expended to Hearth, Inc. for facility upgrades and other
improvements .......................................................................................................$12,582,272
9110-1630 For the operation of the elder home care program, including contracts with
aging service access points or other qualified entities for the home care
program, home care, health aides, homemaker, personal care, supportive
home care aides, home health and respite services, geriatric behavioral
health services and other services provided to older adults; provided, that
sliding-scale fees shall be charged to qualified older adults; provided further,
that the secretary of aging and independence may waive collection of
sliding-scale fees in cases of extreme financial hardship; provided further,
that not more than $16,000,000 in revenues accrued from sliding-scale fees
shall be retained by the individual home care organizations without
reallocation by the executive office of aging and independence and shall be
expended for the home care program, consistent with guidelines to be
issued by the executive office; provided further, that no rate increase shall
be awarded in fiscal year 2027 that would cause a reduction in client
services or the number of clients served; provided further, that no funds shall
be expended from this item to pay for salary increases for direct service
workers who provide state-funded homemaker and home health aide
services that would cause a reduction in client services; provided further,
that funding shall be expended for a contract with the LGBTQIA+ Aging
Project of Fenway Health for provider training including, but not limited to,
home care and home health providers, councils on aging, skilled nursing
facilities and adult day health programs and outreach to gay, lesbian,
bisexual, transgender, queer and questioning older adults and to caregivers;
provided further, that the secretary may transfer not more than 3 per cent of
the funds appropriated in this item to item 9110-1633 for case management
services and the administration of the home care program; and provided
further, that the secretary shall expend not less than $1,400,000 between
this item and said item 9110-1633 on recipients of the home care over-
income cost-sharing program ..............................................................................$298,988,931
9110-1633 For the operation of the elder home care case management program,
including contracts with aging service access points or other qualified
entities for home care case management services and the administration of
the home care organizations funded through item 9110-1630; provided, that
the contracts shall include the costs of administrative personnel, home care
case managers, travel, rent and other costs deemed appropriate by the
executive office of aging and independence; and provided further, that the
secretary of aging and independence may transfer an amount not more than
3 per cent of the funds appropriated in this item to said item 9110-1630 ...........$113,325,426
9110-1636 For the elder protective services program including, but not limited to,
protective services case management, guardianship services, the statewide
231

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
elder abuse hotline, money management services and the elder-at-risk
program .................................................................................................................$51,596,156
9110-1637 For a grant program administered by the secretary of aging and
independence that focuses on advanced skill training for the home care aide
workforce that serves consumers of the elder home care program
administered by the executive office of aging and independence; provided,
that not later than March 3, 2027, the executive office of aging and
independence shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on
ways and means detailing: (i) the number of students currently enrolled in
the online training program, outreach measures to encourage enrollment;
(ii) the cost of the course to students, the number of students who have
completed the course; and (iii) the number of former students currently
working as home care aides in the commonwealth ...........................................$1,183,570
9110-1640 For the geriatric mental health program, including outreach, counseling,
resource management and system navigation for community-dwelling older
adults with mental health needs ..............................................................................$2,455,303
9110-1660 For congregate and shared housing services and naturally occurring
retirement communities for older adults; provided, that not less than
$856,000 shall be expended for providers of naturally occurring retirement
communities with whom the executive office of aging and independence
entered into service agreements in fiscal year 2026 and shall maintain at
proportions of total available funding equal to those provided in fiscal year
2026 .........................................................................................................................$2,575,158
9110-1700 For assessment, placement and homelessness prevention services for
homeless and at-risk older adults ...............................................................................$286,000
9110-1900 For the elder nutrition program; provided, that not less than $100,000shall
be expended for the senior farm share program ..................................................$13,410,964
9110-9002 For grants to the councils on aging and for grants to or contracts with non-
public entities which are consortia or associations of councils on aging;
provided, that notwithstanding the former proviso, all funds appropriated in
this item shall be expended under the distribution schedules for formula and
incentive grants established by the secretary of aging and independence;
provided further, that the formula grant portion of this item shall be $16 per
elder; provided further, that not later than February 5, 2027, the distribution
schedules shall be submitted to the house and senate committees on ways
and means; and provided further, that not less than $10,000 shall be
expended to the Fall River council on aging for community-based
activities; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended
to the Wenham senior center for renovations and upgrades; provided
further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the Chelsea senior
center for their food delivery service; provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended to the Milano Senior Center for exterior
improvements; provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be
expended to Island Elderly Housing, Inc. for emergency preparedness;
provided further, that not less than $60,000 shall be expended to the
Yarmouth senior center for a roof replacement and HVAC stabilization;
provided further, that not less than $25,000 shall be expended to the
Methuen senior activity center for operational costs and event planning;
provided further, that not less than $250,000 shall be expended to
Parkway in Motion, Inc. for programming in Boston’s southwest
232

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
neighborhoods; provided further, that not less than $20,000 shall be
expended to the Pepperell council on aging for new furniture in the Albert
Harris Center meeting spaces; provided further, that not less than $10,000
shall be expended to the Williamstown council on aging; provided further,
that not less than $10,000 shall be expended to the Cheshire council on
aging; provided further, that not less than $7,500 shall be expended to the
Florida council on aging; provided further, that not less than $10,000 shall
be expended to the Adams council on aging; provided further, that not less
than $100,000 shall be expended to the Whipple Senior Center for costs
associated with care, services, programs and facilities; provided further,
that not less than $20,000 shall be expended to the Westford council on
aging to support van service costs; provided further, that not less than
$25,000 shall be expended to the Chelmsford council on aging for nutrition
services; and provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be
expended to OutstandingLife, Inc. for the operation of a statewide virtual
senior center for LGBTQIA+ older adults ............................................................$30,295,092
LEGISLATURE.
Senate.
9500-0000 For the operation of the senate .........................................................................$32,266,578
House of Representatives.
9600-0000 For the operation of the house of representatives ................................................$61,200,000
9610-0000 For expenses incurred by the house of representatives related to
redistricting .................................................................................................................$750,000
Joint Legislative Expenses.
9700-0000 For the joint operations of the legislature; provided, that not less than
$75,000 shall be expended to the Massachusetts Black and Latino
Legislative Caucus for programming, convenings, events, printed
and digital materials, public education and related operational
activities .............................................................................................................$11,335,795
SECTION 2B.
SECTION 2B. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the agencies listed in this section
may expend the amounts listed in this section for the provision of services to agencies listed in section 2.
All expenditures made under this section shall be accompanied by a corresponding transfer of funds from
an account listed in said section 2 to the Intragovernmental Service Fund established in section 2Q of
chapter 29 of the General Laws. All revenues and other inflows shall be based on rates published by the
seller agency that are developed in accordance with cost principles established by the United States Office
of Management and Budget Circular A-87, Cost Principles for State, Local and Indian Tribal Governments.
All rates shall be published within 30 days after the effective date of this section. No expenditures shall be
made from the Intragovernmental Service Fund which would cause that fund to be in deficit at the close of
fiscal year 2027. All authorizations in this section shall be charged to the Intragovernmental Service Fund
and shall not be subject to section 5D of said chapter 29. Any balance remaining in that fund at the close
of fiscal year 2027 shall be transferred to the General Fund.
233

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
SECRETARY OF THE COMMONWEALTH.
0511-0003 For the costs of providing electronic and other publications purchased from
the state bookstore, for commission fees, notary fees and for direct access
to the secretary’s computer library ...............................................................................$16,000
TREASURER AND RECEIVER GENERAL.
0699-0018 For the cost of debt service for the clean energy investment program and
other projects or programs for which an agency has committed to fund the
associated debt service; provided, that the state treasurer may charge other
appropriations and federal grants for the cost of the debt service ........................$32,853,995
OFFICE OF THE COMPTROLLER.
1000-0005 For the cost of the single state audit for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027;
provided, that the comptroller may charge other appropriations and federal
grants for the cost of the audit .................................................................................$1,929,400
1000-0008 For the costs of operating and managing the state management accounting
and reporting system accounting system for fiscal year 2027; provided, that
any unspent balance at the close of fiscal year 2027 in an amount not to
exceed 5 per cent of the amount authorized shall remain in the
Intergovernmental Service Fund and is hereby re-authorized for
expenditures for such item in fiscal year 2028 ......................................................$10,834,246
1000-0601 For the office of the comptroller which may, on behalf of the office, the
human resources division and the executive office of technology services
and security, charge and collect from participating state agencies a fee
sufficient to cover administrative costs and expend such fees for goods and
services rendered in the administration of the human resources
compensation management system program .........................................................$2,442,905
EXECUTIVE OFFICE FOR ADMINISTRATION AND FINANCE.
Office of the Secretary.
1100-1701 For the cost of information technology services provided to agencies of the
executive office for administration and finance .....................................................$34,584,188
Division of Capital Asset Management and Maintenance.
1102-3224 For the costs for the Leverett Saltonstall building lease and occupancy
payments, as provided in chapter 237 of the acts of 2000 ...................................$16,203,972
1102-3226 For the operation and maintenance of state buildings; provided, that the
division of capital asset management and maintenance may also charge for
reimbursement for overtime expenses, materials and contract services
purchased in performing renovations, mail and related services for agencies
occupying state buildings or for services rendered to approved entities using
state facilities ...........................................................................................................$9,425,000
234

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
Reserves.
1599-0008 For a reserve to offset reductions in state aid distributed to cities and towns
under chapters 70 of the General Laws due to unexpected reductions in
English language learners .....................................................................................$10,000,000
1599-2040 For the payment of prior year deficiencies based upon schedules provided
to the executive office for administration and finance and the house and
senate committees on ways and means; provided, that notwithstanding any
general or special law to the contrary, the comptroller may certify payments
on behalf of departments for certain contracted goods or services rendered
in prior fiscal years for which certain statutes, regulations or procedures
were not properly followed; provided further, that the department that was a
party to the transaction shall certify in writing that the services were
performed or goods delivered and shall provide additional information that
the comptroller may require; provided further, that the comptroller may
charge departments’ current fiscal year appropriations and transfer to this
item amounts equivalent to the amounts of any prior year deficiency, subject
to the conditions stated in this item; provided further, that the comptroller
shall assess a chargeback to that current fiscal year appropriation that is for
the same purpose as that to which the prior year deficiency pertains or, if
there is no appropriation for that purpose, to that current fiscal year
appropriation which is most similar in purpose to the appropriation to which
the prior year deficiency pertains or is for the general administration of the
department that administered the appropriation to which the prior year
deficiency pertains; provided further, that no chargeback shall be made
which would cause a deficiency in any current fiscal year item; provided
further, that the comptroller shall report with such schedule a detailed reason
for the prior year deficiency on all chargebacks assessed that exceed
$10,000 including the amount of the chargeback, the item and object class
charged; provided further, that the comptroller shall report on a quarterly
basis on all chargebacks assessed, including the amount of the chargeback,
the item, object class charged and the reason for the prior year deficiency;
and provided further, that the comptroller shall include in the schedules the
amount of each prior year deficiency paid, the fiscal year and appropriation
to which it pertained, the current fiscal year appropriation and object class
to which it was charged and the department's explanation for the failure to
make payment in a timely manner ........................................................................$50,000,000
1599-3100 For the cost of the commonwealth’s employer contributions to the
Unemployment Compensation Fund established in section 48 of chapter
151A of the General Laws; provided, that the secretary of administration and
finance shall authorize the collection, accounting and payment of these
contributions; and provided further, that in executing these responsibilities,
the comptroller may charge, in addition to individual appropriation accounts,
certain non-appropriated funds in amounts that are computed based on
rates developed in accordance with the United States Office of Management
and Budget Circular A-87, including expenses, interest expense or related
charges ..................................................................................................................$38,000,000
1599-3101 For the cost of the commonwealth's employer contributions to the Family
and Employment Security Trust Fund established in section 7 of chapter
175M of the General Laws; provided, that the secretary of administration
and finance shall authorize the collection, accounting and payment of these
contributions; and provided further, that in executing these responsibilities
the comptroller may charge, in addition to individual appropriation accounts,
235

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
certain non-appropriated funds in amounts that are computed based on
rates developed in accordance with the United States Office of Management
and Budget Circular A-87, including expenses, interest expense and related
charges ..................................................................................................................$50,000,000
Human Resources Division.
1750-0101 For the cost of goods and services rendered in administering training
programs, including the cost of training unit staff; provided, that the human
resources division shall charge to other items for the cost of participants
enrolled in programs sponsored by the division or to state agencies
employing such participants; provided further, that the division may collect
from participating state agencies a fee sufficient to cover administrative
costs of the commonwealth’s performance recognition programs and to
expend such fees for goods and services rendered in the administration of
these programs; provided further, that the division may charge and collect
from participating state agencies a fee sufficient to cover administrative
costs and expend such fees for goods and services rendered in the
administration of information technology services related to the human
resources compensation management system program; and provided
further, that the division may charge and collect from participating state
agencies fees sufficient to cover the costs of shared services ..................................$367,343
1750-0105 For the cost of the commonwealth's workers’ compensation program,
including the workers' compensation litigation unit; provided, that the
secretary of administration and finance shall charge state agencies for
workers’ compensation costs, including related administrative expenses,
incurred on behalf of the employees of those agencies; provided further, that
the personnel administrator shall administer those charges on behalf of the
secretary and may establish regulations considered necessary to implement
this item; provided further, that the personnel administrator shall notify
agencies regarding the chargeback methodology to be used in fiscal year
2027 and the amount of their estimated workers’ compensation charges and
shall require agencies to encumber sufficient funds to meet the estimated
charges, including any additional amounts considered necessary under the
regulations; provided further, that for any agency that fails within 60 days of
the effective date of this act to encumber funds sufficient to meet the
estimated charges, the comptroller shall encumber funds on behalf of that
agency; provided further, that the personnel administrator shall: (i)
determine the amount of the actual workers’ compensation costs incurred
by each agency in the preceding month, including related administrative
expenses; (ii) notify each agency of those amounts; (iii) charge those
amounts to each agency's accounts as estimates of the costs to be incurred
in the current month; and (iv) transfer those amounts to this item; provided
further, that any unspent balance in this item at the close of fiscal year 2027
shall be re-authorized for expenditure in fiscal year 2028; and provided
further, that prior year costs for hospital, physician, benefit and other costs
may be funded from this item ................................................................................$66,137,011
1750-0106 For the workers’ compensation litigation unit, including the costs of
personnel .................................................................................................................$1,066,574
1750-0600 For the cost of core human resources administrative processing functions ...........$3,476,919
Operational Services Division.
236

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
1775-0800 For the purchase, operation and repair of vehicles and for the cost of
operating and maintaining all vehicles that are leased by other agencies,
including the costs of personnel; provided, that any unspent balance at the
close of fiscal year 2027 shall remain in the Intragovernmental Service Fund
and may be expended for that item in fiscal year 2028 ..........................................$8,201,002
1775-1000 For the provision of printing, photocopying, mailing and related graphic art
or design work, including all necessary incidental expenses and liabilities ..........$11,281,431
EXECUTIVE OFFICE FOR VETERANS’ SERVICES.
Office of the Secretary.
1410-0110 For the cost of central services provided to agencies of the executive office
of veterans’ services ................................................................................................$5,000,000
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF TECHNOLOGY SERVICES AND SECURITY.
1790-0200 For the cost of computer resources and services provided by the executive
office of technology services and security; provided, that any unspent
balance at the close of fiscal year 2027 shall remain in the
Intragovernmental Service Fund and may be expended for the item in fiscal
year 2028 .............................................................................................................$210,624,447
1790-0201 For the costs of any information technology or telecommunications product,
service or equipment incurred by the executive office of technology services
and security in delivering necessary information technology and
telecommunications services and products to its customers, but not
including any administrative costs; provided, that any unspent balance at
the close of fiscal year 2027 shall remain in the Intragovernmental Service
Fund and may be expended for the item in fiscal year 2028 ................................$40,000,000
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF ENERGY AND ENVIRONMENTAL AFFAIRS.
Office of the Secretary.
2000-1701 For the cost of information technology services provided to agencies of the
executive office of energy and environmental affairs ..............................................$6,620,837
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES.
Office of the Secretary.
4000-0102 For the cost of transportation services for health and human services clients
and the operation of the health and human services transportation office ...........$20,334,806
4000-0103 For the costs of core administrative functions performed within the executive
office of health and human services; provided, that the secretary of health
and human services, notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, may identify administrative activities and functions common to the
separate agencies, departments, offices, divisions and commissions within
the executive office and may designate those functions as core
237

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
administrative functions in order to improve administrative efficiency and
preserve fiscal resources; provided further, that common functions may be
designated core administrative functions including, but not limited to, human
resources, financial management, leasing and facility management;
provided further, that all employees performing functions so designated may
be employed by the executive office; provided further, that upon the
designation of a function as a core administrative function, the employees
of each agency, department, office or commission who perform these core
administrative functions may be transferred to the executive office of health
and human services; provided further, that the executive office shall charge
the agencies, departments, offices, divisions and commissions for the
services under this item; provided further, that the reorganization shall not
impair the civil service status of any transferred employee who immediately
before the effective date of this act either holds a permanent appointment in
a position classified under chapter 31 of the General Laws or has tenure in
a position by reason of section 9A of chapter 30 of the General Laws; and
provided further, that nothing in this item shall impair or change an
employee’s status, rights or benefits under chapter 150E of the General
Laws ......................................................................................................................$49,496,475
4000-1701 For the cost of information technology services provided to agencies of the
executive office of health and human services .....................................................$73,868,754
Massachusetts Commission for the Deaf and Hard of Hearing.
4125-0122 For the costs of interpreter services provided by commission staff; provided,
that the costs of personnel may be charged to this item; and provided
further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for
the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of
retained revenues and related expenditures, the commission may incur
expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to
exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate
as reported in the state accounting system ................................................................$450,000
4125-0124 For the costs of contracted communication access services incurred by the
commission for the deaf and hard of hearing to deliver necessary
communication access services to commonwealth agencies, but not
including any administrative costs; provided, that any unspent balance at
the close of fiscal year 2027 shall remain in the Intragovernmental Service
Fund and may be expended for the item in fiscal year 2028 ..................................$6,000,000
Department of Public Health.
4510-0108 For the costs of pharmaceutical drugs and services provided by the state
office for pharmacy services; provided, that the state office shall notify all
agencies listed below of their obligations under this item by December 30,
2026; provided further, that the state office shall continue to be the sole
provider of pharmacy services for the following agencies currently under the
state office: (i) the department of public health; (ii) the department of mental
health; (iii) the department of developmental services; (iv) the department of
correction; (v) the sheriffs’ offices of Barnstable, Berkshire, Bristol, Essex,
Franklin, Hampden, Hampshire, Middlesex, Norfolk and Plymouth; and (vi)
the Soldiers’ Homes in the cities of Holyoke and Chelsea; provided further,
that the state office shall be the sole provider of pharmacy services for all
said agencies and all costs for pharmacy services shall be charged by this
item; provided further, that the state office shall become the sole provider of
238

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
pharmacy services to the sheriffs’ offices of Worcester and Suffolk; provided
further, that these agencies shall not charge or contract with any other
alternative vendor for pharmacy services other than the state office;
provided further, that the state office shall validate previously-submitted
pharmacy expenditures including HIV Drug Assistance Program drug
reimbursements during fiscal year 2027; provided further, that the state
office shall continue to work to reduce medication costs, provide
standardized policies and procedures in a clinically responsible manner,
provide comprehensive data analysis and improve the quality of clinical
services; and provided further, that not later than April 16, 2027, the state
office shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways
and means detailing recommendations for the inclusion of other entities that
may realize cost savings by joining the state office ..............................................$75,955,529
4590-0901 For the costs of medical services provided at department of public health
hospitals and charged to other state agencies ..........................................................$163,909
4590-0903 For the costs of medical services provided at the department of public health
Lemuel Shattuck hospital to incarcerated persons in the care of houses of
correction; provided, that the costs shall be charged to items 8910-0102,
8910-0105, 8910-0107, 8910-0108, 8910-0110, 8910-0145, 8910-0619,
8910-8200, 8910-8300, 8910-8400, 8910-8500, 8910-8600, 8910-8700 and
8910-8800 of section 2 ............................................................................................$3,180,269
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT.
Office of the Secretary.
7002-0018 For the cost of information technology services provided to agencies of the
executive office of economic development .............................................................$3,091,734
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF EDUCATION.
Office of the Secretary.
7009-1701 For the cost of information technology services provided to agencies of the
executive office of education ...................................................................................$3,000,000
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND SECURITY.
Office of the Secretary.
8000-1701 For the cost of information technology services provided to agencies of the
executive office of public safety and security ..........................................................$6,661,730
Department of State Police.
8100-0002 For the costs associated with department of state police personnel assigned
to roadways of the Massachusetts Department of Transportation, the district
attorneys’ offices, the attorney general, the Massachusetts gaming
commission and other state agencies; provided, that notwithstanding any
general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating
timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
239

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
expenditures, the department may incur expenses and the comptroller may
certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or
the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting
system ...................................................................................................................$45,000,000
8100-0003 For the costs associated with the use and maintenance of the statewide
telecommunications system .......................................................................................$156,375
Military Division.
8700-1145 For the costs of utilities and maintenance associated with state armory
rentals and related services and for the implementation of energy
conservation measures with regard to the state armories .........................................$100,000
Department of Correction.
8900-0021 For costs related to the production and distribution of products produced by
prison industries and for the costs of services provided by incarcerated
persons; provided, that the commissioner of correction may allocate year-
end net profits to the cost of drug, substance abuse and rehabilitative
programming .........................................................................................................$14,650,000
SECTION 2D.
SECTION 2D. The amounts set forth in this section are hereby appropriated from the General Federal
Grants Fund. Federal funds received in excess of the amount appropriated in this section shall be expended
only in accordance with section 6B of chapter 29 of the General Laws. The amount of any unexpended
balance of federal grant funds received before June 30, 2026 and not included as part of an appropriation
item in this section is hereby made available for expenditure during fiscal year 2027 and shall be in addition
to any amount appropriated in this section.
JUDICIARY.
Supreme Judicial Court.
0320-1710 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, State Court
Improvement Basic Grant ...........................................................................................$757,618
Committee for Public Counsel Services.
0320-1809 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY24 BJA
Postconviction Testing of DNA Evidence ...................................................................$574,845
0320-1810 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY24 BJA Preventing
Wrongful Convictions Program Expansion ................................................................$265,994
Trial Court.
0332-3201 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Chicopee and Holyoke
Access to Treatment and Services ............................................................................$316,500
0332-3501 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Maintain
Independence and Sobriety Through Systems Integration .........................................$32,500
240

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
0333-0123 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Guardianship: Helping
Vulnerable Adults Explore Alternatives to Traditional Guardianship ...........................$94,771
0337-0005 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, OJJDP FY 2021
Family Drug Program .................................................................................................$125,000
0339-1015 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Improving Reentry
High-Tech Career Reentry Path Project ....................................................................$300,000
DISTRICT ATTORNEYS.
Suffolk District Attorney.
0340-0109 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY24 Enhancing
Prosecution……………. .............................................................................................$140,000
0840-0111 For the purpose of a federally funded grant entitled, for services to victims
and survivors of crime ................................................................................................$179,100
8100-4646 For the purpose of a federally funded grant entitled, for services to victims
and survivors of crime ..................................................................................................$74,602
Worcester District Attorney.
0340-0471 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Worcester County
Division and Drug Endangered Children ......................................................................$10,468
0340-0472 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Peer Recovery
Support Center ...........................................................................................................$530,000
Plymouth District Attorney.
0340-0837 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, BJA FY21 Sexual
Assault Kit Initiative (SAKI) .........................................................................................$497,578
0340-0842 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Plymouth County First
Response to Substance Use & Recovery ..................................................................$431,003
0340-0843 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Human Trafficking 2nd
Round ...........................................................................................................................$38,205
0340-0844 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, BJA FY24 National
Community Courts Initiative .......................................................................................$288,758
0340-0845 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, BJA FY24
Comprehensive Opioid Stimulant Substance Use Site Base Program .....................$507,756
SECRETARY OF THE COMMONWEALTH.
0526-0113 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Historic Preservation
Survey and Planning ...............................................................................................$1,109,158
0526-0118 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, National Maritime
Heritage Grant Program .............................................................................................$250,000
241

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
0526-0112 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Underrepresented
Communities Grant .......................................................................................................$29,950
0526-0119 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, American Battlefield
Grant .............................................................................................................................$83,656
TREASURER AND RECEIVER GENERAL.
Massachusetts Cultural Council.
0640-9716 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Folk and Traditional
Arts ................................................................................................................................$35,000
0640-9717 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Basic State Grant ..................$934,238
0640-9718 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Arts in Education .....................$62,900
0640-9724 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Youth Reach State
and Regional Programs ..............................................................................................$278,800
OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.
Office of the Attorney General.
0810-0023 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY21 COPS Anti-
Heroin Task Force Grant Program ..........................................................................$3,889,492
0810-0051 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY22 OVC Task
Force to Combat Human Trafficking ..........................................................................$750,000
0810-0052 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY22 OVC Task
Force to Combat Human Trafficking ...........................................................................$749,999
0810-0297 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY22 OVC Victim
Compensation Formula ..............................................................................................$997,672
Victim and Witness Assistance Board.
0840-0111 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Office of Victims of
Crimes – Victim Assistance Formula ....................................................................$29,799,343
MASSACHUSETTS DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES COUNCIL.
1100-1702 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Developmental
Disability Act; provided, that in order to qualify for said grant, this account
shall be exempt from the first $314,698 of fringe benefit and indirect cost
charges pursuant to section 6B of chapter 29 of the General Laws .......................$1,647,070
1100-1704 For the purposes of a federally funded technical assistance grant entitled,
Maintain and Further Development of Developmental Disabilities Suite;
provided, that in order to qualify for said grant, this item shall be exempt from
242

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
the first $36,000 of fringe benefits and indirect cost charges under section
6B of chapter 29 of the General Laws ........................................................................$100,000
1100-1713 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Expanding the Public
Health Workforce within the Disability Networks: State Councils on
Developmental Disabilities; provided, that in order to qualify for said grant,
this account shall be exempt from the first $32,400 of fringe benefit and
indirect cost charges pursuant to section 6B of chapter 29 of the General
Laws ..............................................................................................................................$74,929
EXECUTIVE OFFICE FOR ADMINISTRATION AND FINANCE.
Massachusetts Office on Disability.
1107-2450 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Client Assistance
Program ......................................................................................................................$230,000
Department of Revenue.
1201-0109 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, State Access and
Visitation Program ......................................................................................................$179,442
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF ENERGY AND ENVIRONMENTAL AFFAIRS.
Office of the Secretary.
2000-0141 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Massachusetts
Coastal Zone Management Program Implementation ............................................$3,350,000
2000-0143 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, CZM IIJA Capacity .............$7,500,000
2000-9702 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, National Parks Service
Land and Water Conservation Fund .......................................................................$6,644,878
2000-9735 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Buzzards Bay Estuary
Program ...................................................................................................................$3,600,000
2030-0013 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Joint Enforcement
Agreement Between NOAA-OLE-Fisheries ...............................................................$944,401
2030-9701 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Recreational Boating
Safety Program ........................................................................................................$2,430,600
Department of Public Utilities.
2100-9013 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Rail Fixed Guideway
Public Transportation System State Safety Oversight ..............................................$3,646,768
7006-9002 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Pipeline Security ................$4,869,021
Department of Environmental Protection.
243

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
2200-9706 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Water Quality
Management Planning ...............................................................................................$544,500
2200-9712 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Leaking Underground
Storage Tank Cooperative Agreement ......................................................................$659,282
2200-9717 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Department of Defense
State Memorandum of Agreement .............................................................................$994,083
2200-9724 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Superfund Block Grant
....................................................................................................................................$642,670
2200-9728 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Brownfields
Assessment Program .................................................................................................$478,394
2230-9734 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, CERCLA
128(a)Response Program Cooperative Agreement for MADE ..............................$2,645,000
2230-9735 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Brownfield
Multipurpose CERCLA ...............................................................................................$400,000
2230-9702 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Performance
Partnership Grant ..................................................................................................$14,536,721
2240-9791 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Long Island Sound
Project (LIJA) ...........................................................................................................$3,516,667
2240-9793 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, MASSDEP Emerging
Contaminants SDC Grant ........................................................................................$6,367,333
2240-9796 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, DEP 319 PPG
NPS/PPG ....................................................................................................................$786,159
2240-9797 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, ENV Inf Exchange
Network .........................................................................................................................$85,910
2240-9798 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, MassDEP EC-SDC
Grant Program #2 ....................................................................................................$8,071,250
2250-9712 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Clean Air Act Section
103 ..............................................................................................................................$734,633
2250-9716 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Massachusetts
National Air Toxics Trend Station Program ................................................................$149,000
2250-9726 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Homeland Security
Co-Op Agreement ......................................................................................................$976,512
2250-9749 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Clean Air Act/Air
Sensor Program ..............................................................................................................$4,349
2250-9750 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Clean Air Act (IRA) ................$234,094
Department of Fish and Game.
244

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
2300-0179 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, National Coastal
Wetlands Conservation Grant Program .....................................................................$228,490
2310-0122 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Land Acquisition ................$2,250,000
2310-0124 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Windsor Brook
Wetland Restoration ...................................................................................................$400,000
2310-0125 For the purpose of a federally funded grant entitled, Assessing Viability of
NEWC Metapopulations ...............................................................................................$89,601
2310-0126 For the purpose of a federally funded grant entitled, Chronic Wasting
Disease Management ..................................................................................................$15,000
2330-9222 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Clean Vessel Act Grant
Program ...................................................................................................................$1,200,000
2330-9712 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Commercial Fisheries
Statistics ......................................................................................................................$250,000
2330-9725 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Boating Infrastructure ...........$720,000
2330-9730 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Interstate Fisheries
Management Support .................................................................................................$450,000
2330-9732 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, ACCSP
Implementation Strategic Plan ...................................................................................$102,000
2330-9733 For the purpose of a federally funded grant entitled, Testing Cod Avoidance
of Trawl Nets ...............................................................................................................$170,000
2330-9739 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Turtle Disengagement
....................................................................................................................................$800,000
2330-9742 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Age and Growth
Project Segment One .................................................................................................$450,000
2330-9743 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Sport Fish Restoration
Coordination ...............................................................................................................$175,000
2330-9747 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Natural Resources
Project ...........................................................................................................................$10,000
Department of Agricultural Resources.
2511-0004 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Food Safety Program ............$500,000
2511-0310 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Massachusetts
Pesticide Enforcement Grant .....................................................................................$450,000
2511-0400 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Cooperative
Agricultural Pest Survey .............................................................................................$350,000
2511-0972 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Farm and Ranch
Lands Protection Program .......................................................................................$5,000,000
245

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
2511-1025 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Country of Origin
Labeling - Retail Surveillance .......................................................................................$35,000
2516-9002 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Development of
Institutional Marketing .................................................................................................$460,000
2516-9003 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Farmers' Market
Coupon Program ........................................................................................................$450,000
2516-9004 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Senior Farmers'
Market Nutrition Program ...........................................................................................$520,000
2516-9007 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Organic Certification
Cost-Share Program .....................................................................................................$20,000
2516-9008 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Resilient Food
Systems Infrastructure .............................................................................................$1,500,000
Department of Conservation and Recreation.
2800-9760 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FEMA National Flood
Insurance, Community Assistance Program ..............................................................$348,476
2820-9770 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FEMA National Dam
Safety Program ........................................................................................................$4,898,673
2820-9705 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Identifying and
Eradicating the Asian Longhorned Beetle ...............................................................$2,300,000
2820-9708 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, NRCS Dam
Rehabilitation Funding for Watershed Restoration .................................................$4,097,240
2820-9903 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Volunteer Fire
Assistance Program Grant cfda 16.698 .....................................................................$274,084
2820-9919 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, National Park Service’s
Historic Preservation Fund, (Semiquincentennial Grant Funding) ............................$304,668
2821-9110 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Inflation Reduction Act
Funding for Urban and Community Forestry Programs .............................................$382,315
2821-9905 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Urban and Community
Forestry Grant .............................................................................................................$407,865
2821-9909 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Forest Stewardship
Conservation and Education Grant ............................................................................$225,224
2821-9911 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, State Fire Assistance
Grant ...........................................................................................................................$423,696
2821-9912 For the purposes of a federally funded Bipartisan Infrastructure Law grant
entitled, Community Wildfire Defense Grant ................................................................$26,343
2821-9913 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Hazard Fuels
Management and Wildfire Risk Reduction Grant .......................................................$485,692
246

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
2821-9917 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Forest Legacy
Administration Grant ................................................................................................$1,008,726
2821-9918 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, 2024 IRA Funding for
Forest Legacy Admin Grant ....................................................................................$2,215,562
2821-9919 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, 2024 USFSM-
Underserved Forest Landowner Capacity IRA Grant .............................................$1,117,708
2821-9926 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Forest Health Program
Grant ...........................................................................................................................$253,739
2821-9927 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Hemlock Woolly
Adelgid Suppression Grant ..........................................................................................$65,520
2821-9929 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, 2023 IIJA Temporary
Bridge Funding ...........................................................................................................$302,900
2830-9733 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, USFWS Aquatic
Invasive Species Management Grant ........................................................................$145,591
2840-9708 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Capacity Building
Habitat Coop Agreement ............................................................................................$475,000
2840-9709 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Waquoit Bay National
Estuarine Research .................................................................................................$1,201,696
2850-9701 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Recreational Trails
Grant Program ............................................................................................................$924,299
2850-9702 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Federal Highway
Charging and Fueling Infrastructure Grant ........................................................................$796
Department of Energy Resources.
7006-9311 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, State Energy Security
Plan - SEP ..................................................................................................................$398,994
7006-9313 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, BIL - EECBG Program
(IIJA) .............................................................................................................................$49,492
7006-9314 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Ira-50121 HER .................$13,655,713
7006-9315 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Ira-50122 Hear .................$16,119,988
7006-9317 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Energy Efficiency
Revolving Loan Fund Capitalization Grant Program .................................................$947,380
7006-9324 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Clean Heavy-Duty
Vehicles Program .......................................................................................................$675,374
7006-9701 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, State Heating Oil
Propane Program .........................................................................................................$22,288
7006-9734 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, State Energy Plan -
SEP ..........................................................................................................................$1,299,240
247

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES.
Office of the Secretary.
4000-1826 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Money Follows the
Person Y4 ...................................................................................................................$914,195
Office for Refugees and Immigrants.
4003-0808 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Youth Mentoring .................$275,2285
4003-0818 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Elderly Refugee
Services ......................................................................................................................$151,903
4003-0821 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Refugee School
Impact ......................................................................................................................$2,136,406
4003-0826 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Refugee Cash and
Medical Assistance Program .................................................................................$70,989,708
4003-0830 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Refugee Support
Services Ukraine Base ............................................................................................$1,200,000
4003-0845 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Wilson Fish TANF
Coordination Program .............................................................................................$1,080,000
4003-0854 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Refugee Health
Promotion ................................................................................................................$2,338,000
4003-0855 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Refugee Social
Services Program ..................................................................................................$21,896,726
4003-0860 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Afghan Refugee Social
Service .....................................................................................................................$5,277,893
4003-0862 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Afghan Refugee
Health Promotion ........................................................................................................$788,264
Massachusetts Commission for the Blind.
4110-3021 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Vocational
Rehabilitation; provided, that no funds shall be deducted for pensions, group
health and life insurance or any other such indirect cost of federally
reimbursed state employees ...................................................................................$8,961,000
4110-3026 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Independent Living –
Services to Older Blind Americans .............................................................................$666,000
4110-3028 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Supported
Employment ..................................................................................................................$25,000
4110-3029 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Fort Devens Vending
Stand Award ............................................................................................................$2,296,500
248

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
MassAbility.
4120-0020 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Vocational
Rehabilitation; provided, that no funds shall be deducted for pensions, group
health and life insurance or any other such indirect cost of federally
reimbursed state employees .................................................................................$50,180,656
4120-0187 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Supported
Employment Services Grant .......................................................................................$396,031
4120-0191 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Informed Members
Planning and Assessing Choices Together ...............................................................$235,100
4120-0511 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Social Security
Disability Insurance ...............................................................................................$55,731,678
4120-0751 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Assistive Technology
Grant ...........................................................................................................................$600,237
4120-0752 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Independent Living
Federal Grant (Part C) .............................................................................................$1,722,883
4120-0753 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Independent Living
State Grants (Part B) ..................................................................................................$348,595
4120-0758 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Beyond Bridges: The
Intersection of Behavioral Health & Traumatic Brain Injury .......................................$200,179
Department of Transitional Assistance.
4400-3064 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, SNAP Nutrition
Education and Obesity Prevention Grant ..............................................................$10,000,000
4400-3067 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Supplemental Nutrition
Assistance Program Employment and Training ......................................................$3,235,000
4400-3073 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Summer Electronic
Benefit Transfer Program for Children ....................................................................$2,830,615
4400-3074 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Summer EBT Benefit
Funding ..................................................................................................................$77,397,000
4400-3076 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, TANF Data Equity ..........$110,000,000
4400-3077 For the purpose of a federally funded granted entitled, Summer EBT
Technology Grant ....................................................................................................$1,100,000
4400-3078 For the purpose of a federally funded grant entitled, Summer EBT Benefit
Grant .....................................................................................................................$70,668,000
Department of Public Health.
4500-1002 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Preventive Health and
Health Services Block Grant 2018 ..........................................................................$4,845,171
249

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
4500-1056 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, MA Rape Prevention
and Education Program ..............................................................................................$862,158
4500-1057 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Massachusetts Sexual
Assault Service Program ............................................................................................$978,490
4500-1064 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, State Loan;
Repayment ARPA Funding ........................................................................................$839,800
4500-2000 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Maternal and Child
Health Services .....................................................................................................$11,526,730
4502-1012 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Cooperative Health
Statistics System ........................................................................................................$785,000
4510-0114 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, State Primary Care
Offices .........................................................................................................................$349,580
4510-0117 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, State Office of Rural
Health ..........................................................................................................................$223,410
4510-0120 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Rural Hospital
Flexibility Program ......................................................................................................$364,663
4510-0223 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Oral Health Workforce
Activities ......................................................................................................................$400,000
4510-0224 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Small Rural Hospital
Improvement Grant Program ........................................................................................$81,168
4510-0401 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Medicare and Medicaid
Survey and Certification ........................................................................................$12,532,386
4510-0404 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Hospital Preparedness
Programs .................................................................................................................$6,000,000
4510-0501 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Clinical Laboratory
Improvement Amendment ..........................................................................................$806,680
4510-0507 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Impact Act for Hospice
Recertification Surveys .................................................................................................$85,671
4510-0619 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FDA Inspection of
Food Establishments ....................................................................................................$82,247
4510-0645 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Harold Rogers
Prescription Drug Monitoring Program .......................................................................$842,185
4510-1357 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, COVID-19 Domestic
Violence and Sexual Assault Survivors’ Safety Trust Fund .........................................$26,158
4510-9014 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Mammography Quality
Standards Act .............................................................................................................$498,957
4510-9032 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, HUD Capacity Building
Grant ...........................................................................................................................$833,000
250

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
4510-9041 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, ATSDR’s Partnership
to Promote Local Efforts to Reduce Environmental Exposure ..................................$489,275
4510-9048 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Indoor Radon
Development Program ...............................................................................................$195,000
4510-9053 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Beach Monitoring ..................$258,000
4510-9054 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Strengthening
Statewide Environmental Health Capacity ...................................................................$90,000
4510-9068 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Maintenance and
Enhancement of the State and National Environment ...............................................$615,000
4510-9071 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, MA Childhood Lead
Poisoning Prevention Program ..................................................................................$518,678
4510-9073 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Human and Animal
Food Rapid Response Teams (U2F) MA FPP ..........................................................$206,231
4512-0100 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Sexually Transmitted
Disease Control .......................................................................................................$2,091,000
4512-0108 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Mass Applications for
STD Surveillance Parts A and B ................................................................................$441,480
4512-0150 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Immunization and
Vaccines for Children ............................................................................................$11,911,392
4512-0193 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Building and
Enhancing Epidemiology, Laboratory and Health Information Systems
Capacity .................................................................................................................$18,000,000
4512-0194 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Epidemiology and
Laboratory Capacity for Infectious Diseases ........................................................$15,000,000
4512-0195 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Build Epidemiology
and Laboratory Capacity .........................................................................................$6,596,528
4512-0197 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, New England
Pathogen Genomics Center of Excellence .............................................................$6,586,209
4512-0198 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, New England
Pathogen Genomics Center of Excellence .............................................................$3,357,557
4512-9055 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Promoting Integration
of Primary & Behavioral Health Care ......................................................................$3,228,960
4512-9069 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Substance Abuse
Prevention and Treatment Block Grant .................................................................$52,919,376
4512-9085 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Strategic Prevention
Framework ..................................................................................................................$517,466
251

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
4512-9089 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Prevent Prescription
Drug Overuse Misuse ..............................................................................................$9,883,363
4512-9092 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Amy Sorensen-Alawad
MPA .........................................................................................................................$1,643,070
4512-9093 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Massachusetts State
Opioid Response SOR ..........................................................................................$72,621,523
4512-9426 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Uniform Alcohol and
Drug Abuse Data ........................................................................................................$300,000
4513-0111 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Housing Opportunity
for People with AIDS Program ...................................................................................$700,758
4513-9007 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Women Infants and
Children ...............................................................................................................$136,100,000
4513-9009 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, ARPA Technology for
a Better WIC Experience ............................................................................................$288,500
4513-9014 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Enhancing Reviews &
Surveillance to Elim Maternal Mort ERASE ...............................................................$495,000
4513-9021 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Infants and Toddlers
with Disabilities ........................................................................................................$9,355,295
4513-9031 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, State Systems
Development Initiative for MA ....................................................................................$100,000
4513-9037 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Ryan White Care Act
Title II .....................................................................................................................$23,401,181
4513-9047 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Comprehensive HIV
Prevention Project for Health Departments ............................................................$9,231,181
4513-9056 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, National HIV
Behavioral Surveillance ..............................................................................................$522,425
4513-9063 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, State Sexual Risk
Avoidance Education FY 2018 ...................................................................................$848,591
4513-9070 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Emergency Medical
Services for Children ..................................................................................................$200,000
4513-9104 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Universal Newborn
Hearing Screening ......................................................................................................$235,000
4513-9106 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, MA Comprehensive
Asthma Control Program ............................................................................................$567,229
4513-9109 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Massachusetts
Perinatal Quality Collaborative ...................................................................................$325,000
4513-9110 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, B Existing PRAMS ................$175,000
252

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
4513-9112 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, MA EHDI Project ...................$160,000
4513-9113 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Maternal, Infant, and
Early Childhood Home Visiting Grant Program ....................................................$10,441,379
4513-9117 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Birth Defects Study to
Evaluate Pregnancy Exposures .................................................................................$855,000
4513-9121 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Pediatric Mental
Healthcare Access New Area Expansion – ARPA ....................................................$175,000
4513-9127 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Ryan White Title IV
Program ......................................................................................................................$532,810
4513-9130 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, State Maternal Health
Innovation Program .................................................................................................$1,000,000
4513-9131 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Transforming
Massachusetts Pediatrics for Early Childhood ........................................................$1,000,000
4513-9132 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Pediatric Mental Health
Care Access Expansion ...............................................................................................$81,683
4513-9133 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Childhood Essentials
Preventing Adverse Experiences ...............................................................................$465,000
4513-9134 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, MA Population-Based
Neonatal Abstinence Syndrome Surveillance ............................................................$527,991
4514-1013 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY2015 WIC Special
Project Grants ...............................................................................................................$45,300
4515-0116 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Tuberculosis
Elimination and Lab Control Co-op Agreement ......................................................$1,649,717
4515-0211 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, HIV/AIDS, Viral
Hepatitis, STD and TB Prevention ..........................................................................$1,080,585
4515-0215 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, New England
Pathogen Genomics Center of Excellence ................................................................$500,000
4515-1125 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Viral Hepatitis
Prevention and Surveillance .......................................................................................$730,366
4516-1008 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, CDC Cooperative
Agreement for Emergency Response: Public Health Crisis Response
Influenza A/H5N1 and Pandemic Preparedness and Response Funding for
state, tribal, local, and territorial (STLT) Jurisdictions ................................................$669,777
4516-1013 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Biomonitoring Program
to Assess Environment Chemical Exposure ..............................................................$750,000
4516-1021 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Hospital Preparedness
and Public Health Emergency Preparedness .......................................................$15,500,000
253

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
4516-1036 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, MDPH HSLI
Laboratory Accreditation .............................................................................................$150,000
4516-1042 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, MASPHL-NARMS
Cooperative Agreement .............................................................................................$185,000
4518-0520 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, MA Violent Death
Reporting System .......................................................................................................$257,816
4518-0535 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Expanded
Occupational Health Surveillance in MA ....................................................................$641,054
4518-1000 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Procurement of
Information for the National Death Index .....................................................................$75,000
4518-1002 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Massachusetts Death
File – Social Security Administration ..........................................................................$627,000
4518-1003 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Birth Records for the
Social Security Administration ....................................................................................$586,000
4518-9023 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Census of Fatal
Occupational Injuries ....................................................................................................$58,750
4518-9052 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Behavioral Risk Factor
Surveillance System ...................................................................................................$750,000
4570-1010 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Strengthening PH
Infrastructure, Workforce, and Data Systems .........................................................$3,240,000
4570-1011 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, PH Infrastructure,
Workforce, and Data System ARPA .......................................................................$5,000,000
4570-1527 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Personal
Responsibility Education Program 2010 ....................................................................$848,026
4570-1534 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Federal Drug
Administration Tobacco 2011 .....................................................................................$741,537
4570-1548 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Paul Coverdell
National Acute Stroke Prevention ..............................................................................$672,000
4570-1549 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Massachusetts Health
and Disability Program ...............................................................................................$650,000
4570-1554 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY14 Family Planning
Services FOA ..........................................................................................................$7,348,447
4570-1557 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, MA Organized
Approaches to Increase Colorectal Cancer Screen ...................................................$652,871
4570-1561 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Massachusetts Core
Violence Injury Prevention Program ...........................................................................$275,000
4570-1562 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, The Family Violence
Service State Grants ...............................................................................................$3,130,048
254

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
4570-1564 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, MA Diabetes and Heart
Disease Stroke Prevention Program .......................................................................$2,354,008
4570-1568 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, National and State
Tobacco Control Program .......................................................................................$3,805,308
4570-1571 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, MA Cancer Prevention
and Control Program ...............................................................................................$2,822,325
4570-1573 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, State and Community
Based Injury Prevention and Control ......................................................................$1,102,512
4570-1575 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Massachusetts Suicide
Prevention ................................................................................................................$7,051,031
4570-1577 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Family Violence
Prevention and Domestic Violence and Support Service ARPA ............................$9,257,424
4570-1581 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Health Equity for
Priority Population with Risk for Diabetes ...............................................................$1,000,000
Department of Children and Families.
4800-0006 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Children’s Justice Act ...........$309,459
4800-0009 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Title IV-E Independent
Living Program ........................................................................................................$3,249,888
4800-0013 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Promoting Safe and
Stable Families Program Title IV-B Subpart 2 and Caseworker Visitation .............$6,271,704
4800-0084 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Education & Training
Voucher Program ....................................................................................................$1,043,671
4800-0089 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Adoption Incentives
Payments .................................................................................................................$1,394,000
4899-0001 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Title IV-B Child Welfare
Services ...................................................................................................................$3,393,806
4899-0021 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, National Center for
Child Abuse and Neglect .........................................................................................$1,889,650
Department of Mental Health.
5012-9180 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, ARPA for Block Grants
for Community Mental Health Services ........................................................................$67,231
5012-9182 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, BSCA Center for
Mental Health Block Grants .....................................................................................$1,211,771
5012-9401 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Block Grants for
Community Mental Health Services ......................................................................$20,073,212
255

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
5012-9406 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, System of Care
Expansion and Sustainability Grants .........................................................................$784,083
5012-9407 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Massachusetts
Psychosis Prevention Project .....................................................................................$241,549
5046-9100 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Shelter Plus Care ..................$337,577
BOARD OF LIBRARY COMMISSIONERS.
7000-9702 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Library Service
Technology Act ........................................................................................................$3,661,196
9000-9700 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Federal Reserve Title
I ...................................................................................................................................$157,544
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT.
Office of the Secretary.
7002-1002 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Travel and Tourism
Season Extension Grant ................................................................................................$2,730,091
7002-1003 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, EDA Statewide
Tourism Grant ARPA .............................................................................................$58,348,810
7002-1005 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Broadband Equity,
Access and Deployment ..........................................................................................$1,433,096
7002-1007 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Broadband Equity,
Access and Deployment .....................................................................................$142,230,168
7002-2025 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Capital Projects Fund ....$170,918,503
Division of Insurance.
7006-6007 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Expanding Access to
Women's Health Grant ...............................................................................................$619,275
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF LABOR AND WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT.
Office of the Secretary.
7003-4206 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Lead License
Enforcement .................................................................................................................$75,735
7003-6628 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, OSHA 23G
Operational Program ...............................................................................................$1,437,932
Department of Career Services.
7002-6623 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, the Work Opportunity
Tax Credit ...................................................................................................................$576,827
256

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
7002-6625 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Labor Certification .................$429,651
7002-6626 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Employment Services
State Allotment ......................................................................................................$15,255,423
7002-6628 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Disabled Veterans
Outreach Program ...................................................................................................$3,190,147
7003-1010 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Trade Adjustment
Assistance ..................................................................................................................$874,165
7003-1630 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Workforce Investment
Act Adult Activities .................................................................................................$17,281,839
7003-1631 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Workforce Investment
Act Youth Formula Grants .....................................................................................$19,110,434
7003-1777 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Workforce Investment
Act National Emergency Grants .................................................................................$551,195
7003-1778 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Workforce Investment
Act Dislocated Worker Formula Grant ..................................................................$22,092,181
7003-1785 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Apprenticeships USA
State Accelerator Grant ...........................................................................................$2,118,461
Department of Unemployment Assistance.
7002-6624 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Unemployment
Insurance Administration .....................................................................................$103,400,000
7002-9701 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Federal Bureau of
Labor Statistics ........................................................................................................$1,941,381
Department of Labor Standards.
7002-2013 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Mine Safety and Health
Training .......................................................................................................................$111,862
7003-4203 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Bureau of Labor
Statistics Statistical Survey ...........................................................................................$75,000
7003-4212 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Asbestos Licensing
and Monitoring ..............................................................................................................$78,608
7003-4213 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Lead Licensing and
Monitoring ...................................................................................................................$409,962
7003-6627 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Occupational Safety
and Health Administration On-site Consultation Program ......................................$1,350,339
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF HOUSING AND LIVABLE COMMUNITIES.
Office of the Secretary.
257

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
4400-0705 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, McKinney Emergency
Shelter Grants Program ..........................................................................................$5,500,000
4400-0707 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Continuum of Care
Supplemental Housing ..........................................................................................$34,000,000
7004-1718 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Youth Homelessness
Demonstration Program (COC YHDP) ...................................................................$1,500,000
7004-2021 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Federal COVID Rental
Assistance ...............................................................................................................$1,500,000
7004-2030 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Weatherization
Assistance for Low Income Persons .....................................................................$13,000,000
7004-2033 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Low Income Home
Energy Assistance Program ................................................................................$220,000,000
7004-2034 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Community Services
Block Grant ............................................................................................................$24,000,000
7004-2041 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Low-Income Home
Energy Assistance Program (LIHEAP) (IIJA) ........................................................$11,000,000
7004-2043 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, BIL Weatherization
Assistance Program (IIJA) .....................................................................................$50,000,000
7004-3037 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Small Cities
Community Development Block Grant Program ...................................................$80,000,000
7004-3039 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Community
Development Block Grant COVID-19 .....................................................................$3,000,000
7004-9001 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Youth Homelessness
System Improvement ..............................................................................................$1,000,000
7004-9010 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Stability Voucher ................$2,530,000
7004-9012 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Recovery Housing
Program ...................................................................................................................$3,000,000
7004-9013 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Foster Youth to
Independence ..........................................................................................................$1,500,000
7004-9014 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Federal Housing
Voucher Program ..................................................................................................$11,500,000
7004-9015 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Housing Choice
Voucher and Moving to Work Program ...............................................................$588,000,000
7004-9016 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Family Unification
Program ...................................................................................................................$6,000,000
7004-9017 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Supportive Housing
for Persons with Disabilities ....................................................................................$6,000,000
258

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
7004-9018 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Section 811 Project
Based Rental Assistance Demonstration Program .................................................$4,000,000
7004-9019 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Section 8 Moderate
Rehabilitation Program ..........................................................................................$10,200,000
7004-9021 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, the Family Self-
Sufficiency Program ................................................................................................$1,400,000
7004-9022 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Emergency Housing
Vouchers (ARPA) ..................................................................................................$19,750,000
7004-9028 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Home Investment
Partnerships ...........................................................................................................$23,000,000
7004-9029 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, National Housing Trust
Fund .......................................................................................................................$20,000,000
7004-9038 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Home Investment
Partnership (ARPA) – American Rescue Plan 2021 ............................................$20,000,000
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF EDUCATION.
Department of Early Education and Care.
3000-0707 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Head Start
Collaboration ...............................................................................................................$175,000
3000-9003 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Child Abuse
Prevention ..................................................................................................................$974,453
3000-9006 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Preschool
Development Grant Birth Through Five ..................................................................$5,985,665
Department of Elementary and Secondary Education.
7010-9706 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Common Core Data
Project .........................................................................................................................$210,569
7038-0108 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Adult Education – State
Grant Program .......................................................................................................$13,643,877
7043-1001 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Title I Basic Program .....$302,605,579
7043-1004 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Title I Migrant Children
.................................................................................................................................$1,330,434
7043-1005 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Title I Neglected
Children and Orphans ................................................................................................$900,459
7043-2001 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Title II Teacher Quality
State Grants ...........................................................................................................$31,887,869
259

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
7043-3001 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Title III Language
Instruction and LEP Grants ...................................................................................$19,714,919
7043-4002 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Title IV 21st Century
Community Learning Centers ...............................................................................$20,050,205
7043-4004 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Student Support and
Academic Enrichment Grants ...............................................................................$20,924,026
7043-4005 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Stronger Connections
Grant (SCG) Program .............................................................................................$1,383,409
7043-6001 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Title VI State
Assessment Grants .................................................................................................$6,835,720
7043-6501 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Title X Homeless
Children and Youth ..................................................................................................$2,129,376
7043-7001 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Special Education
Grants ..................................................................................................................$339,339,359
7043-7002 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Preschool Grants .............$10,888,209
7043-8000 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Vocational Educational
Basic Grants ..........................................................................................................$23,338,414
7048-2004 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, CLSD Equitable
Literacy Experience ................................................................................................$8,160,534
7048-2005 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Academic Assessment
for Science Grant .....................................................................................................$2,081,570
7048-2321 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, CDC Funding to
Promote Adolescent Health ........................................................................................$107,500
7048-9144 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Migrant Education
Program Consortium Incentive Grants .........................................................................$58,794
7053-2008 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Fresh Fruits and
Vegetables Nutrition ................................................................................................$4,896,238
7053-2103 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, CNP Training and Tech
Assistance ..................................................................................................................$373,143
7053-2112 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Special Assistance
Funds ...................................................................................................................$600,378,386
7053-2117 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Child Care Program ...........$6,816,819
7053-2125 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Commodity
Supplemental Food Program .....................................................................................$272,980
7053-2126 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Temporary Emergency
Food Assistance ......................................................................................................$2,708,762
260

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
7053-2266 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Team Nutrition
Competitive Training Grant ........................................................................................$375,897
7053-3272 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Direct Certification
Performance Award ....................................................................................................$439,163
7057-2127 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FARM TO SCHOOL
GRANTS ARPA ............................................................................................................$63,119
7062-0008 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Office of School Lunch
Programs - Child Care Program Admin ..................................................................$9,222,797
7062-0017 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Charter School
Assistance and Distributions ...................................................................................$2,290,807
Department of Higher Education.
7066-6032 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Gear Up V ..........................$5,000,000
7066-6033 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Gear Up IV .........................$3,200,000
Community Colleges.
7503-9714 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Bristol CC - Upward
Bound Program .........................................................................................................$265,821
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND SECURITY.
Office of the Secretary.
8000-0402 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Bipartisan
Infrastructure Law Funds I ......................................................................................$6,087,600
8000-0405 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Bipartisan
Infrastructure Law Funds II .....................................................................................$8,000,000
8000-4692 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, State Homeland
Security Program .....................................................................................................$2,806,252
8000-4707 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Nonprofit Security
Grant Program .........................................................................................................$6,662,588
8000-4727 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, State and Local
Cybersecurity Grant Program ..................................................................................$2,920,439
8000-4794 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Urban Areas Initiative
Grant ......................................................................................................................$13,249,346
8100-4600 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Juvenile Justice
Delinquency Prevention .............................................................................................$715,863
8100-4610 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FFY2022 State Justice
Statistics Program .........................................................................................................$75,000
261

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
8100-4611 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Byrne Justice
Assistance Programs ..............................................................................................$4,360,620
8100-4622 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Residential Substance
Abuse Treatment – Admin Grant ...............................................................................$332,138
8100-4627 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Sex Offender
Registration - Grants ..................................................................................................$326,269
8100-4628 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, National Criminal
History Improvement Program ................................................................................$3,500,396
8100-4639 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, John R. Justice Grant ...........$109,241
8100-4645 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Support for Adam
Walsh Act Implementation Grant Program ..................................................................$71,735
8100-4646 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FFY2020 Violence
Against Women Act .................................................................................................$3,562,889
8100-4669 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Byrne State Crisis
Intervention Program SCIP .....................................................................................$4,053,344
8100-4670 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Opioid, Stimulant, and
Other Substance Use Grant Program ........................................................................$533,267
8100-4671 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Second Chance Act
Reentry Initiative Grant .................................................................................................$20,364
8100-4692 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Homeland Security
Grant ........................................................................................................................$6,799,138
8100-4693 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Project Safe
Neighborhood – Admin Grant ....................................................................................$374,127
8100-4707 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Non-Profit Security
Grant Program .........................................................................................................$3,673,887
8100-4708 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Nonprofit Security
Grant National Security Supplement .......................................................................$2,012,863
8100-4727 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, State and Local
Cybersecurity Grant Program ..................................................................................$1,598,264
8100-4794 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Urban Areas Security
Initiative ..................................................................................................................$16,838,838
Department of State Police.
8100-1426 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FFY2024 Law
Enforcement Mental Health and Wellness Act ..........................................................$100,000
8100-2014 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Federal Motor Carrier
Safety Admin FFY2024 ..............................................................................................$400,000
262

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
8100-2015 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Federal Motor Carrier
Safety Administration FFY2025 .............................................................................$3,000,000
8100-2408 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FFY2024 Prosecuting
Cold Cases Using DNA ..............................................................................................$189,793
8100-2541 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FFY2024 Cops
Microgrant to Prevent Hate Crimes ..............................................................................$79,961
8100-3003 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FFY23 COPS Anti
Heroin Task Force Grant .........................................................................................$1,109,763
8100-3004 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FFY24 COPS AHTF .............$800,000
8100-5459 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FF24 Port Security ..................$50,000
8100-9776 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FFY23 Coverdell
Formula ...........................................................................................................................$2,506
8100-9777 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FFY24 Coverdell
Formula .........................................................................................................................$60,000
8100-9782 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FFY23 DNA CEBR .................$17,331
8100-9783 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FFY24 DNA CEBR .................$50,000
Military Division.
8700-0014 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Army National Guard
Administrative Services ..............................................................................................$324,200
8700-1001 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Army National Guard
Facilities Program ..................................................................................................$31,134,400
8700-1002 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Army National Guard
Environmental Program ...........................................................................................$3,744,600
8700-1003 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Army National Guard
Security ....................................................................................................................$1,642,050
8700-1004 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Army National Guard
Electronic Security ......................................................................................................$275,400
8700-1005 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Army National Guard
Command Control, Communications and Information Management ........................$576,000
8700-1007 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Army National Guard
Sustainable Ranges ...................................................................................................$724,295
8700-1010 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Army National Guard
Anti-Terrorism ...............................................................................................................$99,600
8700-1021 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Air National Guard
Facilities Operations and Maintenance .................................................................$11,175,000
263

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
8700-1022 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Air National Guard
Environmental .............................................................................................................$107,084
8700-1023 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Air National Guard
Security ....................................................................................................................$2,400,000
8700-1024 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Air National Guard Fire
Protection .................................................................................................................$4,300,000
8700-1031 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Air National Guard
SRM Projects ...........................................................................................................$2,100,000
8700-1040 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Air National Guard
Distributed Learning Program ....................................................................................$697,000
8700-2301 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Camp Edwards
Readiness Center ..................................................................................................$48,550,000
Massachusetts Emergency Management Agency.
8800-0005 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FFY24 Emergency
Management Performance Grant ............................................................................$7,000,000
8800-0006 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FFY24 EOC Grant ................$700,000
8800-0040 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY23 Regional
Catastrophic Preparedness Grant ..............................................................................$800,000
8800-0042 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Hazardous Materials
Transportation Act ......................................................................................................$600,000
8800-0050 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY2023 Emergency
Operations Center Grant .........................................................................................$1,500,000
8800-0051 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY2022 1/30
Snowstorm HAZ Mitigation Program Project Cost .....................................................$100,000
8800-0096 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, COVID-19 Presidential
Declaration Mitigation Grant Program .....................................................................$1,000,000
8800-1544 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY2022 Pre-Disaster
Mitigation Program Management Costs .....................................................................$250,000
8800-1545 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY2023 Pre-Disaster
Mitigation Program Project .........................................................................................$250,000
8800-1644 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY11 Pre-Disaster
Mitigation Competitive Projects .............................................................................$11,900,000
8800-1744 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Building Resilient
Infrastructure and Communities 2020 Grant Program Management Cost ................$500,000
8800-1844 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Building Resilient
Infrastructure and Communities 2021 Grant Program Management Cost ................$100,000
264

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
8800-1944 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY22 Building Resilient
Infrastructure & Communities BRIC Management Costs .......................................$1,000,000
8800-4097 For the purpose of a federally funded grant entitled, October 2012 Hurricane
Sandy ..........................................................................................................................$700,000
8800-4110 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, February 8-9, 2013
Severe Winter Storm ...............................................................................................$5,000,000
8800-4372 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, March 2-3 2018
Severe Winter Storm and Flooding ............................................................................$200,000
8800-4496 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, COVID-19 Pandemic ........$5,000,000
8810-0051 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, January 30 2022
Snowstorm Haz Mitigation Program Project Cost ......................................................$500,000
8810-0096 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, HMPG COVID-19
Pandemic PRJ .......................................................................................................$30,000,000
8810-1544 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY2022 Pre-Disaster
Mitigation Program Project Cost ..............................................................................$5,000,000
8810-1545 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY2023 Pre-Disaster
Mitigation Program Project Cost ...........................................................................$15,000,000
8810-1744 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Building Resilient
Infrastructure & Communities BRIC20 Project ........................................................$4,000,000
8810-1844 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Building Resilient
Infrastructure & Communities Project Cost ................................................................$100,000
8810-1944 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY2022 Building
Resilient Infrastructure and Communities .............................................................$12,000,000
8810-2044 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY 2023 Building
Resilient Infrastructure and Communities .................................................................$397,500
8810-2446 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY 2024 Pre-Disaster
Mitigation Grant Program ........................................................................................$4,200,000
8810-4214 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, January 26-28 Severe
Winter Storm ..........................................................................................................$10,000,000
8810-4372 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, March 2-3 2018
Severe Winter Storm Flooding ................................................................................$8,000,000
8810-4496 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, COVID-19 Pandemic
OG 2020 ..................................................................................................................$2,000,000
Chief Medical Examiner.
4512-9089 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Mass-PPDOMA&O .................$47,044
4518-0520 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, MAVDRS ...................................$4,000
265

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
8100-9777 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Coverdell .................................$32,185
Parole Board.
0840-0111 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, COVID-19&SASS .................$310,083
4510-1357 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, VOCA .................................$1,357,263
SHERIFFS.
Franklin Sheriff’s Office.
8910-0820 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, SAMHSA - PDOA ..................$149,770
8910-0822 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, COSSAP COAP ......................$81,249
8910-0823 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, BJA FY23 Justice and
Mental Health Collaboration Program ........................................................................$150,000
8910-0824 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, TAPOTF ..................................$50,000
Hampden Sheriff’s Office.
7035-0002 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Adult Basic Education
....................................................................................................................................$354,743
8100-4611 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Byrne Justice
Assistance ..........................................................................................................................$606
8100-4646 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Violence Against
Women Act ...................................................................................................................$23,140
Worcester Sheriff’s Office.
8000-4622 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Residential Substance
Abuse Treatment ..........................................................................................................$29,120
4512-9069 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Substance Abuse
Prevention and Treatment Block Grant ......................................................................$139,050
Middlesex Sheriff’s Office.
8910-0174 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Comprehensive
Opioid, Stimulant, and Substance Abuse Site-Based Program .................................$203,452
Barnstable Sheriff’s Office.
8910-8223 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, SAMHSA VIPS
(Vivitrol Increased Participation Services) ..................................................................$147,280
Bristol Sheriff’s Office.
8100-4622 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Residential Substance
Abuse Treatment-Jail Based Treatment ......................................................................$30,000
266

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
8910-4623 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Second Chance Act ..............$450,000
TRANSPORTATION.
6440-0089 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Commercial Vehicle
Information Systems and Networks ...........................................................................$390,934
6440-0090 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Commercial Driver
License Information System Enhancement ...............................................................$667,366
6440-0091 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Fatality Analysis
Reporting 22-23 ..........................................................................................................$123,066
6642-0018 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Non-Urbanized Area
Formula Program .....................................................................................................$5,791,534
6642-0023 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Metropolitan
Transportation Planning ...............................................................................................$97,917
6642-0030 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Transit Grant Bus and
Bus Facilities ..........................................................................................................$10,570,275
6642-0049 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Special Needs for
Elderly Individuals and Individuals with Disabilities ................................................$1,300,264
6643-0018 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Springfield Area Track
Reconfiguration Project ................................................................................................$72,000
6643-0020 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Boston & Albany
Corridor Admin ........................................................................................................$2,058,855
6643-0021 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Consolidated Rail
Infrastructure and Safety Improvements (CRISI Grant Program) ........................$16,447,134
6644-0009 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Federal Climate
Investments ..................................................................................................................$50,000
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF AGING AND INDEPENDENCE.
9110-1060 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Title VI OAA MA to
Support Family Caregivers 25 ....................................................................................$281,283
9110-1061 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Medicare
Improvements Priority 1 for SHIPs 25 ........................................................................$226,513
9110-1062 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Medicare
Improvements for Patients and Providers for ADRCs .................................................$83,951
9110-1063 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Title VI OAA MA to
Support Family Caregivers 25 ....................................................................................$490,000
9110-1074 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Older Americans Act .............$136,703
267

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
9110-1075 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Title VII Ombudsman ............$570,000
9110-1076 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Title IIIB Supportive
Service ...................................................................................................................$13,650,175
9110-1077 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, National Family
Caregiver Support Program ....................................................................................$5,031,670
9110-1079 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, IIID Preventative
Health ..........................................................................................................................$682,679
9110-1089 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, APC6 ARP for APS ............$4,589,811
9110-1094 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, State Health Insurance
Assistance Program ................................................................................................$1,509,857
9110-1099 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Elder Justice Adult
Protective 23 .................................................................................................................$58,162
9110-1173 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Older Americans Act ........$21,271,490
9110-1174 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Nutrition Services
Incentive Program ...................................................................................................$6,000,000
9110-1178 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Senior Community
Service Employment Program ................................................................................$1,185,466
9110-1199 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Elder Justice Adult
Protective 24 ...............................................................................................................$114,345
9110-2025 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Massachusetts No
Wrong Door Project 2025 ...........................................................................................$450,000
SECTION 2E.
SECTION 2E. The sums set forth in this section are hereby appropriated for transfer from the General Fund
to the trust funds named within each item unless specifically designated otherwise in this section, for the
purposes and subject to the conditions specified in this section and subject to the laws regulating the
disbursement of public funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. Items in this section shall not be
subject to allotment under section 9B of chapter 29 of the General Laws or reduction under section 9C of
said chapter 29 without express authorization from the general court. Notwithstanding section 19A of said
chapter 29, any transfer under this section shall be made by the comptroller in accordance with a transfer
schedule to be developed for each item by the comptroller after consulting with the appropriate agency
secretary, the secretary of administration and finance and the state treasurer. The schedule for each
appropriation shall provide for transfers in increments considered appropriate to meet the cash flow needs
of each fund; provided, however, that the sum of the incremental transfers shall equal the sum set forth in
this section and all transfers under the schedule shall be completed not later than June 30, 2027. Not later
than 7 days after the schedules receive final approval by the comptroller, they shall be reported to the house
and senate committees on ways and means.
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF LABOR AND WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT.
Office of the Secretary.
268

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
1595-1075 For an operating transfer to the Workforce Competitiveness Trust Fund
established in section 2WWW of chapter 29 of the General Laws .......................$10,000,000
Gaming Economic Development Fund .................80.00%
General Fund ........................................................20.00%
EXECUTIVE OFFICE FOR ADMINISTRATION AND FINANCE.
1599-6152 For an operating transfer to the State Retiree Benefits Trust Fund
established in section 24 of chapter 32A of the General Laws ...........................$400,000,000
1595-6153 For an operating transfer to the Communications Access Trust Fund
established in section 2XXXXX of chapter 29 of the General Laws; provided,
that not later than March 10, 2027, the executive office for administration
and finance shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on
ways and means that shall include, but not be limited to the: (i) distribution
of the funds appropriated in this item to sheriffs’ offices and the department
of correction; (ii) barriers to providing calls free of charge to incarcerated
individuals; and (iii) current number of calls at sheriffs’ offices and the
department of correction .......................................................................................$10,000,000
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF ENERGY AND ENVIRONMENTAL AFFAIRS.
1595-6232 For the Climatetech Investment Fund established in section 15 of chapter
23J of the General Laws; provided, that funds shall be appropriated for clean
energy workforce development initiatives and investments to support
emissions reductions in the energy, transportation and buildings sectors, as
directed by the Massachusetts clean energy and climate plan for 2050;
provided further, that not less than $1,000,000 shall be expended for
entrepreneurial fellowships providing direct, multi-year funding enabling
the translation of research into businesses, products, and jobs in the
energy, transportation, and buildings sectors, as directed by the 2050
Clean Energy and Climate Plan; and provided further, that not later than
March 2, 2027, the executive office of energy and environmental affairs, in
consultation with the Massachusetts clean energy center, shall submit a
report to the joint committee on telecommunications, utilities and energy and
the house and senate committees on ways and means, which shall include,
but not be limited to: (i) summaries of the investments made from or
expected to be made from the transfer; (ii) the workforce training programs
supported or developed with funds from the transfer, including the number
of workers served by each program; and (iii) the estimated impacts of the
transfer towards the clean energy climate plan for 2050’s outlined goals,
including details by sector .....................................................................................$11,000,000
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES.
Office of the Secretary.
1595-1068 For an operating transfer to the MassHealth provider payment account
under the Medical Assistance Trust Fund established in section 2QQQ of
chapter 29 of the General Laws; provided, that these funds shall be
expended for: (i) services provided; (ii) public hospital transformation and
incentive initiative payments; (iii) health equity incentive payments; or (iv)
269

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
Medicaid care organization payments under 42 CFR 438.6(c); provided
further, that all payments from the Medical Assistance Trust Fund shall be:
(a) subject to the availability of federal financial participation; (b) made only
under federally-approved payment methods; (c) consistent with federal
funding requirements and all federal payment limits as determined by the
secretary of health and human services; and (d) subject to the terms and
conditions of an agreement with the executive office of health and human
services; provided further, that the secretary of health and human services
shall notify the house and senate committees on ways and means and the
joint committee on health care financing of increases or decreases in any
payments made within the term of the current 1115 waiver or other state
plan amendments within 15 days of said payments; and provided further,
that the secretary of health and human services shall utilize funds from the
Medical Assistance Trust Fund to make payments of up to $494,800,000 to
the Cambridge public health commission or to Medicaid care organizations
for payment to the Cambridge public health commission if the Cambridge
public health commission, in anticipation of receiving such payments, first
voluntarily transfers an amount equal to the non-federal share of such
payments to the Medical Assistance Trust Fund using a federally-
permissible source of funds .................................................................................$548,032,400
1595-1069 For an operating transfer to the Health Information Technology Trust Fund
established in section 35RR of chapter 10 of the General Laws; provided,
that these funds shall be expended for operating costs for the statewide
health information exchange and integrated eligibility system; and provided
further, that not later than December 18, 2026, the executive office of health
and human services shall submit a report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means and the joint committee on health care
financing detailing utilization in fiscal year 2026 of the Health Information
Technology Trust Fund established in said section 35RR of said chapter 10,
including the: (i) total dollar amount billed to the Health Information
Technology Trust Fund; (ii) total dollar amount of federal reimbursement; (iii)
initiatives and programs paid for out of the Health Information Technology
Trust Fund; and (iv) amount disbursed from the Health Information
Technology Trust Fund to each program and initiative outlined in the
enabling statute .....................................................................................................$14,177,900
1595-1071 For an operating transfer to the Community Behavioral Health Promotion
and Prevention Trust Fund established in section 35GGG of chapter 10 of
the General Laws, inserted by section 7 of chapter 208 of the acts of 2018 ...........$200,000
Department of Public Health.
1595-4506 For an operating transfer to the Childhood Lead Poisoning Prevention Trust
Fund established in section 35MMM of chapter 10 of the General Laws ..............$2,700,000
TRANSPORTATION.
Massachusetts Department of Transportation.
1595-6368 For an operating transfer to the Massachusetts Transportation Trust Fund
established in section 4 of chapter 6C of the General Laws; provided, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the registrar of
motor vehicles shall provide quarterly reports to the commissioner of
correction detailing the number of identity cards processed pursuant to the
270

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
enhanced state identity card program for citizens released from the
department of correction facilities; provided further, that the report shall also
provide a summary and detail of the registry of motor vehicles fees
associated with the transactions and that, upon receipt and verification by
the department of correction of the accuracy of the transactions reported in
each quarterly report, the commissioner of correction shall submit a request
to the comptroller for an operating transfer of the full amount of said registry
of motor vehicles fees to the Commonwealth Transportation Fund
established in section 2ZZZ of chapter 29 of the General Laws; and provided
further, that the transfer request shall include the department of correction
account from which the transfer shall be made the quarterly report from the
registrar of motor vehicles as supporting documentation; provided further,
that not less than $20,000 shall be expended to the city of Somerville for
their crossing guard program and other pedestrian enhancements in the
vicinity of the East Somerville section of the city of Somerville; and
provided further, that not less than $75,000 shall be expended to the town
of Bolton for rural infrastructure improvements .................................................$605,056,384
Commonwealth Transportation Fund ....................88.40%
Education and Transportation Fund ......................11.60%
1595-6369 For an operating transfer to the Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority
under clause (1) of subsection (d) of section 2ZZZ of chapter 29 of the
General Laws; provided, that the Massachusetts Bay Transportation
Authority shall submit quarterly reports to the executive office for
administration and finance and the house and senate committees on ways
and means which shall include an accounting of the funds provided for in
this item including: (i) the amount of money received under this transfer; (ii)
the amount of money expended under this transfer; (iii) a description of
items and services for which funds have been expended; and (iv) the status
of ongoing and planned capital projects under the purview of the
Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority; provided further, that the
Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority shall submit these reports on
a quarterly basis not later than 30 days following the last day of the quarter;
provided further, that not less than $40,000,000 shall be expended for the
Massachusetts Bay Transit Authority academy program to establish a
pipeline for a skilled workforce; provided further, that funds included in this
item may be used for an income eligible, reduced fares program under the
Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority for riders of all modes with low-
incomes; provided further, that funds included in this item over the total
amount of funds made available in this item in the prior fiscal year shall not
be used for capital spending; provided further, that not less than $50,000
shall be expended to the Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority to
study the financial feasibility and department capability of either extending
the Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority red line and/or creating a
Bus Rapid Transit (BRT) line from Alewife down Route 2 to the Concord
Rotary; provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to
the Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority for the repair and
restoration of the Gift of the Wind sculpture at Porter station; and provided
further, that ferry services operated by or under contract with the
Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority including, but not limited to,
services operated in fiscal year 2026 seasonally in the East Boston section
of the city of Boston, the cities of Lynn and Quincy and the city known as the
town of Winthrop, shall continue to run year-round through the end of fiscal
year 2027 ............................................................................................................$470,150,000
271

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
Commonwealth Transportation Fund ....................53.19%
Education and Transportation Fund ......................46.81%
1595-6370 For an operating transfer to the regional transit authorities organized under
chapter 161B of the General Laws, or any prior laws, under clause (2) of
subsection (d) of section 2ZZZ of chapter 29 of the General Laws; provided,
that each regional transit authority receiving assistance under this item shall
deliver not later than January 6, 2027, a copy of its most recent audited
financial statement to the chief financial officer of the Massachusetts
Department of Transportation, the secretary of administration and finance,
the treasurer of the commonwealth, the comptroller of the commonwealth,
the house and senate committees on ways and means and the joint
committee on transportation ................................................................................$217,450,000
Education and Transportation Fund ......................62.01%
Commonwealth Transportation Fund ....................37.99%
1595-6379 For the operation of the motor vehicle insurance merit rating board, including
the rent, related parking and utility expenses of the board; provided, that the
amount appropriated in this item and the associated fringe benefit costs
shall be borne by insurance companies doing motor vehicle insurance
business within the commonwealth under section 57A of chapter 6C of the
General Laws; and provided further, that notwithstanding any general or
special law to the contrary, no safe driver insurance plan shall require the
payment of an unsafe driver point surcharge for the first offense for a non-
criminal motor vehicle traffic violation as described in chapter 90C of the
General Laws ........................................................................................................$11,671,807
Commonwealth Transportation Fund .......................100%
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF EDUCATION.
Department of Elementary and Secondary Education.
1595-0035 For an operating transfer to the Twenty-First Century Education Trust Fund
established in section 35NNN of chapter 10 of the General Laws; provided,
that funds may be used for effective and sustainable improvement initiatives
in public schools designated as in need of assistance pursuant to the school
accountability system established by the board of elementary and
secondary education, and for the purpose of addressing persistent
disparities in achievement among student subgroups, improving
educational opportunities for all students, sharing best practices for
improving classroom learning and supporting efficiencies within and across
school districts .........................................................................................................$1,000,000
1595-0115 For the Civics Project Trust Fund established in section 2CCCCC of chapter
29 of the General Laws to promote civics education ..............................................$2,500,000
1595-0116 For the Genocide Education Trust Fund, established in section 2MMMMM
of chapter 29 of the General Laws; provided, that said funds shall be
distributed by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education
for purposes related to the instruction of middle and high school students
on the history of genocide, including, but not limited to: (i) development of
curricular materials detailing the underlying causes, international reaction,
progression and aftermath of genocide; and (ii) professional development
272

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
training, including, but not limited to, the provision of trainings, seminars,
conferences and materials, for educators to use in the teaching of
genocide………………………………………………………….. ............................…$500,000
Department of Higher Education.
1595-7066 For the support of the Massachusetts Science, Technology Engineering,
and Mathematics Grant Fund, referred to as the Pipeline Fund, established
in section 2MMM of chapter 29 of the General Laws .............................................$1,000,000
SECTION 2F.
SECTION 2F. The sums set forth in this section are hereby appropriated from the Education and
Transportation Fund for the purposes and subject to the conditions specified in this section and subject to
the laws regulating the disbursement of public funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. All
appropriations in this section shall not be subject to section 5D of chapter 29 of the General Laws.
EDUCATION.
Department of Early Education and Care.
1596-2410 For operational grants to child care providers; provided, that for fiscal year
2027 funds shall be distributed in accordance with the formula established
in section 20 of chapter 15D of the General Laws; provided further, that
funds from this item shall be expended in coordination with funds from item
3000-1045; provided further, that the department shall collect data from
participating programs, including, but not limited to: (i) the number of enrolled
children; (ii) the number of educators employed; (iii) efforts to recruit and
retain employees; (iv) any available demographic data of the families served
by participating providers; (v) to the extent feasible, the income level of the
families served by participating providers; (vi) the amount awarded to each
provider; and (vii) the amount of operational grants spent by provider,
delineated by category of spending including, but not limited to: (a) salaries;
(b) other compensation; (c) workforce training; and (d) facilities
improvements; provided further, that programs shall respond to all data
collection requests and surveys from the department to be eligible for said
grants; provided further, that funds may be expended for departmental
technical assistance related to the administration and distribution of said
grants; and provided further, that administrative costs for the program shall
not exceed 2 per cent of the total appropriation for said program .......................$365,000,000
Education and Transportation Fund .........................100%
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF EDUCATION.
Department of Elementary and Secondary Education.
1596-2422 For the reimbursement of school districts and participating schools for the
costs of providing universal free school meals pursuant to section 1C of
chapter 69 of the General Laws; provided, that districts receiving funds
under this item shall not implement a meal charge for students; provided
further, that participating districts that are eligible for reimbursement under
the community eligibility provision or provision 2 of the National School
273

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
Lunch Program or an applicable provision of the National Child Nutrition Act,
Public Law 111-296, shall adopt said provision to maximize access to
federal funds; and provided further, that not later than January 15, 2027, the
department of elementary and secondary education shall submit a report to
the house and senate committees on ways and means that shall include: (i)
data on any change in utilization of school lunch services in districts
receiving funding under this item, delineated by free, reduced and full-pay
students as defined by the National School Lunch Program; (ii) the
distribution of funding paid through this item and, for the purpose of universal
free school meals in fiscal year 2025, item 7053-1925 delineated by school
district; and (iii) options to reform, modify or extend the program in a manner
that promotes equity, maximizes federal funds and improves predictability
and sustainability of funding ................................................................................$198,000,000
Education and Transportation Fund ..........................100%
1596-2424 For a competitive grant program administered by the department of
elementary and secondary education, in consultation with Massachusetts
clean energy center, for K-12 public schools or districts for projects to install
or maintain clean energy infrastructure pursuant to section 37 of chapter 69
of the General Laws ................................................................................................$5,000,000
Education and Transportation Fund ..........................100%
1596-2438 For the cost of providing an additional $160 per pupil in minimum aid funding
to qualifying cities, towns, regional school districts, counties maintaining
agricultural schools, independent vocational schools and independent
agricultural and technical schools to be distributed under chapters 70 and
76 of the General Laws and section 3 ...................................................................$52,200,000
Education and Transportation Fund ..........................100%
1596-2450 For school aid to cities, towns, regional school districts, counties maintaining
vocational and agricultural schools and independent vocational schools;
provided, that funds in this item shall be in addition to funds appropriated in
items 7061-0008 and 1596-2438 and may be distributed under chapters 70
and 76 of the General Laws and section 3; and provided further, that the
commissioner of elementary and secondary education may transfer funds
from this item to said item 7061-0008 .................................................................$550,586,435
Education and Transportation Fund .........................100%
1596-2451 For reimbursements to regional school districts for the transportation of
pupils and to cities, towns, regional vocational or county agricultural school
districts, independent vocational schools and collaboratives for certain
expenditures for transportation of nonresident pupils to approved
vocational-technical programs of any regional or county agricultural school
district, city, town, independent school or collaborative under section 8A of
chapter 74 of the General Laws; provided further, that funds from this item
for reimbursements to regional school districts for the transportation of
pupils shall be in addition to funds appropriated in item 7035-0006; and
provided further, that the commissioner of elementary and secondary
education may transfer funds from this item to said item 7035-0006 ...................$62,000,000
Education and Transportation Fund .........................100%
274

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
Department of Higher Education.
1596-2414 For a scholarship program to provide financial assistance to
Massachusetts students enrolled in and pursuing a program of higher
education in any public institutions of higher education in the
commonwealth; provided, that funds from this item may be expended on the
administration of the scholarship program; and provided further, that the
commissioner of higher education, in coordination with the Massachusetts
state scholarship office, shall adopt regulations governing the eligibility and
the awarding of financial assistance under this item ............................................$85,000,000
Education and Transportation Fund ..........................100%
1596-2423 For a scholarship program to provide financial assistance to students in the
commonwealth who are enrolled in and pursuing a program of higher
education at a public institution of higher education, as defined in section 5
of chapter 15A of the General Laws, for an in-demand profession as defined
by the executive office of labor and workforce development's study on labor
market conditions pursuant to section 16A of said chapter 15A; provided,
that funds from this item may be expended on the administration of said
scholarship program; provided further, that the board of higher education, in
coordination with the Massachusetts state scholarship office, shall adopt
guidelines governing the eligibility for and the awarding of financial
assistance; provided further, that not less than $1,500,000 shall be
expended for a scholarship program to provide financial assistance to
students from the commonwealth who: (i) are enrolled in and pursuing either
an associate degree or certificate program at a municipal college; (ii) are
age 25 or older as of the first day of classes; (iii) have not previously earned
a college degree; and (iv) are enrolled in at least 6 credits; provided further,
that the funds shall be expended to cover any remaining tuition and fees
due and an allowance for the cost of books, supplies and other expenses
for any eligible student after all non-loan aid have been exhausted; provided
further, that funds from this item may be expended on student support
services, administration and the marketing of said scholarship program; and
provided further, that funds may be expended for programs or activities
during the summer months ...................................................................................$10,000,000
Education and Transportation Fund ..........................100%
1596-2439 For state university cohort counseling to ensure student success
(SUCCESS) grants to state universities to provide wraparound supports and
services to improve outcomes for their most vulnerable populations
including, but not limited to, low-income, first-generation, minority and
disabled students and lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, queer and
questioning students; provided, that funds shall be disbursed based on the
formula developed by the department of higher education in fiscal year
2026; provided further, that eligible wraparound support activities shall
include, but not be limited to, peer mentors, academic skills workshops and
targeted academic, career and scholarship advising; provided further, that
appropriated funds may be expended for programs or activities during the
2028 academic year; provided further, that all funds distributed may be
spent solely on personnel costs at the discretion of the universities; and
provided further, that not later than April 30, 2027, the state universities
council of presidents, in consultation with the department of higher
education, shall report to the house and senate committees on ways and
means on the progress made on implementing and funding this
275

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
program, including any regulations, guidelines or criteria used to distribute
the funds and on the final distribution of funds to campuses ................................$18,000,000
Education and Transportation Fund ..........................100%
1596-2700 For a free community college program established in section 5B of chapter
15A of the General Laws; provided, that funds shall be expended to cover
any remaining tuition and fees due and an allowance for the cost of books,
supplies and other expenses for any eligible student after all other sources
of federal and state grant aid have been exhausted; provided further, that
students whose household income is at or below 125 per cent of the state
median income shall be granted an allowance of up to $1,200 per academic
year for books, supplies and other expenses for attending a community
college program; provided, however, that said allowance shall not preclude
students from receiving assistance through MassGrant or MassGrant Plus,
subject to the regulations of said programs; provided further, that the
commissioner of higher education, in consultation with the executive office
of education and the Massachusetts Association of Community Colleges,
and in coordination with the Massachusetts state scholarship office, shall
adopt guidelines governing eligibility for and the awarding of financial
assistance under this item; provided further, that funds from this item may
be expended on student support services, administration and marketing of
said scholarship program; provided further, that students aged 25 or older
may be referred to as MassReconnect students; provided further, that funds
from this item may be expended to create awareness and conduct public
outreach related to MassReconnect; provided further, that funds may be
expended for programs or activities during the summer months; provided
further, that tuition and fees at public community colleges shall not increase
more than the lesser of: (i) the ratio of the value of the implicit price deflator
for state and local government purchases in the third quarter of the prior fiscal
year to its value in the third quarter of the fiscal year 2 years prior; and (ii)
1.045; provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to
the contrary, students enrolled in courses that meet the initial training
requirements for emergency medical technician and paramedic certification
shall be awarded sufficient financial assistance to cover any remaining
tuition and fees due and an allowance for the cost of books, supplies and
other expenses after all other sources of federal and state grant aid have
been utilized, regardless of the number of credits the student is enrolled in
or whether the student has previously earned a baccalaureate degree or
equivalent certification; provided further, that the department, after
consultation with the Massachusetts Association of Community Colleges,
shall analyze the faculty and staff capacity to meet the needs of the program
established in this item, to ensure a sufficient workforce; provided further,
that not later than February 2, 2027, the department of higher education, in
consultation with the Massachusetts Association of Community Colleges,
shall submit a report to the joint committee on higher education and the
house and senate committees on ways and means detailing program
uptake, funding distribution, and the metrics and benchmarks being used to
measure program success including, but not limited to: (1a) enrollment; (2b)
retention; (3c) barriers to student participation; and (4d) demographic data
related to program participants; and provided further, that not later than May
28, 2027, the department of higher education shall submit information to the
executive office for administration and finance, the board of higher
education, the joint committee on higher education and the house and
senate committees on ways and means on the number of students
participating in the program at each community college .....................................$127,048,000
276

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
Education and Transportation Fund ..........................100%
1596-2701 For Supporting Urgent Community College Equity through Student
Services (SUCCESS) grants to community colleges to provide wraparound
supports and services to improve outcomes for their most vulnerable
populations, which may include, but shall not be limited to, low-income, first-
generation, minority and disabled students and lesbian, gay, bisexual,
transgender, queer and questioning students; provided, that funds shall be
disbursed based on the formula developed in consultation with the
Massachusetts Association of Community Colleges; provided further, that
eligible wraparound support activities shall include, but not be limited to,
peer mentors, academic skills workshops, field trips to 4-year schools and
targeted academic, career, transfer and scholarship advising; provided
further, that funds may be expended for programs or activities during the
2028 academic year; provided further, that all funds distributed may be
spent solely on personnel costs at the discretion of the college; and provided
further, that not later than April 30, 2027, the department shall report to the
joint committee on higher education and the house and senate committees
on ways and means on the progress made on implementing and funding
this program, including any regulations, guidelines or criteria used to
distribute the funds, and on the final distribution of funds to campuses,
prior appropriation continued ................................................................................$18,000,000
Education and Transportation Fund ..........................100%
277

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
SECTION 3 LOCAL AID DISTRIBUTIONS.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2027 the distribution of unrestricted general government aid to cities and towns of the balance of
the State Lottery and Gaming Fund, as paid from the General Fund in accordance with clause (c) of the
second paragraph of section 35 of chapter 10 of the General Laws, and additional funds from the General
Fund and the Gaming Local Aid Fund, shall be $1,333,109,519 and shall be apportioned to cities and towns
in accordance with this section. For fiscal year 2027 the total amounts to be distributed and paid to each
city, town and regional school district from item 7061-0008 of section 2 and items 1596-2438 and 1596-
2450 of section 2F, shall be as set forth in the following lists. If there is conflict between the language of
this section and the distribution listed below, the distribution below shall control. The specified amounts
distributed from said item 7061-0008 of said section 2 and said items 1596-2438 and 1596-2450 of said
section 2F shall be deemed in full satisfaction of the amounts due under chapter 70 of the General Laws.
For fiscal year 2027, a district’s school aid shall be calculated according to the provisions of chapter
70 of the General Laws. The foundation budget category of “low-income enrollment” for the purpose of
calculating foundation enrollment shall be determined by financial eligibility for certain federal programs, as
defined by the provisions of section 2 of said chapter 70, and including a number of students identified and
approved as low income through the supplemental claiming system established and posted by the
department for that purpose, as well as students identified and approved as homeless for purposes of
calculating the McKinney-Vento homelessness grant program administered by the department, consistent
with the conditions provided for in said section 2 of said chapter 70. The assumed special education
enrollment percentage for vocational school students shall be set at 5.00 per cent and the assumed special
education enrollment percentage for non-vocational school students shall be set at 4.00 per cent.
The per-pupil rates for the employee benefits and fixed charges allotments shall be adjusted by the
foundation employee benefits inflation rate and the per-pupil rates for all other foundation allotments shall
be adjusted by the foundation inflation index. Foundation increments shall be the additional resources
provided for the education of students designated as English learners or low-income; provided, however,
that for low-income students the amount of the foundation increment shall be determined by the low-income
group into which each district is assigned. Foundation budget rates for employee benefits and fixed
charges, guidance and psychological services, special education out-of-district tuition, English learners and
low-income students shall be increased to close the gap between the rates used in fiscal year 2021 and
the rates established in tables 1 and 2 of section 3 of chapter 70 of the General Laws, consistent with
adjustments prescribed in said section 3 of said chapter 70 and set at the rates identified in the table below.
Required local contributions shall be calculated pursuant to said chapter 70; provided, that municipal
revenue growth factors shall be calculated in a manner consistent with calculations made in fiscal year
2026; provided further, that the total statewide target local contribution shall be 59 per cent and the effort
reduction percentage shall be 100 per cent; and provided further that the minimum aid per pupil dollar
amount shall be $160. Said chapter 70 aid for fiscal year 2027 shall be the greater of: (i) foundation aid or
(ii) the sum of base aid and minimum aid. No non-operating district shall receive said chapter 70 aid in an
amount greater than the district’s foundation budget.
The department of elementary and secondary education shall not consider health care costs for
retired teachers to be part of net school spending for any district in which such costs were not considered
part of net school spending in fiscal year 1994 and for any district that has not accepted the provisions of
section 260 of chapter 165 of the acts of 2014; provided, however, that any district for whom such costs
are not so considered shall have included as part of net school spending an amount equal to the increase
in the foundation budget for the district associated with health care costs of retired teachers. No payments
to cities, towns or counties maintaining an agricultural school under this section shall be made after
November 30 of the fiscal year until the commissioner of revenue certifies acceptance of the prior fiscal
year’s annual financial reports submitted under section 43 of chapter 44 of the General Laws. Advance
payments shall be made for some or all of periodic local reimbursement or assistance programs to any city,
town, regional school district or independent agricultural school that demonstrates an emergency cash
shortfall, as certified by the commissioner of revenue and approved by the secretary of administration and
finance, under guidelines established by the secretary.
278

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
FY27 Base Rates
Instructional
Classroom & Other Materials, Guidance & Employee Special
Instructional Specialist Teaching Professional Equipment & Psychological Pupil Operations & Benefits/Fixed Education Total, All
Administration Leadership Teachers Services Development Technology Services Services Maintenance Charges Tuition Categories
Pre-school 234.97 424.36 1,945.84 499.05 76.96 281.62 226.58 56.31 540.34 1,036.80 0.00 5,322.83
Kindergarten half-day 234.97 424.36 1,945.84 499.05 76.96 281.62 226.58 56.31 540.34 1,036.80 0.00 5,322.83
Kindergarten full-day 469.93 848.74 3,891.69 998.14 154.00 563.28 453.16 112.67 1,080.67 2,073.56 0.00 10,645.84
Elementary 469.93 848.74 3,891.63 998.14 154.02 563.28 453.16 168.97 1,080.67 2,073.56 0.00 10,702.10
Junior/Middle 469.93 848.74 3,424.65 718.52 166.94 563.28 453.16 276.02 1,171.58 2,239.93 0.00 10,332.75
High School 469.93 848.74 5,036.23 598.16 161.88 901.24 472.52 636.49 1,135.97 1,977.51 0.00 12,238.67
Vocational 469.93 848.74 8,561.64 598.16 267.63 1,577.15 472.52 636.49 2,126.02 2,488.68 0.00 18,046.96
Special Education & Incremental Rates
Instructional
Classroom & Other Materials, Guidance & Employee Special
Instructional Specialist Teaching Professional Equipment & Psychological Pupil Operations & Benefits/Fixed Education Total, All
Administration Leadership Teachers Services Development Technology Services Services Maintenance Charges Tuition Categories
Special Education in-district 3,243.28 0.00 10,702.02 9,992.32 516.26 450.60 0.00 0.00 3,622.90 4,718.22 0.00 33,245.60
Special Education tuitioned-out 4,137.24 0.00 0.00 63.20 0.00 0.00 0.00 0.00 0.00 0.00 39,280.88 43,481.32
English learners PK-5 120.50 210.87 1,476.04 210.87 60.24 150.61 90.37 30.13 361.48 384.32 0.00 3,095.43
English learners 6-8 129.25 226.15 1,583.04 226.15 64.61 161.53 96.93 32.32 387.68 412.17 0.00 3,319.83
English learners high school/voc 155.07 271.39 1,899.66 271.39 77.53 193.83 116.30 38.77 465.22 494.61 0.00 3,983.77
Low-income group 1 (0-5.99%) 57.28 271.38 2,649.26 0.00 128.53 19.70 107.27 557.44 0.00 497.03 0.00 4,287.89
Low-income group 2 (6-11.99%) 60.86 288.35 2,814.85 0.00 136.57 20.94 113.98 592.28 0.00 528.10 0.00 4,555.93
Low-income group 3 (12-17.99%) 64.44 305.32 2,980.43 0.00 144.60 22.17 120.69 627.13 0.00 559.16 0.00 4,823.94
Low-income group 4 (18-23.99%) 68.02 322.27 3,146.00 0.00 152.63 23.39 127.39 661.96 0.00 590.23 0.00 5,091.89
Low-income group 5 (24-29.99%) 71.59 339.23 3,311.58 0.00 160.67 24.63 134.10 696.80 0.00 621.29 0.00 5,359.89
Low-income group 6 (30-35.99%) 80.19 379.95 3,708.98 0.00 179.94 27.59 150.18 780.42 0.00 695.85 0.00 6,003.10
Low-income group 7 (36-41.99%) 88.78 420.64 4,106.36 0.00 199.22 30.54 166.28 864.04 0.00 770.39 0.00 6,646.25
Low-income group 8 (42-47.99%) 97.38 461.36 4,503.75 0.00 218.50 33.50 182.37 947.65 0.00 844.95 0.00 7,289.46
Low-income group 9 (48-53.99%) 105.97 502.07 4,901.14 0.00 237.78 36.44 198.45 1,031.27 0.00 919.51 0.00 7,932.63
Low-income group 10 (54-69.99%) 114.55 542.78 5,298.53 0.00 257.06 39.41 214.55 1,114.88 0.00 994.08 0.00 8,575.84
Low-income group 11 (70-79.99%) 128.88 610.61 5,960.85 0.00 289.19 44.33 241.38 1,254.25 0.00 1,118.32 0.00 9,647.81
Low-income group 12 (80%+) 143.20 678.47 6,623.17 0.00 321.32 49.26 268.19 1,393.60 0.00 1,242.58 0.00 10,719.79
Unrestricted General
Municipality / District Chapter 70 Government Aid
ABINGTON $15,164,118 $2,467,376
ACTON $0 $1,754,517
ACUSHNET $7,640,852 $1,901,754
ADAMS $12,393 $2,936,431
AGAWAM $27,760,200 $4,620,761
ALFORD $0 $17,603
AMESBURY $10,270,009 $2,440,097
AMHERST $6,703,939 $10,559,589
ANDOVER $16,197,960 $2,241,214
AQUINNAH $0 $2,932
ARLINGTON $21,226,373 $9,515,716
ASHBURNHAM $0 $997,262
ASHBY $0 $549,205
ASHFIELD $93,683 $232,857
ASHLAND $12,447,058 $1,696,166
ATHOL $0 $3,320,652
279

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
Unrestricted General
Municipality / District Chapter 70 Government Aid
ATTLEBORO $63,226,636 $7,155,503
AUBURN $16,115,849 $2,148,056
AVON $4,488,051 $869,333
AYER $0 $949,518
BARNSTABLE $26,894,457 $2,638,300
BARRE $0 $1,128,055
BECKET $76,923 $113,905
BEDFORD $7,054,469 $1,439,813
BELCHERTOWN $15,052,600 $2,134,134
BELLINGHAM $10,967,237 $2,128,288
BELMONT $13,660,219 $2,832,050
BERKLEY $4,414,688 $763,160
BERLIN $0 $252,877
BERNARDSTON $0 $364,803
BEVERLY $16,388,255 $7,324,671
BILLERICA $22,129,264 $7,303,740
BLACKSTONE $162,423 $1,716,791
BLANDFORD $77,586 $159,262
BOLTON $3,547 $247,642
BOSTON $254,265,561 $237,632,800
BOURNE $6,146,375 $1,838,668
BOXBOROUGH $32,909 $316,390
BOXFORD $2,161,403 $609,730
BOYLSTON $54,141 $429,629
BRAINTREE $22,754,750 $7,177,338
BREWSTER $1,547,125 $495,242
BRIDGEWATER $190,196 $4,568,318
BRIMFIELD $1,831,387 $489,017
BROCKTON $288,027,232 $26,262,248
BROOKFIELD $2,002,366 $619,292
BROOKLINE $18,876,413 $7,963,288
BUCKLAND $7,677 $384,055
BURLINGTON $11,059,876 $3,284,747
CAMBRIDGE $23,847,887 $26,945,555
CANTON $10,034,440 $2,689,724
CARLISLE $1,625,134 $275,148
CARVER $11,067,283 $1,832,305
CHARLEMONT $120,531 $219,245
CHARLTON $0 $1,817,162
CHATHAM $0 $188,765
CHELMSFORD $16,278,424 $6,366,141
CHELSEA $131,827,785 $10,301,318
CHESHIRE $0 $770,513
280

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
Unrestricted General
Municipality / District Chapter 70 Government Aid
CHESTER $115,723 $225,815
CHESTERFIELD $108,282 $173,170
CHICOPEE $101,370,278 $14,443,308
CHILMARK $0 $4,705
CLARKSBURG $2,235,621 $456,281
CLINTON $22,950,682 $2,952,596
COHASSET $3,556,395 $645,307
COLRAIN $8,760 $361,994
CONCORD $4,818,025 $1,455,091
CONWAY $669,446 $224,162
CUMMINGTON $59,811 $104,634
DALTON $337,786 $1,427,048
DANVERS $10,648,870 $3,572,365
DARTMOUTH $11,780,277 $3,161,836
DEDHAM $10,556,123 $4,101,650
DEERFIELD $1,265,859 $602,429
DENNIS $0 $683,086
DEVENS $308,558 $0
DIGHTON $0 $969,852
DOUGLAS $9,358,683 $915,327
DOVER $1,227,551 $241,275
DRACUT $28,733,489 $4,394,614
DUDLEY $11,040 $2,241,018
DUNSTABLE $0 $308,497
DUXBURY $7,763,410 $1,111,799
EAST BRIDGEWATER $13,677,749 $1,877,454
EAST BROOKFIELD $221,080 $363,762
EAST LONGMEADOW $16,046,736 $1,815,537
EASTHAM $588,199 $186,867
EASTHAMPTON $9,308,822 $3,525,490
EASTON $12,037,547 $2,746,699
EDGARTOWN $1,331,177 $83,549
EGREMONT $0 $79,138
ERVING $629,866 $84,302
ESSEX $0 $307,094
EVERETT $128,092,523 $8,665,342
FAIRHAVEN $10,285,363 $2,828,364
FALL RIVER $250,598,336 $29,889,921
FALMOUTH $10,478,249 $1,738,900
FITCHBURG $92,786,527 $10,703,835
FLORIDA $579,687 $62,429
FOXBOROUGH $10,485,512 $1,868,250
FRAMINGHAM $93,930,862 $12,478,771
281

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
Unrestricted General
Municipality / District Chapter 70 Government Aid
FRANKLIN $31,218,083 $3,099,247
FREETOWN $16,860 $1,191,017
GARDNER $33,019,774 $5,315,044
GEORGETOWN $6,189,672 $898,520
GILL $0 $305,086
GLOUCESTER $12,634,061 $5,009,422
GOSHEN $111,470 $100,342
GOSNOLD $0 $2,630
GRAFTON $14,015,088 $1,961,149
GRANBY $5,029,860 $1,107,468
GRANVILLE $139,520 $201,096
GREAT BARRINGTON $0 $951,893
GREENFIELD $17,009,024 $3,982,071
GROTON $0 $971,595
GROVELAND $65,470 $913,012
HADLEY $1,528,446 $569,257
HALIFAX $3,735,263 $1,138,578
HAMILTON $0 $842,697
HAMPDEN $0 $862,942
HANCOCK $475,796 $70,816
HANOVER $8,471,971 $2,657,005
HANSON $40,519 $1,606,191
HARDWICK $10,500 $583,921
HARVARD $2,555,491 $1,857,498
HARWICH $0 $540,273
HATFIELD $1,012,456 $391,366
HAVERHILL $96,427,042 $12,327,448
HAWLEY $32,248 $54,279
HEATH $0 $104,943
HINGHAM $9,996,377 $1,979,505
HINSDALE $104,923 $279,272
HOLBROOK $13,156,698 $1,850,690
HOLDEN $14,521 $2,398,070
HOLLAND $1,080,634 $253,162
HOLLISTON $9,981,860 $1,942,354
HOLYOKE $110,598,472 $12,738,460
HOPEDALE $6,585,260 $817,883
HOPKINTON $11,540,499 $985,299
HUBBARDSTON $0 $564,998
HUDSON $14,243,100 $2,501,153
HULL $4,288,024 $2,658,125
HUNTINGTON $436,448 $432,277
IPSWICH $4,776,506 $2,013,389
282

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
Unrestricted General
Municipality / District Chapter 70 Government Aid
KINGSTON $6,227,857 $1,203,903
LAKEVILLE $119,449 $1,026,274
LANCASTER $0 $1,198,942
LANESBOROUGH $7,201 $432,663
LAWRENCE $332,192,248 $24,627,306
LEE $2,392,845 $781,135
LEICESTER $11,665,327 $2,177,799
LENOX $1,533,843 $668,554
LEOMINSTER $76,157,655 $7,178,525
LEVERETT $437,488 $223,883
LEXINGTON $20,399,075 $1,922,265
LEYDEN $0 $103,271
LINCOLN $1,535,658 $853,888
LITTLETON $5,511,890 $891,582
LONGMEADOW $8,220,391 $1,752,375
LOWELL $275,966,413 $31,592,675
LUDLOW $15,369,913 $3,831,650
LUNENBURG $9,485,250 $1,326,388
LYNN $327,335,160 $28,082,584
LYNNFIELD $6,850,530 $1,304,477
MALDEN $70,838,845 $15,736,139
MANCHESTER $0 $278,933
MANSFIELD $20,854,717 $2,797,785
MARBLEHEAD $7,390,439 $1,428,298
MARION $1,305,942 $283,011
MARLBOROUGH $52,707,503 $6,827,794
MARSHFIELD $16,701,173 $2,717,172
MASHPEE $5,435,000 $461,470
MATTAPOISETT $1,154,853 $508,356
MAYNARD $6,186,200 $1,970,519
MEDFIELD $7,630,178 $1,818,179
MEDFORD $19,272,206 $15,214,227
MEDWAY $11,703,987 $1,530,239
MELROSE $13,911,036 $6,432,519
MENDON $38,052 $512,569
MERRIMAC $36,094 $1,055,331
METHUEN $72,676,678 $6,819,713
MIDDLEBOROUGH $23,585,325 $3,092,406
MIDDLEFIELD $13,290 $66,678
MIDDLETON $2,046,759 $686,282
MILFORD $55,270,258 $3,831,064
MILLBURY $9,513,233 $2,221,066
MILLIS $5,441,676 $1,313,194
283

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
Unrestricted General
Municipality / District Chapter 70 Government Aid
MILLVILLE $73,662 $510,904
MILTON $13,473,284 $4,030,206
MONROE $170,066 $23,062
MONSON $7,992,519 $1,637,306
MONTAGUE $0 $1,797,569
MONTEREY $0 $57,992
MONTGOMERY $32,160 $108,850
MOUNT WASHINGTON $13,818 $37,598
NAHANT $663,225 $473,918
NANTUCKET $5,099,197 $99,380
NATICK $15,344,137 $4,779,593
NEEDHAM $15,595,834 $2,189,594
NEW ASHFORD $123,072 $25,476
NEW BEDFORD $271,241,737 $28,853,411
NEW BRAINTREE $0 $165,578
NEW MARLBOROUGH $0 $73,456
NEW SALEM $0 $130,139
NEWBURY $16,934 $649,579
NEWBURYPORT $6,510,535 $3,198,947
NEWTON $32,235,914 $7,371,008
NORFOLK $4,034,619 $1,202,838
NORTH ADAMS $16,898,002 $5,564,623
NORTH ANDOVER $13,775,969 $2,570,486
NORTH ATTLEBOROUGH $22,877,567 $3,608,565
NORTH BROOKFIELD $5,136,726 $999,445
NORTH READING $8,429,947 $2,227,068
NORTHAMPTON $9,019,229 $5,512,913
NORTHBOROUGH $4,904,088 $1,399,085
NORTHBRIDGE $16,692,113 $2,647,603
NORTHFIELD $0 $453,170
NORTON $14,044,622 $2,606,903
NORWELL $5,882,618 $1,344,582
NORWOOD $19,086,531 $5,834,186
OAK BLUFFS $2,115,129 $91,219
OAKHAM $0 $240,643
ORANGE $7,131,555 $2,027,042
ORLEANS $516,774 $215,448
OTIS $0 $45,622
OXFORD $12,686,783 $2,579,129
PALMER $12,360,019 $2,515,442
PAXTON $0 $678,731
PEABODY $39,044,161 $9,054,089
PELHAM $358,213 $199,656
284

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
Unrestricted General
Municipality / District Chapter 70 Government Aid
PEMBROKE $15,014,594 $2,108,428
PEPPERELL $0 $1,872,037
PERU $91,030 $143,245
PETERSHAM $727,308 $143,793
PHILLIPSTON $0 $231,367
PITTSFIELD $69,313,721 $10,829,431
PLAINFIELD $83,804 $62,927
PLAINVILLE $3,291,813 $951,566
PLYMOUTH $31,322,417 $4,914,812
PLYMPTON $1,239,805 $297,566
PRINCETON $0 $371,369
PROVINCETOWN $341,239 $173,494
QUINCY $49,152,393 $23,950,227
RANDOLPH $32,003,795 $6,519,584
RAYNHAM $0 $1,426,277
READING $12,931,313 $4,066,270
REHOBOTH $0 $1,307,477
REVERE $108,436,838 $12,902,531
RICHMOND $573,273 $135,701
ROCHESTER $2,609,552 $532,725
ROCKLAND $20,241,858 $3,315,808
ROCKPORT $1,809,026 $548,839
ROWE $163,075 $4,941
ROWLEY $18,508 $677,355
ROYALSTON $0 $225,498
RUSSELL $255,579 $309,781
RUTLAND $0 $1,160,291
SALEM $32,898,737 $8,652,439
SALISBURY $15,791 $792,514
SANDISFIELD $0 $43,464
SANDWICH $8,403,816 $1,413,722
SAUGUS $16,641,482 $4,601,650
SAVOY $537,259 $145,332
SCITUATE $7,665,955 $2,523,235
SEEKONK $8,599,658 $1,543,466
SHARON $11,913,046 $1,755,828
SHEFFIELD $17,905 $305,572
SHELBURNE $0 $328,014
SHERBORN $1,011,345 $271,688
SHIRLEY $0 $1,645,640
SHREWSBURY $23,420,930 $3,494,003
SHUTESBURY $688,342 $212,702
SOMERSET $11,280,197 $1,923,785
285

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
Unrestricted General
Municipality / District Chapter 70 Government Aid
SOMERVILLE $23,366,282 $31,603,148
SOUTH HADLEY $11,417,059 $3,275,848
SOUTHAMPTON $2,819,438 $799,216
SOUTHBOROUGH $3,671,623 $548,600
SOUTHBRIDGE $36,441,720 $4,412,663
SOUTHWICK $220,059 $1,582,172
SPENCER $34,709 $2,836,975
SPRINGFIELD $583,158,575 $47,483,466
STERLING $0 $869,577
STOCKBRIDGE $0 $125,028
STONEHAM $8,291,383 $4,661,571
STOUGHTON $31,998,924 $4,016,580
STOW $0 $528,020
STURBRIDGE $5,431,034 $971,758
SUDBURY $6,593,364 $1,755,791
SUNDERLAND $954,756 $633,969
SUTTON $6,197,181 $979,120
SWAMPSCOTT $6,109,390 $1,623,556
SWANSEA $11,637,498 $2,355,803
TAUNTON $109,617,416 $10,549,623
TEMPLETON $11,493 $1,749,068
TEWKSBURY $15,173,007 $3,490,999
TISBURY $1,794,439 $122,992
TOLLAND $0 $23,183
TOPSFIELD $1,720,627 $769,341
TOWNSEND $0 $1,648,440
TRURO $493,226 $37,736
TYNGSBOROUGH $8,308,620 $1,212,156
TYRINGHAM $72,676 $15,925
UPTON $39,979 $667,795
UXBRIDGE $10,361,060 $1,725,863
WAKEFIELD $9,949,023 $4,225,562
WALES $1,221,948 $296,261
WALPOLE $11,377,480 $3,196,700
WALTHAM $27,305,086 $12,044,758
WARE $14,934,620 $2,165,469
WAREHAM $17,155,112 $2,481,648
WARREN $12,223 $1,134,812
WARWICK $401,664 $159,521
WASHINGTON $37,233 $118,471
WATERTOWN $8,964,426 $8,366,423
WAYLAND $8,378,020 $1,133,793
WEBSTER $24,259,540 $3,105,567
286

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
Unrestricted General
Municipality / District Chapter 70 Government Aid
WELLESLEY $11,568,736 $1,624,852
WELLFLEET $342,443 $73,314
WENDELL $0 $218,594
WENHAM $0 $537,272
WEST BOYLSTON $3,503,475 $999,365
WEST BRIDGEWATER $7,286,583 $820,214
WEST BROOKFIELD $328,719 $610,922
WEST NEWBURY $13,151 $371,650
WEST SPRINGFIELD $47,772,002 $4,495,339
WEST STOCKBRIDGE $0 $121,956
WEST TISBURY $0 $232,977
WESTBOROUGH $13,452,856 $1,453,498
WESTFIELD $46,092,037 $7,896,120
WESTFORD $19,692,829 $2,665,600
WESTHAMPTON $527,648 $181,756
WESTMINSTER $0 $821,092
WESTON $5,291,459 $469,181
WESTPORT $6,077,452 $1,525,999
WESTWOOD $8,250,386 $915,076
WEYMOUTH $31,745,663 $10,936,933
WHATELY $367,983 $168,328
WHITMAN $174,351 $3,037,240
WILBRAHAM $0 $1,835,709
WILLIAMSBURG $892,871 $379,740
WILLIAMSTOWN $0 $1,197,529
WILMINGTON $13,051,370 $3,118,914
WINCHENDON $14,590,171 $2,110,162
WINCHESTER $12,084,323 $1,855,820
WINDSOR $28,984 $130,255
WINTHROP $10,768,036 $5,287,747
WOBURN $16,125,949 $7,509,151
WORCESTER $437,762,216 $52,124,429
WORTHINGTON $514,362 $157,551
WRENTHAM $4,317,997 $1,169,405
YARMOUTH $0 $1,583,651
TOTAL MUNICIPAL AID $6,695,466,289 $1,333,109,519
287

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
Unrestricted General
Regional School District Chapter 70 Government Aid
ACTON BOXBOROUGH $17,981,291 $0
AMHERST PELHAM $10,276,651 $0
ASHBURNHAM WESTMINSTER $16,612,077 $0
ASSABET VALLEY $11,659,434 $0
ATHOL ROYALSTON $26,295,109 $0
AYER SHIRLEY $9,264,373 $0
BERKSHIRE HILLS $3,675,288 $0
BERLIN BOYLSTON $3,320,001 $0
BLACKSTONE MILLVILLE $12,330,088 $0
BLACKSTONE VALLEY $9,795,822 $0
BLUE HILLS $7,947,314 $0
BRIDGEWATER RAYNHAM $35,105,190 $0
BRISTOL COUNTY $5,343,254 $0
BRISTOL PLYMOUTH $14,884,729 $0
CAPE COD $3,692,990 $0
CENTRAL BERKSHIRE $10,311,337 $0
CHESTERFIELD GOSHEN $814,702 $0
CONCORD CARLISLE $3,799,593 $0
DENNIS YARMOUTH $14,475,005 $0
DIGHTON REHOBOTH $14,411,508 $0
DOVER SHERBORN $3,121,252 $0
DUDLEY CHARLTON $26,343,197 $0
ESSEX NORTH SHORE $9,368,948 $0
FARMINGTON RIVER $799,554 $0
FRANKLIN COUNTY $6,291,558 $0
FREETOWN LAKEVILLE $12,750,459 $0
FRONTIER $3,128,227 $0
GATEWAY $6,461,790 $0
GILL MONTAGUE $8,209,343 $0
GREATER FALL RIVER $25,119,750 $0
GREATER LAWRENCE $42,612,739 $0
GREATER LOWELL $38,740,488 $0
GREATER NEW BEDFORD $39,925,494 $0
GROTON DUNSTABLE $12,183,943 $0
HAMILTON WENHAM $4,778,969 $0
HAMPDEN WILBRAHAM $13,479,210 $0
HAMPSHIRE $3,603,057 $0
HAWLEMONT $682,610 $0
HOOSAC VALLEY $12,635,071 $0
KING PHILIP $8,675,978 $0
LINCOLN SUDBURY $4,450,937 $0
MANCHESTER ESSEX $3,684,266 $0
MARTHAS VINEYARD $3,869,228 $0
288

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
Unrestricted General
Regional School District Chapter 70 Government Aid
MASCONOMET $6,085,593 $0
MENDON UPTON $13,557,074 $0
MINUTEMAN $3,241,069 $0
MOHAWK TRAIL $6,489,734 $0
MONOMOY $4,866,955 $0
MONTACHUSETT $18,997,205 $0
MOUNT GREYLOCK $5,302,346 $0
NARRAGANSETT $13,247,157 $0
NASHOBA $11,025,818 $0
NASHOBA VALLEY $5,124,864 $0
NAUSET $4,176,089 $0
NEW SALEM WENDELL $953,720 $0
NORFOLK COUNTY $1,574,815 $0
NORTH MIDDLESEX $22,082,919 $0
NORTHAMPTON SMITH $983,931 $0
NORTHBORO SOUTHBORO $3,871,056 $0
NORTHEAST METROPOLITAN $16,719,585 $0
NORTHERN BERKSHIRE $7,181,352 $0
OLD COLONY $4,401,625 $0
OLD ROCHESTER $3,861,601 $0
PATHFINDER $7,988,454 $0
PENTUCKET $14,470,950 $0
PIONEER $4,235,099 $0
QUABBIN $17,724,542 $0
QUABOAG $10,763,375 $0
RALPH C MAHAR $7,293,658 $0
SHAWSHEEN VALLEY $7,202,253 $0
SILVER LAKE $11,068,178 $0
SOMERSET BERKLEY $7,346,821 $0
SOUTH MIDDLESEX $10,058,369 $0
SOUTH SHORE $6,073,177 $0
SOUTHEASTERN $26,183,132 $0
SOUTHERN BERKSHIRE $2,340,395 $0
SOUTHERN WORCESTER $14,902,363 $0
SOUTHWICK TOLLAND GRANVILLE $10,358,346 $0
SPENCER EAST BROOKFIELD $14,547,460 $0
TANTASQUA $11,921,949 $0
TRI COUNTY $6,259,646 $0
TRITON $9,977,405 $0
UPISLAND $1,126,972 $0
UPPER CAPE COD $4,862,780 $0
WACHUSETT $38,607,953 $0
WHITMAN HANSON $26,731,986 $0
289

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
Unrestricted General
Regional School District Chapter 70 Government Aid
WHITTIER $14,231,622 $0
TOTAL REGIONAL AID $962,933,217 $0
TOTAL MUNICIPAL AND REGIONAL AID $7,658,399,506 $1,333,109,519
1 SECTION 3A. Section 2 of chapter 6C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
2 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 13, the figure “11” and inserting in
3 place thereof the following figure:- 13.
4 SECTION 3B. Said section 2 of said chapter 6C, as so appearing, is hereby further
5 amended by striking out, in line 38, the figure “6” and inserting in place thereof the following
6 figure:- 7.
7 SECTION 4. Section 25 of chapter 10 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
8 amended by inserting after the word “appropriation”, in line 13, the following words:- ; provided,
9 however, that the commission may enter into contracts or group agreements for lottery games not
10 currently or previously authorized by the commission, resulting in a contractor or licensor to be
11 paid a specified percentage of net or gross revenues of such game, and such payments shall not be
12 subject to appropriation.
13 SECTION 5. Section 10 of chapter 12A of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
14 amended by striking out, in lines 7 and 8, the words “When authorized by a majority vote of the
15 inspector general council, the inspector general shall” and inserting in place thereof the following
16 words:- The inspector general may.
17 SECTION 6. Said section 10 of said chapter 12A, as so appearing, is hereby further
18 amended by inserting after the word “Any”, in line 11, the following words:- reports or.
19 SECTION 6A. Chapter 12C of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out
20 section 21 and inserting in place thereof the following section:-
21 Section 21. (a) The center shall establish a continuing program of investigation and study
22 of the uninsured and underinsured in the commonwealth, including the health insurance needs of
23 the residents of the geographically isolated or rural areas of the commonwealth. Said continuing
24 investigation and study shall examine the overall impact of programs developed by the center
25 and the division of medical assistance on the uninsured, the underinsured and the role of
26 employers in assisting their employees in affording health insurance.
27 (b)(1) For the purposes of this subsection, “public health access program beneficiary”
28 shall mean a person who is an enrollee in a: (i) MassHealth program established in section 9A of
29 chapter 118E; or (ii) subsidized health care plan through the commonwealth health insurance
30 connector authority established in section 2 of chapter 176Q.
290

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
31 (2) Annually, not later than December 1, the center shall submit a public health access
32 program beneficiary employer report to the clerks of the house of representatives and the senate,
33 the house and senate committees on ways and means and the joint committee on health care
34 financing. The center may consult with other relevant agencies and departments to prepare the
35 report. The report shall include data for the preceding fiscal year.
36 (3) The center shall utilize all available data, including, but not limited to, self-reported
37 data provided by individuals who apply for public health assistance, if applicable.
38 (4) The report shall include the following information about each employer of 50 or more
39 public health access program beneficiaries in the commonwealth: (i) the name and address of the
40 employer; (ii) the number of each type of public health access program beneficiaries who are
41 employees of the employer; (iii) the number of public health access program beneficiaries who
42 are spouses or dependents of employees of the employer; (iv) whether the employer offers any
43 employee health benefits; (v) the estimated cost to the commonwealth of providing public health
44 access program benefits; and (vi) an analysis aggregating public health access program
45 beneficiaries attributable to any single franchisor licensing 10 or more franchises in the
46 commonwealth.
47 (5) The report shall not include the names of, or other identifying information about, any
48 individual public health access program beneficiaries, and the report shall be subject to any
49 applicable federal and state laws.
50 SECTION 7. Section 17 of chapter 23N of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
51 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 7, the figure “17.5” and inserting in
52 place thereof the following figure:- 10.
53 SECTION 8. Said section 17 of said chapter 23N, as so appearing, is hereby further
54 amended by striking out, in lines 11 to 14, inclusive, clauses (4) and (5) and inserting in place
55 thereof the following 3 clauses:-
(4) 1 per cent to the Youth Development and Achievement Fund established in
section 19;
56 (5) 9 per cent to the Public Health Trust Fund established in section 58 of chapter 23K;
57 and
58 (6) 7.5 per cent to the Sports and Entertainment Events Fund established in section 13W
59 of chapter 23A.
60 SECTION 9. Section 18 of said chapter 23N, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
61 striking out, in line 5, the figure “16” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- 17.
62 SECTION 10. Said section 18 of said chapter 23N, as so appearing, is hereby further
63 amended by striking out subsection (b) and inserting in place thereof the following subsection:-
291

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
64 (b) The fund shall be administered by the secretary of economic development, in
65 consultation with the secretary of labor and workforce development. Money in the fund shall be
66 expended for the following purposes to support:
67 (i) existing workforce development programs administered by state agencies or quasi-
68 public agencies that develop and strengthen workforce opportunities for low-income
69 communities, unemployed or underemployed individuals or vulnerable youth and young adults
70 in the commonwealth;
71 (ii) internships, apprenticeships or other work-based learning programs or programs that
72 provide vocational or professional training to address workforce skills gaps or workforce
73 readiness in priority economic sectors; or
74 (iii) eligible recipients of competitive grants pursuant to subsection (c).
75 SECTION 11. Said section 18 of said chapter 23N, as so appearing, is hereby further
76 amended by striking out, in line 25, the word “and” and inserting in place thereof the following
77 word:- or.
78 SECTION 11. Said section 18 of said chapter 23N, as so appearing, is hereby further
79 amended by inserting after the word “permits”, in line 31, the following word:- , apprenticeships.
80 SECTION 13. Said section 18 of said chapter 23N, as so appearing, is hereby further
81 amended by striking out, in line 50, the words “housing and”.
82 SECTION 14. Section 5G of chapter 29 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
83 amended by striking out, in lines 16 to 18, inclusive, the words “the average annual rate of growth
84 in United States gross domestic product over the preceding 5 years based on the most recently
85 available ” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- 95 per cent of the average of final
86 certified capital gains tax revenues for the prior 10 fiscal years, including the most recently ended
87 fiscal year, adjusted for inflation based on the most recently available national gross domestic
88 product price index.
89 SECTION 15. Said chapter 29 is hereby further amended by inserting after section 5I the
90 following section:-
91 Section 5J. The executive office for administration and finance, in consultation with the
92 department of revenue, shall annually conduct a multi-year budget forecast and evaluate the
93 potential prospective stress impacts of economic scenarios, to be determined by the secretary of
94 administration and finance, for at least the next 3 fiscal years, including, but not limited to: (i)
95 notable causes of potential deficiencies and key risk factors impacting the state budget; (ii)
96 potential effects of economic changes on tax revenue collections and spending pressures; and (iii)
97 the sufficiency of the Commonwealth Stabilization Fund established pursuant to section 2H and
98 other reserve balances, as identified by the secretary, in offsetting potential revenue declines and
292

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
99 spending pressures. Annually, not later than October 31, the executive office shall submit a report
100 to the house and senate committees on ways and means with the results of the multi-year budget
101 forecast and stress impact evaluation.
102 SECTION 16. Section 1 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, as most recently amended
103 by section 21 of chapter 73 of the acts of 2025, is hereby further amended by inserting after the
104 definition of “Constitutional officers” the following definition:-
105 “Cost of Living Reserve Fund”, a fund established in subdivision (6B) of section 22 to
106 provide for the reservation of money for future cost of living liabilities and benefit payments of
107 the retirement system; provided, that there shall be 1 fund for the state employees’ and teachers’
108 retirement systems and 1 fund each for any retirement system that opts in pursuant to said
109 subdivision (6B) of said section 22.
110 SECTION 17. Said section 1 of said chapter 32, as so amended, is hereby further
111 amended by inserting after the definition of “Employer” the following definition:-
112 “Excess investment income”, the amount in any calendar year where all realized gains
113 from invested funds of a retirement system results in earnings in excess of the investment return
114 assumption set in the system’s most recent actuarial valuation. Such amount, in excess of said
115 investment return assumption, shall be based on the market rate of return during a calendar year
116 on the balance of total assets of the system at the close of business on December 31 of the prior
117 calendar year, less the amount required to be derived by the investment return assumption set in
118 said valuation. Not later than 90 days after the end of said calendar year, the relevant actuary of a
119 system shall certify the total excess investment income of the system.
120 SECTION 17A. The definition of “Teacher” in said section 1 of said chapter 32, as so
121 amended, is hereby amended by adding the following sentence:- Any person who served in a
122 position described above who is vested in the teachers’ retirement system or the Boston
123 retirement system and is subsequently employed by the executive office of education or the
124 department of elementary and secondary education shall retain the status of teacher and be
125 considered as remaining in service in that capacity.
126 SECTION 17B. Paragraph (a) of subdivision (8) of section 3 of said chapter 32, as
127 appearing in the 2024 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following sentence:- A
128 teacher who becomes employed at the executive office of education or the department of
129 elementary and secondary education shall remain in the teachers’ retirement system or the
130 Boston retirement system.
131 SECTION 17C. Said subdivision (8) of said section 3 of said chapter 32, as so
132 appearing, is hereby further amended by adding the following 2 paragraphs:-
133 (e) An employee of the executive office of education or the department of elementary and
134 secondary education who is a member of the state employees’ retirement system and who is
135 reinstated in the teachers’ retirement system or the Boston retirement system pursuant to
293

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
136 paragraph (a) shall not be deemed to have had an interruption of membership or service. Upon
137 reinstatement, the member shall pay into the annuity savings fund of the teachers’ retirement
138 system or the Boston retirement system in 1 sum, or in installments as the board may prescribe,
139 makeup payments equal to the difference between the contributions paid to the state employees’
140 retirement system and the required contributions of the teachers’ retirement system or the Boston
141 retirement system on all regular compensation received during the period of membership in the
142 state employees’ retirement system.
143 (f) Notwithstanding the provisions of this chapter or any other general or special law to
144 the contrary, a member who is reinstated in the teachers’ retirement system or the Boston
145 retirement system pursuant to paragraph (a) shall be entered into the state employees’ retirement
146 system as a Group 1 state employee upon retirement.
147 SECTION 18. Section 22 of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
148 striking out, in line 6, the word “seven”.
149 SECTION 19. Said section 22 of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby further
150 amended by striking out, in lines 9 and 10, the words “and the Commonwealth’s Pension
151 Liability Fund” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- the Commonwealth’s
152 Pension Liability Fund and the Cost of Living Reserve Fund.
153 SECTION 20. Paragraph (a) of subdivision (6) of said section 22 of said chapter 32, as
154 so appearing, is hereby amended by adding the following clause:-
155 (vi) In any calendar year prior to making the transfers required by clause (iii), an amount
156 equal to 10 per cent of the excess investment income shall be transferred to the Cost of Living
157 Reserve Fund for the state employees’ and teachers’ retirement systems. For a system other than
158 the state employees’ and teachers’ retirement systems that has accepted subdivision (6B), an
159 amount equal to 10 per cent of the excess investment income shall be transferred to said system’s
160 Cost of Living Reserve Fund.
161 SECTION 21. Said section 22 of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby further
162 amended by inserting after subdivision (6A) the following subdivision:-
163 (6B) Cost of Living Reserve Fund. – (a) There shall be: (i) a Cost of Living Reserve Fund
164 for the state employees’ and teachers’ retirement system; and (ii) a Cost of Living Reserve Fund
165 for each retirement system other than the state employees’ and teachers’ retirement systems that
166 accepts this section pursuant to paragraph (b). The Cost of Living Reserve Funds shall be
167 credited all amounts set aside by a system for the purpose of establishing a reserve to meet future
168 cost of living liabilities and benefit payments as contained in sections 102 and 103, including
169 such amounts as may be set aside pursuant to a funding schedule established in accordance with
170 section 22C or 22D. Such amounts shall include without limitation the amount determined to be
171 excess investment income as provided for in clause (vi) of paragraph (a) of subdivision (6).
294

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
172 (b) For the purposes of this subdivision, “legislative body” shall mean: (i) in the case of a
173 city, the city council in accordance with its charter; (ii) in the case of a town, the town meeting;
174 (iii) in the case of a district, the district members; and (iv) in the case of an authority, the
175 governing body. In the case of a city, town, district or authority retirement system, this
176 subdivision shall take effect upon its acceptance by a majority vote of the board of such system,
177 subject to the approval of the legislative body. In the case of a county or regional retirement
178 system, this subdivision shall take effect upon its acceptance by the county or regional retirement
179 board advisory council at a meeting called for that purpose by the county or regional retirement
180 board. Acceptance of this subdivision shall be deemed to have occurred upon the filing of the
181 certification of such vote with the commission. A decision to accept this subdivision shall not be
182 revoked.
183 (c) This subdivision shall take effect automatically for the state employees’ and teachers’
184 retirement systems.
185 SECTION 22. Subdivision (1) of section 22C of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is
186 hereby amended by striking out the third paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following
187 paragraph:-
188 Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, appropriations or
189 transfers made to the Commonwealth’s Pension Liability Fund in fiscal years 2027 to 2029,
190 inclusive, shall be made in accordance with the following funding schedule: (i) $5,130,518,640
191 in fiscal year 2027; (ii) $5,335,739,386 in fiscal year 2028; and (iii) $5,549,168,961 in fiscal year
192 2029. Notwithstanding any provision of this subdivision to the contrary, any adjustments to these
193 amounts shall be limited to increases in the schedule amounts for each of the specified years.
194 SECTION 22. Said chapter 32 is hereby further amended by inserting after section 65J
195 the following section:-
196 Section 65K. Notwithstanding sections 65A to 65J, inclusive, or any other general or
197 special law, rule or regulation to the contrary, a judge or justice who is eligible for retirement
198 benefits pursuant to sections 65A to 65J, inclusive, shall be provided written notice by the
199 retirement board upon entry into service that if they qualify as a veteran who served in the armed
200 forces of the United States, they shall be entitled to credit for active service in the armed services
201 of the United States for purposes of calculating the minimum number of years a judge or justice
202 must serve before eligibility for receipt of a pension, which credited service shall be considered
203 to have run continuously with judicial service for purposes of sections 65A to 65J, inclusive;
204 provided, however, that such active service shall not be credited until such member, prior to or
205 within 1 year of vesting pursuant to this chapter, has paid into the annuity savings fund of such
206 system, in 1 sum or in installments, upon such terms and conditions as the board may prescribe,
207 makeup payments, for each year of creditable service sought, of an amount equal to 10 per cent
208 of the regular annual compensation of the member when said member entered the retirement
295

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
209 system; provided further, that such creditable service shall not be construed to include service for
210 more than 4 years; and provided further, that such creditable service shall not be allowed for any
211 period of active service for which said veteran has received credit in any retirement system
212 governed by this chapter, including, but not limited to, non-judicial membership in the state
213 employees’ retirement system. This section shall apply to national guard and active reserve
214 personnel, both former and present. Creditable service time, both enlisted and commissioned,
215 may be applied toward retirement on a ratio of 5 years of national guard service or 5 years of
216 active reserve service substitutable for each year of active service. National guard and active
217 reserve personnel shall not be precluded from making said purchase if they qualify as a veteran
218 after vesting or if they reach the maximum of 4 years of eligible service purchase after vesting
219 and qualifying as a veteran; provided, however, that they enter into a purchase agreement within
220 5 years of the last occurring event.
221 SECTION 24. Section 102 of said chapter 32, as appearing in the 2024 Official Edition,
222 is hereby amended by inserting after the word “years”, in line 48, the following words:- and any
223 additional benefit paid in accordance with paragraph (h).
224 SECTION 25. Said section 102 of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby further
225 amended by adding the following 2 paragraphs:-
226 (h)(1) Every member of the state employees’ retirement system and the teachers’
227 retirement system who has attained at least 10 full years of retirement as of June 30 of the prior
228 fiscal year and receives a cost of living increase shall receive annually an additional $100 benefit
229 to said increase. Said $100 benefit shall be granted only to members of the state employees’
230 retirement system and the teachers’ retirement system who retired before July 1, 2020 with 20 or
231 more years of creditable service and whose total annual retirement benefit is less than 80 per cent
232 of the average annual salary as determined by the retirement system’s most recent actuarial
233 valuation; provided, however, that those members who retired with a disability benefit under
234 section 6, 7 or 26 shall be eligible with less than 20 years of creditable service. Any surviving
235 beneficiary of a deceased member who would otherwise be eligible for the aforesaid additional
236 benefit under this paragraph, including those beneficiaries receiving a benefit under section 9, 12
237 or 101, shall receive said additional benefit if it is determined that they are eligible by the
238 retirement board in which they are a participant.
239 (2) Every member of the state employees’ retirement system and the teachers’ retirement
240 system who has attained at least 15 full years of retirement as of June 30 of the prior fiscal year
241 and receives a cost of living increase shall receive annually an additional $200 benefit to said
242 increase. Said $200 benefit shall be granted only to members of the state employees’ retirement
243 system and the teachers’ retirement system who retired before July 1, 2020 with 20 or more
244 years of creditable service and whose total annual retirement benefit is less than 80 per cent of
245 the average annual salary as determined by the retirement system’s most recent actuarial
246 valuation; provided, however, that those members who retired with a disability benefit under
296

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
247 section 6, 7 or 26 shall be eligible with less than 20 years of creditable service. Any surviving
248 beneficiary of a deceased member who would otherwise be eligible for the aforesaid additional
249 benefit under this paragraph, including those beneficiaries receiving a benefit under section 9, 12
250 or 101, shall receive said additional benefit if it is determined that they are eligible by the
251 retirement board in which they are a participant.
252 (3) Every member of the state employees’ retirement system and the teachers’ retirement
253 system who has attained at least 20 full years of retirement as of June 30 of the prior fiscal year
254 and receives a cost of living increase shall receive annually an additional $300 benefit to said
255 increase. Said $300 benefit shall be granted only to members of the state employees’ retirement
256 system and the teachers’ retirement system who retired before July 1, 2020 with 20 or more
257 years of creditable service and whose total annual retirement benefit is less than 80 per cent of
258 the average annual salary as determined by the retirement system’s most recent actuarial
259 valuation; provided, however, that those members who retired with a disability benefit under
260 section 6, 7 or 26 shall be eligible with less than 20 years of creditable service. Any surviving
261 beneficiary of a deceased member who would otherwise be eligible for the aforesaid additional
262 benefit under this paragraph, including those beneficiaries receiving a benefit under section 9, 12
263 or 101, shall receive said additional benefit if it is determined that they are eligible by the
264 retirement board in which they are a participant.
265 (i) In any calendar year, if the actuary determines that there is excess investment income
266 where all realized gains from invested funds of the retirement systems results in earnings in
267 excess of the investment return assumption set in the retirement system’s most recent actuarial
268 valuation and if it is further determined that 10 per cent of such amount when added to the Cost
269 of Living Reserve Fund existing balance is in excess of the amount necessary to fund the total
270 liabilities of a $1,000 base increase, then the base used to determine the cost of living increase
271 shall be increased for the retirement systems by an amount of not less than $1,000 in the next
272 fiscal year following the determination of excess earnings; provided, however, that the amounts
273 credited to the Cost of Living Reserve Fund under subdivision (6B) of section 22 shall be in
274 excess of the amounts necessary to meet future cost of living liabilities and benefit payments
275 attributable to said increase and in excess of the amount necessary to fund the total liabilities of
276 the additional benefit under paragraph (h).
277 SECTION 26. Section 103 of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
278 inserting after the word “applied”, in line 51, the following words:- , including any additional
279 benefit paid in accordance with paragraphs (k), (l) and (m).
280 SECTION 27. Said section 103 of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby further
281 amended by adding the following 4 paragraphs:-
282 (k) Upon acceptance of this paragraph as provided in paragraph (n), every member of a
283 retirement system other than the state employees’ retirement system and the teachers’ retirement
297

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
284 system, who has attained at least 10 full years of retirement as of June 30 of the prior fiscal year
285 and receives a cost of living increase pursuant to this section, shall receive annually an additional
286 $100 benefit to said increase. Said $100 benefit shall be granted only to members of a retirement
287 system, other than the state employees’ retirement system and the teachers’ retirement system,
288 who retired before July 1, 2020 with 20 or more years of creditable service and whose total
289 annual retirement benefit is less than 80 per cent of the average annual salary as determined by
290 their retirement system’s most recent actuarial valuation; provided, however, that those members
291 who retired with a disability benefit under section 6, 7 or 26 shall be eligible with less than 20
292 years of creditable service. Any surviving beneficiary of a deceased member who would
293 otherwise be eligible for the aforesaid additional benefit under this paragraph, including those
294 beneficiaries receiving a benefit under section 9, 12 or 101, shall receive said additional benefit
295 if it is determined that they are eligible by the retirement board in which they are a participant.
296 (l) Upon acceptance of this paragraph as provided in paragraph (n), every member of a
297 retirement system other than the state employees’ retirement system and the teachers’ retirement
298 system, who has attained at least 15 full years of retirement as of June 30 of the prior fiscal year
299 and receives a cost of living increase pursuant to this section, shall receive annually an additional
300 $200 benefit to said increase. Said $200 benefit shall be granted only to members of a retirement
301 system, other than the state employees’ retirement system and the teachers’ retirement system,
302 who retired before July 1, 2020 with 20 or more years of creditable service and whose total
303 annual retirement benefit is less than 80 per cent of the average annual salary as determined by
304 their retirement system’s most recent actuarial valuation; provided, however, that those members
305 who retired with a disability benefit under section 6, 7 or 26 shall be eligible with less than 20
306 years of creditable service. Any surviving beneficiary of a deceased member who would
307 otherwise be eligible for the aforesaid additional benefit under this paragraph, including those
308 beneficiaries receiving a benefit under section 9, 12 or 101, shall receive said additional benefit
309 if it is determined that they are eligible by the retirement board in which they are a participant.
310 (m) Upon acceptance of this paragraph as provided in paragraph (n), every member of a
311 retirement system other than the state employees’ retirement system and the teachers’ retirement
312 system, who has attained at least 20 full years of retirement as of June 30 of the prior fiscal year
313 and receives a cost of living increase pursuant to this section, shall receive annually an additional
314 $300 benefit to said increase. Said $300 benefit shall be granted only to members of a retirement
315 system, other than the state employees’ retirement system and the teachers’ retirement system,
316 who retired before July 1, 2020 with 20 or more years of creditable service and whose total
317 annual retirement benefit is less than 80 per cent of the average annual salary as determined by
318 their retirement system’s most recent actuarial valuation; provided, however, that those members
319 who retired with a disability benefit under section 6, 7 or 26 shall be eligible with less than 20
320 years of creditable service. Any surviving beneficiary of a deceased member who would
321 otherwise be eligible for the aforesaid additional benefit under this paragraph, including those
298

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
322 beneficiaries receiving a benefit under section 9, 12 or 101, shall receive said additional benefit
323 if it is determined that they are eligible by the retirement board in which they are a participant.
324 (n) For the purpose of this paragraph, “legislative body” shall mean: (i) in the case of a
325 city, the city council in accordance with its charter; (ii) in the case of a town, the town meeting;
326 (iii) in the case of a district, the district members; and (iv) in the case of an authority, the
327 governing body. In the case of city, town, district or authority system, acceptance of paragraphs
328 (k), (l) or (m) shall be by a majority vote of the board of such system, subject to the approval of
329 the legislative body. In the case of a county or regional system, acceptance of paragraphs (k), (l)
330 or (m) shall be by the county or regional retirement board advisory council at a meeting called
331 for that purpose by the county or regional retirement board. Acceptance of this paragraph shall
332 be deemed to have occurred upon the filing of the certification of such vote with the commission.
333 A decision to accept this paragraph shall not be revoked.
334 SECTION 28. Chapter 32A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
335 section 17Z the following section:-
336 Section 17AA. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context
337 clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
338 “Cost sharing”, a deductible, coinsurance, copayments and any maximum limitation on
339 the application of such a deductible, coinsurance, copayment or similar out-of-pocket expense.
340 “Health care provider”, as defined in section 1 of chapter 111.
341 “HIV”, human immunodeficiency virus.
342 “HIV prevention drug”, any pre-exposure prophylaxis drug approved for the prevention
343 of HIV by the federal Food and Drug Administration, including any ancillary or support health
344 service determined by the secretary of health and human services to be necessary to: (i) ensure
345 that a drug is prescribed or administered to a person who is not infected with HIV and has no
346 medical contraindications to the use of a drug; and (ii) monitor a person to ensure the safe and
347 effective ongoing use of a drug through: (A) office visits; (B) laboratory testing; (C) testing for a
348 sexually transmitted infection; (D) medication self-management and adherence counseling; or
349 (E) any other health service specified as part of comprehensive HIV prevention drug services by
350 the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services, the federal Centers for Disease Control and
351 Prevention, the United States Preventive Services Task Force or an equivalent state-authorized
352 body with responsibility to identify health services that are components of comprehensive HIV
353 prevention drug services.
354 (b) The commission shall provide any active or retired employee of the commonwealth,
355 insured under the commission, coverage for an HIV prevention drug. There shall be no: (i)
299

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
356 patient cost sharing; or (ii) prior authorization, step therapy or any other protocol that could
357 restrict or delay the dispensing of any HIV prevention drug.
358 (c) The commission shall not refuse, reject or deny a prescription for any covered HIV
359 prevention drug on the basis of the type of health care provider issuing the prescription for an
360 HIV prevention drug or the venue or practice setting of the health care provider issuing the
361 prescription; provided, that the health care provider shall be licensed to prescribe medications.
362 SECTION 29. Section 97B1/2 of chapter 41 of the General Laws, as appearing in the
363 2024 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “cases”, in line 20, the
364 following words:- ; provided, however, that all kits shall be retained for not less than 15 years.
365 SECTION 30. Said section 97B1/2 of said chapter 41, as so appearing, is hereby further
366 amended by inserting after the word “enforcement”, in line 26, the following words:- ,
367 notwithstanding the statute of limitations of the underlying offense.
368 SECTION 30A. Section 1B of chapter 69 of the General Laws, as amended by section
369 25 of chapter 14 of the acts 2025, is hereby further amended by adding the following paragraph:-
370 The board shall establish a school meal nutrition standards advisory council to advise the
371 commissioner on nutrition standards for meals served in schools, including, but not limited to,
372 the implementation of the recommendations of the school meal nutrition standards commission
373 established in section 77 of chapter 28 of the acts of 2023. The council shall: (i) provide ongoing
374 guidance in the development of comprehensive strengthened nutrition standards aligned with the
375 most current public health guidance and evidence-based nutrition standards; (ii) provide ongoing
376 feasibility assessments; and (iii) work with school food authorities and stakeholders to reduce
377 barriers to feasibility of implementation on issues, including, but not limited to, procurement,
378 facilities and workforce training. The members of the council shall serve without compensation
379 but may be reimbursed, subject to appropriation, for expenses necessarily and reasonably
380 incurred in the performance of the member’s responsibilities. The council shall consist of the
381 following 11 members: 6 members appointed by the governor who shall be school nutrition
382 operators or registered dieticians representing geographically, racially and socio-economically
383 diverse school districts; a representative from Project Bread – The Walk for Hunger, Inc.; a
384 representative from the School Nutrition Association of Massachusetts, Inc.; a representative
385 from the Massachusetts Healthy School Lunch Coalition; a representative from Massachusetts
386 Farm to School Project, LLC; and a representative from the Massachusetts Food System
387 Collaborative. Members shall serve for a term of 3 years. Members serving on the council shall
388 represent a reasonable statewide geographic balance. The council shall meet not less than 4 times
389 each year. The council shall elect a chair to serve for a term of 3 years who may appoint other
390 officers as necessary.
391 SECTION 30B. Section 89 of chapter 71 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
392 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out subsection (mm) and inserting in place
393 thereof the following 2 subsections:-
300

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
394 (mm) Each Horace Mann charter school’s enrollment and accountability data shall be
395 included in the enrollment and accountability data, as a whole, for the district in which the school
396 is located.
397 (nn) The board shall promulgate regulations for implementation and enforcement of this
398 section.
399 SECTION 31. Section 5A of chapter 71B of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
400 hereby amended by inserting after the definition of “Approved costs threshold” the following
401 definition:-
402 “Detailed cost components”, a breakdown of costs on either a per-trip or per-invoice
403 basis that shall include, but shall not be limited to: (i) labor; (ii) capital or fleet and vehicle
404 acquisition; (iii) fuel and vehicle maintenance; (iv) insurance; (v) overhead; (vi) profit; and (vii)
405 other costs that make up the total amount being charged to the school districts.
406 SECTION 32. Said section 5A of said chapter 71B, as so appearing, is hereby further
407 amended by inserting after subsection (b) the following subsection:-
408 (b½)(1) Each school district providing required out-of-district transportation pursuant to
409 subsection (b) shall include, in each district’s solicitation documents, a breakdown of detailed
410 cost components.
411 (2) Each vendor shall include detailed cost components in their submissions to each
412 school district for bids or quotes in the competitive procurement process. The detailed cost
413 components shall be included in: (i) the contract between the school district and the vendor; and
414 (ii) all future invoices.
415 (3) Annually, each school district shall submit the detailed cost components to the
416 department in its annual report. The department shall analyze the detailed cost components and
417 report to the chairs of the joint committee on education cost trends for out-of-district
418 transportation.
419 SECTION 33. Said chapter 71B is hereby further amended by inserting after section 5A
420 the following section:-
421 Section 5A 1/2. (a)(1) The department shall establish and maintain an electronic
422 centralized database of procurement and contract documents for all out-of-district transportation
423 pursuant to subsection (b) of section 5A and a list of licensed special education out-of-district
424 school transportation providers under contract with districts pursuant to section 5A. The database
425 shall be searchable and accessible to all districts. The database shall include, but shall not be
426 limited to: (i) copies of each procurement document and signed contract provided pursuant to
427 paragraph (2); and (ii) transportation vendor information, including, but not limited to,
301

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
428 compliance history, the areas where service is provided, ownership structure and contract history
429 with any district.
430 (2) Each district shall submit a copy of each procurement document and signed contract
431 to the department not later than 30 days after the contract is signed. Not later than 30 days after
432 receipt, the department shall add each document to the database established in paragraph (1).
433 (b)(1) The department shall establish and annually update guidelines for districts on best
434 practices for school transportation procurement, including, but not limited to, out-of-district
435 transportation. The guidelines shall include, but shall not be limited to: (i) information on laws
436 and regulations impacting transportation requirements; (ii) best practices for managing costs; (iii)
437 transportation planning and operations; and (iv) managing reimbursement requests. In
438 establishing and updating the guidelines, the department shall consult with the districts with the
439 highest utilization rates and highest costs of out-of-district transportation.
440 (2) The guidelines established in paragraph (1) shall be available to all districts on the
441 department’s website; provided, however, that the department shall annually identify and provide
442 the guidelines and additional assistance, as determined by the department, to: (i) the 20 districts
443 with the highest out-of-district transportation costs; and (ii) any district where transportation is
444 contributing to underperformance and inequity.
445 SECTION 34. Chapter 111 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
446 section 110E the following section:-
447 Section 110F. (a) Not later than 30 days after a family’s entry into a temporary
448 emergency assistance shelter pursuant to section 30 of chapter 23B, domestic violence shelter,
449 substance use disorder and recovery shelter or non-emergency assistance shelter, any child under
450 the age of 3 years old shall be referred to a certified early intervention professional for an early
451 intervention evaluation and assessment, pursuant to the department’s early intervention
452 operational standards. The referral shall be made by shelter staff, case managers, medical
453 providers or others. If applicable, early intervention services shall be rendered once an evaluation
454 and determination of need have been established by a certified early intervention professional.
455 (b) The department, in consultation with the executive office of housing and livable
456 communities, shall promulgate regulations pursuant to chapter 30A to implement this section.
457 SECTION 35. Said chapter 111 is hereby further amended by adding the following 2
458 sections:-
459 Section 250. (a) There shall be a commission on acupuncture and wellness within the
460 department. The commission shall consist of: the commissioner or a designee, who shall serve as
461 chair; the commissioner of insurance or a designee; the director of MassHealth or a designee; the
462 executive director of the board of registration in medicine or a designee; the chairs of the joint
302

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
463 committee on public health or their designees; a member representing a statewide organization of
464 licensed acupuncturists; a member representing a statewide organization of medical
465 acupuncturists; a member representing the Massachusetts Public Health Association; and 5
466 members to be appointed by the governor, at least 2 of whom shall be acupuncturists licensed
467 and practicing in the commonwealth, 1 of whom shall represent 1 of the top 5 health insurance
468 companies in the commonwealth according to market share, 1 of whom shall represent a health
469 care consumer organization and 1 of whom shall be a licensed physician currently practicing in
470 the commonwealth.
471 (b) The commission on acupuncture and wellness shall investigate and comprehensively
472 study the potential for greater integrated use of acupuncture services in health care services, to
473 expand access, reduce health care costs and provide improved quality of care to residents of the
474 commonwealth.
475 (c) The commission shall consider strategies:
476 (i) to evaluate and implement effective integration of acupuncture services in health care
477 delivery in the commonwealth with a specific focus on interventions in pain management,
478 substance use disorder treatment and wellness promotion;
479 (ii) to effectively integrate acupuncture treatment modalities into alternative payment
480 models, including, but not limited to, accountable care organizations, workplace wellness
481 programs and provider organizations established under chapter 224 of the acts of 2012; and
482 (iii) regarding the reimbursement of licensed acupuncturists via third party payors or
483 otherwise to facilitate a stable and sustainable integration of acupuncture services into the
484 broader system of health care delivery.
485 (d) Annually, not later than January 1, the commission shall submit to the secretary of
486 health and human services and the joint committee on public health a report of its findings,
487 recommendations and any draft legislation to implement those recommendations.
488 Section 251. (a) As used in this section, the term “provider immunization brand choice”
489 shall mean that healthcare providers shall select specific manufacturer brands for their patients.
490 (b) Notwithstanding section 24N and any other general or special law to the contrary, the
491 department shall implement a provider immunization brand choice requirement as part of: (i) the
492 commonwealth’s universal immunization program under section 24I; (ii) routine childhood
493 immunizations under section 24N; (iii) the Vaccines for Children Program operated by the
494 department under the authority of 42 U.S.C. §1396s; and (iv) in any other existing or future
495 immunization program for children or adults administered by the commonwealth using local,
496 state or federal funds.
497 (c) For all categories of immunizations included in subsection (a), all participating health
498 care providers shall be able to select any brand or type of immunization, including any
303

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
499 combination immunization and dosage form, as long as the immunization is licensed or
500 authorized for emergency use by the federal Food and Drug Administration and recommended
501 by the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention Advisory Committee on Immunization
502 Practices. The department shall not limit the ability of such health care providers to provide an
503 immunization by limiting the supply of immunizations purchased by the department. This
504 section shall not apply in the event of a shortage or delay in vaccine availability, disaster or
505 public health emergency, terrorist attack, hostile military or paramilitary action or extraordinary
506 law enforcement emergency.
507 (d) The department shall, for the purposes of the purchase, delivery and administration of
508 vaccines, use the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention vaccine list established, and
509 periodically reviewed and revised, by the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention
510 Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices.
511 SECTION 36. Chapter 118E of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
512 section 10Z the following section:-
513 Section 10AA. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context
514 clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
515 “Health care provider”, as defined in section 1 of chapter 111.
516 “HIV”, human immunodeficiency virus.
517 “HIV prevention drug”, any pre-exposure prophylaxis drug approved for the prevention
518 of HIV by the federal Food and Drug Administration, including any ancillary or support health
519 service determined by the secretary of health and human services to be necessary to: (i) ensure
520 that a drug is prescribed or administered to a person who is not infected with HIV and has no
521 medical contraindications to the use of a drug; and (ii) monitor a person to ensure the safe and
522 effective ongoing use of a drug through: (A) office visits; (B) laboratory testing; (C) testing for a
523 sexually transmitted infection; (D) medication self-management and adherence counseling; or
524 (E) any other health service specified as part of comprehensive HIV prevention drug services by
525 the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services, the federal Centers for Disease Control and
526 Prevention, the United States Preventive Services Task Force or an equivalent state-authorized
527 body with responsibility to identify health services that are components of comprehensive HIV
528 prevention drug services.
529 (b) The division and its contracted health insurers, health plans, health maintenance
530 organizations, behavioral health management firms and third-party administrators under contract
531 to a Medicaid managed care organization, accountable care organization or primary care
532 clinician plan shall provide coverage for an HIV prevention drug. There shall be no: (i) patient
533 cost sharing; or (ii) prior authorization, step therapy or any other protocol that could restrict or
534 delay the dispensing of any HIV prevention drug.
304

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
535 (c) The division and its contracted health insurers, health plans, health maintenance
536 organizations, behavioral health management firms and third party administrators under contract
537 to a Medicaid managed care organization, accountable care organization or primary care
538 clinician plan shall not refuse, reject or deny a prescription for any covered HIV prevention drug
539 on the basis of the type of health care provider issuing the prescription for an HIV prevention
540 drug or the venue or practice setting of the health care provider issuing the prescription;
541 provided, that the health care provider shall be licensed to prescribe medications.
542 SECTION 36A. Said chapter 118E is hereby further amended by inserting after section
543 67A the following section:-
544 Section 67B. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context
545 clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
546 “Ambulance service”, as defined in section 1 of chapter 111C.
547 “Executive office”, the executive office of health and human services.
548 “Public ambulance service”, ambulance services that are provided by a city or town,
549 county, district or other governmental body and are licensed pursuant to section 6 of chapter
550 111C.
551 (b) The executive office shall implement voluntary programs to increase funding to
552 public ambulance services, including, but not limited to, intergovernmental transfer programs, as
553 authorized under section 1903(w)(6) of the federal Social Security Act, 42 CFR 433.51.
554 (c) Any additional funds received by public ambulance services pursuant to subsection
555 (b) shall not be used to replace other payment commitments between public ambulance services
556 and the commonwealth.
557 SECTION 36B. Section 69 of said chapter 118E, as appearing in the 2024 Official
558 Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following subsection:-
559 (e) Notwithstanding 101 CMR 614.00 and any successor rules or regulations or any other
560 general or special law, rule or regulation to the contrary, the office shall not apply a payment
561 adjustment with respect to a shortfall allocation to a federally qualified community health center
562 established under chapter 147 of the acts of 1995.
563 SECTION 37. The second paragraph of section 24 of chapter 119 of the General Laws,
564 as so appearing, is hereby amended by striking out the fifth sentence and inserting in place
565 thereof the following sentence:- If the identity or whereabouts of a parent is unknown, the
566 petitioner shall, upon motion and with leave of the court, cause notice to be served upon such
567 parent by: (i) publication once in each of 3 successive weeks in any newspaper as the court may
568 order; (ii) publication on a website designed for such purpose for 3 successive weeks; or (iii)
569 through electronic means reasonably calculated to reach the parent as found by the court.
305

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
570 SECTION 38. Chapter 127 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
571 section 17D the following section:-
572 Section 17E. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context
573 clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
574 “County correctional facility”, as defined in paragraph (f) of section 1 of chapter 125.
575 “Health care provider”, as defined in section 1 of chapter 111.
576 “HIV”, human immunodeficiency virus.
577 “HIV prevention drug”, any pre-exposure prophylaxis drug approved for the prevention
578 of HIV by the federal Food and Drug Administration.
579 (b) The superintendent of each state correctional facility and the administrator of each
580 county correctional facility shall ensure that within a reasonable time prior to release each inmate
581 of a state correctional facility and county correctional facility who has been committed to a term
582 of 30 days or more, and who is negative for HIV infection, shall be:
583 (i) provided information and counseling about HIV prevention drugs to prevent HIV
584 acquisition;
585 (ii) evaluated for the benefit of an HIV prevention drug, with the consent of the inmate;
586 (iii) provided with a supply of an HIV prevention drug prior to release, to an eligible
587 inmate with their consent; provided, that the supply of an HIV prevention drug shall, at the
588 inmate’s option, include administration immediately prior to release of the longest duration
589 injectable form of an HIV prevention drug, a 90-day supply of an oral HIV prevention drug, any
590 other clinically appropriate HIV prevention drug or a prescription for such supply to be filled
591 post-release; and
592 (iv) provided with information about requirements for medical monitoring after release to
593 ensure the safe and effective ongoing use of HIV prevention drugs; provided, that each state
594 correctional facility and county correctional facility shall develop and implement a plan to
595 connect each inmate receiving an HIV prevention drug to post-release medical and other services
596 to ensure ongoing HIV prevention therapy upon release.
597 (c) Any pre-release supply of an HIV prevention drug shall be provided at no cost to the
598 inmate.
599 (d) Each state correctional facility and county correctional facility evaluating an inmate
600 for an HIV prevention drug pursuant to subsection (b) shall ensure that information obtained for
601 such evaluation shall be kept confidential between the inmate and medical provider and shall not
602 be shared with security or administrative staff.
306

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
603 (e) The department of correction, in consultation with the department of public health,
604 shall promulgate regulations or issue guidance for the implementation of this section.
605 SECTION 39. Chapter 138 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out
606 section 19G, as appearing in the 2024 Official Edition, and inserting in place thereof the
607 following section:-
608 Section 19G. (a) For the purposes of this section, the following words shall, unless the
609 context clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
610 “Brewery of origin”, any brewery at which a tenant brewer is duly licensed to
611 manufacture malt beverages other than at the host brewer’s premises.
612 “Distillery of origin”, any distillery at which a tenant distiller is duly licensed to
613 manufacture distilled spirits other than at the host distiller’s premises.
614 “Package”, a keg, cask, barrel, bottle, can or other container approved by the United
615 States Department of the Treasury Alcohol and Tobacco Tax and Trade Bureau for malt
616 beverages or distilled spirits.
617 (b)(1) The commission may issue tenant brewer or tenant distiller licenses that authorize
618 the licensee to manufacture or package malt beverages or distilled spirits, respectively, on the
619 premises of a host brewery or host distillery to any individual applicant who is a resident and
620 citizen of the commonwealth or to a corporation, partnership or other entity which complies with
621 the requirements of section 26 and is a holder of a certificate of compliance issued pursuant to
622 section 18B. An applicant for a tenant brewer or tenant distiller license shall provide the
623 commission and the department of revenue with a true copy of the applicable alcoholic beverage
624 notice, permit or registration to manufacture, export and import as issued by the appropriate
625 licensing authority.
626 (2) To be eligible for a tenant brewer or tenant distiller license, the applicant shall: (i) be
627 licensed pursuant to section 18, section 19 or section 19C or a license holder outside the
628 commonwealth that is authorized to manufacture, export and import malt beverages or distilled
629 spirits, respectively; (ii) comply with any federal law regulating the manufacture, export or
630 import of malt beverages or distilled spirits, respectively, as identified by the commission in a
631 written guidance that shall be issued to each host brewer, tenant brewer, host distiller, tenant
632 distiller and wholesaler licensed pursuant to section 18; and (iii) shall have an approved
633 alternating proprietorship arrangement that allows the applicant to use the facilities, equipment
634 and employees of a host brewer or host distiller.
635 (3) A tenant brewer or tenant distiller may import such raw materials as are required
636 solely for the production and packaging of the malt beverages or distilled spirits, respectively,
637 including, without limitation, bulk malt beverages or bulk distilled spirits produced by the tenant
307

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
638 brewer or tenant distiller, respectively, at its brewery or distillery of origin. The bulk malt
639 beverages imported by the tenant brewer and bulk distilled spirits imported by the tenant distiller
640 shall be packaged and shipped back to the tenant brewer’s brewery of origin or tenant distiller’s
641 distillery of origin, or to a wholesaler licensed pursuant to section 18 or to a license holder
642 outside the commonwealth authorized to import malt beverages or distilled spirits designated by
643 the tenant brewer or tenant distiller within 10 days after receipt by the host brewer or host
644 distiller, or, in the case of a tenant distiller who is licensed as a wholesaler under section 18 and
645 operates as a rectifier, to a retailer in the commonwealth licensed to sell distilled spirits at retail.
646 (4) Any product produced or packaged at the host brewer’s or host distiller’s premises
647 shall be removed from such premises within 10 days after the production or packaging process is
648 completed. The finished product shall be returned to the tenant brewer’s brewery of origin or
649 tenant distiller’s distillery of origin, or to a wholesaler licensed pursuant to section 18 or to a
650 license holder outside the commonwealth authorized to import malt beverages or distilled spirits
651 designated by the tenant brewer or tenant distiller, or in the case of a tenant distiller who is
652 licensed as a wholesaler under section 18 and operates as a rectifier, to a retailer in the
653 commonwealth licensed to sell distilled spirits at retail.
654 (c)(1) The commission shall require a tenant brewer and tenant distiller and a host brewer
655 and host distiller to maintain a record or log indicating which equipment is being used at any
656 time by the tenant brewer or tenant distiller in the production or packaging of malt beverages or
657 distilled spirits, respectively, and which employees are working on production or packaging of
658 the tenant brewer’s or tenant distiller’s product. Tenant brewers and tenant distillers shall be
659 subject to the same reporting requirements as host brewers and host distillers.
660 (2) A tenant brewer license and tenant distiller license issued pursuant to this section shall
661 not authorize the licensee to sell malt beverages or distilled spirits, respectively, to any person or
662 entity in the commonwealth other than a wholesaler licensed pursuant to section 18; provided,
663 however, that a tenant distiller who is licensed as a wholesaler under section 18 and operates as a
664 rectifier may sell to a retailer in the commonwealth licensed to sell distilled spirits at retail. A
665 tenant brewer licensee and tenant distiller licensee shall only be authorized to manufacture or
666 package malt beverages or distilled spirits, respectively, pursuant to this section.
667 (d) The annual fee for a license issued under this section shall be $1,000.
668 SECTION 40. Chapter 175 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
669 section 47CCC the following section:-
670 Section 47DDD. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context
671 clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
672 “Cost sharing”, a deductible, coinsurance, copayment and any maximum limitation on the
673 application of such a deductible, coinsurance, copayment or similar out-of-pocket expense.
308

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
674 “Health care provider”, as defined in section 1 of chapter 111.
675 “HIV”, human immunodeficiency virus.
676 “HIV prevention drug”, any pre-exposure prophylaxis drug approved for the prevention
677 of HIV by the federal Food and Drug Administration, including any ancillary or support health
678 service determined by the secretary of health and human services to be necessary to: (i) ensure
679 that a drug is prescribed or administered to a person who is not infected with HIV and has no
680 medical contraindications to the use of a drug; and (ii) monitor a person to ensure the safe and
681 effective ongoing use of a drug through: (A) office visits; (B) laboratory testing; (C) testing for a
682 sexually transmitted infection; (D) medication self-management and adherence counseling; or
683 (E) any other health service specified as part of comprehensive HIV prevention drug services by
684 the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services, the federal Centers for Disease Control and
685 Prevention, the United States Preventive Services Task Force or an equivalent state-authorized
686 body with responsibility to identify health services that are components of comprehensive HIV
687 prevention drug services.
688 (b) Any policy of accident and sickness insurance, as described in section 108, that
689 provides hospital expense and surgical expense insurance that is delivered, issued or
690 subsequently renewed by agreement between the insurer and policyholder in the commonwealth
691 and any group blanket or general policy of accident and sickness insurance, issued under section
692 110, that provides hospital expense and surgical expense insurance and that is delivered, issued
693 or subsequently renewed by agreement between the insurer and the policyholder, within or
694 without the commonwealth, that provides coverage for any HIV prevention drug shall not
695 require: (i) patient cost sharing; or (ii) prior authorization, step therapy or any other protocol that
696 could restrict or delay the dispensing of any HIV prevention drug.
697 (c) Any policy of accident and sickness insurance, as described in section 108, that
698 provides hospital expense and surgical expense insurance that is delivered, issued or
699 subsequently renewed by agreement between the insurer and policyholder in the commonwealth
700 and any group blanket or general policy of accident and sickness insurance, issued under section
701 110, that provides hospital expense and surgical expense insurance and that is delivered, issued
702 or subsequently renewed by agreement between the insurer and the policyholder, within or
703 without the commonwealth, that provides coverage for any HIV prevention drug shall not refuse,
704 reject or deny a prescription for any covered HIV prevention drug on the basis of the type of
705 health care provider issuing the prescription for an HIV prevention drug or the venue or practice
706 setting of the health care provider issuing the prescription; provided, that the health care provider
707 shall be licensed to prescribe medications.
708 SECTION 41. Section 7 of chapter 175M of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
709 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 6, the words “and for the
710 administration of the department” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- for the
309

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
711 administration of the department and for expenditure by the Workforce Productivity Sub-Fund
712 under section 12.
713 SECTION 42. Said section 7 of said chapter 175M, as so appearing, is hereby further
714 amended by striking out, in line 23, the words “and for the administration of the department” and
715 inserting in place thereof the following words:- for the administration of the department and for
716 expenditure by the Workforce Productivity Sub-Fund under section 12.
717 SECTION 43. Said chapter 175M is hereby further amended by adding the following
718 section:-
719 Section 12. (a) For the purposes of this section, the term “eligible applicant” shall mean
720 an employer employing 50 or fewer employees in the commonwealth; provided, that “eligible
721 applicant” shall not include an employer with a plan approved pursuant to section 11.
722 (b) There is hereby established a Workforce Productivity Sub-Fund within the Family
723 and Employment Security Trust Fund established in section 7. Money in the Workforce
724 Productivity Sub-Fund shall be expended by the director for the grant program established
725 pursuant to subsection (c).
726 (c)(1) There is hereby established a grant program to support eligible applicants with
727 costs associated with covering a temporary vacancy due to an employee being on an approved
728 continuous leave.
729 (2) Eligible applicants may apply for a grant pursuant to this subsection in a form and
730 manner prescribed by the department.
731 (3) The department shall competitively award grants to eligible applicants.
732 (d) The director shall promulgate regulations or other guidance necessary for the
733 implementation of this section, including, but not limited to, grant eligibility criteria, how grants
734 will be competitively awarded, amounts of the grants and other information necessary for the
735 administration of the grant program pursuant to subsection (c).
736 SECTION 44. Chapter 176A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
737 section 8DDD the following section:-
738 Section 8EEE. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context
739 clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
740 “Cost sharing”, a deductible, coinsurance, copayment and any maximum limitation on the
741 application of such a deductible, coinsurance, copayment or similar out-of-pocket expense.
742 “Health care provider”, as defined in section 1 of chapter 111.
310

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
743 “HIV”, human immunodeficiency virus.
744 “HIV prevention drug”, any pre-exposure prophylaxis drug approved for the prevention
745 of HIV by the federal Food and Drug Administration, including any ancillary or support health
746 service determined by the secretary of health and human services to be necessary to: (i) ensure
747 that a drug is prescribed or administered to a person who is not infected with HIV and has no
748 medical contraindications to the use of a drug; and (ii) monitor a person to ensure the safe and
749 effective ongoing use of a drug through: (A) office visits; (B) laboratory testing; (C) testing for a
750 sexually transmitted infection; (D) medication self-management and adherence counseling; or
751 (E) any other health service specified as part of comprehensive HIV prevention drug services by
752 the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services, the federal Centers for Disease Control and
753 Prevention, the United States Preventive Services Task Force or an equivalent state-authorized
754 body with responsibility to identify health services that are components of comprehensive HIV
755 prevention drug services.
756 (b) Any contract between a subscriber and the corporation under an individual or group
757 hospital service plan that provides hospital expense and surgical expense insurance, except
758 contracts providing supplemental coverage to Medicare or other governmental programs, that is
759 delivered, issued or renewed by agreement between the insurer and the policyholder, within or
760 without the commonwealth, that provides coverage for any HIV prevention drug shall not
761 require: (i) patient cost sharing; or (ii) prior authorization, step therapy or any other protocol that
762 could restrict or delay the dispensing of any HIV prevention drug.
763 (c) Any contract between a subscriber and the corporation under an individual or group
764 hospital service plan that provides hospital expense and surgical expense insurance, except
765 contracts providing supplemental coverage to Medicare or other governmental programs, that is
766 delivered, issued or renewed by agreement between the insurer and the policyholder, within or
767 without the commonwealth, that provides coverage for any HIV prevention drug shall not refuse,
768 reject or deny a prescription for any covered HIV prevention drug on the basis of the type of
769 health care provider issuing the prescription for an HIV prevention drug or the venue or practice
770 setting of the health care provider issuing the prescription; provided, that the health care provider
771 shall be licensed to prescribe medications.
772 SECTION 45. Chapter 176B of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
773 section 4DDD the following section:-
774 Section 4EEE. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context
775 clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
776 “Cost sharing”, a deductible, coinsurance, copayment and any maximum limitation on the
777 application of such a deductible, coinsurance, copayment or similar out-of-pocket expense.
778 “Health care provider”, as defined in section 1 of chapter 111.
311

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
779 “HIV”, human immunodeficiency virus.
780 “HIV prevention drug”, any pre-exposure prophylaxis drug approved for the prevention
781 of HIV by the federal Food and Drug Administration, including any ancillary or support health
782 service determined by the secretary of health and human services to be necessary to: (i) ensure
783 that a drug is prescribed or administered to a person who is not infected with HIV and has no
784 medical contraindications to the use of a drug; and (ii) monitor a person to ensure the safe and
785 effective ongoing use of a drug through: (A) office visits; (B) laboratory testing; (C) testing for a
786 sexually transmitted infection; (D) medication self-management and adherence counseling; or
787 (E) any other health service specified as part of comprehensive HIV prevention drug services by
788 the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services, the federal Centers for Disease Control and
789 Prevention, the United States Preventive Services Task Force or an equivalent state-authorized
790 body with responsibility to identify health services that are components of comprehensive HIV
791 prevention drug services.
792 (b) Any subscription certificate under an individual or group medical service agreement,
793 except certificates that provide supplemental coverage to Medicare or other governmental
794 programs, issued, delivered or renewed, within or without the commonwealth, that provides
795 coverage for any HIV prevention drug shall not require: (i) patient cost sharing; or (ii) prior
796 authorization, step therapy or any other protocol that could restrict or delay the dispensing of any
797 HIV prevention drug.
798 (c) Any subscription certificate under an individual or group medical service agreement,
799 except certificates that provide supplemental coverage to Medicare or other governmental
800 programs, issued, delivered or renewed, within or without the commonwealth, that provides
801 coverage for any HIV prevention drug shall not refuse, reject or deny a prescription for any
802 covered HIV prevention drug on the basis of the type of health care provider issuing the
803 prescription for an HIV prevention drug or the venue or practice setting of the health care
804 provider issuing the prescription; provided, that the health care provider shall be licensed to
805 prescribe medications.
806 SECTION 46. Chapter 176G of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
807 section 4VV the following section:-
808 Section 4WW. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context
809 clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
810 “Cost sharing”, a deductible, coinsurance, copayment and any maximum limitation on the
811 application of such a deductible, coinsurance, copayment or similar out-of-pocket expense.
812 “Health care provider”, as defined in section 1 of chapter 111.
813 “HIV”, human immunodeficiency virus.
312

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
814 “HIV prevention drug”, any pre-exposure prophylaxis drug approved for the prevention
815 of HIV by the federal Food and Drug Administration, including any ancillary or support health
816 service determined by the secretary of health and human services to be necessary to: (i) ensure
817 that a drug is prescribed or administered to a person who is not infected with HIV and has no
818 medical contraindications to the use of a drug; and (ii) monitor a person to ensure the safe and
819 effective ongoing use of a drug through: (A) office visits; (B) laboratory testing; (C) testing for a
820 sexually transmitted infection; (D) medication self-management and adherence counseling; or
821 (E) any other health service specified as part of comprehensive HIV prevention drug services by
822 the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services, the federal Centers for Disease Control and
823 Prevention, the United States Preventive Services Task Force or an equivalent state-authorized
824 body with responsibility to identify health services that are components of comprehensive HIV
825 prevention drug services.
826 (b) An individual or group health maintenance contract that is issued, delivered or
827 renewed, within or without the commonwealth, that provides coverage for any HIV prevention
828 drug shall not require: (i) patient cost sharing; or (ii) prior authorization, step therapy or any
829 other protocol that could restrict or delay the dispensing of any HIV prevention drug; provided,
830 however, that cost sharing shall be required if the applicable plan is governed by the federal
831 Internal Revenue Code and would lose its tax-exempt status as a result of the prohibition on cost
832 sharing for these services.
833 (c) An individual or group health maintenance contract that is issued, delivered or
834 renewed, within or without the commonwealth, that provides coverage for any HIV prevention
835 drug shall not refuse, reject or deny a prescription for any covered HIV prevention drug on the
836 basis of the type of health care provider issuing the prescription for an HIV prevention drug or
837 the venue or practice setting of the health care provider issuing the prescription; provided, that
838 the health care provider shall be licensed to prescribe medications.
839 SECTION 47. Section 63 of chapter 277 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
840 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the first paragraph the following
841 paragraph:-
842 Notwithstanding the first paragraph, an indictment or complaint for an offense set forth in
843 section 22, 22A, 22B, 22C, 22D, 23, 23A or 23B of chapter 265 may be found and filed at any
844 time after the date of the commission of such offense if the identity of the person who allegedly
845 committed the offense: (i) was identified after the limitation period set forth in this section; and
846 (ii) has been established through a DNA analysis, as defined in section 1 of chapter 22E, using
847 evidence collected at the time of the commission of the offense.
848 SECTION 47A. Item 1599-6063 of section 2 of chapter 268 of the acts of 2022 is hereby
849 amended by striking out the words "that not less than $388,000 shall be expended for the design
850 and installation of heating pumps for the public library in the town of Hudson," and inserting in
851 place thereof the following words:- that not less than $388,000 shall be expended for the design
313

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
852 and installation of heating pumps, or for the purpose of roof repairs and general structural
853 improvements for the public library in the town of Hudson.
854 SECTION 48. Section 81 of chapter 28 of the acts of 2023, as amended by section 96 of
855 chapter 9 of the acts of 2025, is hereby further amended by striking out the word “3-year”, each
856 time it appears, and inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following word:- 4-year.
857 SECTION 49. Section 114 of said chapter 28, as amended by section 98 of said chapter
858 9, is hereby further amended by striking out the figure “2027” and inserting in place thereof the
859 following figure:- 2028.
860 SECTION 49A. Subsection (d) of section 112 of chapter 9 of the acts of 2025 is hereby
861 amended by striking out the figure “2026” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:-
862 2027.
863 SECTION 50. Said chapter 9 is hereby further amended by striking out section 129 and
864 inserting in place thereof the following section:-
865 Section 129. Notwithstanding section 189 of chapter 149 of the General Laws, the
866 comptroller, at the direction of the secretary of administration and finance, may transfer up to
867 $15,000,000 of employer medical assistance contributions from the Commonwealth Care Trust
868 Fund established in section 2OOO of chapter 29 of the General Laws to the Health Safety Net
869 Trust Fund established in section 66 of chapter 118E of the General Laws; provided, however,
870 that this transfer may be in addition to any other transfers from said Commonwealth Care Trust
871 Fund to said Health Safety Net Trust Fund required in fiscal year 2026.
872 SECTION 51. (a) The department of elementary and secondary education, in
873 consultation with the operational services division, the department of public utilities and the
874 registry of motor vehicles, shall study the special education school transportation marketplace to
875 identify areas to improve the vendor marketplace for special education transportation to ensure
876 open and free competition.
877 (b) The study shall include, but shall not be limited to: (i) an analysis of pricing data from
878 school districts; (ii) an analysis of vendor financial information; (iii) other states’ models for out-
879 of-district special education school transportation; (iv) the feasibility and efficacy of establishing
880 a rate structure for special education transportation providers; and (v) any other information
881 necessary to identify solutions to address the lack of competition in the marketplace.
882 (c) Not later than July 1, 2027, the department of elementary and secondary education, in
883 consultation with the operational services division, the department of public utilities and the
884 registry of motor vehicles, shall submit a report of its findings to the chairs of the joint
885 committee on education.
314

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
886 SECTION 51A. (a) There is hereby established a special commission to study and report
887 on the appropriate level and structure of dental benefits provided by MassHealth and the health
888 safety net. The commission shall evaluate whether the MassHealth and the health safety net
889 dental benefits are clinically appropriate, financially sustainable and sufficient to ensure access
890 to medically necessary dental services.
891 (b) The commission shall consist of the following 17 members: the secretary of health
892 and human services or a designee, who shall serve as chair; the undersecretary of MassHealth or
893 a designee; the commissioner of public health or a designee; the chairs of the joint committee on
894 health care financing; the chairs of the joint committee on public health; 1 member appointed by
895 the minority leader of the house of representatives; 1 member appointed by the minority leader
896 of the senate; 1 member who is a representative of Massachusetts Dental Society; 1 member who
897 is a representative of Health Care for All, Inc.; 1 member who is a representative of The
898 Massachusetts League of Community Health Centers, Inc.; 1 member who is a representative of
899 the Massachusetts Health and Hospital Association, Inc.; and 4 members to be appointed by the
900 governor, 1 of whom shall be a representative of an oral health advocacy organization and 3 of
901 whom shall be dental providers that participate in MassHealth.
902 (c) The commission shall: (i) assess the current dental benefit structure, including
903 covered services and utilization among adult populations; (ii) evaluate alternative benefit
904 designs, including, but not limited to, dollar limits, defined service packages or other models and
905 their clinical appropriateness; (iii) examine the impact of benefit structures on patient outcomes,
906 including access to preventive, restorative and emergency services, oral health status and unmet
907 need; (iv) assess impacts on providers and other health resources, including participation in
908 MassHealth, financial viability, administrative burden, capacity and emergency care; (v) analyze
909 geographic variation in access to care and identify areas with provider shortages; (vi) evaluate
910 how benefit design influences provider enrollment and participation, including barriers and
911 opportunities; (vii) consider the needs of underserved populations and assess how benefit design
912 affects disparities in access and outcomes; and (viii) review best practices from other state
913 Medicaid programs and relevant national standards.
914 (d) Not later than January 1, 2027, the commission shall file its report and
915 recommendations with the clerks of the house of representatives and the senate, the house and
916 senate committees on ways and means, the joint committee on health care financing and the joint
917 committee on public health. The commission’s recommendations shall include, but shall not be
918 limited to, the appropriate level and structure of benefits, including changes to covered services,
919 limits or reimbursement based on the study and review of benefits pursuant to subsection (c).
920 SECTION 51B. (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the
921 Massachusetts Department of Transportation shall conduct a comprehensive transit service
922 assessment of the feasibility of establishing direct rapid bus transit between Kendall Square in
923 the city of Cambridge, the Allston and North Brighton sections of the city of Boston and the
924 Longwood medical area in the city of Boston.
315

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
925 (b) The assessment shall: (i) identify the transit infrastructure that needs to be preserved
926 for direct rapid bus transit alternatives between Kendall Square in the city of Cambridge, the
927 Allston and North Brighton sections of the city of Boston and the Longwood medical area in the
928 city of Boston; (ii) review the prospect of constructing and operating on existing rights of way;
929 (iii) analyze the impact of planned, designed, funded or under construction transportation or
930 development projects nearby; (iv) identify the potential market for such transit services; and (v)
931 evaluate the potential economic benefits to the region and to the commonwealth.
932 (c) The department shall make recommendations on a preferred route and how to
933 preserve the transit infrastructure necessary for direct rapid bus transit alternatives between
934 Kendall Square in the city of Cambridge, the Allston and North Brighton sections of the city of
935 Boston and the Longwood medical area in the city of Boston, taking into consideration nearby
936 transportation and development projects that have been studied, designed, funded or are under
937 construction. Not later than July 1, 2027, the department shall file a report with the clerks of the
938 house of representatives and the senate, the house and senate committees on ways and means and
939 the joint committee on transportation.
940 SECTION 51C. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, not later
941 than October 1, 2026, the Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority shall enter into a lease
942 agreement with the Friends of the Weston Depot for the use of the parcel or parcels of land
943 located at 55 Church street in the town of Weston on which the Weston railroad station sits.
944 SECTION 52. Notwithstanding section 2OOO of chapter 29 of the General Laws or any
945 other general or special law to the contrary, in fiscal year 2027, the comptroller, at the direction
946 of the secretary of administration and finance, may transfer to the Commonwealth Care Trust
947 Fund, established in said section 2OOO of said chapter 29, an amount not to exceed the amount
948 equal to the cost of the fourth year of the pilot program established in section 81 of chapter 28 of
949 the acts of 2023 from funds attributable to the federal financial participation received by the
950 commonwealth for designated state health program expenditure.
951 SECTION 52A. (a) Notwithstanding paragraph (i) of subdivision (4) of section 5 of
952 chapter 32 of the General Laws, an active or inactive member of the teachers’ retirement system
953 or the Boston retirement system who: (i) is a teacher or school nurse; (ii) became eligible for
954 membership in the teachers’ retirement system before July 1, 2001; (iii) began contributing to the
955 teachers’ retirement system before July 1, 2001; and (iv) did not provide a written election to
956 participate in the alternative superannuation retirement benefit program provided under said
957 subdivision (4) to the teachers’ retirement system or the Boston retirement system before July 1,
958 2001 or at any other time prior to September 1, 2026 or declined to participate in the alternative
959 superannuation retirement benefit program before July 1, 2001 or at any other time prior to
960 September 1, 2026, shall have a new 1-time opportunity to elect to participate in the alternative
961 superannuation retirement benefit program. A member entitled to make an election under this
962 section shall have 180 days from the effective date of this act to make such election.
963 (b) A member who participates in the alternative superannuation retirement benefit
964 program under this section shall make contributions at the rate of 11 per cent pursuant to section
316

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
965 22 of chapter 32 of the General Laws and may be required to provide make-up contributions at
966 the rate of 11 per cent, upon such terms and conditions as the relevant retirement system may
967 require, from the date that such member established membership in the teachers’ retirement
968 system or the Boston retirement system.
969 (c) The teachers’ retirement system and the Boston retirement system shall notify eligible
970 active or inactive members of the teachers’ retirement system and the Boston retirement system
971 and shall provide information to school districts concerning the 1-time opportunity pursuant to
972 subsection (a); provided, that the teachers’ retirement system and the Boston retirement system
973 shall provide sufficient information pursuant to subsections (a) and (b) not later than 90 days
974 after the effective date of this act.
975 SECTION 53. (a) Notwithstanding section 53 of chapter 118E of the General Laws or
976 any other general or special law to the contrary, beginning in fiscal year 2027, the executive
977 office of health and human services may determine the extent to which to include within its
978 covered services for adults the federally-optional dental services that were included in its state
979 plan or demonstration program in effect on January 1, 2002 and the dental services that were
980 covered for adults in the MassHealth basic program as of January 1, 2002.
981 (b) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, beginning in fiscal year
982 2027, the executive office of health and human services may impose coverage caps, changes,
983 exclusions or limitations on its coverage of dental services for adults on a per patient basis or in
984 aggregate; provided, that no coverage cap, change, exclusion or limitation shall result in any cap
985 of less than $1,750 on covered services for adults.
986 (c) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, beginning in fiscal year
987 2027, the health safety net office established in section 65 of chapter 118E of the General Laws
988 may impose caps, changes, exclusions or limitations on its total payments for dental services for
989 adults on a per patient basis or in aggregate; provided, that no coverage cap, change, exclusion or
990 limitation shall result in any cap of less than $1,750 on covered services for adults.
991 SECTION 54. (a) For the purposes of this section, “HDAP” shall mean the HIV Drug
992 Assistance Program, established under the department of public health and funded in line item
993 4512-0106 of section 2 of chapter 9 of the acts of 2025.
994 (b) Notwithstanding section 66 of chapter 118E of the General Laws or any other general
995 or special law to the contrary, in Health Safety Net fiscal year 2026, the comptroller, at the
996 direction of the secretary of administration and finance, and in consultation with the secretary of
997 health and human services, may transfer to the department of public health or expend an amount
998 not more than the amount required from the Health Safety Net Trust Fund, established in said
999 section 66 of said chapter 118E, for services rendered to Health Safety Net patients participating
1000 in HDAP and any reasonable administrative costs associated with paying for services to such
1001 patients. The secretary of health and human services shall take into consideration supplemental
317

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
1002 rebates received by the commonwealth from drug manufacturers for drugs provided through
1003 HDAP.
1004 (c) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the department of public
1005 health shall use any funds transferred or expended for HDAP from the Health Safety Net Trust
1006 Fund in Health Safety Net fiscal year 2026 exclusively for services rendered to Health Safety
1007 Net patients participating in HDAP and any reasonable administrative costs associated with
1008 paying for services to such patients.
1009 SECTION 55. (a) For the purposes of this section, “HDAP” shall mean the HIV Drug
1010 Assistance Program, established under the department of public health and funded in line item
1011 4512-0106 of section 2.
1012 (b) Notwithstanding section 66 of chapter 118E of the General Laws or any other general
1013 or special law to the contrary, in Health Safety Net fiscal year 2027, the comptroller, at the
1014 direction of the secretary of administration and finance, and in consultation with the secretary of
1015 health and human services, may transfer to the department of public health or expend an amount
1016 not more than the amount required from the Health Safety Net Trust Fund, established in said
1017 section 66 of said chapter 118E, for services rendered to Health Safety Net patients participating
1018 in HDAP and any reasonable administrative costs associated with paying for services to such
1019 patients. The secretary of health and human services shall take into consideration supplemental
1020 rebates received by the commonwealth from drug manufacturers for drugs provided through
1021 HDAP.
1022 (c) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the department of public
1023 health shall use all funds transferred or expended from the Health Safety Net Trust Fund in
1024 Health Safety Net fiscal year 2027 exclusively for services rendered to Health Safety Net
1025 patients participating in HDAP and any reasonable administrative costs associated with paying
1026 for services to such patients.
1027 SECTION 55A. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the bureau
1028 of purchased services in the operational services division shall determine prices for programs
1029 under chapter 71B of the General Laws in fiscal year 2027 by increasing the final fiscal year
1030 2026 price by the rate of inflation as determined by the division. The division shall adjust prices
1031 for extraordinary relief pursuant to 808 C.M.R. 1.06(4). The division shall accept applications for
1032 program reconstruction and special circumstances in fiscal year 2027. The division shall
1033 authorize the fiscal year 2027 price for out-of-state purchasers requested by a program, not to
1034 exceed a maximum price determined by the bureau, by identifying the most recent price
1035 calculated for the program and applying the estimated rate of inflation for each year, as
1036 determined by the bureau pursuant to section 22N of chapter 7 of the General Laws, in which the
1037 rate of inflation is frozen beginning with fiscal year 2004, in a compounded manner for each
1038 fiscal year.
318

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
1039 SECTION 56. Notwithstanding section 189 of chapter 149 of the General Laws, the
1040 comptroller, at the direction of the secretary of administration and finance, may transfer not more
1041 than $15,000,000 of employer medical assistance contributions from the Commonwealth Care
1042 Trust Fund established in section 2OOO of chapter 29 of the General Laws to the Health Safety
1043 Net Trust Fund established in section 66 of chapter 118E of the General Laws; provided, that this
1044 transfer may be in addition to any other transfers from said Commonwealth Care Trust Fund to
1045 said Health Safety Net Trust Fund required in fiscal year 2027.
1046 SECTION 56A. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the
1047 comptroller, at the direction of the secretary of administration and finance, shall transfer
1048 $37,500,000 from the Commonwealth Federal Matching and Debt Reduction Fund established in
1049 section 2EEEEEE of chapter 29 of the General Laws, inserted by section 2 of chapter 214 of the
1050 acts of 2024, to the Health Safety Net Trust Fund established in section 66 of chapter 118E of the
1051 General Laws; provided, that such funds shall be used first to reduce the shortfall, as described in
1052 subsection (b) of section 69 of said chapter 118E, for health safety net fiscal year 2027 and that
1053 any remaining funds may be used to reduce the shortfall in any other open health safety net fiscal
1054 year; and provided further, that the amount equal to any federal financial participation revenues
1055 claimed and received by the commonwealth for eligible expenditures made from said Health
1056 Safety Net Trust Fund with these funds transferred from said Commonwealth Federal Matching
1057 and Debt Reduction Fund shall be credited to said Health Safety Net Trust Fund.
1058 SECTION 56B. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the
1059 comptroller, at the direction of the secretary of administration and finance, shall transfer
1060 $8,000,000 from the Commonwealth Federal Matching and Debt Reduction Fund established in
1061 section 2EEEEEE of chapter 29 of the General Laws, inserted by section 2 of chapter 214 of the
1062 acts of 2024, to the General Fund.
1063 SECTION 57. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the
1064 comptroller, at the direction of the secretary of administration and finance, in consultation with
1065 the secretary of health and human services, may transfer not more than $15,000,000 from the
1066 prescription advantage program in line item 9110-1455 of section 2 and the Health Safety Net
1067 Trust Fund established in section 66 of chapter 118E of the General Laws in fiscal year 2027 to
1068 support the Medicare Saving or Medicare Buy-In programs established in section 25A of said
1069 chapter 118E; provided, however, that the secretary of health and human services shall certify to
1070 the house and senate committees on ways and means, not less than 45 days in advance of the
1071 transfer, in writing, the amount to be transferred and an explanation of the amount of expected
1072 savings to those programs resulting from the transfer.
1073 SECTION 58. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, payments
1074 from the Health Safety Net Trust Fund established in section 66 of chapter 118E of the General
1075 Laws may be made either as safety net care payments under the commonwealth’s waiver
1076 pursuant to section 1115 of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. 1315, or as an adjustment
1077 to service rate payments under Titles XIX and XXI of the federal Social Security Act or a
319

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
1078 combination of both. Other federally permissible funding mechanisms available for certain
1079 hospitals, as defined by regulations of the executive office of health and human services, may be
1080 used to reimburse up to $70,000,000 of uncompensated care pursuant to said section 66 and
1081 section 69 of said chapter 118E using sources distinct from the funding made available to the
1082 Health Safety Net Trust Fund.
1083 SECTION 59. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, not later than
1084 October 1, 2026, and without further appropriation, the comptroller shall transfer from the
1085 General Fund to the Health Safety Net Trust Fund established in section 66 of chapter 118E of
1086 the General Laws the greater of $45,000,000 or 1/12 of the total expenditures to hospitals and
1087 community health centers required pursuant to this act, for the purposes of making initial gross
1088 payments to qualifying acute care hospitals for the hospital fiscal year beginning October 1,
1089 2026. These payments shall be made to hospitals before, and in anticipation of, the payment by
1090 hospitals of their gross liability to the Health Safety Net Trust Fund. Not later than June 30,
1091 2027, the comptroller shall transfer from the Health Safety Net Trust Fund to the General Fund
1092 the amount of the transfer authorized by this section and any allocation of that amount as
1093 certified by the director of the health safety net office established in section 65 of said chapter
1094 118E.
1095 SECTION 60. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, in hospital
1096 fiscal year 2027, the office of the inspector general may expend not more than $1,000,000 from
1097 the Health Safety Net Trust Fund established in section 66 of chapter 118E of the General Laws
1098 for costs associated with maintaining a health safety net audit unit within the office of the
1099 inspector general. The unit shall continue to oversee and examine the practices in hospitals,
1100 including, but not limited to, the care of the uninsured and the resulting free charges. The unit
1101 shall also study and review the Medicaid program pursuant to said chapter 118E, including, but
1102 not limited to, a review of the program’s eligibility requirements, utilization, claims
1103 administration and compliance with federal mandates. The inspector general shall submit a
1104 report to the chairs of the house and senate committees on ways and means on the results of the
1105 audits and any other completed analyses not later than March 1, 2027.
1106 SECTION 61. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, nursing
1107 facility rates effective on October 1, 2026, pursuant to section 13D of chapter 118E of the
1108 General Laws, may be developed using the costs of calendar year 2023.
1109 SECTION 62. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for fiscal year
1110 2027, $123,500,000 shall be considered operating assistance and distributed to regional transit
1111 authorities from line item 1595-6370 of section 2E. For fiscal year 2027, $94,000,000 of the
1112 amount transferred in said line item 1595-6370 of said section 2E shall be distributed based on
1113 fiscal year 2026 distributions in accordance with the updated fiscal year 2026 bilateral
1114 memorandum of understanding between each regional transit authority and the Massachusetts
1115 Department of Transportation; provided, however, that each regional transit authority shall
320

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
1116 receive operating assistance from said line item 1595-6370 of said section 2E of not less than the
1117 amount received in fiscal year 2026. The Massachusetts Department of Transportation may
1118 require each regional transit authority to provide data on ridership, customer service and
1119 satisfaction, asset management and financial performance, including farebox recovery, and shall
1120 compile any such collected data into a report on the performance of regional transit authorities
1121 and detail each authority’s progress towards meeting the performance metrics established in each
1122 memorandum of understanding.
1123 SECTION 63. Notwithstanding section 59 of chapter 23K of the General Laws or any
1124 other general or special law to the contrary, 100 per cent of the revenue received from a category
1125 1 license, as defined in section 2 of said chapter 23K, pursuant to subsection (a) of section 55 of
1126 said chapter 23K, in fiscal year 2027 shall be transferred as follows:
1127 (i) 31.5 per cent to the Gaming Local Aid Fund established in section 63 of said chapter
1128 23K;
1129 (ii) 20 per cent to the Commonwealth Transportation Fund established in section 2ZZZ of
1130 chapter 29 of the General Laws;
1131 (iii) 20 per cent to the Education Fund established in section 64 of said chapter 23K;
1132 (iv) 13 per cent to the Gaming Economic Development Fund established in section
1133 2DDDD of said chapter 29;
1134 (v) 5 per cent to the Public Health Trust Fund established in section 58 of said chapter
1135 23K;
1136 (vi) 4 per cent to the Community Mitigation Fund established in section 61 of said
1137 chapter 23K;
1138 (vii) 2.5 per cent to the Race Horse Development Fund established in section 60 of said
1139 chapter 23K;
1140 (viii) 2 per cent to the Massachusetts Cultural and Performing Arts Mitigation Trust Fund
1141 established in section 2HHHHH of said chapter 29; and
1142 (ix) 2 per cent to the Massachusetts Tourism Trust Fund to fund tourist promotion
1143 agencies under subsection (b) of section 13T of chapter 23A of the General Laws.
1144 SECTION 64. (a) Notwithstanding section 5G of chapter 29 of the General Laws, the
1145 excess capital gains threshold for fiscal year 2027 shall be $2,250,000,000.
1146 (b) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for fiscal year 2027, the
1147 comptroller shall transfer capital gains collected in excess of the threshold pursuant to section 5G
1148 of chapter 29 of the General Laws, as provided in subsection (a), for fiscal year 2027, on a
321

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
1149 quarterly basis as follows: (i) 15 per cent to the Commonwealth’s Pension Liability Fund
1150 established in subsection (e) of subdivision (8) of section 22 of chapter 32 of the General Laws,
1151 which shall satisfy the fiscal year 2027 requirements set forth in subdivision (1) of section 22C
1152 of said chapter 32; (ii) 20 per cent to the Commonwealth Stabilization Fund established in
1153 section 2H of said chapter 29; and (iii) 65 per cent to the State Retiree Benefits Trust Fund
1154 established in section 24 of chapter 32A of the General Laws.
1155 SECTION 65. (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for fiscal
1156 years 2027 through 2031, inclusive, annually all sheriff’s offices shall submit full-time employee
1157 caps to the executive office for administration and finance. The submission shall be in a form to
1158 be determined by the executive office.
1159 (b) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for fiscal year 2027 and
1160 consistent with current law, including, but not limited to, sections 26 and 27 of chapter 29 of the
1161 General Laws, no sheriff’s office shall spend into deficiency; provided, that if a sheriff’s office
1162 requires supplemental funding, said sheriff’s office shall submit sufficient documentation of the
1163 need to the executive office for administration and finance and the comptroller’s office prior to
1164 any supplemental budget being filed by the governor. The general court will not act on any
1165 supplemental budget spending until the sheriff’s office has submitted documentation to the
1166 executive office.
1167 SECTION 66. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, prior to
1168 transferring the consolidated net surplus in the budgetary funds for fiscal year 2027 to the
1169 Commonwealth Stabilization Fund pursuant to section 5C of chapter 29 of the General Laws, the
1170 comptroller shall transfer $14,000,000 from the General Fund to the Disaster Relief and
1171 Resiliency Fund established in section 2HHHHHH of said chapter 29.
1172 SECTION 67. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the amounts
1173 transferred pursuant to subdivision (1) of section 22C of chapter 32 of the General Laws shall be
1174 made available for the Commonwealth’s Pension Liability Fund established in section 22 of said
1175 chapter 32. The amounts transferred pursuant to said subdivision (1) of said section 22C of said
1176 chapter 32 shall meet the commonwealth’s obligations pursuant to said section 22C of said
1177 chapter 32, including retirement benefits payable by the state employees’ retirement system and
1178 the state teachers’ retirement system, for the costs associated with a 3 per cent cost-of-living
1179 adjustment pursuant to section 102 of said chapter 32, for the reimbursement of local retirement
1180 systems for previously authorized cost-of-living adjustments pursuant to said section 102 of said
1181 chapter 32 and for the costs of increased survivor benefits pursuant to chapter 389 of the acts of
1182 1984. The state board of retirement and each city, town, county and district shall verify these
1183 costs, subject to rules that shall be adopted by the state treasurer. The state treasurer may make
1184 payments upon a transfer of funds to reimburse certain cities and towns for pensions of retired
1185 teachers, including any other obligation that the commonwealth has assumed on behalf of a
1186 retirement system other than the state employees’ retirement system or state teachers’ retirement
322

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
1187 system, including the commonwealth’s share of the amounts to be transferred pursuant to section
1188 22B of said chapter 32. The payments under this section shall be made only pursuant to
1189 distribution of money from the Commonwealth’s Pension Liability Fund and any distribution,
1190 and the payments for which distributions are required, shall be detailed in a written report
1191 prepared quarterly by the secretary of administration and finance and submitted to the house and
1192 senate committees on ways and means and the joint committee on public service in advance of
1193 the distribution. Distributions shall not be made in advance of the date on which a payment is
1194 actually to be made. If the amount transferred pursuant to said subdivision (1) of said section
1195 22C of said chapter 32 exceeds the amount necessary to adequately fund the annual pension
1196 obligations, the excess amount shall be credited to the Pension Reserves Investment Trust Fund
1197 established in subdivision (8) of said section 22 of said chapter 32 to reduce the unfunded
1198 pension liability of the commonwealth.
1199 SECTION 68. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for fiscal year
1200 2027, the secretary of administration and finance shall direct the comptroller to take any
1201 measures necessary to retain within the General Fund interest earnings that would otherwise be
1202 deposited into or otherwise be attributed to a fund, trust fund or other separate account, whether
1203 established administratively or by law, including a separate account established under section 6
1204 of chapter 6A of the General Laws. The secretary and comptroller shall report to the house and
1205 senate committees on ways and means 45 days before any such action taken pursuant to this
1206 section. The request shall certify that the secretary, in consultation with the comptroller, has
1207 determined that the balance, or a specified part of the balance, is not necessary for the purposes
1208 for which it was made available.
1209 SECTION 69. Notwithstanding section 5H of chapter 29 of the General Laws or any
1210 other general or special law to the contrary, for fiscal year 2027, all abandoned property net
1211 revenue, as defined in said section 5H of said chapter 29, shall remain in the General Fund.
1212 SECTION 70. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, not later than
1213 December 31, 2026, the comptroller shall transfer $1,000,000 into the Workforce Productivity
1214 Sub-Fund established in section 12 of chapter 175M of the General Laws from the Family and
1215 Employment Security Trust Fund established in section 7 of said chapter 175M.
1216 SECTION 71. The working group established pursuant to line item 4000-0601 of section
1217 2 of chapter 140 of the acts of 2024 shall continue to develop recommendations, in addition to
1218 those filed in the personal care attendant working group reports finalized on February 28, 2025
1219 and November 14, 2025. The working group shall submit updated recommendations consistent
1220 with requirements in line item 4000-0601 in section 2 of this act to convene and consult with the
1221 executive office of health and human services to identify savings in addition to those identified
1222 in the November 14, 2025 report to effectuate the long-term viability of the personal care
1223 attendant program. Not later than January 1, 2027, the working group shall file said
323

House Ways and Means Committee H.5500
1224 recommendations with the secretary of administration and finance and the house and senate
1225 committees on ways and means.
1226 SECTION 72. Not later than November 9, 2026, the department of public health, in
1227 consultation with the executive office of housing and livable communities, shall adopt rules or
1228 regulations necessary to implement section 34.
1229 SECTION 72A. Not later than October 1, 2026, the executive office of health and
1230 human services shall submit proposals to the federal Center for Medicare and Medicaid Services
1231 pursuant to subsection (b) of section 67B of chapter 118E of the General Laws, inserted by
1232 section 36A, as necessary to make supplemental payments for public ambulance services that
1233 make an intergovernmental transfer.
1234 SECTION 73. Not later than January 1, 2027, the department of elementary and
1235 secondary education, in consultation with the operational services division, shall create a model
1236 procurement template and a model contract for use by school districts for procurement of out-of-
1237 district transportation pursuant to subsection (b) of section 5A of chapter 71B of the General
1238 Laws. The department shall maintain the model documents in the database established in section
1239 5A 1/2 of chapter 71B of the General Laws, inserted by section 33.
1240 SECTION 73A. The department of public health shall implement all or part of the
1241 provider immunization brand choice requirement pursuant to section 251 of chapter 111 of the
1242 General Laws, inserted by section 35, as soon as practicable; provided, however, that the
1243 department shall complete full implementation of the system not later than October 1, 2026.
1244 SECTION 74. The first report required pursuant to subsection (d) of section 250 of
1245 chapter 111 of the General Laws, inserted by section 35, shall be submitted not later than January
1246 1, 2027.
1247 SECTION 75. Sections 20 and 24 to 27, inclusive, shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
1248 SECTION 76. Except as otherwise specified, this act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
324